Harry Sa wondered why there were no SMRT NightRider NR3 at Clarke Quay bus stop at 12:30 and 1:30 a.m. The netizen mentioned that it was the second incident that he had to wait until the final 2 a.m. NR3 service. He said that SMRT should inform commuters should there be changes in bus timings.
siaolang~ claimed seeing two huge trolleys inside an MRT train brought in by a female passenger during the morning rush hour. Several netizens wondered how two huge trolleys could be taken inside the train without being noticed by security officers or station staff. Some asked the thread starter to post photos of the trolleys to prove that his/her story was real. Others said that MRT staff should not allow the passenger to bring in the trolleys.
The Public Transport Council (PTC) has detailed a series of suggestions on how to improve public transport for commuters in its first advisory report released on Monday (Aug 1).PTCs recommendations cover four main themes: Making public transport inclusive for all; providing more information to commuters; improving the design of the public transport system, and deepening the human touch in public transport. In total, there are 17 recommendations.Among the recommendations were to review the Land Transport Authoritys (LTA) policy on open strollers on public buses, training of taxi drivers to be able to serve wheelchair users better, including additional information like bus service numbers and the final destination on the new electronic screens, and wider and flatter seats at future bus stops.On his blog, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that he has read the report from PTC and "fully supports their focus on commuters". He also mentioned that he had read commuters strong feedback on making our buses and trains more senior-friendly, child-friendly and more inclusive. As such, the Minister stated that the ministry would continue to make the city the "best place to bring up children and for our seniors", and "strive to put into practice the many useful recommendations contained in it".LTA stated that they would study PTC's recommendations and look into how these could be implemented together with ongoing measures to improve public transportation in Singapore. Some netizens stated that the recommendations by the PTC would not address the real issues in the transport system. Francis considered the recommendations as cosmetic, saying that there should be a reward and penalty system to ensure that bus drivers follow their schedules. Mag Kan said that priority should be given to passengers in wheelchairs instead of strollers. Joseph Tanus suggested reviewing infrastructure such as the bus stops to have extended shelters so that passengers would not be drenched when boarding or alighting during rainy weather. Benson Lin observed that the wheelchair and stroller area should not be used as standing area unless the train or bus was really crowded. Hw Koh believed that a people-centric approach was in the right direction. The netizen hoped to see more provisions for priority seats for seniors at the bus stops and bays. Pang Soon Tan said that authorities should learn from the electronic display system on Hong Kong buses.
testerjp stated that advertising with SMRT was very expensive. The netizen was not surprised why the display monitors at MRT stations were running advertisements 90% of the time rather than train timings. A link to the advertising packages was also shared. cute_togepi said that the netizen should not be complaining about the high advertising cost because it was SMRTs way of increasing revenue instead of asking for higher fares.
In Straits Times forum, writer Seow Joo Heng said that although the defective China-made trains are progressively sent back to their Chinese manufacturer for repair, it was imperative to pre-empt future problems.The writer stated that since the consortium was still delivering new trains to Singapore, they should assure LTA and SMRT that there would be no more defects and that the localised impurity which occurred in the manufacturing process would not happen again.The writer asked whether repairing the trains in Singapore would become an option or if the Government would build a facility that would allow repairs to be done in Singapore. gstalk said that people should avoid taking trains during peak periods to be safe.
Eugene Koh asked SMRT whether the advertisement shared on a Facebook page was legitimate. The advertisement stated that SMRT has 500 vacancies and was offering a salary of US$7,000, and interested applicants should comment with their e-mail ID.
?Shirlene LiJuan? complimented the driver of bus service 854 (3606T) for greeting and thanking passengers who boarded and alighted the bus.
Tay Kai Boon? reported an issue with the route map on train number C151A (set 521/522) as it did not show the correct stop.The netizen mentioned that the map showed City Hall when the train was at Bugis Station.
?Lingling Lin? reported that the female bus captain of SMRT bus service 961 (SMB1434K) asked her passengers for directions to Golden Mile (Beach Road) and also told the passengers that she also drove in the wrong direction earlier. The bus captain made the same mistake again by driving along Nicoll Highway and exiting at the Red Cross headquarters and turning right to Keypoint bus stop. The netizen hoped SMRT could look into the issue . Thomson Lim also saw the same bus which bypassed the bus stop opposite Suntec City. The netizen said that the female bus captain was seen talking to an old man, presumably a random passenger on board the bus.SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Rui Hang Mei? stated that a Hispano Habit Rego bus (TIB1052B) had the worst air-conditioning maintenance. The netizen mentioned that the rear carriage air-conditioner would blow out warm air while accelerating, and would blow out cold air when stopping.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) announced the names of the 10 stations on the East Coast stretch of the Thomson-East Coast Line (TEL) and Downtown Line 3 Extension (DTL3e), after a public poll on the preferred names.LTA consulted partnering Government agencies such as the National Heritage Board, Urban Redevelopment Board and Housing Development Board in finalising the station names. Several netizens were glad that the public was consulted about the station names. Some disapproved of using the name Xilin and suggested replacing it with Changi South, saying that it was difficult to pronounce and that it did not fit into the local landscape. Others rebutted that it was a recognizable local term. Paul Fitzpatrick stated that having stations named Farrer Road and a Farrer Park would only confuse commuters. Heng Kee suggested having only one Marine station instead of having a Marine Parade and a Marine Terrace stations.
Netizens continued to discuss the new appeal submitted by a group of volunteers for the Cross Island Line (CRL) to avoid the Central Catchment Nature Reserve (CCNR) area for fear of damage to the forest and wildlife during its construction. Several netizens stated that the CRL would benefit more people who would need efficient transportation to go work. Others said that there would still be trees in the forest reserve since the line would not take up so much space and new trees could be planted in the area. Some suggested an above ground line running through the CCNR as it could be very therapeutic for commuters to enjoy the greenery, if the construction does not threaten the foliage. Wu Yuan said that destroying the habitats of the fauna would not bring any benefit to humans. Jemma Ong mentioned that the issue should not be whether the line would cut the reserve or route somewhere else but whether so many lines were needed to access different parts of Singapore since Singapore is so small. The netizen wondered why people cannot make a few more transfers on the existing lines or even improve the bus transport system to serve places that are more "isolated".
On Facebook, Singapore Matters shared Steven Lims Facebook post regarding an SMRT taxi driver (SHB900Y) who offered the netizen a free ride. The netizen mentioned flagging down a taxi at Sungei Kadut only to find out it was heading to the opposite direction from where he was headed. The driver, however, proceeded to ask where the netizen was going and offered to drop him off to Kranji MRT station where it would be easier to take a cab or other public transport. Steven Lim offered to pay for the ride, but the cabby refused, saying that it was on his way.
Two SMRT buses were involved in an accident at the Lentor Avenue bus stop as one of the buses hit the back of another SMRT bus. The impact was so strong that several passengers, many of whom were elderly, were tossed about in their seats. 4 passengers were injured in the accident, left shattered glass on the road and caused a 500m traffic jam.Passengers said that the bus in front, service 854, had suddenly jammed on its brakes after it left the bus stop. The driver of the bus behind, service 858, failed to react in time and slammed into the rear of bus service 854.Kok Nee Cheong a bus passenger who was seated near the front claimed that a female commuter tried to stop the first bus just as it was moving off.Said Mr Kok: "Because our injuries were not that severe, some of us wanted to leave.Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President of Corporate Information and Communication, apologized for the accident and said that assistance would be rendered to the injured passengers. Several netizens mentioned that the bus stops along Lentor Avenue was very dangerous. Some stated that if the proper braking distance was observed, the incident would not have occurred. Augustine Gabriel said that SMRT buses were disasters waiting to happen, saying that 8 out of 10 buses he had boarded had reckless drivers. The netizen added that SMRT should review their drivers skills.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? observed that buses of service 911 were still overcrowded and there were longer waiting times despite the deployment of two additional buses to the fleet.
AS1 shared a photo of the crowd at Orchard MRT station on Sunday afternoon (May 29). The netizen wondered whether there was an unannounced problem somewhere along the rail line or was it due to Car-free Day. Several netizens stated that crowding on the MRT was already the norm. luei74 mentioned that a 30-minute delay in train services was not considered a breakdown. Redberries assumed that there were many people taking the MRT because they were already supportive of the car-free day initiative, while MrSinkie95 said that it could be because of the GSS season.
?Alex Goh? shared a photo of a new SMRT bus captain of service 857 (SMB 1393U) being accompanied by a senior bus captain while the bus was on its route at Little India on July 3. Aziz Patangruwi applauded SMRT for keeping up with its good service standard.
Seah Kian Chong, a taxi driver of almost 20 years, believe that there were many unreported cases of fare evasion than official figures indicate. He stated that a taxi driver who had been victimised by a fare evader could report the case to the company and get half the fare reimbursed. Many taxi drivers, however, move on without reporting such cases because of the long process in reporting and getting the fare reimbursed. Fare evasion was also a non-seizable offence, hence a victim who wants the offender charged in court has to waste time and resources to do so. Although the writer approved of the new Government initiative to raise penalties for fare evaders, he stated that it was extremely difficult to apprehend them. The writer suggested implementing a minimum deposit of at least S$10 for passengers at the start of the journey. Alternatively, passengers could be required to hand over an identity card with their photographs and addresses at the start of the journey. Seah Kian Chong said that radical solutions should be used to stop fare evaders as soon as possible. Some netizens suggested requesting for an upfront deposit of the estimated amount of the actual fare, calculated by the distance of the passengers destination. Others said that passengers should present an identity card upon boarding the taxi which was to be scanned by the driver. CT Chew suggested registering the passengers credit card or debit card prior to the trip, which is similar to Uber and Grab where fare evasion was almost impossible. Royston Soon suggested implementing online reporting on fare evasion so that it would be easier for taxi drivers and also having inward cameras so that footage can be used to appeal for information.
qwertyotaku observed that transfer charges from one transport to another had increased from S$0.04 to S$0.08 since last week. The netizen wondered why no announcements were made regarding the increase. S/he asked for an explanation from the LTA, SMRT and SBS Transit. shinkuaku mentioned that his/her fares decreased.serangoon1 said that any increase should be announced by the Public Transport Council.
?Ivan Liu? observed that the cross border bus service 950 from Woodlands to Johor had lower frequencies especially during festive seasons and weekends. The netizen hoped that SMRT could deploy more single-decked buses during festive seasons and weekends, similar to that of SBS Transit bus services 170 and 160.
?Alice Simon? thanked the technicians who helped settle the technical fault and got the Sengkang LRT train moving in less than 15 minutes. Kendrick Teo asked if SMRT could resolve a train fault within 15 minutes similar to SBS Transit for the North-South, East-West and Circle Lines.
?Kaos B. Wolf? stated that anyone working in Singapore whose job scope involved communicating with the public should be able to speak basic English.The netizen recounted being onboard an SMRT feeder bus. S/he pressed the bell to signal the bus captain to stop at the next bus stop but the driver did not stop. The netizen pressed the bell again but the bus continued with the journey. ?Kaos B. Wolf? approached the bus captain when the bus stopped at a traffic light and informed him that s/he needed to alight. S/he was surprised that the bus captain simply stared at him/her and did not respond at all. The bus captain only opened the door after the netizen gestured for him to do so.
The Public Transport Council (PTC) said that there were almost 9,000 fare evasion cases in 2015 but the penalty fee for fare evaders had been unchanged since its introduction in 2008. The regulatory board believed that it was timely to review the penalty fee for fare evaders to ensure that the interests of commuters who pay the correct fare are protected. Several netizens stated that the PTC should also require transport companies to compensate commuters for inconveniences caused during train breakdowns. Others said that the transport system should be improved first rather than targeting fare evaders. Alex Chew said that if the PTC was so concerned about fairness, bus fares would have dropped by much more when oil prices dropped to around US$30 a barrel. Wong Yking mentioned that bus drivers should check if the card readers are in good working condition before starting their bus journey. The netizen added that most of the time card readers were not working properly. ??? mentioned that the Government should also target those people eating and drinking on buses and trains since it could be another source of income, considering that the fine was S$500.
Several forum threads were observed regarding the track fault at Lakeside MRT on the East-West Line. Several netizens stated that the trains were travelling much slower. Some advised commuters to add 15-20 minutes to their travel time when going to the east. Others said that there were long queues at several stations. SpinFire said that the Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan and other Ministers drive their cars to work and did not care about MRT breakdowns. babies_man156 mentioned that Chinese Garden MRT was also very packed with commuters.
Writer Julian Yeo Siu-Kang, a paraplegic, commended the train and bus companies for implementing handicap-accessible facilities in their infrastructure as public transport is an integral part of his outdoor activities.The writer, however, was concerned about taxis as some of the newer taxis have doors that open at a smaller swing angle which hinders the transferring of a disabled passenger. The seats in the taxi were also too deep, which requires more effort for someone like himself to board.He hopes that taxi companies would take due consideration for all passengers, able-bodied or otherwise, when deciding on which new models to introduce and which old models to retire.
GateCrasher observed that there were four Station Managers and six Assistant Station Managers listed on the notice board at Joo Koon MRT station.The netizen was surprised that a small station like Joo Koon had so many managers and assistant managers. In a later post, the netizen claimed that having more managers mean that train fares also have to go up, and this could be used as a justification for pay increase. kooldog59 stated that her comment was unfair, citing that the MRT stations operate from 6a.m. to past midnight 365 days a year and more than 18 hours a day. hfourhappy mentioned that the managers were running on two shifts and that more manpower was needed to man the station especially during disruptions. Other netizens commented that Managers and Assistant Managers were titles given to service staff, and that means that the station only had 10 staff altogether.
SMRT announced that the sleeper replacement programme on the East-West Line (EWL) would be completed by year end.When the project is done, trains will run at normal speeds of up to 80kmh instead of between 40kmh and 60kmh, which has been the case on certain stretches of the line where temporary speed restrictions have been imposed.The temporary speed restrictions allow the new sleepers to settle on the ballast bed when freshly installed.Meanwhile, the early closure arrangements for stations along the EWL, which were facilitated for SMRTs rail renewal works, would end on September 1. Mr Lee Ling Wee, SMRT Trains Managing Director, thanked commuters and residents for bearing with some inconveniences as SMRT worked hard to renew the ageing NSEWL network. Mr Lee added that the renewal will improve the reliability and performance of the NSEWL so that commuters can look forward to a better journey experience. He also said that as a result of the good progress made by SMRTs engineers over the past few months, the planned last phase of early closure of stations is no longer required. Several netizens praised SMRT for improving the rail system. Others hoped that trains would really travel faster and would have shorter intervals after the completion of the sleeper replacement works. Some netizens thanked the workers and contractors for the hard work. Jason Goh asked about the sound barriers that were supposed to be installed.
UK-based bus operator Go-Ahead Singapore raised its minimum monthly starting salary by about 4.6% for all its Singaporean and Permanent Resident bus captains from July 1. The new S$1,950 starting pay applies to existing and newcomers, which was more than the S$1,865 it announced in February. Tower Transit also announced recently that a junior bus captain would receive a basic monthly salary of S$1930 while SBS Transit raised salaries to S$1950.Nigel Wood, Managing Director of Go-Ahead Singapore stated that Go-Ahead Singapore was committed to offering all its staff a competitive employment package. SMRT said that they were working with the National Transport Workers Union to ensure total remuneration and benefits for its bus captains remain competitive. SMRT has offered a basic starting salary of S$1,625 for a bus captain as of February this year. Some netizens were concerned that the increase in basic salary of bus captains would eventually result in increase in bus fares. Simon Lim considered the S$1950 monthly starting salary for Singaporeans and PR Go-Ahead bus captains reasonable. Junko Igeta stated that given the cost of living in Singapore, the wage increase was fair. S/he mentioned that people should accept if a fare hike comes as a result of the salary increase.
On Facebook, SMRT stated that some residents staying near the tracks might have heard trains running in the early hours of the morning, as most of the tests could only be carried out during non-service hours, while they were on the final stages of tests of the new signalling system on the North-South Line (NSL). SMRT announced that from 1:30 to 4 a.m. on Mar 13, tests would be conducted with up to 10 trains running on the NSL between Jurong East and Ang Mo Kio in both directions. On Mar 15, tests would be conducted with up to 10 trains running on the NSL between Sembawang and Marina South Pier in both directions from 1:30 to 4 a.m.The operator apologised for the inconvenience it may cause, and assured the public that their project team was doing its best to keep noise levels to a minimum. reiko shared SMRTs tweet regarding the tests that would be conducted between Jurong East and Ang Mo Kio. Ljc Lim thanked SMRT and LTA for the hard work done. The netizen, however, asked SMRT to also improve the North-South and East-West Lines platforms by installing more display screens so commuters would know the train arrival times, and having announcements in all four official languages. Jason Goh asked when SMRT would install the sound barriers towards Pasir Ris Station. The netizen stated that during a dialogue between the residents, Members of Parliament and the LTA in 2013, SMRT stated that barriers would be installed in 2014 but the barriers had yet to be installed. ??? speculated that more frequent train service disruptions would be expected.
scroobal claimed that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) would be restructured after the controversial awarding of contact to the consortium of Kawasaki Heavy Industries Ltd, Kawasaki Heavy Industries (S) Pte Ltd and CSR Qingdao Sifang Locomotive and Rolling Stock Co. Ltd which supplied defective trains to SMRT.The contributor mentioned that a few of the main reasons for the restructuring were the errors made by LTA in taking on roles such as procurement and maintenance which directly conflicted with its role as a regulator, as well as forming joint teams with SMRT which breached the basic risk management principle of clear separation of roles. Satyr mentioned that the LTA should have done a better job since it had one of the most highly educated and best compensated administrations in the world. ckmpd believed that the restructuring was just a way to distract and divert attention from the Governments mistakes. The netizen added that the Governments main aim was to dilute issues and create buzz elsewhere to divert the attention of the public.
reiko shared a photo of SMRT bus captains being treated to dinner by celebrity Chef Sam Leong, who had been taking his mobile kitchen to prepare dinners for people in various occupations.
Bin Xian Tan highlighted two issues with the new C830C trains on the Circle Line: 1) the dynamic map display was turned off for most C830C trains and asked if SMRT was conserving energy on purpose, and 2) the old announcement was still being used for all C830C trains. The stations like Promenade, Botanic Gardens and Bayfront were not updated to the Downtown line announcement.The netizen hoped that the issues would be resolved soon.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan observed that since news emerged about the sending of a batch of new MRT trains back to China to rectify a defect, the Ministry of Transport and the LTA have appeared eager to downplay the episode.Both have declared that the reported imperfections were merely "hairline cracks found on the surface" of the car-body bolster - an aluminium alloy structure under the train carriage.He mentioned that using words like "routine" to describe what happened, and to compare the cracks on the train body to hairline cracks which often appear on a newly plastered wall, the Transport Ministry risked giving some the impression that it was taking the serious problem lightly.Tan stated that cracks do not always happen catastrophically. They may begin as hairlines but if impurities in the metal was the cause, the entire structure may weaken over time as trains were subject to enormous stress.He added that there was nothing routine about the incident since none of the MRT trains has had cracks before. Several netizens stated that the hairline cracks could eventually become catastrophic. Some said that the word routine meant that the cracks had happened frequently. Sangha Vandana wondered whether the LTA inspected the manufacturers factory and assessed for possible defects before the trains were allowed to be shipped to Singapore. Lahh Tay praised the LTA and SMRT staff for being sharp enough to spot the minor hairline cracks when the trains were shipped in. Margaret Chong reckoned that if the cracks were not uncovered and exposed by a foreign media, nothing would be disclosed to the public.
Tower Transit has redeployed 20 of its bus captains to other positions that suit their skills and qualities better. The workers had signed up to be bus drivers, but were hand-picked during training by their trainers and managers to go for new internal job openings. Their pay would now be 15% or more of the basic monthly pay of S$1,950 that bus captains receive.Among those promoted was Shanmugam Ramasamy who has taken on the position of associate bus driver trainer. Shanmugam was grateful to Tower Transit for the opportunity and for recognising the efforts of its employees.Similarly, Abdul Rahim Jusof, who previously worked with SMRT for 26 years in various roles, had been promoted to interchange supervisor at Jurong East Bus Interchange. Andrew Bujtor, Managing Director of Tower Transit, said that majority of their experienced operations supervisors and controllers in London and Australia started their careers as bus drivers and progressed through the organisation. Melvin Yong, Executive Secretary of the National Transport Workers Union, said he was happy that a worker was given the opportunity to take on bigger responsibilities through their hard work. Several netizens believed that experienced workers should be given higher positions in the industry. Fadly Azad said that some companies do not promote employees who have been performing well. The netizen pointed out that it is good to work for companies that have a clear progression for employees, value their hard work and see their potential.
IndianChief mentioned that former Transport Minister Lui Tuck Yew came into office in May 2011 and took over Minister Raymond Lim after the delivery of the trains from manufacturer CSR Sifang Locomotive & Rolling Stock Company Ltd (CSR Sifang). The netizen assumed that Raymond Lim was the one in charge when orders for the trains were placed initially. Q_Q_Q_Q believed that the former Ministers of Transport should not be blamed for the defective trains, citing that it was not their job to know the details in the procurement process. ShuaiDaiYanDao reckoned that former Transport Minister Raymond Lim probably bought the defective trains for the East-West Line, but Lui Tuck Yew reordered trains from the same manufacturer for the Thomson-East Coast Line and perhaps for Downtown Line. Medicated Oil believed that the Transport Ministers should be responsible as they were the final authorized signatory for all the contracts involved.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan has set a new target for rail network reliability this year - 200,000km travelled by MRT trains between delays. The goal is to catch up with Hong Kong Mass Transit Railway's performance of 300,000 train-km before a delay.Last year, MRT trains travelled an average of 133,000km before delays of more than five minutes occurred - an improvement of 40% from 2014's 93,000km.Minister Khaw also mentioned several strategies to improve reliability with more "condition monitoring" sensors to be deployed on MRT trains and tracks this year. About a billion dollars would be invested in hardware replacement and upgrading. The skills of rail engineers and maintenance crew were also being beefed up. Most netizens said that they would only believe the Ministers statements after it had been achieved. Andrew Singh stated that Minister Khaw was forcing the maximum breaking point that a train could take without first consulting the manufacturers on the maximum distance load. Joey Yeo asked how the Ministers target translates to something that the people could feel and observe.
A netizen posted online about a male train passenger who shouted at a foreign worker for taking a seat onboard the train. In what was probably an effort to avoid any confrontation, the foreign worker adhered and just sat on the floor by the door. The netizen disapproved of the male passengers behaviour since the foreign worker looked tired and also paid the same fare. Most netizens stated that the male passenger had no right to deprive any train passenger from taking a seat onboard the train. Others wondered why the contributor did not confront the male passenger for his bad behaviour instead of just posting the story online. Some said that it was a one-sided story. A few mentioned that the male passenger should be banned from taking the train. Others stated that the contributor might have chosen to avoid any trouble with the male passenger by not confronting him.
SMRT announced that train services and selected bus services would be extended on 16 Jan for the Chinese New Year Celebrations light-up and opening ceremony in Chinatown.The last trains departing stations like Choa Chu Kang, City Hall, Dhoby Ghaut and HarbourFront would be as late as 12.36 a.m.SMRT also said passengers aboard the last trains could connect to selected bus services at Bukit Batok, Choa Chu Kang, Sembawang, Woodlands and Yishun interchanges, which would be departing as late as 1.45 a.m. on Jan 17.Bus services 61, 190, 851, 961 and 970 would be temporarily diverted on Jan 16 from 2 to 11 p.m. due to road closures for the Chinatown Chinese New Year celebrations. Ramnarayan Natarajan stated that longer operating hours was not the issue but the efficiency of service. ? ? asked if there would be any breakdowns.
skarfy wrote about the SMRT bus captain of service 966 (SMB1514M) driving at 35km/h on Pan Island Expressway towards Bukit Timah Expressway. He mentioned writing in multiple feedbacks to SMRT in the past but received no satisfactory response. The thread starter mentioned that most loop buses with long journeys have similar issues, particularly SMRT buses. zuoom said that it was technically illegal to drive below the minimum speed on the expressway.
The National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) submitted an appeal to SMRT management against the dismissal of two SMRT staff over a fatal accident that took place at Pasir Ris MRT station on March 22. Member of Parliament Mr Melvin Yong, NTWU's Executive Secretary, said in a media statement that the union had submitted the appeal after reviewing the cases of the two staff.Secretary-General of the National Trades Union Congress (NTUC) Mr Chan Chun Sing had said last Friday (September 16) that the workers would have until this week to submit their appeal, and that union representatives would be meeting with SMRT to discuss the issue. Most netizens believed that NTUC and NTWU were assisting the two dismissed SMRT employees merely because of the publics strong disapproval of the dismissal. Tah Por hoped that the assistance given by NTWU was not simply an act of pretence between them and SMRT. Others believed that the union should assist the dismissed workers to seek compensation if the dismissal would be found unfair or assist them in finding other job opportunities. Ah Soh wondered why only two employees among those involved, including supervisors and seniors, were dismissed from their jobs. Koh Wee Leng asked whether LTA or MOM would conduct a public and transparent investigation on the safety lapses that occurred which led to the demise of two SMRT trainees.
Vivien Chen praised the bus captain of service 176 for waiting for her and her two children after the bus captain saw them rushing to catch the bus.
A netizen claimed that SMRT's upper deck seat counter system could be cheated by moving up and down the stairs quickly. By doing such, the system would not register the movement leading to inaccurate number of seats available being displayed. Daniel Leong mentioned that Hong Kong double-decker buses did not have seat counters.
Connie Tan LiPin stated that the new Woodlands Temporary bus Interchange was not elderly friendly because of its many staircases and long paths. Chua ZT was surprised to see stairs leading to the interchange when the one in Yishun did not have any. The netizen added that getting around the interchange was also difficult because it is quite large.
?Ahh Bel? boarded bus service 858 on Mar 14 around 11:44 p.m. at the Yishun bus stop and noticed that the bus driver, Vasantan, greeted everyone "Good evening" with a smile. The netizen said that the kind gesture made her day and asked SMRT to pass her appreciation to the bus captain. Bus captain Vasantan Vasant also thanked the netizen who commended him.
?Tammy Yap? warned others against using SMRT taxi apps when booking a taxi. The netizen mentioned that out of five advanced bookings, 3 taxis did not appear. She said she made the advanced bookings to avoid missing important appointments.
?Mark Tritaris? mentioned that the air-conditioning on the train from Pasir Ris to Raffles Place was not working. The netizen said that the overcrowding in the train was bad enough, and the lack of air-con made matters worse.
Jason Tan shared photos and a video on SMRTs Facebook Page of an accident between a lorry and an SMRT Taxi. The netizen witnessed how the lorry was driving without the lights on and was weaving in and out of the left-most lane along Farrer Road. The netizen mentioned that the lorry was going relatively fast and grazed the kerb numerous times. The netizen drove at a safe distance and honked continuously to alert pedestrians and other drivers. However, the lorry unfortunately hit an SMRT taxi. The netizen also noticed that the lorry driver was drunk and had alerted the police of the accident.The netizen hoped that SMRT would not ask the taxi driver to pay for the damage to the taxi as the taxi driver was only a victim of a drunk driver.CMC has informed Taxis who will be following up with the taxi partner to show concern and look into his claims.
Police were investigating the case of an SMRT articulated bus driver who swerved across four lanes at a busy traffic junction and crashed into a stationary goods van on Jan 17.In the video clip shared online, the bus looked like it had brushed against a road curb on the left before swerving. Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications apologised for the incident and reported that the bus captain involved had been taken off driving duties. Andrew Singh said that it was not easy to control and drive a bendy bus especially on wet road. Brian Andre Ng believed that double-deckers were more suited to Singapore roads. Eric Ong noticed the the bus seemed to have hit something on the roadside curb before swerving to the right.
?Magnus Matsuo? complimented bus captain of service 970 (SMB134H) for assisting an elderly in alighting the bus.
On The Singapore Daily, it was mentioned that the Government should learn three key lessons from the defective trains incident to improve its public relations team:1. Netizens know more engineering than professional engineers2. Fire cannot be covered with paper3. Better to be frank and upfront as early as possibleThe writer stated that the MRT system is one of the key pillars of our public transport system, and anything that happens to it, whether trains, tunnels, power systems or cables, is something that is of public concern. The writer said that the Governments press statements were issued in dribs and drabs, which only made them seem defensive. He also said that if the issue was not serious, the Government should have been upfront about it. He added that the choice not to be upfront made it even harder for Singaporeans to be convinced that the cracks were not something that they should be seriously concerned about. Aaron Loy said that the Government was extremely sensitive to criticisms and that they were trying to save face.
Netizens continued to discuss the train breakdown on 9 Jan when commuters had to walk on the tracks after a train stalled between Kranji and Marsiling stations. dnsfpl stated in jest that walking on the tracks could be a tourist attraction in 2017. The netizen mentioned that the operator could make the train travelling from the airport to Expo randomly breakdown and have the lucky passengers walk on the tracks with their luggage. hfourhappy said that SMRT needs more electricity to ensure that the power source was in top priority. dingster wondered how long SMRT would use power fault as an excuse during breakdowns. kooldog59 said that the root cause of the failures had not been determined.
Seul Lim? stated that the frequency of service 912 was poor and he had to wait 25 minutes for the bus.
Muhd Hafiz? shared a photo of SMRT bus with plate number SG5052E in a minor accident near Bukit Panjang Plaza. (buses[IN]gapore!) stated that accidents could happen anytime and anywhere. The netizen assumed that the bus captain was not familiar in driving a Volvo bus.
The prospect of regulating ride-sharing app companies to ensure protection of commuters interests, promote healthy competition and level the playing field for taxi drivers was under review by the Ministry of Transport (MOT). Manpower Correspondent Toh Yong Chuan wrote on The Straits Times that the MOT should also review how fares were set by Uber and GrabCar, including the surge in fares during peak hours and how drivers were screened. The writer added that regulation was necessary but should not hinder the progress of technology or stifling innovation. To commuters, taking away the convenience, better services and occasional lower fares that Uber and GrabCar provide was seen as a step backwards. Several netizens stated that taxi services should be improved instead of regulating third-party booking app companies. Others said that Uber and GrabCar offered better services than taxis. George Hess mentioned using Uber because the drivers were more pleasant, has nicer cars and cheaper fares. Ady Goh B S said that taxi drivers have horrible attitudes.
On Mar 19, SMRT announced that there was no train service between Kent Ridge and HarbourFront stations along the Circle Line due to a signal fault.Normal services resumed at around 8:23 p.m. Some netizens wondered why the Circle Line broke down when the line was rather new. Sharmini Nair wondered if there was a month or so that the train did not break down, or had issues. The netizen said that at this rate commuters should be traveling for free instead of paying for inconvenience.
Tan Kin Lian wondered whether a city of 700-square kilometers like Singapore needed 375 bus services. He mentioned that most commuters knew only a few services and might be lost when they have to take any unfamiliar services, unless they have a mobile app. He added that the five MRT lines seemed to cover most of Singapore already. Tan stated that it should be possible to have 50 bus services to provide connections between all the towns in Singapore and commuters could change to a feeder bus within each town. He said that Singapore should be organised into eight regions and have 56 bus services to provide direct connections from one region to another. A region could comprise of a few towns that were closed to each other. By reducing the number of stops for the major bus services, and leaving the feeder service to smaller capacity buses, traveling time could be reduced. Tan believed that such a scheme would lead to a better bus traveling experience instead of needing to take crowded MRT trains. Tan Albert stated that buses on many routes were also very crowded.
Bus captains from SBS Transit and SMRT would be deployed temporarily to assist Go-Ahead Singapore after the new bus operator found itself short of staff less than three weeks after launching its services.In a media release on September 20, Go-Ahead said it requested for help due to higher-than-expected staff attrition as well as the fine-tuning of its schedules. It said the short-term sub-contracting arrangement would last about two months. 30 SBS Transit bus captains would be deployed at Loyang Depot from Wednesday to operate services 358 and 359, while SMRT would send 10 bus captains to assist Go-Ahead.In a separate statement, NTWU's Executive Secretary Mr Melvin Yong said it is working closely with Go-Ahead, SBST, SMRT and the Land Transport Authority (LTA) to support Go-Ahead's manpower needs during the interim period. Several netizens wondered why some of the bus captains in Go-Ahead had left the company even after the bus operator has increased the basic pay and introduced incentives for the bus captains. Some observed that after LTA implemented the new bus contracting model, there were more irregular arrival frequencies and slower bus travel. Ong Chan mentioned that Go-Ahead should spare a thought for the bus captains who were assigned to drive different routes. The netizen stated that Go-Ahead should change its policies If they want to retain its drivers. Ali Yahya Raee, on the other hand, was impressed with Go-Ahead because the waiting time for bus service 359 was now down to two minutes compared to the 15-minute wait when SBS Transit was still operating the service.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian stated that after the General Elections, Khaw Boon Wan was appointed Transport Minister because he had a good record of finding solutions to difficult challenges in the health and national development ministries.Tan Kin Lian, however, noticed that after five months in office, the difficult issues in public transport remain troubling while the Transport Minister seemed to be rather quiet. He assumed that the issues were too difficult to resolve, even for Minister Khaw.Constantine Giam said that the frequent train breakdowns had nothing to do with the Transport Minister or the CEOs of transport companies. The netizen said that the breakdowns could have been caused by poor maintenance and suggested outsourcing foreign experts to do the repair and maintenance jobs.Ting Hoe Keong believed that the CEOs were responsible for the breakdowns because they were in charge of the company and should be aware of what was happening within the company.Tan Albert remarked that the problems were due to the poor management of SMRTs former CEO because of inadequate preventive maintenance. Robert Luo Bo noted that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan made a lot of mistakes in health and housing, questioning why people say that he found solutions.
Netizens continued to discuss the SMRT bus captain who was sentenced to a week in jail for causing an accident that resulted in an elderly passenger's foot being amputated. Many netizens admired Madam Ting for being gracious to the bus captain who caused the accident. May Ong stated that SMRT and SBS Transit should take action against reckless bus captains. Bee Choo suggested that all bus captains be trained to show some compassion for the elderly.
Soulhacker stated that the train on the Circle Line kept stopping and that s/he was already 10 minutes later than his/her usual arrival at work. The netizen hoped that the issue could be rectified before the peak period. beano stated that commuters should not be surprised should there be a disruption since it was already the norm. xboxseller mentioned that there was no problem travelling from Dakota to downtown. diamond_guy said that if the MRT was already having issues at 6 a.m. the engineers who had work the previous night might have slept on the job. Losergeek87 stated that the first train at Botanic Gardens Station on the Circle Line already had issues and passengers had to alight from the front door.
Ellen Chan Lover observed that the frequency of trains during peak hours has been reduced. The netizen said that it was unusual for trains to have four to six minutes interval during peak hours on the North-South and East-West Lines. Ah-Pin-Kor mentioned that intervals of four to six minutes during peak hours was still reasonable. maturestudent said that it was better to have trains arriving between four to six minutes than having no trains arrive at all.
Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan replied to two Parliamentary questions regarding the Bukit Panjang LRT train incident when the train failed to stop and skipped three stations despite the effort of passengers to push the emergency buttons. Minister Khaw stated that there are two ways the passengers could alert or stop the train in an emergency: 1) They could contact the train captain, station staff or the Operations Control Centre (OCC) using the intercom units inside the trains and on station platforms, or use their mobile phones to contact the OCC. The OCC contact numbers are displayed inside the LRT trains; 2) Use the emergency stop buttons at station platforms, intercom units inside MRT trains and the Emergency Next Station Stop buttons inside the trains, to bring the train to a safe stop. Preliminary investigation regarding the incident showed that the Train Stop Antenna was faulty, causing the train to fail to detect that it was arriving at the three stations from Jelapang to Bukit Panjang. Minister Khaw pointed out that the LRT is protected by the Automatic Train Protection (ATP) System which ensures that trains do not exceed the maximum operating speed of 55km/hr and that a minimum safe distance is kept between any two trains at all times. He emphasised that the ATP operates independently of the Train Stop Antenna system. Several netizens expressed concern on the safety of driverless trains. Others asked how often safety systems were checked to ensure that they were operating properly. Vincent goh said that the Transport Minister should know that the impact energy of a moving train could cause horrific damage even at a speed lower than 55km/hr, and that the ATP was an unsound remedial measure.
The Straits Times Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that many people were perplexed by the report that despite the increase in number of major MRT breakdowns, the rail system was more reliable than it has been since 2011 which suggests that there were longer intervals between breakdowns and thus a lower frequency of overall glitches.Christopher Tan stated that theoretically, it was not incorrect to interpret the report as an improvement in reliability. It was difficult, however, for anyone to reconcile an improvement in reliability when major breakdowns have increased.He mentioned that to the commuter, 20 to 30 major breakdowns a year translate to almost once every fortnight. It did not matter if the breakdown was triggered by bad design, poor maintenance or external factors.Besides system reliability, the other thing that affects commuter experience significantly is speed. Low train speed not only frustrates commuters, it also affects the efficiency of the entire network.The writer stated that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) needs to find a measure of the network's reliability that would be credible to commuters and measures the system's health holistically. Several netizens stated that instead of trying to find excuses for the breakdowns, authorities should work on resolving the issues that caused the breakdowns. Some wondered if the report was an April Fools joke. Peter Lim stated that the increase in number of breakdowns showed that the Transport Minister was unable to resolve the issues. The LTA instead was subtly trying to divert attention away from the real issue. Mei Ting applauded SMRT with sarcasm for redefining reliability. jw5 mentioned that although the LTA claimed higher system rail reliability, it was undisputable that the absolute number of breakdowns has increased.
Netizens continued to discuss the air-conditioning vent leak inside the train travelling to Pasir Ris on the East-West Line during the evening rush hour on July 19.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications said that its operations control centre had been alerted to a leak in the air-conditioning system, and staff boarded the train at Commonwealth Station to check the leak and clear up the water. He added that the train was subsequently withdrawn from service and apologized to the affected commuters. Several netizens asked whether the leak was also caused by the hairline crack found on several China-made trains. Others stated with sarcasm that there was nothing to worry about since the leak was not safety-critical.
Yi Ning Leau? asked SMRT why no empty trains were deployed at Ang Mo Kio Station during the morning peak hour. Commuters had to wait for at least three to four trains before they could board. The netizen mentioned that previously an empty train was deployed during the morning peak period.
?Nicola Ra? asked why the air-conditioning on the Circle Line trains were either switched off or turned very low in the mornings. The netizen stated that the heat was quite unbearable especially when it was crowded.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan has been criticised for his Facebook post linking the tragedy involving two young SMRT staff who were killed on the tracks near Pasir Ris station and a milestone for the Downtown Line (DTL).The post, published on Mar 22, began with the DTL milestone before highlighting the SMRT tragedy. Most netizens found Minister Khaws post insensitive. Many stated that the Minister should have posted about the milestone and the SMRT tragedy separately. Some said that the Transport Minister should take responsibility for the death of the two SMRT staff and resign from office. Others mentioned that Minister Khaw should apologise for being insensitive. Sahada Tina stated that it was inappropriate to boast about his achievements as Transport Minister.
Managing Director for SMRT Services Colin Lim and Chairman and Founder of 2getthere Carel van Helsdingen clarified that 2getthere was not in financial difficulty as reported in The Straits Times on May 5. 2getthere was founded as an independent company in 2008 and has no connection to the restructuring of Frog in 2007. Its financial record has demonstrated that the company has been profitable. The transport system installed by 2getthere in the Masdar City project in Abu Dhabi was also an operational system, and it did not get into Phase 2 of the operational system due to the economic downturn in the region. The 2005 collision between two driverless pods at Rivium Business Park in Rotterdam on the other hand, was caused by human error and took place before the start of the day's service. Mr Lim and Mr van Helsdingen assured readers that SMRT conducted its due diligence checks before entering into a joint venture with 2getthere to establish 2getthere Asia. SMRT was also confident of 2getthere's technology offerings and its growth potential in Asia, based on its track record of delivering viable, certified and proven transport solutions. SMRT's partnership with 2getthere is a natural and logical extension of SMRT's public transport operations, and is consistent with the Government's push to make a quantum leap in improving the first- and last-mile connectivity to MRT stations and bus interchanges. Isaac Thang noted that the partnership was to tie in with the Governments broader vision of a car-lite society. The netizen feels that SMRTs investment with Grab in the private-car hire business was contradictory to this statement.
A 70-year-old patient being sent back by an ambulance to a nursing home was injured after a TransCab taxi driver suddenly cut into the path of the ambulance. The ambulance driver had to step on the brakes causing the patient who was sitting on a wheelchair to lose balance and fall, hitting his head on the support railing inside the ambulance. The driver quickly called for another ambulance to send the patient to Singapore General Hospital. Douglas Ho wondered why TransCab drivers have "exemplary" driving skills. The netizen asked if it was part of their recruitment strategy. Sas Karma also wondered who would not give way to emergency vehicles.
A Singapore Civil Defence Force spokesman said they were alerted to the accident at 3:15 p.m. and sent an ambulance. Police had arrested a 64-year-old taxi driver for causing death by a negligent act. Several netizens stated that the LTA should consider implementing compulsory re-testing of all drivers of a certain advanced age to ensure competency and alertness. Kent Kian Long mentioned that Comfort taxi has the most dangerous drivers.
In a forum letter, Koh Shu Yi said that it is understandable if trains break down and cause delays, as all things undergo wear and tear, no matter how advanced the technology is. The writer, however, stated that it was not the delays that frustrate the passengers but the lack of information provided while they wait.The writer was among those affected by the Apr 25 disruption. She said that after the train pulled up into the station, the lights at the station suddenly went out. The train captain made a soft and muffled announcement that no one could understand. Announcements from the station could barely be heard in full as they were also too soft for passengers inside the train to hear.She decided to alight from the train after 10 minutes, only to see chaos in the pitch-black station. She saw SMRT staff members giving out leaflets that were supposed to provide information on alternative ways to travel to other stations. Unfortunately, not all affected stations were listed. Since train breakdowns are becoming rather frequent, the writer said that SMRT should look into how to react in such situations. Train captains and station staff should be trained to give enunciated announcements to explain the cause of delay, as well as an estimated waiting time, so that passengers could decide to continue waiting or look for alternative means of transport. The leaflets on alternative ways to get to other stations should include all affected stations.The writer suggested that within each station, passengers could be grouped according to the different places they intend to travel to, so that staff could help to direct people more efficiently. Qiao Zhi was surprised that stations have no emergency lights. The netizen cited his/her visit to Taiwan, where every shop, retail outlet, restaurant and building were equipped with strategically located battery operated emergency lighting. The netizen added that customer service staff on duty at the station should be equipped with plastic helmets with head lamps so the staff would be easily visible to commuters who need assistance.
Netizens continued to discuss the complaint by Firdaus Wahid on September 19 for the lack of leadership, communication, and proper protocols at Choa Chu Kang bus interchange regarding the boarding of passengers on wheelchairs. Several netizens suggested that the complainant should have taken down the plate number of the buses involved and reported the incident directly to SMRT. Wayne Rex Tan noted that some passengers had complained why those in wheelchairs were given priority when boarding wheelchair accessible buses. Chia Seng Kim George said that the same incident also happened at another interchange involving bus services 845 and 106. The netizen said that it was no use complaining directly to the bus operator.
HO YING HUI was glad that many changes were being planned in the public transport system to ensure that commuters have a safe and pleasant journey. The netizen, however, is apprehensive towards the installation of USB charging ports for mobile devices on buses near the inner seats. She believed that it would worsen the problem of people not giving up their seats to those who need them more. Some commuters were likely to hog their seats and fail to show consideration for those in need because of the charging ports. The netizen suggests having more quirky ideas similar to the Prosperity Spot that was introduced on the Chinese New Year-themed train on the North-East Line to encourage commuters to move in to less crowded spaces. The netizen hoped that more changes would be implemented to both buses and trains to ensure smoother and more pleasant rides. Puibao Bao stated with sarcasm that SMRT had been trying to make train journeys less boring and more pleasant by increasing the number of breakdowns to provide commuter distraction and to bring thousands of commuters together.
Chris Soo? stated that the bus captain of service 179 was amazing.The netizen mentioned that although many passengers ignored the bus captains greeting, he continued to make eye contact and greeted every passenger who boarded the bus and would also say Thank you, have a nice day. See you again. Bye Bye! at the end of their journey.
A video taken by Fadli Junaidi? which showed an SMRT bus service 961 ignoring the red light and the male adult with small kid going over the pedestrian crossing was shared online. The incident happened on July 9 at around 11:30 a.m. along Upper Boon Keng Road. Some netizens stated that the bus captain should be terminated from service immediately. Louis Looi said that the bus driver should be punished heavily for such ignorance. Azmi Naik Basikal mentioned a similar experience with an SMRT bus at the same junction.
Syed M Daniel? asked SMRT if recording a video when riding the MRT was prohibited.
The Public Transport Council (PTC) announced that under the new bus contracting model, it would continue to regulate and set fares for public buses by taking into consideration the revenue collected by the Government and fees paid to the operators. Currently, the fare formula was set to changes in the Core Consumer Price Index, the Wage Index and the Energy Index and based on changes over the preceding year. According to PTC Chairman Richard Magnus, the major consideration in the fare formula review would be affordability for all segments.Several netizens stated that all PTC board members should only use public transport for a year before they decide if there was a need to review the fares. Some asked why the need to raise fares when fuel and operating costs had been reduced.Meng Kwang Johnny Tang wondered why the PTC would only consider affordability now in reviewing fares.
On Facebook, the LTA mentioned the second tranche of the Loyang bus package on September 18 under Go-Ahead Singapore. The buses under the tranche would be bus services 2, 6, 12, 15, 17, 36, 354, 358, 359, 403 and 518.The LTA asked the public to bear with them as they continue to work closely with the public transport operators while they iron out the teething issues during the transition period. Many commuters observed the long waiting time for most bus services under the new bus contracting model. Some mentioned that they would take note of any improvements in bus timings in the following days. Jonathan Jia said that the LTA failed to ensure that bus operators met the service standards even on the first day of operation.
In connecton with Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans announcement of the six-month trial to allow all-day access of foldable bikes on public transport, hfourhappy wondered why the Minister needed six months to study it. Several netizens stated that the trial would only add inconvenience to commuters. Some considered the idea as senseless. Others suggested that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan take the MRT during peak hours before the trial. Simplicity said that the trial would be feasible if trains were not crowded during peak hours.
A video showing an accident between a Comfort taxi and another taxi was shared online. The accident happened at the junction of Sengkang West Way and Fernvale Drive. Several netizens stated that both vehicles were at fault. The Comfort cab failed to wait for the green light arrow before proceeding to turn right while the silver cab had beaten the red light. Others said that the Comfort cab driver might have been day dreaming and did not notice the oncoming vehicle. Some observed that the silver cab failed to slow down while approaching the light which already turned amber.
?Chin Wei? shared a video showing the bus captain of service 858 beating a red light.SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Singapores fourth and newest public transport operator, Go-Ahead Singapore, would launch its operations on September 4.Go-Ahead would be operating 13 bus routes in the Loyang district. 11 more routes would follow two weeks later, with a 25th service to be launched next year.The new transport operator would also manage the Pasir Ris and Punggol bus interchanges and use the Loyang Bus Depot. Mr Nigel Wood, Managing Director of Go-Ahead Singapore, stated that on the first day of operations, Go-Ahead staff would be guiding commuters and answering queries.The first services to be run by Go-Ahead Singapore are: 3, 34, 43/43M, 62, 82, 83, 84, 85, 118, 119, 136, 382, 386. Sangha Vandana said that commuters would be watching Go-Ahead closely on punctuality and bus bunching. The netizen asked Go-Ahead to make sure it was up to the mark. Victor Raj hoped that Go-Ahead buses would not be as slow as Tower Transit buses. Muhd Sofee Hadi said that all buses should be painted green to avoid confusing commuters.
GateCrasher posted some important observations regarding the SMRT accident on Mar 22 based on what was available on the Internet. 1. Lack of constant communication between ground crew and control station. 2. Train could not be heard coming from afar when workers are on the actual tracks. 3. Train driver did not see the workers on the tracks. 4. None of the 15 workers noticed the approaching train until it was too late. 5. The signalling box was designed to open facing the train track. The thread starter stated that trains should have some sort of visual indication on the front part of the train like big blinking lights that could be seen from miles away. S/he also wondered what the train driver was doing before he saw the workers on the tracks. If the driver had seen the workers, he could have blared the trains horn as a warning and override the trains auto mode to manual mode and direct the train to Platform 1 instead of Platform 2. It was suggested that there should be a worker who would act as a lookout for approaching trains similar to that at roadside construction works. The signalling box door should also be designed to face the walkway for safer operation. Dankoh148 stated that the top officials could not be blamed for the safety lapse as the safety procedures should be set up by those people who need to go on the track. sayuri2323 mentioned that since the records did not show that safety procedure took place, the staff who was responsible should be questioned.
?Lin Hui Xian? complimented SMRT bus captain of service 920 (SMB3125P) for waiting for all passengers to board and get settled before moving off.The netizen was also impressed when the bus captain offered to pick up the coins that an elderly had dropped at the bus stop so that the elderly could proceed to find a seat.
Rolland Ng mentioned that his vehicle was involved in an accident with an SMRT taxi at Upper Bukit Timah Road. He stated that the taxi swerved into his lane and scraped the left front of his vehicle. The taxi also scraped its right rear. As the netizen believed that both parties were at fault, he did not think that there was any chance he could claim against the taxi driver. After filing a police report, he decided to do his own repair.The taxi driver, however, decided to claim against the netizens insurance. His insurance company (AIG) decided to accept the claim and proceeded to pay for the claims. The claim resulted for the netizens No-Claim Discount (NCD) being reduced from 50% to 20%. Rolland Ng informed the insurance company that he wished to contest the claims but was later discharged by the company to engage his own lawyer to do a counter claim. The netizen pointed out that there was no evidence that proved who was at fault, so the insurance company should not have proceeded to pay the claim and reduce his NCD. Nicholas Fanyeong stated that the netizen should have informed the insurance company about the accident whether or not he was at fault.
?Aaron Tan praised bus captain Murugan for providing fast and reliable service on bus service 966. The netizen stated that although the bus was late due to a traffic jam at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange, he managed to reach the first stop at Bukit Panjang towards Parkway Parade safely and on time.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a series of infographics about the bus workshop team in each bus depot which specialises in maintaining different sections of the bus: electrical, driveline, body, undercarriage and air-conditioning. The team at Woodlands Depot alone maintains an average of 40 buses a day.Photos of SMRT Lead Technician Kumaran was also posted as he demonstrated a small part of his daily routine. Some netizens regarded SMRT favourably for sharing information that could help commuters understand how buses were maintained. (buses[IN]gapore!) pointed out that there were still some SMRT buses with non-working rear lights, dented or damaged bodyworks and damaged tail lamps but were still allowed on the roads. June Hi mentioned that the air-conditioning in trains in Thailand were cooler despite the hot weather. The netizen also shared a photo of an air-conditioning vent in a train (train cabin number 2012) that was dirty and which he claimed was blowing out smelly air. Muhammad Azhar Bin Jamzuri noticed that some of the engines of Enviro buses sounded like a motorboat.
?Esther Rajan? praised bus captain Surenther Singh of service 67 (SMB1511X) for wishing his passengers Good Evening. The netizen said that more SMRT staff members should be like him.
A post by netizen Jacqueline Bong on the SMRT Facebook page on July 28 about her experience on board a BPLRT train which skipped three stations without stopping was picked up by several other media channels. The netizen shared that the train had a faulty emergency phone and button that did not work, and that commuters on board were very frightened. Many netizens expressed concern that the train could have hit another train in front and injured several passengers if it did not stop before reaching Phoenix Station. Several wondered why the emergency button and phone were not working. Others observed that the LRT line had been plagued with many problems since the start of operations in 1999. Stephen Tan said that it was a serious incident and that it should be looked into. Edmund Toh asked for a full investigation of the incident. Crooni hoped that there was a video footage proof of the incident.CMC is working with BPLRT on a post which will be put up on SMRTs Facebook page today.
In a blogpost at Mothership.sg, it was mentioned that competition in the taxi industry was an excellent development for commuters and taxi drivers.Private hire car chauffeurs have also emerged which attract many part-timers. They help to complement the limited taxi supply.The blogger stated that competition had improved efficiency with easy bookings, more value-added services were provided, drivers could now choose between driving a taxi or private-hire vehicles, more choices of payment methods, and commuters could now rate drivers.
In a joint press statement on September 1, the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and SMRT stated that they had narrowed down the Circle Line signalling issue to signal interference, causing intermittent loss of signal between trains and stations which has affected train operations at 30 MRT stations since August 29. LTA and SMRT added that they were working with a team of experts from French train manufacturer Alstom. Commuters were encouraged to factor additional travelling time as they may continue to experience delays in service. Transport expert Dr Park Byung-Joon stated that the signal interference was very uncommon for the problem to persist for so long. Dr Park was surprised that there was a genuine interference from some others source which had not been present before. Mobile signals along the Circle Line were suspended at four stations on the evening of September 2 as investigations into an unknown communications interference in the tunnels intensified.During the mobile signal blackout which lasted two hours, commuters could not make phone calls, send or receive text messages, or access the Internet.In another joint statement on September 3, LTA and SMRT said that they have established the presence of an interfering signal in the CCL tunnel within the operating frequency band of the signalling system. The interfering signal could be a possible cause of the intermittent loss of train-to-track communications but experts have not yet been able to verify the source. They added that investigations will continue. Should and when an incident recur, SMRT and LTA have worked with IDA and mobile network operators to suspend telecommunication signals along stretches of CCL for short periods of time for further tests.Many netizens expressed frustration that authorities have yet to determine the source of the signal interference.Several disapproved the suspension of mobile signals saying that train passengers would not be able to call for emergency services should there be a disaster or terror attack.Some wondered why no backup signal system was in place during the interference. Several netizens suggested that SMRT should offer passengers alternative transport solutions and shut down the entire line temporarily to resolve the problem. Others mentioned that SMRT should make timely announcements so commuters could plan for alternative means of travel.Keith Ong pointed out that intermittent issues were difficult to resolve and would need experienced specialists to determine the root cause.Martin Wong considered it unacceptable for the Circle Line to have such persistent problems since it was among the newer MRT lines.Amal Maarof noted that the Circle Line and the North-East Line have been using the same signalling system and wondered why the North-East Line has not experienced any interence
Services along the Circle Line were temporarily delayed on Monday evening (September 5) due to a track fault. On Twitter at about 8:20 p.m., SMRT posted that the issue affected train services between Paya Lebar and MacPherson stations towards HarbourFront station. At 9:13 p.m., SMRT tweeted that train services were operating normally.In response to media queries, Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications, said that a faulty track switch added about 10 minutes to the journey for commuters traveling between Paya Lebar and MacPherson stations. Mr Nathan also said that the fault has been resolved and apologised to affected commuters. Commuters took to social media to express their frustration that the Circle Line was affected by a train fault following the delays on five consecutive days last week due to signalling issues. ?Several netizens observed that many recurring faults and issues in the MRT network cannot be solved after a long time. They wondered when the system will function smoothly as most netizens are tired of the frequent delays.
Referring to the report Govt to pay SMRT, SBS Transit S$7B to run bus routes (August 12), reader Goh Kian Huat asked how the amount paid to each operator was determined. He also asked how LTA would ensure the public that it did not overpay the two bus operators to run the bus routes. The reader also wanted to know how much fare revenue LTA expected to collect and whether the bus fares would be raised should there be a significant deficit in revenue. The reader observed that under the competitive tendering process, bus contracts were only for five years but the two bus operators were given the negotiated contracts with tenures exceeding five years. SBS Transits packages have tenures ranging between five to 10 years except for the Bukit Timah package which was only two years. The three contracts with SMRT Buses range between four to seven years. As there was still no proof that the bus contracting model works better than the previous model, the reader believed that the existing bus operators licences could have been extended first before putting them up for tender.
Edward expressed his/her frustration online after seeing four service 27 buses arrive consecutively at a bus stop on Punggol Road on Jan 4 at 6:20 p.m.The netizen said that it was quite common in some routes for two buses to bunch but the netizen was surprised to see four buses arriving together.A video of the incident was also shared online. Several netizens stated that bunching had been an issue with bus services but no action had been taken. Some shared similar experiences with other bus services. Lawrence Wong stated that the service level of buses was getting more and more lousy. Josephine Simon Dorai mentioned waiting half an hour for service 197 from Jurong East interchange while other bus services have plied three times already. Mel Tan said that the issue was a result of mismanagement by the bus operator.
Robert Teh" stated that the privatization of public transportation and healthcare has proven to be a disaster. He cited the performance of SMRT, pointing out that despite years of fare increases, the MRT trains continue to experience unending frequent disruptions with no prospect of improving the rail service anytime soon. He also mentioned that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan has been trying every possible way to resolve the rail issues.The writer also raised the privatization of the healthcare industry as another failure. He stated that the privatization policy of the Government has failed miserably due to poor allocation of taxes, reserves and profits from land sale and assets to fund public services. He claimed that the consequence was clear that the Government continues to hide profits from land sales by Singapore Land Authority and SMRT and refuse to use such profits to fund public services. Several netizens stated that public transport should be nationalised. Lee Kim Chew asked the netizen to get the facts right and be objective, pointing out that healthcare in Singapore is mainly under the responsibility of the Singapore Governments Ministry of Health.
Eddie Tan Pang Yeow? mentioned seeing a young local couple eating inside the train. He reported the incident to the station control officer at Tanjong Pagar Station but was surprised that the staff did not probe further. The netizen deemed that SMRT was not keen in catching rule breakers, making No food and drinks signs useless.SMRT asked the netizen to provide more details about the incident but Eddie Tan Pang Yeow responded that it might be a waste of time to provide further details about the incident unless there was a CCTV inside the train. He added that the staff at Tanjong Pagar Station should have taken immediate action.
?Mohd Vinz? reported that he accidentally dropped two sets of keys on the track after he was bumped into by a female passenger who was rushing for the train.The netizen had already reported the incident at the Passenger Service Centre at Paya Lebar Station. He hoped that SMRT staff would be able to retrieve and return his house and office keys.
?Hui Ling Kate Leong? was waiting for bus service188 at bus stop 16031 opposite Science Park 2 on Feb at 7:30 p.m. As bus service 188 was approaching the bus stop, another bus service arrived before it. The netizen mentioned walking back so the bus captain of 188 could see him/her. The driver, however, proceeded with the journey before the netizen could signal to the bus driver to stop. This resulted in the netizens six-minute wait to board another bus. Similarly, the bus captain of the new bus seemed to be in a hurry as well, as the bus moved immediately, almost causing the netizen to fall down before s/he was able to find a seat.The netizen wondered why all the bus captains of service 188 seemed to be in a hurry.
It was reported that another SMRT worker, a train captain, had been diagnosed with the contagious tuberculosis (TB) disease. The train captain was also from Tanah Merah MRT station.Another 13 SMRT workers were suspected of having the disease, after they tested positive in the Quanti-Feron test, a TB marker.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said the latest infected worker was diagnosed on August 11. He added that contact tracing was being carried out by Tan Tock Seng Hospital's Tuberculosis Control Unit "to identify close contacts, such as family members and co-workers, so that they undergo TB screening". He also stated that SMRT was taking steps to address the infection. Several netizens were concerned with the increase in the number of SMRT staff found to have TB, saying that commuters were also at risk. Some wondered whether the disease had been brought to the country by foreigners. Timothy Chua stated that SMRT should look into the welfare of their staff members. John Kelly pointed out that it was not only SMRT workers that were found to have the disease but also workers from other companies. Dawn Yeow suggested that the Ministry of Health should publish an article to educate the public about TB.
TimothyTan asked for SMRT to open source its signalling system so that other engineers could pitch in and help rectify the issue. asd78 pointed out that with an open source, the MRT system could be hacked. ethan89 stated that only LTA, SMRT and SBS Transit knew whether the issue was with programming bugs or hardware problems.
SMRT would be introducing eight new Wheelchair Accessible Bus (WAB) Services, bringing the total number of SMRT WAB services to 67. Kate Ong said that SMRT should buy more MAN A24 buses and not downgrade some bus services to MAN A22 buses. Wendy Tee asked if the WAB services would allow unfolded strollers onboard the bus. The netizen mentioned that in Perth, unfolded strollers were allowed inside the bus and hoped Singapore buses could also be baby friendly.
Yggdrasil Dew stated that MRT trains should have two dedicated cabins for the elderly, disabled and pregnant passengers, and remove all reserved seats on trains. bttorn suggested having flip-down seats that would only open after scanning a designated card. Lydia.Tan stated that segregating the elderly, disabled and pregnant passengers might pose a social problem.
Netizens continued to discuss the latest service disruption on the North-South Line which was believed to be caused by a lightning strike.Some netizens noted that the disruption happened while Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was celebrating the 200th day milestone of the Downtown Line functioning without any major disruption. Several netizens wondered whether the trains have a lightning protection system. Thomas Olongwang mentioned that Singapore has one of the highest rates of lightning activity in the world and asked whether SMRT had precautionary measures in place. Kuchikuchiku believed that the reason why the trains kept breaking down was because the engineers were not up to standard and were not familiar with the system as it was designed overseas. Note: The SMRT Blog posted an article last night describing how NSEWL train commuters are protected from lightning. We will direct queries on lightning protection to the blog post.
Netizens continued to discuss the taxi driver who parked his taxi between two parking spaces for the disabled at a mall. micky2008 said that there were many instances where commuters were unable to find cabs despite the increased cab population. The incident confirmed that some cabbies were using the taxis as their personal vehicle instead of its real intended purpose to ferry passengers.The netizen also wondered why the taxi driver was at the mall for two hours when he was supposed to be plying the roads to provide services to customers. cashflow believed that the new entrants such as GrabTaxi and Uber was a good wakeup call the taxi drivers. kooldog59 said that Singaporeans have no respect for the handicapped.
Indian national Godiyal Pramod, a Singapore permanent resident (PR), was jailed for nine weeks on Jun 10 for molesting a woman on board an SMRT train. He pleaded guilty to standing behind and rubbing himself repeatedly against a 21-year-old woman on the train travelling from City Hall to Bugis MRT station on May 4 last year. Several netizens stated that the PR status of the molester should be revoked and that Pramod be deported back to his home country. Wilson Soong suggested having a dedicated cabin for women to prevent any contact with male commuters.
Eric Stephanie ?wondered why a scooter had been allowed inside the train at Outram Park Station. The netizen said that scooter owners should be responsible enough not to obstruct and give way to boarding and alighting passengers or instead ride a cabin which was not overcrowded. Some pointed out that scooters were heavy and would do more harm when folded if the user was not able to support the scooter. Christopher Koh said that even wheelchairs and prams easily take up twice the volume of electric scooters. He added that every passenger has their own needs, and encouraged the netizen to give and take.
Experts stated that the high-speed rail linking Singapore and Kuala Lumpur was expected to be an encouraging stimulus for the local economy when it starts running a decade from now, creating jobs and spurring growth. It was, however, unlikely to bring a big economic impact during construction, citing the short length of Singapore's section of the rail. The rail line would span 350km, but only 15km would be in Singapore.On the other hand, there would be wider benefits as the area around the terminus at Jurong East would open up new business opportunities for retail, accommodation and tourism. Wei Seng Teo stated that the whole project was already devalued by not integrating with the local transit networks. The Singapore terminus would be 500m away from Jurong East MRT station and there would be no transport options for travellers upon reaching the Malaysia Terminus at Bandar Malaysia. Wah Ng wondered whether the trains could travel 200 to 300km/hr with so many stations between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur. He also wonders how these areas have been selected for building of the stations.
?Diana Low? boarded SMRT service 700 from International Plaza towards Orchard Road and was surprised when the bus captain asked her if he should keep driving to the left or right of the road.The driver informed her that he had forgotten the route as he had not driven for service 700 for quite some time.One passenger told the bus captain to keep right. Another passenger, however, said that the driver should keep left. Jesslyn Wong said it was scary to ride on a bus when the driver was not familiar with the route.
Netizens continued to discuss Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans announcement that the North-South Expressway would have one dedicated lane for buses and would incorporate cycling and walking paths on the surface level.Most netizens disapproved of having pedestrian and cycle lanes on the North-South Expressway, with several saying that it would be dangerous for pedestrians and cyclists.Some stated that providing only two lanes for vehicles other than buses would result to more road congestion.Others wondered who would cycle from north to south and whether the cyclists would be required to pay ERP, road tax and COE.Honestboy said that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan must be out of his mind and that building pedestrian and cycle lanes would only be a waste of money.stinv mentioned supporting Minister Khaws idea of a car-lite Singapore, saying that cars were an inefficient mode of transport. In a later post, the netizen stated that wash rooms, changing rooms and bicycle parking facilities should be provided at convenient locations for those who would be cycling.doreme pointed out that the cycling and pedestrian path would not be on the expressway but beside the main road.
Netizens who followed the story about the train captain who was dismissed by SMRT for the death of the two trainees in an accident in March 2016 were outraged and questioned the decision by the company. The families of the victims in the fatal accident have also questioned the operators decision to dismiss the train driver involved in the tragedy before investigations by the relevant authorities were completed and the Coroners Inquiry were held.Most netizens believed that the train captain should not be held liable for the accident as he was simply manning the train which was on auto-mode.Several asked why the staff at the Operations Control Centre were not given any disciplinary action since they were the ones responsible for the safety lapses.Others disapproved of the revelation of the train captains identity.
MrSinkie95 asked whether breastfeeding was allowed on MRT trains. Some netizens stated breastfeeding in public is not prohibited as long as they cover up. Others disapprove of breastfeeding onboard public transport, saying that it was indecent. Ivanpaseo suggested having lactation rooms inside the train.
Peter Low boarded a new train (C830C set 8451) from Botanic Gardens interchange (CC19) to Serangoon (CC13) on Feb 23 and noticed an error with the train. The netizen was surprised to see the LED display monitor showing that the next station was Labrador Park (CC27) all throughout the journey, thinking that he had boarded the wrong train.The netizen only realized the error upon reaching Serangoon station after he saw the Do Not Board announcement on the plasma monitor at the platform. The SMRT staff who also boarded the train from Botanic Gardens towards Caldecott also had no idea what was going on. Some other passengers also alighted from the train due to the error.The netizen hoped SMRT would look into the issue.Muhd Naz Farihin stated that the train might be an out-of-service train but was pulled back to revenue service so the display was not configured properly.
?Jessica Seah? left her wallet in the train at Somerset MRT station. She immediately reported the incident to the Passenger Service Centre where her particulars were recorded.The netizen thanked SMRT station staff Ms Hite for immediate action of contacting the staff at other stations to look for the wallet. The staff at City Hall MRT Station was sent to the cabin where the netizen misplaced the wallet. The netizen also thanked the station staff at Dhoby Ghaut and City Hall MRT stations for their quick response.
A video which showed a commuter quarrelling with a SMRT Chinese bus captain was shared online on June 18 by John Tan. According to the commuter, the bus captain of service 804 (SMB8003A) apparently scolded his daughter after seeing that she was holding a banana while boarding the bus. The commuter claimed that the way the bus captain scolded his daughter infuriated him, which prompted him to film the bus captain. The commuter insisted that his child had no intention of eating the banana while onboard the bus. Most netizens stated that the bus captain was not to be blamed as he was just carrying out his duty diligently as eating and drinking was prohibited on public transport. Others showed sympathy towards the bus captain for the way that he was treated by the commuter, as he had come to Singapore just to make a living. Several disapproved of the passenger standing near the door and filming the bus captain while the bus was moving, saying that it could have affected the safety of other passengers. Others said that the passenger should have taken down the name of the bus captain, the bus number and time of incident. A few mentioned that the bus captain should not have raised his voice to a child or any passenger but simply remind them about the rule. Seekowkia Li wondered what action SMRT would take against the bus captain when most people felt that the passenger was at fault. The netizen hoped SMRT would investigate the incident.
Nicholas Yan? reported that an SMRT staff denied him and his friends from boarding the bus at the third berth where they were queuing during the Singapore Airshow despite having enough standing space for all buses in line to serve all berths. At around 4 p.m., the SMRT staff ushered the next buses to the first, second and fourth berth neglecting the queue on the third berth which already formed a bottleneck that was affecting other queue lines.The netizen was disappointed on how the supervisory SMRT staff managed the queue and how he treated his staff with such uncultured behaviour. He hoped to see some improvement in crowd management in the next major event that SMRT would participate in. Gustav Yap Puay Tong said that the netizen should also complain with the event organiser.
Netizens continued to discuss the trial of driverless taxis in Singapore, the first country in the world to offer such technology. The service was part of an ongoing trial by nuTonomy, which was founded by two Massachusetts Institute of Technology researchers now based in Singapore.Mr Doug Parker, nuTonomys Chief Operations Officer, stated that it chose to try out the service in Singapore because of the high consumer demand for taxis, well-maintained roads and clear Government regulations for its tests. The service will initially be available to a limited invited group of about 10 people.Among the first group of five who tried the service on August 22 was entrepreneur Mr Edward Tiong. He said that he initially had apprehensions about the car's safety, but worries were soon resolved.Ms Olivia Seow, who also tried it, said that she would "definitely" consider taking driverless taxis once they are widely available. Several netizens stated that they still prefer to ride taxis with drivers, raising concerns about safety. Others wondered what would happen during emergencies and who would be responsible for insurance. Some were concerned that taxi drivers would soon be jobless if the trial becomes successful. hfourhappy believed that it would still take a while before driverless cars would be fully operational in Singapore. The netizen pointed out that safety and affordability of fares were more important to commuters.
Connie Lim warned female commuters against an alleged molester when riding the MRT. The netizen claimed that the male passenger intentionally pressed his fist on a female commuters buttocks. The netizen also posted a photo of the alleged molester. Several netizens stated that Connie Lim should have confronted the alleged molester instead of just taking his photo and posting it online. Others said that the incident should have been reported to the police.
?Kenneth Zhong Kai Yi? asked SMRT to increase the frequency of bus service 882 or train its bus captains on how to deal with commuters. The netizen mentioned knocking on the front door of bus service 882 (SMB1580X) while it was still at the bus berth as it was blocked by another bus in front. He claimed that the bus captain refused to open the door for him, forcing him to wait for the next bus. The netizen, however, later saw the bus captain open the doors to allow another passenger to board when the bus had to stop at the traffic light junction.
danny8x8 claimed that there was a train breakdown on the Circle Line at Stadium Station on July 9. The netizen mentioned that the National Day Parade volunteers who had just ended rehearsals were stuck at the station. Some netizens wondered how the trains could handle the crowd on National Day itself.
Meowmeow reported that there was a leak inside the train at around 8.37am on August 23. The netizen did not mention which train and line s/he was on. kitaeshi assumed that the leak was from the air-conditioning system. RobinTeoHood said that it might just be condensation that caused the leak. Meowmeow mentioned before s/he alighted at City Hall MRT station that it also started to leak at other areas.
An unhappy ex-taxi driver claimed that ComfortDelGro did not return his security deposit upon resigning and turning in his vehicle. The netizen said that the company gave excuses such as accidents on why the deposit was not returned.The netizen revealed that he got involved in an accident with a car that sped through a red light and collided with his taxi. ComfortDelGro, however, claimed that the cabby was in the wrong for not giving way, despite the video footage showing otherwise.After he found out that his deposit had been forfeited, he spoke with Priscilla Tay, ComfortDelGros Fleet Safety Officer, who provided him with unreasonable answers. ComfortDelGro did not issue any receipt for the deposit or payments made to the company. When asked about this matter Tay dismissed the discussion abruptly saying that they should not talk about the past.The netizen said that he did not mind not getting back his money but would like the public to be aware that ComfortDelGros staff handled the cases with such unprofessionalism. Dave Pittey asked if the company was aware that his security deposit had been forfeited. The netizen surmised that somebody inside the company might have taken his deposit and informed the company that the deposit had been returned to him. Sri Mayasari said that the taxi driver was lucky enough that his licence had not been revoked. Oscar Robert Ang asserted that more taxi drivers would be encouraged to transfer to Uber or Grab. Ho Soon Seng said that the cabbie should demand for the receipt if his deposit was being used to offset the insurance access. If no receipt could be presented, the cabbies security deposit could have gone into the staff members personal pockets. The netizen suggested bringing the matter to top management if no receipt was issued.
Choo Suay Moon was incredibly touched by the thoughtfulness of SMRT staff when she was experiencing some difficulty walking on July 7. She stated that after her back treatment, she took the train at Holland Village Station after several failed attempts to hail a taxi. She mentioned that it was an arduous journey from Holland to Bishan as she was enduring the pain on her back as she walked.The netizen recounted that an SMRT officer approached her to enquire if she needed assistance. She said that she broke out in tears of joy and pain for the kind offer. SMRT Assistant Station Manager Robin Ho of Circle Line Bishan station contacted Station Manager Govindarajoo who came with a wheelchair to ferry her to Bishan Station on the North-South Line. At Bishan Station, SMRT Service Ambassador Rubiah was already waiting at the elevator landing to assist the netizen into the train and secure her a seat to Khatib. When she reached Khatib Station, she was surprised to see SMRT staff Mr Lee and Ms Selvi waiting at the train door entrance with a wheelchair. Both Mr Lee and Ms Selvi insisted to have their colleague Mr Ramy ferry her home.The netizen was very grateful to the SMRT staff who helped her and said that she was very touched by the excellent services rendered by them. The netizen said that at times, the hardware, referring to trains, may encounter occasional breakdowns but the software - services of the SMRT staff - never breaks down. The netizen has written an email to SMRT to commend the staff as well.
LTA, in partnership with this years National Day Parade (NDP) executive committee and public operators SMRT and SBS Transit, launched four NDP-themed trains on each MRT Line. Each train is decked out in three designs across different carriages. One design focuses on Singapore folklore, another on this year's theme of building a better future and the last design is on racial harmony and unity in Singapore.LTA also hopes the designs could encourage better commuter behaviour by acting as subtle social "nudges" to get commuters to move in to have a closer look at the decorations. Chia Johan said that authorities should stop wasting money on decorations and focus on minimising breakdowns. Chu Yao Min asked whether there would be free travel on trains and buses on Aug 9.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about the important milestone by the Downtown Line having 150 days without any major service disruption. He also mentioned the sad news about the two SMRT colleagues killed by a moving train while attending to a problem near Pasir Ris MRT station. Many netizens were disappointed with Minister Khaw, saying that it was inappropriate to celebrate a milestone while two SMRT workers were killed by a moving train. Several said that Minister Khaw got his priorities mixed up. Some mentioned that unfavourable comments were deleted from the Ministers Facebook page. Others asked where the Transport Minister was after the unfortunate accident happened. Some stated that Minister Khaw seemed to imply that the death of two SMRT staff members marred the 150-day milestone. Several mentioned that having no disruption should be the norm and should not be considered as an achievement. Others said that Minister Khaw should have separately posted about the SMRT tragedy and the Downtown Line milestone.
Android Pay, Google's mobile payment system, joined the mobile payments bandwagon in Singapore on Jun 28, making the city-state the first in Asia to have the system. Pali Bhat, Senior Director of Product Management at Google, stated that Singapore was selected as the third market worldwide after the United States and the United Kingdom to introduce its mobile payments offering because of its ready base of mobile-savvy consumers as well as a mature ecosystem. At launch, Android Pay would work with MasterCard and Visa cards from DBS Bank, OCBC Bank, POSB, Standard Chartered Bank and UOB, and there would be no limit as to how many cards could be added by the consumer, according to Google. The service is available on all Android devices that were near-field communication-enabled and running on Android KitKat 4.4 and above.As for whether Android Pay would be used to support the nation's transport system, Mr Bhat noted that transport operators such as Grab and Uber, as well as ComfortDelGro, were already onboard. However, payments for trains and buses were not available at launch. The Google executive noted that the LTA would be piloting an account-based ticketing system. He said that they were "excited" to get on once the regulator was ready with the system. In March, LTA had announced that it would be piloting the system in the fourth quarter of this year, which would allow commuters to use contactless debit or credit cards to pay their fare.
xtemujin mentioned being stuck in the train heading to Clementi near the Clementi fire station. The netizen said that an announcement at Dover MRT Station mentioned a train fault. Several netizens stated that both the North-South and East-West Lines were affected by a train fault. cearmouse mentioned that every time it rains heavily, the MRT breaks down. precipice65 said that there were no updates about the train fault at Dover.
?Cleve Wong? stated that the announcements on trains were like war sirens. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the central sound system and reduce the volume by half.
New bus operator Go-Ahead Singapore officially opened its Loyang Bus Depot on Jun 19 with a full day carnival.About 3,000 people attended, including families, Loyang residents, bus enthusiasts and the occasional job hunter. The official bus captain uniform of Go-Ahead was also revealed at the carnival.Some visitors were at the depot to see the new Go-Ahead Singapore buses, decked out in the London-based operators signature red and yellow. Others said they were looking forward to seeing a new competitor in the public bus industry.Group Chief Executive David Brown called the opening of the depot a milestone and stated that the company has every intention to bid for the upcoming Seletar bus package under the Governments new bus contracting model. Sorensen Lkh hoped that the Government could also open up the MRT lines for bidding by foreign and local operators alike to introduce more competition.
Freeman Cheung Ho Hoi? shared a photo of a train door window seal (car 1503; door A3) which had a tear and water leaking into it.
Train service on the East-West Line was delayed in the afternoon of Jul 31 due to a problem with the platform doors. On Twitter, SMRT said that commuters should expect an additional travelling time of 15 minutes between Bugis and Pasir Ris MRT stations and that its engineers were working to rectify the issue.The problem appeared to be at Kembangan station, according to a series of tweets from an affected commuter. Some netizens stated that the announcements and tweets were inaccurate. ?Others mentioned that SMRT should provide the accurate waiting time so that commuters would not wait at the stations and can look for alternative transport.
?Carmen Lok? asked SMRT to provide assistance to the family of Wenhao, an autistic male who went missing near Hougang. The netizen stated that Wenhao was fond of travelling via the MRT.
Yi JF reported that the bus captain of service 167 (SMB257L) was travelling only at a speed of between 40 to 50km per hour from MacRitchie Reservoir to Sembawang interchange.
On Facebook, Victor Chin shared a video he filmed to capture the loud maintenance train horn at Clementi Station. The netizen wondered whether SMRT was aware that their maintenance train horn was very loud. He said that SMRT was being irresponsible by sounding the horn at 12:47 a.m. at Clementi Station.The netizen mentioned that the National Environment Agency (NEA) has a rule prohibiting work for construction sites located within 150m from residential premises and noise sensitive premises as follows: Noise level from 7p.m. to 7a.m. must not exceed 55 decibel. The netizen claimed that the train horn was at 140 decibel and above. Several netizens said that people complain regardless of whether maintenance works were done in the morning or at night. Some stated that it was not advisable to live near MRT stations. Kovi Soo said that it was irresponsible on the part of SMRT if the horns were sounded frequently and throughout the night. Richard Lincoln believed that it was protocol for the locomotive to sound the horn before leaving the station.
Tan Vincent asked why the train travelling towards Marina Bay had a six-minute interval during peak hours. Syed M Daniel explained that train arrivals have six-minute intervals during the start of the peak hour but would eventually be at three minutes after most trains from the depot had been deployed to service.
SBS Transit would be extending the operations of its train and some bus services on the eve of Hari Raya Haji on September 11.The operator said that the operating hours of the North-East and Downtown Lines, as well as the Sengkang and Punggol LRT systems would be extended by about 30 minutes.To complement the extension of train operating hours, the last bus timings of 21 selected bus services would also be extended at their respective bus interchanges.
?Phan Mun Yik? was disappointed with SMRT for having to wait an hour for bus service 950 at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen claimed to have seen two service 950 buses pass by but did not pick up any passengers. There were also a group of staff who were merely chitchatting at the information counter.
?Becca D'Bus? stated that a pre-recorded train announcement asking commuters to alight from the train at the next station and transfer to another platform was only made in Mandarin, Tamil and Malay but not in English. This was a train headed towards Marina Bay Station which stopped at Ang Mo Kio Station.The netizen said that such announcements could compromise the safety of those who did not understand the three languages, and was also embarrassing to tourists
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan visited Tower Transit Singapores Bulim Bus Depot on Feb 23 to wish the staff Happy New Year and hand them mandarin oranges. The Minister said that there are about 100 days more before Tower Transit starts their bus service as the third bus operator in Singapore. Tower Transit stated that it was their pleasure to host Minister Khaw Boon Wan at the Bulim Bus Depot., and that they were looking forward to seeing everyone on board their buses. The company also thanked Minister Khaw for his kind words which gave encouragement to its bus captains, engineers and staff.??? said that the colour theme of Tower Transit buses looked lively and was 10,000,000,000,000 times far nicer and better looking than the LTA's idea of green all over. Josephine Lim was uninterested with the colour theme used by Tower Transit, saying that cleanliness and a smooth and safe journey were more important.Andrew Leong stated that the Transport Minister was walking the talk.Ron Tan Tan remarked that having more operators make better services.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that the proposed CRL would link residents to jobs as the line would connect a fast-growing residential district in the north-east to Singapore's largest industrial hub in the west.Aside from being a part of an overall strategy to build some redundancy into the rail network to mitigate the impact of disruptions, the CRL would also serve the upcoming "creative cluster and learning corridor" in Punggol, which would include the Singapore Institute of Technology's new campus.According to the LTA, residents in Punggol would be able to travel to Pasir Ris in 10 to 15 minutes, compared to the current 40-minute bus ride.Several netizens believed that Singapore does not need another rail line. They suggested not building the rail line, to just save the money and save nature as well.Richard Koh said that Singapore had enough MRT lines around the island. The netizen said that the money should be used to improve the existing system. Darren Tay stated that SMRT was in bad shape so the Government should focus on resolving current issues before building new lines.Jack Zhen Yi Kiew mentioned that residents could still get jobs via the existing MRT lines.Colin Alphonsus Koh stated that the Government should instead introduce more bus routes.Jeni Tang suggested scrapping the Cross Island Line because commuters could connect efficiently using various MRT lines.
???? asked why some commuters were allowed to exit the bus using the front door.In a later post, the netizen mentioned that commuters still alight from the front despite plenty of space for them to walk towards the rear door. Shawn Lee mentioned that bus passengers could exit using the door nearest to them. The netizen said that this would make the boarding and alighting process smoother. He also said that boarding passengers should be patient and give way to those alighting.
Torrential rains in Singapore last Friday (June 17) caused flash floods and felled trees in parts of Singapore. A few vehicles, including an SBS Transit bus with passengers on board, were stranded in a flash flood along Enterprise Road in Jurong West.In a Facebook post, Thessa Huiying recounted her experience being stuck in the floods while onboard SBS Transit bus service 252. She said that within 10 minutes, water started rising rapidly and reached the level of the bus floor. She thanked the bus captain for choosing not to drive through the flood and waited for them to be rescued by the Singapore Civil Defence Force (SCDF) team. Several netizens stated that the LTA, Building & Construction Authority and Public Utilities Board should work on how to prevent flooding in future. Some praised the SCDF personnel for always being there in times of need. Bairni Ng wondered which agency would be responsible for repairing the buses.
Sidm Wen Sheng Tang thanked SMRT for hosting the students from Nanyang Polytechnic School of Interactive & Digital Media at Kim Chuan Depot yesterday (16 June). The netizen mentioned that the visit to the depot was an enlightening experience for them.
?Ryan Tan Wee Soon? asked SMRT when the non-functioning air-conditioning system on the Bukit Panjang LRT line would be repaired.The netizen mentioned that it was not a one-time incident as he experienced it on his daily LRT ride. He also stated that most of the older trains have faulty air-conditioning and wondered where the newer trains were. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it.
Kenneth Wong asked SMRT to improve the arrival timings of service 962 especially during peak hours because commuters had to wait for up to 25 minutes for the bus.
Residents at a stretch of terrace houses in Duchess Road in Bukit Timah apparently have cracked and slanted walls, burst water pipes and front gates that were unable to properly shut due to the construction of the Tan Kah Kee MRT station, which was part of the Downtown Line 2.Two residents, who serve as spokesmen for the affected residents, told AsiaOne that despite repeated attempts over the years to rectify the issues, they were told that neither the LTA nor its contractors were responsible for them.Member of Parliament for Holland-Bukit Timah Group Representation Constituency (GRC) Christopher de Souza made two home visits over the last couple of years. MP de Souza stated that he had requested a compensation board to be convened to address the families' concerns. hfourhappy suggested having a dialogue with Members of Parliament, the LTA, SBS Transit, and other responsible parties to resolve the issue. Kinetic88 claimed that ever since the Government started building the MRT, many similar cases had been reported by property owners but were not able to get any compensation from the Government.
SMRT Corp explained how a door of a Bukit Panjang LRT train could have been flung open during a journey between stations last week, suggesting that the cause of the incident was a design flaw in the system.Patrick Nathan, Vice President of SMRT Corporate Information and Communications, assured commuters that that trains serving the North-South, East-West and Circle lines were designed to ensure all doors are closed and locked before moving off in both automatic and manual modes. He mentioned that SMRT was also exploring with LTA and train manufacturer Bombardier on improving the system's design such that trains in manual mode cannot move until all doors are closed and locked. He added that "operating procedures for manual driving of LRT trains will be reinforced".Disciplinary action has since been taken against the SMRT staff who did not ensure that all the doors of an LRT train were locked, causing a door to be flung open while the train was moving. Many netizens stated that SMRT should not put the blame on the train driver since it was a design flaw. The fault came about because no one would have thought that in manual override mode, parts of the systems ought to remain in system-control mode. Some stated that the incident was the fault of the driver because he took over the control of the train and did not ensure all doors were locked. Peter Simeon Khew wondered how many times SMRT held refresher courses for their train drivers in operating the LRT manually in cases of emergency. David Chow believed that SMRT should apologise to the train driver for putting the blame on him since the safety system detected a door was unsecured and the emergency brakes were applied, without driver intervention. According to the eye witness, the doors opened after the train came to an abrupt stop. Vijayakumar Palani said that SMRT should blame the train manufacturer for the design flaw. Stephen Hwang stated that SMRT should stop the blaming game and just act on the issue. Lloyd Tan said that SMRT should thank the staff involved for highlighting the critical design flaw which had never been discovered in the many years of operation. Medicated Oil pointed out that the staff could only visually check whether the door was closed. The netizen believes that there was no locking mechanism to ensure that the doors were locked.
?Kenneth Stephen Wilson observed that many tourists who took the train from Changi Airport to Tanah Merah MRT station were unaware that they had to alight and transfer to the westbound train at Tanah Merah station to get to the city. The netizen suggested that the Tanah Merah - Changi Airport section be changed to a light green or other colour to show a distinction from the Pasir Ris - Joo Koon section. The netizen added that many tourists also could not remember Joo Koon station since they usually only knew that they were headed to the "City". He stated that SMRT should put up larger signs indicating City that could easily be seen by tourists.
?Ong Weijian? reported that the bus captain of service 857 (SMB5073S) sped past bus stop 04179 despite being flagged. The netizen said that the drivers behaviour was unacceptable.
Commuters continued to discuss the one-north testbed trial for on-demand services by autonomous vehicles that would start this year, following partnership agreements LTA signed with Delphi Automotive Systems and nuTonomy on Monday (Aug 1). Several netizens were concerned that many taxi drivers would soon be out of their jobs if the trial for self-driving vehicles proved successful. Philip Philip considered the introduction of self-driving vehicles a contradiction to the Governments campaign for a car-lite society. The netizen was also concerned about the safety risks when riding such vehicles. sgslug believed that in order for the driverless vehicle system to work, all cars must be self-driving. STUKA76 wondered whether the driverless vehicles could detect a big hole on the road or when a car or a lorry was being driven in the wrong lane. reallymeh disapproved of the trial saying that driverless cars have shown to be unreliable overseas.
On Facebook, SMRT Feedback / The Vigilanteh shared Love Our Macritchie Forests post about its petition to save MacRitchie Forest from being destroyed by the construction of the proposed CRL. Love Our Macritchie Forest thanked those who signed the petition and shared the post.
While there were no updates from SMRT on their social media accounts regarding the train fault on the Circle Line on Mar 15, complaints from commuters started appearing on Twitter at around 8:10 a.m. Several commuters complained of slow trains and being stuck at stations. A photo tweeted by user Boyle Wijono at 8:22a.m. showed a huge crowd at Serangoon station.It appears SMRT has taken train delays and breakdowns as part and parcel of everyday life to not see the need to inform commuters. Despite having news outlets picking up the report, SMRT did not apologize or make any explanation for the morning delay.In the recent transport survey conducted by the LTA, Singaporeans surveyed were found very satisfied at 78.9% satisfaction rate over train service. Many Singaporeans online, however, called out the survey result as a bluff. Many netizens expressed frustration that SMRT did not announce the disruption on Facebook and Twitter. Some stated that breakdowns were already the norm so there was no need for SMRT to announce them. Jeenee Ng said that the staff members at Dhoby Ghaut were unaware of the train fault until she alerted them. The netizen mentioned that the platform was already overcrowded but no announcements had been made. Joyce Ch asked SMRT to inform the commuters about any disruption in service so they could make alternative plan of travel. David Tan wondered why the Transport Minister was still being paid millions of dollars in salary. Peter Siew stated that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was fixing the transport problems, and the public should give him more time to do his job. William Hidajat was sceptical about the survey results that local citizens were happy about the state of affairs of public transport. The netizen asked the Public Transport Council to conduct another survey to determine if commuters were truly happy with the transport services. Steve Chia said that those affected by the disruption and delays should post on social media and tag the LTA, the Prime Minister and Transport Minister so that the transport operators could not get away with such dishonest practices.
Alvin Nitric Tan said that train faults should be resolved first before embarking on new projects.
Responding to a question by Member of Parliament Ang Hin Kee (Ang Mo Kio GRC) regarding spaces for cyclists and users of personal mobility devices at MRT stations and community places, Senior Minister of State for Transport Josephine Teo stated that new MRT stations would have about triple the amount of bicycle parking spaces. A minimum of 100 to 300 bicycle parking spaces would be provided at new MRT stations, up from 40 to 100 at older MRT stations.
On the Middle Ground, Yoong Ren Yan wrote that 10 days after the accident that left two SMRT maintenance staff dead, there were still questions for SMRT still waiting to be answered. 1. Are the five safety measures from the Ministry of Manpower (MOM) and the LTA new rules?2. Which protocols were violated on Mar 22?3. How many previous violations have there been, and how serious were they?4. How were the rules enforced?5. What actions did SMRT take after a similar incident in 2010 on the Bukit Panjang LRT?6. Who makes the rules?7. Do the rules apply to the other train operator, SBS Transit?8. How much caution is appropriate?9. What would happen next?10. Will the families be compensated?SMRT claimed it remains in close touch with the families of the two deceased staff and takes full responsibility for the accident but refused to discuss reparations so far. Cecil Tan wondered who SMRT managed to find as scapegoat this time.
?Laura Rachel? complimented the bus captain of service 858 (SMB 335U) for greeting passengers with a smile despite the morning rush.
On Mothership.sg Blog, Jeanette Tan wrote about the new association for drivers from private-hire cars companies, private limousine and Combi bus companies. The National Private Hire Vehicles Association was formally registered on May 3, and was introduced on May 11 with the help of the National Trades Union Congress (NTUC).Those running the association, some of whom were from the NTUCs Freelancers and Self-Employed unit, said that they have reached out to at least 150 drivers from all three groups through ground-level driver networks. Members of the association would receive standard NTUC benefits like free insurance, link points, bursaries and skills upgrading.
?Naoki Chia? reported that the bus captain of service 962 (SMB1359U) was talking to another bus captain onboard the bus while he was driving. As a result, the bus travelled at a slower speed and stopped for almost three minutes at a bus stop.SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it.
?Angela Tan-Tay? commended and thanked Lynn, the SMRT staff at Raffles Place MRT station, who was seen smiling and greeting commuters daily. The netizen mentioned that Lynn would be missed by many after she leaves SMRT on May 20.
Tam ZH? believed that it would benefit more passengers if bus service 811E could end its journey at Yishun Temporary Bus Interchange instead of Northpoint Shopping Centre.
steven jialat started a thread regarding bus captain Krishna Rao who was seen wearing an airline pilots cap while driving the bus. Several netizens mentioned that the said bus captain was actually very polite and should not be criticised for wearing a pilots cap. Some said that the cap looked nice. zekrom007 stated in jest that the bus might also be travelling at a speed of an airplane.
Eugene Gan? reported that the Bukit Panjang LRT was down and that the train was being driven manually from Choa Chua Kang station.
?Joelle Lim? noticed that the timing of bus service 912 travelling towards Woodlands Customs got worse after the buses were transferred to Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The arrival timing board was also inaccurate.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about the Home Nursing Foundation's (HNF) Portraits of Love exhibition that was launched on Apr 22 by Dr Amy Khor, Senior Minister of State for Health and Environment and Water Resources. Being the Principal Mobility Partner of HNF, SMRT has sponsored a custom-fitted mini bus with a wheelchair ramp, hydraulic lifts and dedicated wheelchair spaces as well as point-to-point transportation for their healthcare workers and beneficiaries. HNF nurses can spend more time with patients, and the vehicles will allow them greater mobility for a better quality of life. Meiqiong Kwok said that the Government was getting better in providing better care to its people.
?Aidle Mohd Ibrahim? shared photos of the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange steel structure which had several missing bolts and nuts.The netizen stated that while at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange, he observed that the steel column and beam joints have missing bolts and nuts near the wheelchair ramp at the interchange exit and at other parts of the interchange. The netizens main concern was the safety of the structure. He mentioned that the issue had been reported to the Building and Construction Authority.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) announced in a news release on the tender for the third bus package under the Government Contracting model.Set to be rolled out in two tranches from the first half of 2018, the Seletar package comprises 26 bus services, including two new ones, that would ply routes from Ang Mo Kio, Yio Chu Kang and Yishun bus interchanges. At least five potential bidders have expressed interest in the tender, which closes on Oct 6. They include Tower Transit and Go-Ahead. Incumbents SBS Transit and SMRT Buses also expressed interest, and said that they would make their decision after assessing the tender requirements. Several netizens asked whether the third bus package would reduce fares and offer better employment package to locals. Patricia Pang questioned if there was a need to change operators as she was already happy with the existing operators at Ang Mo Kio and Yio Chu Kang. Jared Ho disapproved of the third bus package, saying that the Government had already messed up the Bulim package and is now going to split up an interchange into two, referring to the exclusion of several services which operate from the same interchange. The netizen asked why bus service 265 and 268 were in the third package while services 73, 853, 854, 855, 856, 857 and 859 were not in the package. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut hoped that SBS Transit could get the third bus package as he was currently dissatisfied with SMRTs disorganised deployment of fleets. Yue Kiat Tan questioned why LTA had to split up the bus services in Yishun, as it will cause confusion when the new operator takes over selected bus routes.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) asked which colour between red and green would win to be Singapores official bus colour. Some netizens stated that it was just a waste of money to change the colour of existing buses. Others said that the buses should either use LTAs livery or maintain their existing liveries to avoid confusion.
Justine Soh mentioned seeing a visually impaired man at Bugis MRT without anyone helping him, not even SMRT officers at the station. The netizen mentioned that he and his friends assisted the man in taking the MRT.Several netizens said that the netizen did not have to announce to the world that he and his friends did something good.
Philip Ang mentioned that in other democratic countries, an accident similar to the SMRT incident which claimed the lives of two SMRT maintenance crew would have been investigated independently in concurrence with an internal probe. In Singapore, however, SMRT conducted an internal investigation, withheld its findings and subsequently appointed foreigners to recommend improvements in safety protocols.The issue of accountability, as usual, would not be addressed to deflect blame from top management.The contributor said that the Government should not cover up SMRT fatalities and disclose the findings of SMRTs investigations. He said that Singaporeans were already fed up with all the unaccountability that has been ongoing for five decades. Bapak said that it was good to work with the Singapore Government because those who make mistakes would be protected. Singapore Fooled Again n Again wondered why there was a need to engage foreign experts for consultations despite having the train system for 31 years. The netizen also asked why establish an engineering school for the rail industry only now. LIONS said that the LTA was at fault for its failure to provide a safe and efficient public transportation.
Louisham Osman? had seen a tourist eating and drinking onboard an East-West line train bound for Pasir Ris.
Go-Ahead Singapore commenced operations for the remaining 11 of the 24 existing public bus services under the Loyang Bus Package on September 18. The company has also assumed responsibility for managing Pasir Ris Bus Interchange. Mohamad Syahid Bin Arif hoped that the vibrant red and yellow corporate colours of Go-Ahead Singapore would also translate into vibrant services for commuters. Ben Tan said that the shade of green used on the buses was ugly. The netizen mentioned that the current SMRT bus livery was the best as it showed a progressive and modern design language. Aaron Ng asked whether service guides could be available onboard the bus.
?Nelson Ng observed that bus captains seemed to detest queuing at bus stops because most of them would only stop to drop off a passenger but would not bother to pick up passengers already in queue at the bus stop.The netizen mentioned experiencing this with SMB116K at bus stop 07371 at 6:20 p.m. on Apr 7.
?Phil reported about the unpleasant smell at Dhoby Ghaut MRT station which smelled like a burst sewage pipe. According to the netizen, he saw water flowing from a ceiling and that the floor was covered with brown-coloured water. The station staff had already cordoned off the area.Apart from the foul stench, train services were functioning as per normal. stomprus stated that years of neglect in maintenance had come to haunt SMRT and make things miserable for commuters. Rashkae claimed that Bishan Station and between Clementi and Jurong East also had a similar smell.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about SMRT staff members who assisted Bryan, a male commuter, when he felt unwell at Lavender MRT station.Bryan was rushing for a bus when he fell and injured his toes. As he felt giddy from the loss of blood, he sought assistance from staff at the Passenger Service Centre. Station Manager Geof and Assistant Station Manager Asri attended to him quickly with first aid and got a cab for him to go to Raffles Hospital. SM Geof later called Bryan three times to check on him and advised him to use mobile apps to check for bus arrival timings instead of rushing.Bryan came down to the station to thank the staff again. Netizens praised SMRT staff for doing a good job.
A software to alert drivers to red-light and fixed-speed cameras would soon be rolled out across the taxi fleets of SMRT and ComfortDelGro after the successful trial involving nearly a quarter of ComfortDelGros taxis.Starting October, the software would be installed progressively in the mobile data terminals of all of ComfortDelGros 17,000 taxis and to 3,500 cabs from SMRT starting next year. The Traffic Police said that the trial on 3,812 ComfortDelGro taxis, between October last year and March this year, saw a 40% decrease in speeding violations compared with the previous six months. The number of violations involving cabs running a red light also decreased.Ms Jasmine Tan, Trans-Cab spokeswoman, said that apart from looking into a software integration issue, the operator would also need to know the cost involved. Meanwhile, Premier Taxis and Prime Taxi have yet to issue statements whether they would install the new software on their taxis. Several netizens stated that lesser violations do not equate to better driving behaviour of taxi drivers. Larry Tan said that the software should be installed in all vehicles and motorbikes in Singapore.
A school bus windshield shattered after metal pieces landed on it while travelling along Commonwealth Avenue West parallel to the MRT East-West Line viaduct. The bus driver, Xu Yujin, stated that he was driving when he heard two loud noises followed by the cracking of his windscreen. When he alighted, he saw two rusty metal plates which he suspected had fallen from the MRT tracks above. The incident was immediately reported to the police.The police notified SMRT about the incident and was informed that the operator would provide compensation once proven that they had caused the accident.After investigations, SMRT said that the metal pieces were not found to be from its tracks or trains. It is understood that the metal did not match SMRTs components. Mr Xu, who had spent $5,000 for repairs on the vehicle, sought the assistance of a Member of Parliament. He also requested footage from the Land Transport Authority (LTA) to determine where the metal pieces came from. Some netizens stated that the school bus driver should have hired a lawyer instead of asking help from a Member of Parliament. Yogi SG was uncertain that the school bus driver would be able to obtain a footage of the incident.
Tan Kin Lian mentioned taking a bus to Hong Lim Park and asked the bus driver how many stops does it take to reach the destination. He was informed that it would be four stops. The netizen, however, realised that the bus had already passed Hong Lim Park after two stops and had to alight at the stop after and walk back. Tan Kin Lian said that it was rather bad that the bus drivers do not know the stops. He had been asking that the next bus stop be displayed on a digital display or have a voice announcement on buses over the past few years. He added that it was so sad that the standard of customer service in Singapore is poor and the people in charge at LTA, SBS Transit or SMRT did not seem to care.Some netizens said that the Government and transport operators did not seem to care as the issue does not affect their profits.Richardo Link said that there was poor organization and management.Rajesh Ram Singh mentioned his experience wherein the bus driver only shrugged when asked about a destination because the driver could not understand English.
On Facebook, States Times Review posted about a train that broke down along the North East Line at Potong Pasir station. Several netizens stated that train breakdowns were no longer newsworthy and had become the norm. Some mentioned that the Transport Minister should commit hara-kiri. Zack Az said that train operators would always have excuses for the breakdowns such as track faults or electrical line faults, but it was never their fault.
Following a S$1.18B buyout offer from investment firm Temasek Holdings, SMRTs shares climbed more than 8% to close at S$1.65 on July 21 after trading of the stock had been halted pending the announcement.At least three brokers, DBS, OCBC and UOB, have recommended that SMRT investors accept Temasek's offer. Analysts noted that the offer price was about 9% higher than the counter's last traded price before the announcement, and 15% higher than the counters average price over the last 52 weeks.Commuters, however, were warned that the benefit from the potential privatisation of SMRT would have little or no immediate impact in areas such as train reliability and frequency, since these areas were being addressed by the Governments changes to the rail financing network. However, once SMRT is privatised, it can better focus on delivering reliable and efficient public transport services, rather than having to keep their eye on investor priorities.Analysts also stated that taking SMRT private would unlikely have any impact on fares as all public transport operators are regulated under a fare regime. Several netizens believed that Temasek Holdings move was a bailout of SMRT rather than a buyout. Some believed that the buyout was a move to avoid public scrutiny. Several stated that transport fares had always increased regardless of privatisation.
Cecilia was concerned when she saw a man who had brought his unfolded scooter onto the train on Jul 19. The netizen said that SMRT staff should check and request for the passenger to fold his scooter or warn him not to bring the scooter onboard the train, as it is dangerous and could cause others to trip and fall. Several netizens mentioned that SMRT staff usually ask commuters to fold their scooters before boarding the train. Some said that the contributor should have reported the incident to any SMRT staff instead of posting it online.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? reported that bus service 911 (SG1742Z) had a missing headrest cushion at the rear.
On Facebook, SMRT posted the closing of the existing Woodlands Regional Bus Interchange on Mar 12 due to the construction of the underpass link to the future Thomson-East Coast Line Woodlands Station. All existing bus services would operate from the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange Calvin Tan asked if the future enhanced Woodlands Bus Interchange would have an air-conditioning system.
Peshhalaa Devendran, who shared on Facebook about the racist SMRT taxi driver, posted an update regarding the incident.Ms Devendran posted a screenshot of the reply from SMRT Customer Relations team which stated their apologies for the incident and the disciplinary action taken against the taxi driver involved.Ms Devendran thanked SMRT for their assistance and mentioned that she believed it to be an isolated incident and in no way represented the company and their employees. Some netizens stated that the taxi driver should be sent to refresher and customer service courses. Others highlighted that the netizen did not pay for the fare when she asked the taxi driver to drop her off by the side of the road, and that SMRT should also file a case against her. A few mentioned that the story was one sided and that SMRT should also hear the drivers story.
A netizen under the username @Mohdnazly posted on Twitter about his disappointment with Go-Ahead Singapores services because the last bus for service 3 did not arrive.The netizen mentioned waiting for the last bus from 1:00 to 1:30 a.m. but there was no sign of any bus. He stated that the display board showed that the last bus was supposed to arrive at 1:05 a.m.It was reported that after Go-Ahead took over the bus routes in the Punggol region, there had been many complaints about bus timings and crowded buses. Vishal BlackBeard Singh stated that the public should give Go-Ahead some time to adapt to the ways and needs of Singaporeans. (buses[IN]gapore!) mentioned that Go-Ahead should have already adjusted its timings after three days of operation. In a later post, the netizen stated that bus waiting times were up to 40 minutes. Bujang Teruna said that feedback on bus timings should be sent directly to the LTA.
?Imran Abdul Careem? wondered why SMRT could not invest in a good management team so commuters would not be inconvenienced by slow moving trains during peak hours, longer waiting times and infrequent trains. The netizen mentioned that it takes 40 minutes to travel from Bugis to Tanah Merah.
kosongice found those promoting credit cards at MRT stations annoying and asked others how to deal with them. Several netizens stated that those promoters were just earning an honest living. Some suggested not to have eye contact with the promoters or simply inform them that you already have a credit card. Geylang Prawn Seller wondered how much SMRT was earning from the credit card promoters at their stations.
AE Cha reported that bus service 980 was always crowded in the morning and evening. The netizen also suggested deploying double-decker buses to accommodate the high demand for said service.
?Zeng Shichang? reported seeing a passenger who opened and drank a can of beer in a train cabin. The netizen tried calling SMRTs hotline but the hotline was closed. The netizen suggested that each stations hotline number be posted on SMRT website so commuters could report incidents to any station.
On Facebook, SMRT shared photos of Members of Parliament for Choa Chu Kang GRC Gan Kim Yong, Zaqy Mohamad and Low Yen Ling at Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange for the launch of new bus service 308. The new feeder service will serve upcoming residential developments along Choa Chu Kang Avenue 7, Choa Chu Kang Grove and Keat Hong Link.MP Gan Kim Yong approved of the new service initiative for Choa Chu Kang residents.
"Train services on the North-East Line between Chinatown and Farrer Park stations in both directions were disrupted due to a power fault at Dhoby Ghaut station. A commuter said that the train stalled from 11:25a.m. to 11:35a.m. before staff members informed passengers to leave the train and board shuttle buses instead. "Tammy Tan, SBS Transit's Senior Vice President of Corporate Communications, stated that full services resumed about 40 minutes later. The cause of the fault was also being investigated. Raymond Lee stated that after celebrating 100 days of no disruptions comes two MRT disruptions in one day. Lin Hui Min Cheyenne said that even if the MRT breaks down daily, people would continue to take the train because it was more reliable.
Responding to queries on why it continued to award contracts worth more than S$800M to Kawasaki-Sifang after cracks were found in the first batch of trains, the LTA said last week (July 7) that it "looked at the overall quality that the contractor can deliver", and that they considered that the contractor was able to quickly identify the cause of the defects, take responsibility and carry out the necessary action promptly to rectify the fault. Several netizens would like to know how the Government structures the quality of the scorecards used in the tender process. Mingji Lim stated that the Kawasaki-Sifang collaboration was not the same Kawasaki that did the first North-South and East-West Lines trains. The netizen added that Kawasaki used to build the trains themselves, hence the trains were more reliable. Guan Sim said that he would not place too much blame on SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek as most of the problems SMRT was currently being faced with were inherited from the previous CEO. Ron Chan said that LTA and SMRT should publish a complete and open report on this matter and its contract award criteria as well. The netizen added that checks can be done with other train operators as there may be similar experiences to share.
On Mothership.sg blog, Jonathan Lim wrote that taxi companies charge passengers 10% of the total fare as a form of administrative fees when fares were paid using a credit card. This charge, however, does not go to the driver and credit card companies only earn up to 3% of fees transacted.In 2014, Visa withdrew itself as a payment option from all taxi companies as it wanted to uphold its no surcharge protection policy. Visa, however, was back as a payment option in ComfortDelGro taxis and together with the 10% surcharge from Jan 1 2016.Meanwhile, the writer noted that passengers using third-party taxi-booking apps did not incur a surcharge if they pay by credit cards. Several netizens believed it was unfair to commuters for taxi companies to charge a 10% surcharge when paying taxi fares using a credit card. Some wondered what the 7% of the 10% surcharge was for if the credit card companies only earn 3% of fees transacted. Fadly Azad found it senseless for taxi companies to collect a 10% credit card surcharge if Uber and GrabCar has no such charges. Myron Chua mentioned that it was against credit card companies regulation to charge customers for use of credit card as payment mode. Lehan Edirisinghe said that it was inconvenient to pay with cash and that taxi companies should give commuters a 10% discount for using a credit card. Kai Boon mentioned using Uber because 10%surcharge was too much.
netbookcraze asked why Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan had been so quiet over SMRT incidents, but had a lot of things to say to the Town Council. Hard0n stated in jest that Minister Khaw was busy deleting comments from his Facebook page. ahkrong said that Minister Khaw was quiet because he was still enjoying his bonus.
ahboy82 stated that compared to other MRT lines, the Downtown Line (DTL) was the most high-class line because it was serving the elite residents of King Albert, Hill View and Sixth Avenue. Several netizens claimed that the DTL would be serving the domestic helpers of the high-class residents in the area. eclipsemints said that the DTL should have been connected to Kranji MRT instead of ending at Bukit Panjang so that the people from Yew Tee and Woodlands would have a direct alternative transport when going to town. Philipkee mentioned that the DTL would reduce the load at the North-South Line. The netizen also assumed that the DTL ends at Bukit Panjang because it was projected that there would be more residents in Bukit Panjang in the future. shikoo said that the DTL would be crowded next week as the elite schools would start its school term.
Firdaus Wahid was disappointed with the lack of leadership, communication, and proper protocols at Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange.The netizen mentioned that the Standard Operating Procedure (SOP) for bus passengers on wheelchair was to ask the Passenger Service Centre for assistance for the bus service they wish to board and to wait at Berth 5 for the wheelchair accessible bus (WAB) service. The WAB service would have the wheelchair user board the bus at Berth 5 before continuing to its original berth to pick passengers as per normal.On September 19, however, despite following the protocol and a female customer service officer waiting with them at Berth 5, the netizen said that WAB service 985 drove off without stopping. The female staff who was waiting with them then ran back to the Passenger Service Centre, which the netizen assumed was to look into the matter.The staff, however, did not come back and a second service 985 bus left without the netizen and his wheelchair bound wife. The netizen went back to the Passenger Service Centre only to find out that the female staff who had previously assisted them had actually gone to buy dinner.Upon talking to the most senior officer available, the netizen was informed that passengers on wheelchair could board at every berth that had a WAB service. When asked about how the SOP came into play, the senior staff did not answer. The netizen posted photos of the signs instructing wheelchair users to ask for assistance to board a WAB service. He also asked SMRT for a lengthy reply including an apology, a full assessment of the incident and the correct procedure for boarding WABs at Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox wondered how wheelchair users could board at individual berths when the bus could not park near any pavement. SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen for his contact details so that the team can reach out to him. CMC has also alerted Buses to the post and the team is currently investigating the incident.
SMRT reported a 22.9% decrease in profit for the first quarter of its 2017 financial year on August 8. In a media release, SMRT said its profit after tax and minority interests came in at S$15.5M compared to S$20.1M in the same period a year ago. Its revenue for the quarter was down by 2% to S$313.9M, while operating expenses increased 0.8% to S$311.5M. SMRT attributed the lower profit to a higher operating loss of S$9.4M in its rail business, compared to a loss of S$5.3M in the same period last year, as a result of lower revenue due to lower average fare.SMRT added that there was a cannibalisation effect of Downtown Line 2 operations, and added that higher staff costs and repairs, as well as maintenance-related expenditures were causes of the losses reported in its rail business. Several netizens wondered how SMRTs profit could decrease when there were so many people taking public transport. Others stated that despite the reported decrease in profit, SMRTs overall earnings were still high. Others were afraid that there would be another fare hike soon. Jimmy Beany stated that after Temasek takes over SMRT, there will not be any quarterly financial reports made to the public.
Two Singapore Armed Forces (SAF) Third Sergeants Dinie Afiq and Zulfadi were commended for answering the call of duty while out with their peers on Feb 6.In a post on The Singapore Army's Facebook page on Feb 14, the medics came to the aid of an elderly woman who had slipped and fallen facedown at a flight of stairs near Yishun MRT station. The elderly suffered lacerations on her forehead. The medics and their peers immediately assisted the elderly, stopped the bleeding and applied a bandage to her forehead.Besides Dinie and Zulfadi, the post also named Third Sergeants Hong Rui, Fahmi and Kishan who were all from the SAF Medical Training Institute, while Third Sergeant Jerrald, was said to be from the 1st Battalion, Singapore Guards. Several netizens praised the SAF members for their good deed. Some stated that the LTA should look into the infrastructure and refurbish them as necessary to ensure safety. Jason Ong hoped that the MRT management would bear the medical expense of the elderly, out of goodwill. Careena Here mentioned that the design of Yishun MRT was horrible and that the LTA needs to redesign it to accommodate the influx of commuters due to the new estate being built in the area. The netizen added that there were also insufficient toilets at the station. Ang Geok Peng Theresa stated that the steps outside Bukit Gombak Station leading to bus stops were slippery.
SMRT has settled a lawsuit brought by a woman who was paralysed from the waist down after falling into the Tanah Merah MRT escalator gap more than three years ago. Azlin Amran sued SMRT Trains for negligence, and sought about S$3M in damages following the mishap on Jan 28, 2013. Neither party disclosed the final payout, if any. Patrick Nathan, Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications at SMRT told The Straits Times that the case had been amicably settled out of court. In March, SMRT was fined S$120,000 after pleading guilty to one charge under the Workplace Safety and Health Act following a probe by the Manpower Ministry. Several netizens stated that there should be barriers around escalators that were under maintenance. Others believed that Azlin was busy looking at her mobile device and hence did not notice that the escalator was being repaired. Some said that both SMRT and Azlin were guilty of negligence.
icansing asked if there were other countries that have warning tones that alert commuters when train doors were about to close. The netizen mentioned that the warning tone seemed to make people rush to the train. Several netizens stated that trains in other countries also have warning tones before the train door closes. jace88 felt that the warning tone in MRT trains in Singapore were more invasive, resulting in people rushing to board the train. Ah-Pin-Kor said that if there were no warning tones, commuters might take their time in boarding and alighting the train. jeff79 mentioned that the MRT train timings were inaccurate with trains usually packed so commuters tend to rush to be able to board the current train. Dark.Horizon stated that trains in Vienna and Warsaw have warning tones as well to alert those who were visually impaired.
JM_LAU stated that travel time from Ang Mo Kio to Bugis via the MRT was now only 27-30 minutes compared to the previous 51 minutes of travel before the opening of the Downtown Line. Entry Level PC mentioned that commuters could also reach Bugis from Ang Mo Kio via the North-South and East West Lines. diamond_guy said that it was a lot faster reaching Bugis now with a car because the traffic was lighter as more people were taking the MRT instead of driving.
?Lucien Ee? praised bus captainRiz Azhar of service 922 for being one of the most enthusiastic drivers she had encountered. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain signalled for her to move back a little to stay clear of the arriving bus, and also greeted her when she boarded the bus.
A Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) on the Singapore-Malaysia High-Speed Rail (HSR) project was signed by Transport Minister and Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure Khaw Boon Wan and Malaysian Minister in the Prime Ministers Department Abdul Rahman Dahlan on Jul 19, witnessed by Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong and Malaysian counterpart Najib Razak. The 350km line is expected to reduce travel time between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur to around 90 minutes. It was also announced that two train operating companies would be appointed to run the HSR service. An international operator would handle the express service between the Singapore terminus at Jurong East and the Kuala Lumpur end at the upcoming Bandar Malaysia development. The same operator would also oversee a cross-border shuttle service between Singapore and Iskandar Puteri. Another operator would run the domestic service within Malaysia. The express service would have scheduling and operational priority over a domestic line servicing the six stops in Malaysia between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur. Several netizens considered the signing of the MoU good news. Some hoped that Malaysia would keep the agreement and finish the project. Others wondered why Singapore was involved in the project when it was only one of the stations of the HSR. Some said that Singapore should first focus on local transport issues. Several hoped that the tender would not be awarded to a China-owned company. William Choo asked whether taxpayers would be co-paying the costs for the project. Johnny Tan asked why it would take 10 years to complete. Other netizens said they were looking forward to more lines connecting the ASEAN countries and strengthening ties within the region. Several others suggested linking up with Thailand and then China as well.
?Linda Huber? noted that foldable bicycles of a certain size specification were only allowed on trains during off-peak hours while strollers and electric scooters used by the elderly were allowed all day. The netizen pointed out that some baby strollers and elderly electric scooters come in large sizes, which block the aisle in the train and obstruct passengers. The netizen questioned why strollers and scooters were allowed on trains all day, while foldable bicycles, some more compact than strollers and electric scooters, were not. SMRT has reached out to the netizen to share that the foldable bicycle policy is currently regulated by LTA and also shared that LTA has recently announced to soon launch a six-month trial to test the feasibility of allowing users to bring their foldable bikes and personal mobility devices onto trains and buses, at all hours.
SBS Transit bus captain Kamarul had been seen shielding passengers from the rain by holding an umbrella between the bus and the bus stop.Kamarul stated that he had seen passengers getting drenched while boarding the bus during rainy days and was worried that they would fall sick. For his thoughtfulness and kindness, companies such as Songhe and a canola oil brand donated 500kg of rice and 60 litres of canola oil respectively to Kamaruls preferred charity, the Muslim Missionary Society Homes, under his name.
Milik Arab? stated that the adult concession card system was very unfair. The netizen mentioned that her concession card had been spoilt a couple of times and had to wait for weeks for the refund of the remaining value on the card. She also had to either pay the normal fair or top up S$120 on the temporary card issued while waiting for the replacement card, thus spending more for her travel.
Some local companies took advantage of Joseph Schoolings Olympic win through congratulatory advertisements and a variety of offers to honour his achievement.ComfortDelGro taxis had been displaying "Our Pride J Schooling" on taxi rooftop signs to "celebrate this historical moment". The transport operator also offered a S$10 discount for passengers who welcomed the Olympic winner at Changi Airport on the morning of August 15. The discount was given to the first 1,000 passengers who made booking trips via the ComfortDelGro App. Several netizens stated that ComfortDelGro should have lowered the taxi rentals or offered free rental to its cabbies. Others said that free rides should have been given to all Singaporeans. Sangha Vandana mentioned that all wheelchairs users should have completely free rides. A few asked ComforDelGro that instead of using the publicity, the company should donate money for Schoolings training. Li Li Chua wondered whether companies were paying Schooling for the use of his name in its publicity efforts.
Gwen McPherson stated that the SMRT she took from Changi Airport had charged her S$8 instead of only S$5 for the airport surcharge. The netizen also mentioned that the usual 30-minute ride took 45 minutes. The driver was also unable to keep within his lane.
LTA approved UberTaxis continued operation in Singapore. It joins other third-party cab booking services that have successfully registered under a regulatory framework that took effect in September last year. The Third-Party Taxi Booking Service Providers framework was created with the aim of safeguarding commuters' interests after cab booking apps became prevalent. Under the regulations, the apps must dispatch only licensed taxis, and specify all fares upfront.Third-party booking app providers that were found by LTA to have fallen short of the requirements would not be allowed to operate in Singapore. They also risk being fined or jailed if they were found operating without a certificate.
Six SBS Transit bus services will skip bus stops near the National Stadium on July 9 and 16 due to road closures for the National Day Parade National Education Show 2016. The affected services, 10, 11, 14, 16, 70/70M and 196, would be diverted to alternative routes from 3:30 to 11:59 p.m. on both days.
?Thomas Daniel? asked SMRT to deploy buses with quieter ones for service 806 and remove the noisy Hispano buses. The netizen mentioned that at 5:30 a.m., the bus would make loud noises when braking.
On Facebook, the LTA mentioned that prizes await 50 lucky draw winners who would vote for the Singapore bus livery colour by Feb 5. Wrx Sti stated that individual bus companies should retain their livery colours so passengers could distinguish which buses they were taking. ??? considered it a waste of money and said that the colour red should be used for Singapore buses.
On Facebook, LTA shared photos of the painting process of turning the existing colour of a public bus to lush green as part of the transition to the Bus Contracting Model (BCM).The wrapping of the bus was completely stripped off before entering the spray paint booth for a shiny coat of lush green paint. Buses would gradually be painted so that all public buses under BCM would bear the common lush green livery. LTA sought the publics understanding as they work hard to iron out the teething issues during the transition period. A few netizens were looking forward to see all buses having the standardised green colour. Pang Soon Tan hoped Tower Transit would provide good scheduled bus service, quality Bus Service Reliability Framework performance and pro-active approach to boost bus service capacity levels as and when needed. Alex Ong preferred to have red and silver buses.
crayon_shinchan disapproved of the design of the Downtown Lines Chinatown Station, saying that it was too narrow and small. Some netizens agreed that the said station seemed cramped.
?Muhd Naz Farihin? reported that the bus captain of service 911E (SMB331E) continued with the journey despite an indicator warning that the bus had a defect since its departure from Woodlands Bus Interchange. The netizen stated that the bus captain should have stopped the bus and called the control centre for assistance. Several netizens stated that sometimes the issue was with the wiring or a faulty sensor. Nakata Soo observed that most of the newer low floor buses had this kind of wiring issue. SMRT thanked the netizen for flagging this incident and ensured that buses that were deemed unfit would not be scheduled for revenue service.
?Dennis Heng? posted mistakenly on SMRT Facebook page regarding the sounding of an air horn coming from the Punggol LRT depot in the middle of the night. The sounding of the air horn already stopped after their Member of Parliament wrote a letter to the concerned authority regarding the issue. The sound, however, was heard again twice. Four loud announcements made at 2 a.m. were also heard on Jan 14.The netizen asked SMRT to be considerate as many people have to work or study the next day. SMRT replied that the Punggol LRT was managed by SBS Transit.
?Fauzie Husni? reported the bus captain of service 969 (SMB3578R) for ignoring the passenger standing on the upper deck of the bus which was clearly visible on the display monitor. SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Ronnie Lin believed that Member of Parliament Lee Bee Wah was just helping SMRT improve when she asked what time of the day was the hottest because she had received feedback that the morning sun at Khatib MRT station was very hot. The netizen explained that, in the event of a train breakdown, people would be less irritated when they are in the shade while waiting for normal services to resume. Several netizens stated that here were more important issues to bring up in Parliament rather than how to make Khatib MRT station much cooler. Christopher Bong said that as an MP, Lee Bee Wah could easily call SMRT to highlight the issue without need to make so much publicity.
Izzul Haziq? asked whether it was appropriate to have buggies driven around extremely crowded areas in the bus interchange. The netizen mentioned that the buggy driver even turned on the high beam and also used the horn. Zul Saibot pointed out that buggies are for the elderly who have difficulty in walking.
?Tay Jing Wen? praised bus captain Ramlan Bin Kassim of service 965 (SMB1553A) for greeting every passenger who boarded the bus with a smile and for waiting for passengers to sit down before moving off.
A presupposed couple was filmed fighting onboard an SBS Transit bus, where the man refused to let his girlfriend off the bus. The incident held up the entire bus. Several netizens wondered why the bus driver did not continue with the journey while the couple continued arguing and chose to inconvenience other bus passengers. Others said that the female passenger could have climbed on the seats in front of her if she really wanted to alight from the bus. Some asked why none of the passengers confronted the couple as they were disrupting the journey of other passengers.
In Parliament, Senior Minister of State for Transport Ng Chee Meng stated that if the taxi industry wanted private-hire operators to compete on a completely level playing field, they might have to contend with Uber and Grab drivers being allowed to pick up street-hailing customers, which was not the outcome the Government desires.Ngs statement was in response to questions from Member of Parliament Lee Bee Wah on whether there had been "any measurement to show that Uber and GrabCar actually bring positive impact to commuters.To the suggestion by Member of Parliament Ang Hin Kee to have three separate licences for taxi drivers, private-hire drivers and limousine drivers, Ng said that it was possible since it was actually considered in their original design of the system. Regarding the current minimum age of 30 years old for taxi drivers, Ng said they were open for reviews regarding the requirement. Several netizens stated that it was time for taxi drivers to stop behaving like kings of the road and choosing passengers and destinations. Others hoped that taxi companies would improve their standards. Some mentioned that taxi drivers should just join Uber or Grab because they have lower rental rates, no minimum mileage, and that they could choose to drive during high demand periods only. Steven Waliter believed that levelling the playing field would hurt taxi operators more than the taxi drivers. Ken Lee said that it was very natural for taxi drivers to react negatively to added competition for fares. The netizen, however, was afraid that the overall costs of compliance to regulations would definitely be passed on to the commuters.
Speaking at the Committee of Supply debate in Parliament, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that the Singapore Rail Academy would be set up to offer more dedicated training to help rail engineers and maintenance crew improve their skills and keep up with changes in technology.The idea of a national rail academy was first mentioned by Minister Khaw last November. He said then that the Transport Ministry would be working with the National University of Singapore and the Nanyang Technological University to ensure that final year engineering modules include rail engineering. The academy would work with the rail operators and institutes of higher learning to provide training, as well as accreditation and certification of training programmes and competencies. Several netizens hoped that the setting up of the rail academy would not be used as an excuse to raise fares. Charmeleon believed that the academy for engineers was long overdue given the reliance on public transport and the Governments active policy on reducing the number of cars on the road. The netizen said that the programme should have been released earlier to supplement the growth of rail services. SOS9112001 wondered whether the Government was putting too much resources into the rail system.
On HardwareZone Forum, some netizens claimed that there was a track fault at the North-South Line on Mar 18. Some netizens stated that trains were travelling at normal speed. Others mentioned that the train fault was at the East-West Line. Phyber said that s/he was stuck at Braddell Station at 2:28 p.m.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRT Bishan Station Service Ambassador Zainodin Abdul Hadi who had been praised by a mother online for being friendly to her son. Many netizens have also shared similar anecdotes of Zainodin and other friendly SMRT staff members. Several netizens continued to praise and shared their encounters with SA Zainodin.
Alvin Tan Meng Hwee posted that the commute on the SBSTs Punggol LRT Line had become unpleasant after the recent change in the position which the trains come to a stop at stations, in order to cater for two-car trains.The netizen mentioned that besides more frequent minor train disruptions, there have also been a tremendous drop in speed along several stretches of the line, especially between the Punggol Town Centre station and Cove, Damai, Sam Kee and Soo Teck stations. The unpleasant commute was further exacerbated by the poor air-conditioning.The netizen hoped that SBS Transit could reprogram the trains to travel at a faster speed, and also improve the air-conditioning.
In an article on My Paper, it was stated that fares from Bukit Panjang station to Newton Station at the Downtown Line (DTL) costs S$1.91 which was higher than alighting at Little India where the fare was only S$1.75. ??The Public Transport Council (PTC) explained that the fare rates were calculated based on the fastest route distance but there would be exceptional cases for the Downtown Line 2. Based on the fare charging system, the distance from Bukit Panjang Station to Newton was 28.8km, while the distance from Bukit Panjang to Little India was only 14km, which was why the fare was cheaper. Several netizens stated that the fare structure was complicated. Stuffed mentioned that it was cheaper to ride the bus with the same distance than to ride the train. The netizen mentioned that the DTL was only convenient because of its speed. Soulhacker stated that the DTL was built for profits and not for commuters. Ah-Pin-Kor said that those who take the Downtown Line was high class so they could afford the higher fare. QJPtheSE explained that the fare from built Panjang to Newton was based on the LRT fare from Bukit Panjang to Choa Chu Kang and from Choa Chu Kang to Newton. While the fare from Bukit Panjang to Little India was based on the direct trip on the Downtown Line.
?On SMRTs Facebook page, Jacqueline Liliput Teo? commended the excellent attitude of the bus captain of service 143 (SG5036C) for greeting passengers.The netizen also observed that the bus captain willingly offered directions to passengers who did not know where to alight. SMRT thanked the netizen for her appreciation of transport workers, pointed out that bus service 143 is currently operated by Tower Transit and referred the netizen to the bus operators page.
hansamu asked whether Temasek Holdings privatisation offer to SMRT was worth accepting or should be rejected outright. qiqiha said that SMRT shareholders should accept the offer. flexway believed that there was more intrinsic value in SMRT shares than what Temasek has offered.
In response to the letter by Paul Chan Poh Hoi published on The Straits Times last Friday citing the need to reinforce the culture of professionalism and dedication to rail excellence, SMRT Trains Managing Director Lee Ling Wee stressed that SMRT makes significant investments to maintain and upkeep its rail network. In a forum letter reply, Mr Lee stated that over the last four quarters of SMRTs financial year, SMRTs rail maintenance-related expenditure has accounted for up to 53% of its rail revenue. He also said that the measurement of mean distance travelled by trains before a service delay occurs is an international performance metric used by metros around the world, including Singapore, as one measure of rail service reliability. Mr Lee agreed that this should not be the only metric used as an indicator of rail service reliability. Mr Lee referred Mr Chan to the SMRT website for data that demonstrates SMRTs commitment to improving the reliability of the North-South and East-West Lines, which include the rail maintenance-related expenses as well as train service availability, train punctuality, train delays and service disruptions. Mr Lee also stressed that while it is useful to benchmark against the best in class around the world, straight-line comparisons between different rail networks are difficult to make, as rail companies operate on different models.He assured Mr Chan that SMRT has indeed embraced a "culture of dedication to rail excellence". SMRT had published a primer, Your Journey Matters, regarding ongoing efforts to renew and improve the North-South and East-West Lines. It highlights the investment in condition-monitoring equipment as well as the preventive and predictive maintenance programmes, as part of broader efforts to improve the service and reliability of the rail network. Qiao Zhi mentioned that if maintenance and renewal had been carried out consistently, SMRTs rail maintenance-related expenditure could well be far below 53%.
Two notices from SBS Transit were displayed on railings outside the gate of Punggol MRT station located closest to Waterway Point shopping mall threatening a fine of S$1,000 for parking bicycles outside. Some people wondered why the fine has to be set so high, saying that the fine was excessive and unjust since there were not enough parking spaces around the station to accommodate the high number of bicycles. Meanwhile, a 40-year-old man who wants to be known only as Mr Tan, believed that a fine of S$1,000 would effectively deter cyclists from obstructing the gate. Tammy Tan, SBS Transit's Senior Vice President for Corporate Communications, stated that the Rapid Transit System Act stipulates that all bicycles must be parked in designated spaces.
The Ministry of Transport published the written reply by Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan to Member of Parliament Low Thia Khiangs question about the service standards for responding to calls made via the Emergency Call Buttons on MRT trains, the alternative action that commuters could take to stop a moving train, and how LTA intends to enhance emergency procedures for commuters on MRT and LRT trains.Minister Khaw Boon Wan replied that aside from pressing the emergency button, commuters could contact the train captain, station staff or the Operations Control Centre via the intercom units inside the trains and on platforms and via their mobile phones. Commuters could also bring the train to a safe stop by pressing the emergency stop buttons on platforms and the Emergency Next Station Stop buttons inside Bukit Panjang LRT trains. The Transport Minister also stated that train operators were required to ensure that these mechanisms function properly, and that train captains, and station and OCC staff respond in a timely manner. Minister Khaw added that LTA and the operators review these safety facilities and procedures periodically, and LTA is investigating the Bukit Panjang LRT incident.
On Redwire Times Blog, a post was discussed regarding the water puddles on the floor from a leaking roof at Punggol MRT/LRT station which had been an issue for the past one to two years. The puddles had become an eyesore and a safety hazard but has yet to be rectified despite complaints. Kent Chew mentioned that the underpass design was poor and it has no traffic light and pedestrian crossing.
SBS Transit employee Foo Ah Boon stated that commuters today enjoy buses that were safe, air-conditioned and with comfortable seats unlike the ones used almost 50 years ago. Foo said that back then the buses did not even have proper doors, were narrow and stuffy, and would be flooded on rainy days as rainwater would seep in from the ventilation hole on the roof of the bus. He mentioned that surprisingly, there were fewer road accidents those days. When a bus broke down, however, passengers had to wait an hour for the next one. There were also unusual passengers and cargoes then, when durian and livestock were allowed on buses. Sabta Wapunya remembered that previously, commuters had a choice to either take the expensive air-conditioned bus or the cheaper non air-conditioned bus. Sheridan Montrose said that it was much more fun riding the bus in the olden days. Clifford Chan stated that his worst memories when riding the bus in those days was sitting behind a smoker.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? asked SMRT to install two escalators at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen added that the toilets at the interchange should provide sanitation items like seat cleaners, bidets and tissue rolls.The netizen mentioned that dustbins at the interchange could not be easily located.
A woman going up an escalator at Boon Keng MRT station on the North-East Line fainted and tumbled at the bottom of the escalator, injuring her head. Passers-by quickly assisted the woman.A doctor and a medical assistant from a nearby clinic rushed to the scene to help when they heard of the accident, checking the woman's pulse and bandaging her head injuries.The Singapore Civil Defence Force was notified of the accident and its personnel later took the injured woman to Tan Tock Seng Hospital for treatment.
?Mariaman Deepa? praised the bus captain of service 858 (SMB1306Y) for assisting a pregnant passenger to a seat on the bus by asking other passengers to give up their seat.
The LTA would be expanding Sengkang Bus Interchange to add parking bays for another 12 buses to support the Bus Service Enhancement Programme (BSEP). The expansions would also feature passenger boarding and alighting facilities, a concourse area, offices, a staff lounge and a canteen. The expansion to Sengkang Bus Interchange would be built along Compassvale Road and linked to the existing Sengkang Integrated Transport Hub via an existing covered linkway. Keith Cheong suggested having two-train cars running along the Renjong Farmway - Sengkang LRT line. The netizen said that Harvest and Cove residents sometimes found it difficult to squeeze in the train.
Li Feng reported that his/her car was sideswiped by SBS Transit bus (SBS 8472U) while the car was stationery at the red light, heading towards Marymount Road while the bus was making a right turn towards Balestier Road. Photos of the damage to the car and the buss bumper with its licence plate were also shared. Several netizens suggested reporting the incident to the police for assistance. A few mentioned that the bus driver might not be aware of the accident.
Netizen continued to discuss Bishan train depot which would be run by solar power by the end of 2016. Several netizens approved of using solar energy for the train depot. Some netizens were afraid that the cost of installing solar panels would be passed on to commuters later.
A Stomper who feared that she was being followed by a young man as she walked from Rex Cinema to Nicoll Highway MRT station thanked the SMRT staff for escorting her to the station. The netizen began to feel scared when she noticed a young man following her at an uncomfortably close distance and who later followed her as she took the escalator to the overhead bridge. When she spotted a man wearing an SMRT uniform, she approached the staff and informed him of the situation. The young man quickly turned and walked away after seeing that the netizen was with the SMRT staff. The netizen thanked the SMRT staff for accompanying her to the station. Several netizens were uncertain if the netizens story was true. kdsks2000@gmail.com mentioned that the netizen was looking for trouble for choosing to walk from Rex Cinema to Suntec City when there were direct buses available from Bukit Timah Road.
Melvin Chang thanked SMRT staff members for assisting him when he felt unwell while travelling. The netizen also thanked the passengers who called for help. Tan from Khatib MRT station also offered the netizen to rest at the station room.
?Maxim Dae? commended bus captain Zulkhari Muhammad of service 307 for his care and consideration to stop the bus under train the viaduct (bus stop opposite Choa Chu Kang station) to shelter the commuters from the heavy downpour. The netizen hoped other bus drivers could learn from him.
Peshhalaa Devendran reported SMRT taxi driver of vehicle licence plate SHC4460T for being racist. According to the netizen, the driver made several comments about Indians, and also claimed that Singaporean Chinese hate Indians as they did not contribute to society apart from paying alcohol tax. The netizen requested for the driver to drop him off at the side of the road. She also refused to pay the fare as it was still nowhere near her destination, but she wanted to alight as she did not appreciate the comments which the driver had made. The netizen believes that SMRT does not condone such racism and would appreciate if SMRT follow up with the matter. Priya Majewski was disappointed with the drivers behaviour.
Mei Rui Hang shared a photo of a long queue for bus service 965 during the morning peak hour on August 3. The netizen asked SMRT to deploy additional buses or more double-decker buses. Marvin Tam Peng Siang agreed that more double-decker buses should be deployed during peak hours.
farhan posted about the recommendations of the independent panel that had assessed the power supply of all MRT and LRT lines. The experts suggested more than 40 recommendations to make the Singapore rail system more resilient. They urged for more frequent inspection and replacement of components and for the use of new monitoring technologies. They also called for tighter control of manufacturers and contractors at the design and building stages of the nation's rail network and for much greater quality control to be observed.The experts cited the newly opened Circle Line's power cables which failed during the first few months of operation. They recommended that essential components such as switches and circuit breakers should be replaced with more reliable models.According to the netizen, these recommendations put the Governments practice of awarding tenders to the lowest quote under the microscope and highlight the problems of giving such important infrastructural works to the lowest foreign bidder. William Lim noted that the manufacturers were being blamed for the MRT issues. The netizen wondered whether this was just a cover up or there were really issues with quality checks. Christopher Bong questioned the qualifications of those who studied the tender documents.
?Alex Lim? reported that the East-West Line bound train brought its passengers to the North-South Line without any announcement or explanation after it went past Jurong East MRT station. CMC has verified with OCC that there was one train that was used to clear a signal fault. Announcements were made to alert commuters travelling toward Joo Koon. This train terminated service at Bukit Gombak. SMRT has reached out to this netizen for his contact details so that CR can close the loop with him.
A grassroots leader, Wang Lei from Sembawang posted on Facebook that he was in luck to meet Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan on the train travelling from Bishan towards HarbourFront.It was observed from the photos that nobody seemed to notice the Transport Minister except for the grassroots leader, and was not offered the senior citizens priority seat in the train.Minister Khaw also showed his prototype CEPAS wristband, that was being trialled by the LTA, which allows commuters to access MRT stations without tapping any EZ-Link cards. Several netizens stated that they would not approach Minister Khaw even if they noticed him at the MRT. Some mentioned that Minister Khaw should ride the trains on weekdays during peak hours to truly understand how commuters feel. Others said that Wang Lei was a new citizen and wanted publicity so he posted his photos of the Transport Minister. A few believed that Minister Khaw and Wang Leis meeting onboard the same train was not accidental and that it was just wayang. Kesoi Mok said that not everyone should be expected to recognise the Transport Minister and suggested that Minister Khaw should introduce himself and start a conversation with other passengers. Wai-Hong Tang stated that the CEPAS wristband was great and asked who was bearing the cost for the wristband. Jackson Low expressed concern on privacy if the CEPAS wristband was trackable.
?Philip Leong? suggested announcing the number of seats available on the upper deck of double-decker buses aside from asking passengers to move in the rear. The netizen said that such announcements would prompt others to go to the upper deck which has available seats, allowing more passengers to board the bus.The netizen said that it would also ensure that double-decker buses were fully utilised on both upper and lower decks.
Current Deputy Secretary (Performance) in the Ministry of Finance, Mr Ngien Hoon Ping, would be appointed as the new Chief Executive of LTA to take over from outgoing Chief Mr Chew Men Leong, who would be leaving to join the private sector. Mr Ngien will be appointed as CE-designate of LTA from October 31 to November 11, concurrent to his present appointment.Mr Ngien studied at the University of Manchester, United Kingdom, where he graduated with a Bachelor of Engineering (First Class Honours) in Electrical and Electronic Engineering. He was subsequently awarded a Postgraduate Scholarship (Specialist Development) in 2002 to study at the National University of Singapore where he graduated with a Master of Science in Industrial and System Engineering.Prior to his appointment as Deputy Secretary (Performance) of the Ministry of Finance in July 1 2013, Mr Ngien served in the Singapore Armed Forces for 26 years and held various positions including Commander of the Combat Service Support Command, responsible for the planning and execution of army transport, maintenance engineering, supply, medical and ammunition support. Several netizens disapproved that another former military officer was appointed in a key Government position. Ge Song Liang would rather that the LTA promote the Directors who climbed through the ranks saying that they were more worthy of the position. Tan Chong Boon wished the incoming LTA CEO and his team all the success towards the Smart Mobility 2030 vision. Pat Eng said that transportation infrastructure would be a failure when performance was based on profitability.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) has been testing out the use of electric fans at five bus stops to make them cooler and more comfortable for commuters. LTA will also be studying the feasibility of installing fans at other bus stops. LTA said the trial would be evaluated based on commuters' feedback on the effectiveness of the fans.Commuters could activate the fans using switches, and the devices would be powered to run for 15 minutes at a time. Those interviewed said that the fans provide a welcome respite during the hot weather, or when the bus stops are crowded during peak periods.Madam Mary Goh, a retiree, also pointed out that letting commuters decide when to switch on the fans is a good idea. But polytechnic student Awad Ruzaini, suggested automating the process. He suggested that instead of switches, the electric fans should have sensors that could detect people at the bus stops, so the fans turn on automatically. Most netizens stated that the installation of electric fans was a waste of money that should have been used to improve frequency and timings of buses. Shaun Choh said that the fans were a great addition but noticed that the design of the new extended bus stops had pillars blocking commuters view of arriving buses. Zhixiang Guo hoped that electric fans could also be installed inside LRT stations. ??? suggested installing passenger information display screens at bus stops. Pehin Serii Baginda said that air-conditioned bus stops would be more comfortable in hot and rainy weather.
On Facebook, SMRT shared a post on Human Resources Online regarding a case study which showed that nine out of 10 staff were proud to work at SMRT. Abel Ang said that nine out of 10 staff were afraid to get black marked. Is Ming wondered what the one out of 10 staff was not proud of. Nadya Raqeem asked SMRT to make sure the trains are well ventilated during the hot and humid month. Loh Mel Ken mentioned that the air-conditioner at train C751B was not designed for Singapores extremely warm weather.
In his National Day Rally speech, Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong stated that the playing field between taxis and ride-hailing services such as Uber and Grab was "not quite level, adding that the Government would look further into it.Prime Minister Lee stated that although the taxi sector was still subjected to some extra rules such as clocking a minimum daily mileage and statutory requirements that make operating taxis more expensive, there were also advantages such as being able to pick up passengers on the road. He added that industries might have been disrupted by technology and globalisation and that Singapore could also ban Uber and Grab as what other cities had done, but commuters and the economy would be affected. Prime Minister Lee said that to foster fair competition, rules should be updated where commuters would be protected and all drivers would be required to have proper insurance and clean records. Several netizens stated that taxi companies failed to innovate and meet consumers needs. Others mentioned that commuters opt for Uber and Grab because it was hard to find taxis on the road and some drivers chose their preferred destinations. Some mentioned that taxis apply many surcharges. Eddie Hamz said that Uber and Grab should also be able to pick up passengers on the road. Jack Chan noted that it was difficult to book a taxi during peak hours and during rainy days while Uber and Grab accepted bookings during those times. Kevy Tan remarked that consumers have the right to choose whether to use taxi or a private car-hire service.
The photo of Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong and his wife Ho Ching riding the Downtown Line on Chinese New Year had been posted on several social media channels. Many netizens were surprised that many people did not recognise them and that no one offered them seats on the train. Several praised the Prime Minister and his wife for taking the MRT, with some saying that it was encouraging to see the Prime Minister on board the MRT. Some suggested that the Prime Minister take the train during peak hours and when the air-conditioners were faulty. Others believed that the Prime Ministers train ride was just for publicity.
?Karen Wong? wondered what happened to the schedule of bus service 856. The netizen said that for the past two days, its arrival times were not as per app timings. She added that even the empty bus that was supposed to be inserted between 6:45 to 6:55 a.m. was not available.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) has signed separate partnership agreements with Delphi Automotive Systems and nuTonomy on August 1 to begin trials on autonomous Mobility-on-Demand (MoD) transport services as part of the Governments car-lite vision.The two companies were shortlisted to test a fleet of self-driving vehicles (SDVs) as a shared, on-demand, door-to-door and intra-town transport service in the one-north test-bed.The SDVs would be developed on a larger scale to provide commuters with another first-and-last mile travel alternative if the trials prove to be successful. LTA was also exploring SDVs for other public transport applications, such as self-driving buses. Several netizens were concerned about the safety of SDVs, citing the Tesla driver that was killed in the first known fatal crash involving a self-driving car. Some considered it a positive move but recommended that the SDVs be comprehensively and vigorously tested to ensure a safe system. Others stated that taxi drivers would soon be out of their jobs if the SDV trial was successful. Cecelia Ng wondered who would send the passengers to the hospital should they suffer a heart attack or lose consciousness along the way. Chua Cheng Hwa said that SDV passengers should sign an indemnity form before boarding the vehicle.
?Pang Soon Tan? wondered why there were differences in the closing of doors on the Circle Line. The netizen said that in the morning, the platform doors closes before the buzzer has sounded off. S/he added that the issue had been resolved with newer Circle Line trains but the problem persisted with the older ones.
?Seven Qi Mei? reported the bus captain of service 912 for picking up only a few passengers at berth 6 at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange and leaving behind many others who were still in the queue.
?Vincent Pay ?wanted to confirm whether bus services 925 and 927 departing from Choa Chu Kang would be stopping at bus stop 44061.The netizen mentioned that the bus captain of service 925 informed him that 44061 was not being serviced by 925. He was therefore dropped off at the bus stop after 44061. The netizen hoped to clarify the matter.
On August 15, passengers on a westbound train were detrained at Tanjong Pagar MRT station due to a leak of freon gas from the trains air-conditioning system. Several photos and video footages of the incident taken by commuters were posted online. SMRTs media statement: At 2:53pm this afternoon, passengers at Tanjong Pagar MRT station were detrained from a westbound train due to a leak of freon gas from the trains air-conditioning system. The discharge of freon into the tunnel reduced visibility at parts of the station when the platform screen doors were opened for passengers to exit the train. SMRT staff switched on the tunnel ventilation system immediately to disperse the odourless gas. The train was withdrawn from passenger service to allow the air-conditioning system to be checked. The passenger platform at Tanjong Pagar MRT station remained in service during this incident and train services were not affected. We apologise to passengers affected and will be investigating the cause of this incident. In a separate media statement, the Singapore Police Force said it is looking into the matter. The police also added that no injuries were reported and that the train has been towed to Ulu Pandan Depot for inspection. The Singapore Civil Defence Force (SCDF) also shared their official response which said that it immediately contacted SMRT which confirmed that the smoke has since dissipated and SCDF's assistance was not required. As a precautionary measure, SCDF deployed its resources to the train station to investigate the matter. Jason GS said that officers at the MRT station made an announcement for commuters not to take any videos and photographs and most passengers evacuated themselves out of the train. Keline ???? shared about her experience in the train from Paya Lebar. Moments after everyone rushed out of the train, she went to the Passenger Service Centre to check if she should wait or get out of the MRT station. However, the reply from the staff was, Its up to you, you can wait or you can leave." She pointed out that she cannot trust the organisation for advice. She then made her own decision to run out of the station as soon as she could. Several netizens noticed from the video footages that most commuters stayed at the platform instead of leaving the station for their safety. Others wondered why SMRT staff were prohibiting commuters from taking photos and videos as heard in the announcements from one of the videos posted online. Some asked why SMRT was still using Freon gas on its air-conditioning system when it had been banned many years ago as it was harmful to the atmospheres ozone layer. Others stated that the incident was an indication that the air-conditioning system was not being maintained regularly and properly. A few were concerned about how emergencies were handled, as it could have been a terror attack. Choon Lee Liew said that SMRT should do a major overhaul of the train system. Bruce Ong pointed out that people taking photos and videos would obstruct the passage ways which could slow down the evacuation.
Beverly was disappointed having seen a family let their child urinate on the MRT seat and floor. The netizen stated offering her seat to the familys two children and was surprised to see one of the children urinate on the floor. The childs parents even laughed at the incident and then wiped off the mess before alighting on the next stop. Several netizens understood that the child was simply answering an uncontrollable call of nature but stated that the parents should have put on a diaper on the child. Some stated that the incident was a non-issue since the parents had wiped off the urine. Others assumed that the family was not local.
On The Middle Ground Blog, it was stated that Temasek Holdings was set to fully acquire SMRT, if the shareholders would agree to the offered price of S$1.68 per share. It would also delist SMRT from the stock market. The Middle Ground, however, asked why the acquisition had to take place and what would be its impact to SMRT staff and customers. It was stated that companies acquire other companies for the following reasons: - Business synergies- Diversification- Eliminating costs- Eliminating competition- Buying emerging talentAlso, a large corporate player sometimes spots an obscure company with great talent and a marketable product that is not fulfilling its potential. This may prompt them to buy the company quickly and absorb its potential.Customers usually were not able to notice if a company had been bought by another. With regard to SMRT, the buyout would take them off the stock exchange, would no longer have to worry about shareholders demands and dividends and could focus on running its services better. SMRTs acquisition by Temasek would be something of a compromise: it would not be nationalised but it would bring SMRT closer to being a nationalised entity. The end result on customers, however, might be unnoticeable. Lucas Low stated that consumers should benefit from the buyout because the shareholders would be eliminated. The netizen hoped that SMRT would be a better transport company after the buyout.
On Facebook, SMRT shared about Venkatachalam Kumaran, an Escalator, Platform and Lift Technical Officer in SMRT. Kumaran was one of the winners of the SMRT CEO Service Excellence Awards. His supervisor described him as hardworking, a valuable asset and a team player. Several netizens congratulated Kumaran for doing his job well and hoped that he will keep up the good work.
?Stewart Yuen? complimented the bus captain of service 853 (SMB43L) for driving safely and patiently despite the high passenger load. The bus captain also kept a positive mood by welcoming everyone onboard the bus.
#REF!
Netizens continued to discuss the 20.1% increase in SMRTs net earnings for the year ended Mar 31. Several netizens stated that SMRT should let other operators manage its rail business so the company could focus on its non-transport businesses which were making profits. Some said that SMRT should compensate commuters and be fined for rail disruptions. Others mentioned that SMRT should dedicate a huge portion of their profit to maintenance. Yew Tai Pan suggested paying operation and maintenance staff well enough to give them moral support and the pride in the work they do. Johnny Tan remarked that SMRT should not be asking for fare increments since it managed a 20% growth in full year profit.
JurongHealth Mobility Park, located at the healthcare hub comprising of Ng Teng Fong General Hospital and Jurong Community Hospital was officially launched on Jan 7.The Mobility Park was a collaboration between JurongHealth and SMRT to enable and empower mobility. It has simulated streetscapes and life-sized models of the three main modes of public transport: a train, bus and taxi. JurongHealth and SMRT organised learning and sharing sessions amongst staff from both organisations so that they may help patients and commuters in need of assistance to make the necessary adjustments and feel more confident when using public transportation. Venkat Moorthy said that the project was a great genius.
David Chan? wondered what was being drilled at Pioneer Station at two oclock in the morning. The netizen said that SMRT should be more considerate of others. He also asked whether SMRT did any assessments before carrying out the work.SMRT Facebook administrator is checking with Station Ops to find out the details of this incident.
On Facebook, The Singapore Daily shared a link to an article on how big data helped German-made trains to run on time. The Singapore Daily hoped that the link would be shared by others to the Land Transport Authority (LTA) or SMRT.It was mentioned in the article that only 78.3% of Germanys long-distance trains were punctual which Siemens hoped to change by combining two industrial disciplines: big data analysis and predictive maintenance. Hundreds of sensors fitted into its locomotives, feedback data on the condition of components. Software specialists then examine the data generated by the sensors to look for patterns and anomalies that indicate a part may need to be replaced during routine maintenance to avoid unexpected breakdowns and delays.The system was proven to be effective in Spain that customers were offered a full refund if the high-speed service between Madrid and Barcelona was delayed by more than 15 minutes.
?Lilian Gui? expressed her appreciation to the Service Ambassadors at Yishun MRT station platform during the 6a.m. to 11 a.m. shift for always assisting her to get through the crowds during peak hours and finding her a seat on the train throughout her pregnancy.
Passengers on the Sengkang LRT were stuck in the train without lights for about 40 minutes, from the time the train broke down, before being guided to the station by having to walk on the tracks in near-darkness due to a train fault. SBS Transit first announced the disruption on Twitter at 7:57 p.m., saying there was no service on the East Loop of the LRT, and that free bridging bus services were available. While there were announcements on the train about the disruption, SBS staff only arrived about 20 minutes after the breakdown. They tried but failed to restart the LRT train, before two or three staff finally asked passengers to alight from the carriage and guided them towards Renjong station. Several netizens were concerned on the safety of passengers for walking on the tracks without side barriers and in near-darkness. Others pointed out that LRT trains were driverless and could not stop immediately in case of a communication lapse similar to the SMRT accident. ashieru said that if there was a demerit system, the staff might work harder. The netizen suggested that for every demerit point there should be a corresponding deduction to the bonuses. Billionaire said that commuters should bring along a torch light when taking the MRT or LRT. .(0)-(0) wondered why SBS did not just send an empty train to tow or push the stalled train to the nearest station.
?Jef Choo? reported that the door of the train captains cabin in train cabin number 3004 did not close properly while the train was in service.
The story regarding the SMRT Taxi driver who offered a passenger (?Steven Lim?) a free ride was reposted on several social media channels. Netizens continued to discuss about the cabbys good deed. Many netizens praised the cab driver for his good deed. Some stated that other taxi drivers should learn from him. Others said that SMRT should recognise the cab driver for promoting good practice. Some wished that there were more good and kind taxi drivers.
?Christopher Tan? asked SMRT to look into the travelling speed of service 180 (SMB5890A). The netizen mentioned that the bus was travelling at a speed of 20-30km/h.
?Vincent Lim boarded a train from Pasir Panjang Station on the Circle Line towards HarbourFront. Upon reaching Labrador Park Station, the netizen was surprised that the train travelled on the opposite direction back to Pasir Panjang Station.As a result, he was inconvenienced and had to take a cab to work instead. The netizen also raised the issue of safety pointing out a possible collision with an oncoming train that was moving in the right direction. He asked SMRT to look into the issue and hoped to hear an update soon.
LTA called a tender for contractors to dismantle, repair and reinstate the former Tanjong Pagar Railway Stations train platform canopy structures as works start in the fourth quarter of this year to integrate the historic rail station with the Circle Line Extension.The 84-year-old building would be linked to the Circle Line Extension's Cantonment MRT station when it is completed in 2025. The canopy structures, which would be fully reinstated after the completion of Cantonment MRT station, are a vital part of Tanjong Pagar station.In a joint statement, the Urban Redevelopment Authority said the Tanjong Pagar station would be used as a multifunctional community building for 20 years after the new MRT station was completed. After that, the building would be part of the Greater Southern Waterfront - a development three times the size of Marina Bay.The Circle Line Extension would complete the loop for the Circle Line by connecting HarbourFront and Marina Bay stations. Commuters would have improved east-west accessibility when ready. Several netizens were happy with the completion of the loop for the Circle Line. Iman Johan hoped that the image of the Tanjong Pagar Railway Station would be preserved. Michelle Cheong was happy that the historic train station would still be used as a train station.
?Ariel Chua ?asked SMRT to look into the frequency of bus service 912. The netizen mentioned that the average waiting time was about 30 minutes and that the issue had been consistently plaguing Woodlands residents for the last 20 years. The netizen noted that other bus services like service 913 has better frequency than 912. Yushan Wong said that waiting time could sometimes be up to 40 minutes and three 912 buses would arrive at the same time. During peak hours, two or three fully packed buses would pass by without stopping.
?Nor Linda? believed that there should be standards of air quality even in transport vehicles. S/he cited that for a normal air-conditioned office or room, a minimum of 8 air exchange per hour was acceptable. In the SMRT East-West Line trains, the air could rather be stifling at times especially during peak hours, even with half the passenger load only. The netizen suggested that an SMRT safety officers should review this as a requirement.
On Facebook, SMRT stated that they have replaced half of the 92,000 timber sleepers on the East-West Lines with more durable concrete ones. The additional 30 minutes every night of working hours gained by the engineers from the early closure of some stations helped in the steady progress. Netizens thanked SMRT for the good work.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRTs new digital display panels on its new trains which would be rolled out in the second half of 2016. Most netizens stated that the new display panels were unnecessary and that SMRT should focus on improving the rail system. Several believed that the costs of installation and maintenance of the panels would be used by SMRT to increase the fares again. Azfar Hashim said that SMRT had the wrong priority since it has yet to resolve the current rail issues. Tan Hau Siang wondered how the new innovation could prevent the trains from breaking down.
David Quek stated that the train kept stopping between stations all the way from Woodlands to City Hall. The netizens said that it was disappointing that despite additional trains, commuters could not get to their destination faster.
?Raymond Yap Bonn Lock? mentioned having lost his belongings twice at the MRT station and was able to get them back. The netizen thanks SMRT for retrieving his things for him.
?Aaron Tan? shared a photo of the torn protective folding bellows on bus service 962 (TIB1079A). The netizen hoped that SMRT would fix the damaged bellows to prevent any accident from happening. Raymond See was glad that someone else has spotted the damaged bellows as well. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the relevant teams can look into the issue.
A recurring train fault disrupted MRT service on the East-West Line during rush hour between Jurong East and Joo Koon stations on the evening of Feb 19. On Twitter, SMRT first announced the fault at 5.43 p.m. and informed commuters to expect an additional 15 minutes to their travelling time. Nearly 10 minutes later, it said the disruption was due to a train fault and to expect another 25 minutes on top of commuters' usual travelling time.By 6pm, SMRT announced that there was no train service between Jurong East and Joo Koon, and that free bus bridging services were available. After SMRT announced that the service had resumed, it again informed commuters to expect an additional 20 minutes of travelling time due to the recurring fault.The issue was resolved by 6.42pm, and services on both bounds were up and running again. Many commuters expressed their frustration with the disruption in rail service in several social media platforms. Netizens stated that breakdowns had become the new norm.On The Online Citizen Blog, Carlton Tan said that SMRT has behaved like an employee that goes on sick leave every two weeks without warning, then lies about what it was up to. Many netizens were disappointed on how SMRT handled the disruption saying that there was failure in communication to the person updating the social media platforms and also to the ground staff. Several stated that the ground staff were either non-existent at affected stations or did not know where to direct stranded commuters. Others were frustrated that they had to take alternative transport or had transferred to several bus services just to reach their destination as long queues were waiting for the free shuttle buses. A few pointed out that the public transport situation in Singapore was not as inefficient as those in other countries Lee Chiew Yeong said that SMRT keeps downplaying the situation. Loke Fook Seng suggested having planned outages so commuters could arrange for alternative transport. Jade Low wondered if s/he could claim from SMRT the cost of his taxi fare amounting to S$29 which he took after being stuck at Commonwealth Station because of the train fault.
Ang Mo posted a complaint to SMRT about the taxi driver of the vehicle with plate number SHC4462M for being rude to him/her.The netizen mentioned boarding the taxi from the taxi stand at Woodlands Checkpoint and asked the driver to take him/her to Marsiling Drive. S/he stated that the driver was annoyed and used expletives that the destination was just a short distance from the checkpoint. The netizen said that s/he was disappointed for receiving such service. Some netizens said that SMRT should terminate the contract of drivers with such attitudes. Others felt sad for the driver for queuing an hour just to get a short distance trip and for the passenger to have to face a driver with such attitude. Some mentioned that taxi drivers should realise that they are providing service. La Belle Ame said that the commuter should have taken the details of the taxi driver and report him to SMRT. Benson Oh Boon Teck explained that Woodlands Checkpoint has two taxi queues. One was a normal queue while the other queue was for short trips. The taxi driver should have informed the passenger to take the second queue for short trips rather than being rude to the passenger.
Residents living near Pasir Ris MRT station described what they saw and heard just moments before the two SMRT employees were hit and killed by an oncoming train on Mar 22. Several netizens also contributed photos of the incident,Two witnesses recounted that they first saw a group of SMRT workers walking on the tracks at about 11 a.m. They later heard the workers screaming and shouting. Upon looking out the window, one witness saw some workers waving their hands in the air and looked like they were signalling the oncoming train to stop. A loud screech was then heard from the train brakes.The next thing they saw was the train had stopped and a body on the tracks. Some netizens stated that the walkway on the tracks should be extended from 0.5m to 1m. Kuchikuchiku said that whoever directed the workers to the job location should be held accountable.
?Car Tzy? complimented the bus captain of service 812 (SG1691L} for greeting passengers as they board and alight the bus.
Even before a Memorandum of Understanding on the high-speed rail (HSR) was signed between Malaysia and Singapore later this year, countries were rushing to showcase their latest trains and technologies to the people who might travel on the super-fast service. At an exhibition by Japan Rail in an upmarket mall in Kuala Lumpur on May 5, Malaysians young and old were excited to experience a Shinkansen bullet train simulator first hand. The bullet train is capable of travelling up to 350km/h. That would significantly reduce travel time between Kuala Lumpur and Singapore to just 90 minutes. Beijing also harbours the same ambition. China Railway Group was eager to showcase its technology on a global platform using the HSR as a platform. It is touted as the front runner, having invested heavily in Malaysia, from energy to integrated property development. Apart from China and Japan, South Korea is also showing a strong interest in the HSR project. It is showcasing its high-speed rail system KTX, operated by Korea Railroad Corporation. Some netizens hoped that the trains to be used on the HSR would not be made in China. Gabriel Lzh speculated that the China Railway group might have already bribed the Malaysian Government into winning the contract, given the level of corruption in Malaysia. Jabez Chai claimed that the two countries would not choose the best quality for the high-speed rail train to be able to recoup the cost within the shortest time. Ray Cho believed that Malaysian Prime Minister Najib Razak would not accept Japans proposal. James Tio said that Prime Minister Najib would just delay or cancel the project.
?Yannerd Ian? praised the bus captain of service 901 (SMB1603P) for waiting for him/her at the bus stop while s/he was still on the opposite side of the road. The netizen said that the incident made his/her day.
SMRT issued an update on the fatal accident near Pasir Ris MRT station on Mar 23. Records showed that procedures were not fully followed resulting in the fatal accident. The on-going investigations have shown that:? Authorisation was granted for the Permanent Way team and the Signal team to move down from the station platform, cross the track, and access the maintenance walkway in order to proceed to the location of the device.? The safety procedure of walking in the direction facing oncoming train traffic had been followed.? Nasrulhudin and Muhammad Asyraf were following immediately behind the lead assistant engineer.? Records did not show that the team coordinated with the Signal unit at the station for oncoming trains to be brought to a stop and to ensure that no trains enter the affected sector before the team was allowed to step back on to the trackway. ? Pasir Ris MRT station is a terminal station with two platforms. The train moving in automatic mode was routed to Platform 2 at the time of the accident. When the train captain saw staff on the track, he immediately applied emergency brakes but was unable to prevent the accident.SMRT stated that they take responsibility and apologised for the tragic accident. They also conveyed their deepest condolences to the families of Nasrulhudin and Muhammad Asyraf in their time of grief.According to Dr Park Byung Joon, adjunct associate professor at SIM University (UniSIM), the team did not coordinate with the station to stop oncoming trains before moving from the maintenance walkway to the trackway itself, which was a "major breach of safety procedures".Dr Walter Theseira, UniSIM Senior Lecturer, said that it was not unusual for rail staff to go onto maintenance walkways to check faults while trains are still running and doing so does not deviate from international best practices. The question, however, was what steps were taken by SMRT to minimise the risks, and why those procedures failed in this case.Based on previous experience walking on the elevated track of the North-South Line to study sleeper replacement operations, Dr Park Byung Joon said that the 50cm-wide maintenance walkway on the side was the only portion where people can put firm footing. He added that there was just enough space to walk on the walkway and that he did not see how the staff could have been hit by the train. Dr Park, however, noted that there is not much a driver or even an automated system could do to immediately stop the train as it needs longer distance to stop. Many netizens wondered how the other staff were able to evade the oncoming train and why no one among the 15 staff coordinated with the Signal unit at the station. Several stated that SMRT should be sued for negligence. Some hoped that the staff, including the station manager, should be called by the police to shed light on the actual incident. Theforgottongeneration stated that the investigation should be deeper than just an admission that a safety procedure had been omitted. Singh Prem said that SMRT should not attempt to avoid liability since the staff were on the track when trains were still in service. walaneh mentioned that the line should be closed when a fault was detected. bravo asked whether the supervisor would admit his fault. Andrew Leung stated that SMRT should be fined for unsafe practice and be subject to more safety regulations. Tah Por asked what kind of communication device was used to call back to the Signal unit. The netizen said that the request to stop oncoming trains should be made at the beginning of the maintenance works.
At a media briefing at the Loyang Bus Depot on Thursday (16 June), Go-Ahead Singapore announced that they had already hired 93.6% or 655 of the 700 bus captain positons ahead of the launch of its bus services in September.Go-Ahead Singapores Managing Director Nigel Wood stated that they were now in the key stage of training and enhancing the skillsets of their employees to meet the companys quality standards that they want to bring. One of the companys key aims was to recruit as many Singaporeans as they could. About 60% of their new hires are first time bus captains, including former taxi and delivery drivers.
Straits Times Senior Transport Correspondent, Christopher Tan, discusses the design of the system and state of the (rail) infrastructure which are among the tough areas that need fixing, highlighting the two multiple-line MRT failures had happened within nine months (on 7 July 2015 and 25 April 2016), and how it is vital for SMRT and LTA to understand why a single flaw could result in a system-wide failure. Several netizens stated that when things go wrong in a company, it was always the top management who has to take the blame.
Jong Ching Koon suggested having more handrails at the entrance of MRT trains. The netizen said that it was very unsafe for passengers as there was nothing to hold on to when the train is packed.
An editorial from The Business Times regarding train breakdowns was reposted on AsiaOne News. The writer stated that it has not been the best of weeks for SMRT Corporation. One must feel for its senior management and crisis communications team as they tackle one mishap after another.While Singapore was already taking small steps towards becoming a car-lite society, and encouraging more people to take public transport, there must be an excellent, dependable and convenient public transport system. There should be greater transparency and clarity when it comes to explaining the reasons behind a disruption, as well as the specific measures taken to rectify the identified faults.The recent breakdowns only serve to heighten the sense of urgency in upgrading the rail system. The writer added that another crucial task at hand is to win back the publics trust and confidence.
?Netizen Tan Wei Yang Justice? mentioned that the BPLRT train stopped at Senja Station for 15 minutes on August 23, and questioned why there were so many problems with the BPLRT. The netizen also mentioned in another post that he had to walk a distance to the bus stop to look for an alternative route to his destination. ?Another netizen, SzeNian Lim, was frustrated that the BPLRT had broken down again.? ? CMC has verified with BPLRT OCC about the delay in BPLRT train service at 1157hrs on August 23. Train service resumed at 1210hrs. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizens so that the relevant teams can get in touch with them.
One of the trainees that survived the recent SMRT accident, Muhammad Hatin Kamil, recounted the incident on Mar 22. He stated that he had one foot over the third rail of the MRT track when a voice screamed out from behind: "Train is coming! Train is coming!" He caught a glimpse of a train coming towards him and saw his friend and fellow trainee Nasrulhudin Najumudin running desperately towards the walkway. Hatin pulled his foot back onto the walkway, clinging to the side railing to avoid getting hit. He looked up to check on Nasrulhudin, only to see the train crushing him, and flinging trainee Muhammad Asyraf Ahmad Buhari into the air. The supervisor walking in front of the two victims narrowly avoided the train by jumping onto the walkway and squatting. He said that high voltage had been detected from a point machine on the track. To inspect the device, the group, which was moving on a maintenance walkway, had to cross over a 'live' third rail to get onto the tracks. They were unaware that an oncoming train would soon switch tracks, heading right towards them. Hatin also mentioned that our environment up there is different - you wouldn't be able to hear the train coming," adding that their supervisor had not said anything in the moments before the accident. Several netizens stated that the families of the victims should pursue a case against SMRT for safety negligence. Some were disappointed for the lack of safety precautions and communication between the maintenance team and control station. Dennis Khew said that the control station should be in control" at all times, and that the maintenance team should not be blamed for the lapses.
Tan Khee Shian stated that despite announcements made over the public address system during train disruptions to inform commuters of the situation, many were unable to hear the announcements clearly. There was also only one arrival information panel on each side of the train platforms informing commuters of the disruption.The writer suggested that more arrival information panels be put up at the platforms of older train stations to enhance communication particularly during disruptions.
MrGoat observed that train doors at Circle Line Bishan Station closed without warnings and almost caught some people between the doors. ??Crone mentioned that train doors on the Circle Line usually closed after the announcement, unlike the train doors on the North-South Line which would close only after the beeping alarm had sounded. arcturuz stated that it was similar with the North-East Line where the doors would already close even when commuters have not yet fully alighted.
?Mei Rui Hang? shared a photo of the torn protective folding bellows of the pivoting joint of the articulated bus with plate number TIB1039R. The netizen mentioned reporting the issue three months ago but nothing has been done to it.
Elaine Yeo? reported the bunching of service 804 buses during peak hours. The netizen also mentioned having to wait for over 20 minutes at bus stop 59231 in Yishun. Elaine Yeo? added that train and bus timings had been irregular for the past two weeks.
Atiqah Ali? asked SMRT on its policy regarding the length of time the train doors remain open for passengers to board during peak hours. The netizen mentioned being caught between the train doors while boarding the train. She claimed that she was just the third person in the queue. The netizen also mentioned that in several instances, many commuters were forced to wait for the next train because they were unable to board as the train doors had closed on them.
Matthew Chua asked how long SMRT would continue to roast the commuters inside the train. The netizen said that the train was not crowded so he expected that the train air conditioning system to be circulating cold air.
Hong Kong-based investigative news portal FactWire published an article on 5 July which reported that 35 MRT trains were secretly shipped back to their manufacturer, CSR Sifang in Qingdao, for replacement and repair as hairline cracks in the car bodies and key structural components were discovered.FactWire mentioned that the defective trains were being stored at SMRT's Bishan Depot, according to sources. The trains were also wrapped in green covering, placed in large dollies and were towed away by cargo trucks, led by police cars and construction vehicles to Jurong Port on 12 June.Mr Lee Ling Wee, Managing Director of SMRT Trains, said in response to media queries that a total of 26 of 35 trains delivered to SMRT in 2013 were found to have cracks in the structure of the trains connecting the car and the bogie (the framework carrying wheels). The defective trains, which were still under warranty, would be repaired by the manufacturer by 2023. Mr Lee said its engineers discovered the cracks and since then, it has worked closely with the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and the manufacturer to rectify this issue.In a separate statement on 5 July, LTA said that the defects "are not safety-critical and do not affect the train's systems or performance", adding that they have been working closely with the manufacturer Kawasaki Heavy Industries and CSR Sifang after defects were found on the trains purchased under C151A. FactWire claimed that a former SMRT worker informed them that he had never encountered a situation like this in all his decades of working in railway construction. The news portal also claimed that another former SMRT worker said (Chinese-made trains) are very cheap. How can you have (something) that is very good and pay a very cheap price? So this is (the) trade-off.In a recent statement on 6 July, the LTA stated that they have negotiated with the manufacturer and would be able to speed up the process. The rectification work would be completed in 2019 instead of 2023. LTA explained that the 26 defective trains were not sent back to the manufacturer for replacement all at once as they were still fit and safe for service. SMRT said in a statement to the media on 6 July that train service availability or frequency will not be affected due to the recall of the 26 trains, as they are being sent to the factory in "small batches". SMRT's Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan added that the trains, which were discovered to have hairline cracks, are the newest in its fleet serving the North-South East-West Lines. "Passenger safety is paramount to SMRT, and under no circumstance will this be compromised. Any train that is assessed to be defective or unfit for passenger service is not put into service." Many netizens stated that the most important point of the issue was the lack of transparency and accountability on the part of SMRT, LTA and the Ministry of Transport and not about whether the defects found were safety-critical. Several were disappointed with the delays in disclosing such critical information that is of great public interest, until it was publicised by a foreign media. Others wondered why the trains needed to be sent back and why seven years were required to repair them since the defects were not safety-critical. Several netizens asked why the trains were only returned after 6 years of discovering that there were defects. Some commented that SMRT should have rejected all the trains delivered since close to 75% had defects. Others said that SMRT should look for new trains from other countries. Some wondered why SMRT agreed to wait until 2023 for all the trains to be repaired. Several suggested that the defective trains should be replaced with new ones since they were still under warranty. Several stated that the public should be thanking SMRT engineers for finding out about the defects and for sending them back to the manufacturer for repair. Asdspore Chua mentioned that SMRT was making improvement to the situation and the defects were being isolated and measures to fix the situation were being undertaken. Chee Soon Juan stated that the Government should explain why it purchased trains from China as opposed to the ones from other countries. He wondered the considerations taken to ensure that the trains were of the highest quality of trains and whether the cost was the main factor behind the decision. Henry Ace said that the key question remained unanswered: Did the Government intend to keep the issue from the public had the Hong Kong news agency not exposed this? Ian Tay Ke Yang mentioned that the C151A trains have heavy condensation on their air-conditioning units. Some parts of the train also have rust on it. The netizen claimed that China-made trains were much heavier than the older generation trains as the manufacturer used poorer quality materials.
?Fauzie Husni? complimented bus captain Toh Thian Siew of service 960 (SMB3530C) for being friendly. The bus captain greeted passengers boarding the bus. He was also hardworking and cheerful.
On Facebook, The Independent Singapore posted that a former SMRT train captain had questioned whether the tragic March 22 accident could have been avoided. The former train captain also shared the principles of operating trains, and hoped that it would clear some misconceptions about trains which most people equate with driving a car on the road. He mentioned that the trains on the North-South and East-West Lines run on three modes: Auto Mode (AM), Coded Mode (CM) and Restricted Manual (RM). When the train is on RM, it is driven manually with a speed limit of 18kph and below, and would die off when it exceeds 18kph. The brake loop need to be re-set in order to move the train again.Trains are usually operated on AM mode where the driver simply presses the two buttons found on the console to activate the train. The train will stop accurately by itself at the next station. Meanwhile, on CM mode, the train captain would drive the train manually based on speed codes. When AM mode is not working or if there are obstacles to look out for on the track, the Operations Control Centre will instruct the train captain to proceed in CM mode.The former train captain said that he is saddened by the accident on March 22 and asked whether the train was running on AM mode during the fatal accident. If the train captain did not know that there were men at work on the tracks, it may have come as a shock to him when he saw them on it. It may have been too late by the time he activated the emergency brakes as the stopping distance of a train is much longer. He added that the companys SOP and Safety Protocols for access to tracks over the last 30 years have served staff well, and there is nothing wrong with the safety doctrine as long as everyone complies with them. He also hoped that the Coroners Inquiry would shed light on whether tragic accidents could have been avoided if there was strict compliance to existing safety procedures and protocols. hfourhappy stated that the two dismissed employees could shed light on what really happened during the fatal accident.
Netizens continued to discuss the SMRT bus captain who was able to prevent a passengers laptop from being stolen by another passenger after it was accidentally left in the bus. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan also shared the laptops owners (Chelsey Chow) post on his Facebook page. The Minister mentioned seeing the lost-and-found treasure chest at the Woodlands Bus Interchange during his visit on Jan 27. He stated that recently, a bus captain (Ramasamy) returned a lost laptop to its owner. Yan A Le stated that Ramasamy was one of the rare SMRT bus drivers and hoped that many more bus drivers would be like him. Ivy Lai praised Ramasamy for his good deed and also mentioned that many of the service 61 bus captains were very courteous. Note: Shin Min and Lianhe Wanbao interviewed BC Ramasamy this morning, facilitated at BBI by Buses and CIC.
Professor Cham Tao Soon, the former president of Nanyang Technological University and former Chairman of SIM University, would lead the setting up of the new Singapore Rail Academy, to make up for the lost time in developing Singapores rail engineers.The academy would focus on two areas: Training for engineers and technicians in the latest technologies in rail engineering, and identifying areas for conducting research and development. The academy would also launch an accreditation process to certify the proficiency of rail engineers and technicians based on an industry-wide competency framework in the pipeline. Tah Por stated that the rail management staff from top to junior management must be developed to professionally manage a rail system.
Members of Parliament (MPs) from the Workers Party have filed parliamentary questions on the defective China-manufactured trains that were sent back to the manufacturer since July 2014.On Facebook, the party noted that many Singaporeans were surprised at the revelation of defects in some of the trains used by the MRT, leading to 26 of these trains being shipped to China for repair or replacement. It also said that major issues affecting Singapore's public transport system should be discussed publicly.Questions raised in Parliament include why information of the defects was not released to the public prior to the news having been broadcast by a foreign news outlet and whether the Ministry of Transport and LTA were aware of the problems with the MRT trains delivered by Kawasaki Heavy Industries and CSR Sifang in 2013 under a previous contract before placing new orders with the same consortium for more trains in 2014 and 2015. Several netizens wondered why the tender and procurement process were not raised by the Members of Parliament. Steve Chia wondered why no one questioned the Committee of Inquiry for the first major MRT breakdown in December 2011 for not discovering the defective trains from CSR Sifang.
Commuters reported on social media regarding train delays, crowded platforms and non-working escalators along the Circle Line at around 8 a.m. on August 29.Most commuters complained about the longer waiting time, while some mentioned that faulty sensors were causing train doors to shut on commuters at station platforms.SMRT stated that intermittent signalling issues were responsible for train delays on the Circle Line during the morning rush hour. Commuters may experience an additional 1 2 minutes of travelling time during non-peak hours and an additional 5 -10 minutes of travelling time during peak hours until the end of service on August 29. Commuters were advised to hold on handrails as they may experience intermittent braking during the journey.The transport operator apologised for the inconvenience caused and mentioned that they would keep the passengers updated. More SMRT employees were also deployed at stations and onboard trains to provide assistance to passengers.
Senior Minister of State for Transport Ng Chee Meng stated in Parliament that the Government would look to review Singapores taxi availability framework by the end of 2016 to further level the playing field between traditional taxi operators and its new rivals from app-based private car-sharing services.Minister Ng also stated that the income of taxi drivers working for traditional operators have remained unchanged since 2013, while average monthly net income rose by about 5% in real terms due to lower fuel costs. Several netizens disagreed with Minister Ng Chee Mengs statement that the income of taxi drivers remained unchanged since 2013, with some pointing out that they had to work longer hours to earn the standard income. Others stated that the income of taxi drivers had been affected by the private-hire car services because taxi drivers had not improved their services. Angelina Liew said that the Government should study how to reduce the high rental rate being charged by taxi operators. Alex Soon mentioned that it was difficult to flag a taxi at around 5 to 6 a.m. as most taxis have a Busy or Hired sign even when empty.
SMRT sent out an employee communications letter to its staff, reiterating that its disciplinary process had been fair and that besides the two dismissals, verbal and written warning letters were issued to staff across several grades. In addition, individual performance grades were recalibrated downwards across various levels of the Trains team, including senior management and staff.Mr Lee Ling Wee, SMRT Trains Managing Director, also disclosed in the letter that warning letters and performance downgrades were given to several others as part of a fair, thorough and comprehensive disciplinary process.Given that staff members involved in safety breaches on the rail network had been dismissed for safety lapses, he said that it was untenable that the two employees dismissed were not treated consistently with (SMRTs) firm stance on safety. He said the disciplinary process that led to the dismissal of two staff was carried out in strict accordance with SMRTs established Fact Finding framework which included the presence of Union representatives. Mr Lee also stated that many works processes and safeguards have been introduced to tighten safety further. A Track Management Office has also been established to control access to railway tracks, strengthen workplace health and safety, and to proactively push to raise and sustain a Safety First mindset among staff.Questions were raised as to why the train captain was still penalised for the accident given that the panel has already excluded the train captain from the cause of the lapses as the train was set on automatic mode and he had done his part in attempting to stop the train.Some also wondered why SMRT had to justify to its employees its decision to dismiss the train captain.Others asked why SMRT dismissed the train captain even before the independent investigation was completed.
?Chris Christology? thanked Francis of Raffles MRT station and Andy of Marina Bay MRT station for assisting in finding his lost wallet. The netizen also thanked the person who found his wallet and returned it to Marina Bay MRT station
Netizens continued to discuss the alleged SMRT taxi driver, Peter Quek, who had been making fake bookings on Grab. Besides giving fake destinations and pick-up points, Quek would make excuses not to board the car after the driver had arrived, claiming he had already had a taxi. He would also force drivers to cancel the booking, a move which would affect the driver's cancellation rate and reduce the incentive payment he receives from Grab.GrabCar driver Eliza Shen said she also filed a police report against Quek after being harassed by him in WhatsApp messaging groups and Facebook discussion groups. She also claimed that Quek had posted photos of her son, which he took from her Facebook account, in instant messaging chat groups and on Facebook, even though she had told him not to do so. Some netizens asked how Grab would enforce the ban. Others wondered what action SMRT would take against the taxi driver. KennotLiddat said that the incidents were not new and that Grab had banned both passengers and drivers from the app since its launch and have been constantly sending out SMS notifications about such "abusive" riders and drivers. Sim WP said that LTA should step in and request for the SMRT taxi driver to set the record straight.
?Matthew Tay? observed that the frequency of bus service 860 and 860A had improved during peak hours. The netizen also praised the bus captain of service 860A for waiting patiently for commuters who were rushing from the HDB blocks to the bus stop and greeted everyone with a smile. He added that SMRTs service standard remained the same and did not deteriorate.
Several netizens reported that the East-West line was having issues again. Some mentioned waiting for 15 minutes at Tampines station for a train, resulting to longer queues and overcrowded platform.ImFromPipiForum said that the train slowed down from Commonwealth Station onwards. It was announced that the train needed to move slower but did not say if it was a train or track fault.plexxor noted that there seemed to be an issue for trains travelling from west to east.UncleGoldfish mentioned waking up early every working day to take free train rides. The netizen said that small delays were not an issue as s/he arrives more than an hour before working time.Ghim Hong? stated waiting for almost 20 minutes for one train.
Netizens continued to discuss Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans blogpost calling the 100-day major disruption-free milestone on the NSL a success, saying that Minister Khaw mischievously misled Singaporeans about the reliability of Singapores public railway system. In the introductory paragraph, he claimed that there was "no major incident". There were, in fact, disruptions on the NSL in the past 100 days such as the disruption at Bishan Station on Mar 18 and the train fault between City Hall and Newton on Feb 15. There was also a train fault that disrupted services at the Downtown Line on Jan 6, a signalling fault on Dec 29, 2015 and another signalling fault on Dec 31, 2015. The writer wondered where Minister Khaw gets his data from. TY Tang said that there was nothing to celebrate about the 100 days disruption-free train system because the waiting time for SMRT buses were still long and trains were still overcrowded. AngCherLing stated that the Government might have come up with an ingenious idea of categorisation or segregation of various disruptions lasting for more than an hour which shall then be classified as: track fault, train fault and signalling faults; so as to make statistics look better.
Tan Kin Lian mentioned flagging down a taxi on Saturday morning (May 28). The taxi stopped, asked him where he was going and later refused to take him as the taxi driver was heading to a different destination. Tan noted that this is the quality of taxi service in Singapore, and added that taxi services are quite expensive with surcharges and call fees. Most taxis display the sign "Busy", "On Call" even when they are empty. Those that display a green "Taxi" sign would have the excuse that they were either changing shift or the destination was out of their way.Tan sarcastically thanked the Government for the expensive, world-class taxi service based on the unique free market model that they had designed for Singapore.He added that passengers have the right to insist that taxis provide the public service that they were supposed to, but there was no point in risking a confrontation over this "right". Several netizens stated that Uber and Grab services were better than taxi services. Raymond Fong mentioned that the LTA should increase the requirement for awarding taxi driving licenses, citing that in London, getting a taxi driving license successfully was akin to striking a lottery. The netizen also said that London taxi drivers were very knowledgeable, as they are good with their locations and the fastest route to destinations. Christopher Bong mentioned that there used to be a law obliging taxis to bring the customer wherever they want to go without giving excuses. Ronnie Ronnie stated being in the same situation many times. The netizen said that with the poor system and nobody policing the quality of service, Singapores taxi service has become terrible. The netizen also claimed that taxi drivers were not trained and managed.
Ashley shared his/her experience riding a GrabCar where the driver provided drinks, biscuits and a box tissue to his passengers. The netizen mentioned that the driver, Lek Yak Sua, asked whether s/he had breakfast and offered him/her biscuits and drinks. The driver stated that it was a small thing he could offer to people who tend to rush to work without having breakfast. The netizen was touched with the small gesture as the driver was thoughtful, caring and generous. Several netizens praised the driver for going the extra mile for his passengers. Others disapproved of the drivers act saying that he was encouraging people to eat in the car which might attract cockroaches to breed in the car. Meyer Tan stated that others should recognize the selfless and generous act of the driver rather than providing unnecessary comments. soothsayer believed that the demand for the GrabCar drivers service would go up by 60%.
It was reported on various channels on August 6 that two SMRT train captains and one crew manager have contracted tuberculosis (TB). The three employees who were from Tanah Merah Station were diagnosed four to six weeks ago.Two were found to have latent TB, and the other was found to have active TB. Latent TB although not contagious, could develop into contagious active TB if left untreated.Mr Patrick Nathan, ?Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications at SMRT, said that after finding out about the active TB case, SMRT worked closely with the authorities to carry out contact tracing. He added that the other two cases were not linked to the one with active TB.Mr Nathan also mentioned that SMRT carried out extensive sanitisation of staff work areas. He added that SMRT takes healthcare concerns very seriously and takes the necessary steps to keep the staff and commuters safe. Many netizens were concerned about getting infected with TB as MRT trains were crowded. Several wondered whether the three employees were still allowed to work even with the diagnosis. Some stated that SMRT was putting passengers health at risk. Others were concerned that the TB virus would spread through the air-conditioning system in MRT stations and trains. Some mentioned that SMRT should provide enough rest for train captains who have been working seven days a week. Jason Ho believed it was important to educate the public on basic hygiene such as covering their mouths when they cough or sneeze. Cosmos10 hoped that health authorities would quickly take action before the issue becomes more serious.
?Kai Han Tay ? asked SMRT why there were no MAN A24 buses for service 911.The netizen said that the queue at the bus interchange was extremely long and the new temporary bus interchange at Woodlands provided little space for the queues, thus blocking some peoples way. The netizen also mentioned that service 911 was supposed to be a wheelchair accessible bus service, based on the wheelchair decal on the bus. Old long bendy buses, however, were still being used for the said service instead of MAN A24s.
?Imran Muhd? mentioned boarding the train at Tampines MRT when s/he started to have cold sweat and felt weak. Upon reaching Tanah Merah station s/he felt worse. She alighted at Bedok Station and asked the help of the staff. The netizen appreciated the assistance provided by the SMRT staff members who called the ambulance and stayed with him/her while waiting for the ambulance to arrive.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan expressed his condolences to the families of the two SMRT staff killed while on the train tracks and stated in Parliament that various investigations were ongoing to establish the cause of the incident.He said that the LTA was conducting its own investigation, while statutory investigations by the police and MOM were also ongoing. A Coroners' Inquiry would also be held in due course. The Minister said that their priorities were to establish the cause of the incident, and prevent a recurrence. If the investigations reveal human errors, those responsible would be held to account. Several netizens believed that the top management of the LTA and SMRT would not be held accountable should the findings point to human error. Ron Lee noted that instead of admitting their shortcomings, authorities were finding excuses to cover themselves. Tan Keng Hua would like to see whether the names of those responsible for the accident would be revealed or kept confidential. Idge Imbrulia mentioned engineering in the error chain. The netizen said that the way a facility was designed could add or minimise potential hazards.
LightningStrikes and Darryl Kang were glad that SMRT was now using WhatsApp to receive feedback on defects and faults on SMRT trains and stations. LightningStrikes was happy that things were moving well under the leadership of the new Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan. Darryl Kang said that it was a cool initiative by SMRT that commuters could now easily report a faulty air-conditioner. firezero10 wondered whether there would be one person staring at the phone for updates.
ftplah asked whether SMRT trains have Wi-Fi services and how to set it up. The netizen mentioned being annoyed that s/he could not get any 4G connections while on the train. Nemesis Alien stated that MRT stations have Wi-Fi services. pikafunk3 pointed out that the connection will not be as strong when trains enter the tunnel. ftplah, however, stated that trains in other countries have high speed broadband that is not disrupted even in tunnels. Some other netizens lament that Wireless@SG internet on train platforms are slow as well.
?Meis Ho Pui Shan ? noticed that the air-conditioning on trains, especially those on the East-West Line trains, was too cold nowadays. The netizen asked SMRT to adjust the temperature to a degree which was more environmentally and human-friendly. Ong Jia Cheng said that air-conditioning temperatures on SMRT trains were pre-set to a certain degree and could not be adjusted.
SMRT and Nanyang Technological University (NTU) announced its S$60M joint research laboratory, which aims to develop technological solutions to make the train system more resilient and reliable. The laboratory was officially launched by Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan on May 20. Combining the rail operations and engineering capabilities of both parties, the SMRT-NTU Smart Urban Rail Corporate Laboratory would focus on two complementary research tracks. The first focuses on developing better detection methods and monitoring systems so that potential issues can be pre-empted quickly and accurately. The second track aims to enhance the reliability of existing rail assets by studying previous failures, and creating software tools to analyse and come up with optimal maintenance and servicing processes. Desmond Kuek, SMRT President and Group CEO, said that the laboratory presents a collaborative platform where the capabilities of both parties can translate into innovative and implementable solutions that would ensure the sustainability, high performance, reliability and safety of Singapores rail network. Many netizens stated that it was a waste to spend money on research rather than on actual improvements on the rail system. Others asked when the solutions would be developed and when the results would be seen. Jeannie Nicole wondered why a S$60M laboratory had to be set up just for research on train reliability when trains in other countries which were older than the MRT run just fine. Some netizens said that the establishment of a research laboratory was a good move but should have been established a decade ago.
?CH Hoo reported that train 3349 on the North-South Line travelling towards Braddell had its air-conditioner turned off.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about his visit at the Downtown Line (DTL) to join the staff to mark the 200th disruption-free day. Minister Khaw Boon Wan mentioned that the DTL had a delay in May but train service resumed within 30 minutes. He stated that it was the threshold for classifying delays as major disruptions, and an indicator that other systems also use. The milestone was hard-earned. The Minister stated that milestones were being noted to keep the workers spirits up and morale high. Milestones were also tracked to see the progress and were a form of encouragement.He added that disruptions may still happen but the authorities and workers have to persist in spite of difficulties. Some wondered why a breakdown of 30 minutes was not counted as a disruption. Others thanked the staff and workers of SBS Transit for their hard work in keeping trains running smoothly. Some said that the Transport Minister would celebrate insignificant records but was always silent during major breakdowns. Jamie Awyong was pleased with the DTL, saying it was convenient for him and his family to travel from Bukit Panjang to the city. Wang Lei stated that setting disruption-free milestones were encouraging. For transport staff, accomplishment of a higher goal means higher achievement, while for commuters, a higher goal brings more confidence to the train system. Mohd Hanif believed that the biggest issue was that the infrastructure was not planned and meant to carry such loads and at such train frequencies.
Netizens continued to discuss the video showing an SMRT taxi beating the red light at Ubi junction. Kit Ye reminded others to always wait and check before proceeding at a junction because many motorists beat the red light. Richard Lincoln said that taxi drivers had to remember that their passengers lives are in their hands.
SMRT announced a train service delay on the North-South Line from Marina South Pier to Toa Payoh Station on May 3. SMRT first tweeted at 5:45 p.m. that trains were travelling slower in the direction of Jurong East. SMRT later informed commuters to expect an additional traveling time of 25 minutes from Marina South Pier to Toa Payoh. Several netizens stated that train disruptions were already the norm and that the media should only report when there were no disruptions. ??? said that the Government should set up an independent fact-finding committee to investigate SMRT. Nak Muay mentioned that the sequence of disruptions were dangerous signs that the MRT could not cope with the high volume of commuters. Prime 13 observed that the number of breakdowns this year would probably set a new record.
?Ryan Fung wondered why the train moves slower between Bedok and Kembangan and would move faster when departing Bedok for Tanah Merah. Rosshan rosshan replied the netizen to say that this was caused by sleeper replacement.
In connection with the letter by Alvin Teng published at The Straits Times - Forum Letters on Jan 17 regarding the improvement of bus bridging services during train disruptions, Hans Kaiser stated that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should be encouraged to resign.
Additional responses were observed on the thread initiated by ChickenLitter on HardwareZone Forum regarding SMRT toilets being the worst. Several netizens stated that many people still do not know how to use toilets properly. Others said that SMRT should have toilets similar to those in Hong Kong and Taiwan. rizal5150 suggested removing the toilets at MRT stations. daldrome mentioned that toilet paper should be placed inside the cubicles instead of outside.
?Suharti Surani? reported the poor driving attitude of the bus captain of service 811 (SMB1493P). She said that the bus captain stepped on the brakes every few minutes. She added that standing passengers were jolted forward and backwards during acceleration and sudden braking.The netizen hoped that SMRT would seriously consider her feedback highlighting the risks caused by the excessive braking and acceleration for standing passengers .
?Heinn Htike Aung? withdrew money from a POSB ATM at Joo Koon MRT station but forgot to take the cash. The netizen only realised it after an hour and went back to the stations passenger service counter to ask if someone had seen his money. Fortunately, a cleaning lady saw it and passed it on to the SMRT staff. The netizen thanked the SMRT team for their assistance.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a video which showed what commuter Tay Pei Xin had to say about Macpherson Station Manager Jason Soo Thiam Chye.The commuter recounted how Jason helped her redress her wound on her knee which she sustained when she fell down at another MRT station. She said that Jason also gave a her a hot chocolate drink and wheeled her on a wheelchair to meet her father.
Tan Wen Bin Wilson? reported an incident regarding the bus driver of service 963 (TIB1188T) who slapped a passenger and asked for a fight.The netizen mentioned that the driver drove off without checking whether the female passenger carrying a child had fully alighted. A male passenger, presumed to be the husband, went up front to the driver to scold him and so did another female passenger. The netizen said she did not see the whole incident but heard a slap and that a commotion ensued. The female passenger reported the issue to the police.The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the issue and take action against the bus driver.
?Jojo Lin? shared that she was disappointed with the bus captain for insisting that her daughter did not tap in when she boarded the bus.The netizen stated that when her daughter was alighting, she tapped out but the machine stated to board at entrance. The child went to the front of the bus and tapped again but the machine still showed the same message. The netizen mentioned that she was behind her daughter and saw the message on the machine. The bus captain, however, pointed out to her daughter that there would be a S$30 fine next time if this happens again.The netizen asked SMRT to educate its bus captains to be mindful of how they speak to young children.SMRT FB administrator has reached out to the netizen for follow up.
Loong Chik Tong praised the LTA for the innovative design of the bus shelters near the newly opened Downtown Line 2 stations because the high-roof shelters were eye-catching and kept the rain at bay. The netizen wondered if the LTA could also install high-roof shelters at other high-usage bus stops since it was common to see rainwater splashing towards the commuters sheltered area at these bus stops.
In an announcement to Land Transport Authority (LTA) staff, Chief Executive Chew Men Leong announced his resignation on August 5, less than two years after he assumed the position. Mr Chew said he was leaving for "personal career development" in the private sector. There was speculation that he would join Singapore Technologies although he did not say where he was heading for.A Ministry of Transport (MOT) spokesman confirmed Mr Chew's resignation. A formal announcement on his successor would be made at a later date.According to some sources, Mr Chew was facing mounting pressure arising partly from the persistent rail incidents. Many netizens believed that Mr Chew resigned because of the many issues being faced by the transport sector. Some believed that Mr Chew was pressured by the Government to resign. Others thanked Mr Chew for his service as he had handled a difficult job. Terrence Sim described Chew as remarkable saying that Mr Chew gave 100% to try to improve commuter experience. starmerck believed it was a smart move on the part of Mr Chew as LTA would be taking over the rail assets. Lim Joe Sin believed that Mr Chews career path had already been planned out by the Government and would transfer him to other sectors.
The LTA has awarded the contract for building Sungei Bedok MRT station on the East Coast stretch of ThomsonEast Coast Line (TEL) to KTC Civil Engineering and Construction, a local company, at a sum of approximately S$418M. Chew Men Leong, LTA Chief Executive, stated that all contractors for the nine stations of the East Coast stretch of TEL had already been awarded. KTC was also involved in the construction of Tampines Station on the Downtown Line 3, and Orchard Boulevard Station on the TEL.
Maya Razalie? had nothing against PRC bus drivers but said that they should at least learn basic English. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain of service 911 did not understand her query regarding the bus route.
?Amos Tan? asked SMRT to deploy more bendy buses for services 859 and 980 so commuters would not have to wait for up to 30 minutes to board the bus since the short buses were always packed.
Bonut mentioned receiving four commemorative fridge magnets from SMRT in an information pack in his/her mailbox.The netizen wondered why SMRT had to inform them about upgrading the train system and keeping up with maintenance and why was it giving out commemorative magnets. S/he also mentioned that instead of the commemorative magnets, SMRT should have offered S$10 EZ-Link cards.
Kathy sought for witnesses to an accident that occurred at Pasir Ris Drive 1 on May 24 between her car and a CityCab taxi.The CityCab taxi driver had hit her car and then drove away, leaving her vehicle damaged. RockHeaven suggested reporting the incident to the taxi operator. Tohs Ric mentioned that Comfort taxis, which also operates CityCab, could trace the particular taxi because they have GPS devices in their cabs.
?H Ming Yuan? claimed that SMRT had not trained its PRC bus captains properly as they showed poor attitude.The netizen reported his encounter with bus captain Liu Ying Quan of service 858 (SMB8039Y). The netizen mentioned that he was at Woodlands Bus Interchange waiting for the bus with his handicapped brother. When the bus arrived, he asked the bus captain if he could help them open the rear door and allow his brother to board the bus. The netizen said that the bus captain had instead replied in a harsh tone that the netizen and his brother should have waited at the back and that they were wasting his time. The netizen pointed out that if the bus captain was not willing to help, he should not drive a wheelchair-friendly bus.
Train services between Tanah Merah and Pasir Ris MRT stations were disrupted in both directions on Mar 22 after two SMRT maintenance staff were killed in an accident on the tracks near Pasir Ris station.Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong, Minister of State for Manpower Sam Tan, SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan, and several public officials conveyed their deepest sympathies to the families of affected workers. SMRT would also provide support to them at this very difficult time.Speaking to the media, SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek said the duo were walking directly behind their supervisor, who was leading the team of 15, in a single file on the walkway beside the train track, towards the location of the signalling equipment.Investigations were still trying to establish exactly how the workers got onto the track or close enough to the oncoming train that was moving in the direction opposite to them.Lee Ling Wee, managing director of SMRT Trains, told reporters that the team was undergoing "supervised activity", and that they had been given authorised access to the track. The team was supposed to ask permission for a second time - to switch off the power - before the accident took place at around 11:10 a.m.The facts known so far were:? All 15 maintenance staff were walking in single-file, along the side of the train tracks, on the walkway.? They were following protocol by walking against the direction of the train.? The group was headed by the supervisor, and the two staff that were killed were second and third in line. ? The group, which had received permission to go down to the tracks, had gotten to about 150m away from the Pasir Ris station platform when the incident took place. ? The incident happened before the group could ask for permission to turn the power off on the tracks to stop the trains from moving. ? The two staff were hit by an oncoming train, moving toward Pasir Ris, in the direction opposite to them. ? The train in the incident was just pulling into the station, travelling at about 60km per hour. ? There is no CCTV footage on that part of the track, and SMRT is in the process of getting detailed accounts from witnesses.Minister of State for Manpower Sam Tan said that the Ministry of Manpower is currently investigating the incident to find out what happened and to prevent a similar incident in future. He added that safety at the workplace is of paramount importance, and all must do their part and work together to ensure a safe working environment for all workers. Many netizens expressed their sympathy to the families of the affected SMRT workers. Most wondered why the workers had been granted permission to walk on the tracks while the rail line was still active Others believed that there was lack of communication between the workers supervisor and the control centre. Some said that it was not the time to point fingers but a time to review security protocols to prevent any other mishaps in the future. Some wondered how SMRT could allow trainees on active track lines. Stanley Leng believed that the people at the control station were at fault. He stated that the control station manager should have informed the train driver that workers were on the track. Ace Chiu said that operations should have been temporarily shut down before maintenance of the tracks was carried out. He said that SMRT seemed to have neglected the safety of their workers. Nigel Ng pointed out that the workers were granted approval to proceed to the track for their duties, but failed to coordinate with the control station. Chua Richard urged the public to continue to voice their displeasure with SMRT until a final and satisfactory answer was given. He added that SMRT should ensure that the two workers were compensated well and their immediate families are well taken care of. Alan Wong said the accident could have been avoided by ensuring all maintenance is done after operating hours. Lim Ben asked SMRT to give a detailed explanation on the tragedy. gottaname believed there were lapses in ensuring that safety protocols were followed. Ruddie Ashton Burns hoped that the authorities would step in and look into the safety standard operating procedures and also assist on the issues of regular track problems of the MRT. Louis Ang said that safety protocols should be reviewed frequently.
Ligeok Tan? asked SMRT why passengers had to alight at the very end of Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange when there was so much empty space at the front of the interchange.
SMRT Corporation announced that a scheme meeting would be convened on September 29, the same day when the New Rail Financing Framework Extraordinary General Meeting (NRFF EGM) would be held in relation to the proposed sale of SMRTs operating assets and transition from the Current Financing Framework to NRFF.The meeting follows Temaseks offer in July to buy all the stakes of SMRT. Belford, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Temasek, proposes to acquire all of the shares that Temasek does not own at a scheme price of S$1.68 in cash per share.SMRT would be delisted from Singapore Exchange and would go private should the scheme be approved by the minority shareholders and the court.There were two conditions to be met for the privatisation to be approved: more than 50% of shareholders present in person or by proxy must vote to approve, and they must hold at least 75% of the value of SMRT shares among those present at the meeting. SMRT's independent financial advisor, Rothschild, has recommended that shareholders vote in favour of the scheme at the meeting, or sell their shares in the open market if they were able to obtain a higher price. Several netizens stated that there would be no difference whether Temasek acquires SMRT or not since Temasek was already the major stockholder of SMRT. Amaz'ng John said the shareholders had to vote for auditing purposes.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) said that priority queues would be implemented at the platform screen doors and passenger lifts of all MRT stations in a move towards a more gracious society. The queues would cater to commuters most in need, such as the disabled, elderly, pregnant and parents with strollers. Six MRT stations that were in close proximity to hospitals and with high usage by seniors such as Novena (North-South Line), Outram Park (East-West Line and North East Line), Chinatown (North East Line), Sengkang (North East Line) and Kent Ridge (Circle Line) were chosen. Chew Men Leong, LTA Chief Executive said: We hope to see more commuters graciously giving way to those in need so that we work together to encourage good travel etiquette and a better ride for everyone. I hope this extends to all trains and buses, beyond the Priority Queue zones.The programme builds on an earlier initiative by SMRT which had introduced priority queuing at station lifts entrances at its MRT stations in 2014.On Facebook, Parliamentary Secretary for the Ministry of Education and Ministry of Social and Family Development, Muhammad Faishal Ibrahim, liked the initiative but hoped that graciousness would still prevail at all situations. Most netizens stated that LTA might have good intentions in implementing the priority queues but were uncertain that it would be effective. Several mentioned that it would be impractical to implement the priority queues given the huge crowd and limited space at MRT stations particularly during peak period. Some suggested having priority cabins for the disabled, elderly, pregnant and parents with strollers rather than priority queues. Sam Lo stated that it was interesting that the initiative first implemented by SMRT would now be implemented in other MRT lines. Ahmad Yusoff said that ushers should be employed because not all people have the discipline to follow rules. Chua Lay Kwan mentioned that priority queues for wheelchairs should face the platform screen doors squarely, not at an angle. Joachim Low stated that a great initiative like this should be rolled out as soon as possible. Simon Lim asked what SMRT and other operators would do to commuters who ignored the priority queues. Wilson Toh said that all policies and facilities that would help the needy should be appreciated because some people would one day need these initiatives.
?Caleb Lee? was pleased to see that new green MAN A95 double-decker buses were being deployed on service 854. The netizen hoped SMRT would replace the old bendy buses with more MAN A95 buses to improve the service 854 quota for wheelchair accessible buses.
SMRT bus captain Kumarevelu Velappan was fined S$5,000 and banned from driving for four years after admitting to causing grievous hurt to seven passengers by doing a negligent act.On March 27, 2015, the bus captain was trying to reach a logbook which had dropped onto his right leg when he suddenly realised that his bus was approaching the rear of an SBS Transit bus. He then accidentally stepped on the accelerator instead of the brakes, causing the bus to surge towards the bus in front.As a result of the collision, seven passengers were injured. One of them, who was seated at the back of the SBS Transit bus, had spinal injuries and underwent an operation.
?Susanna Loh? asked SMRT to update their staff promptly when there is a disruption, whether minor or major. The netizen mentioned having to exit at Newton Station to take the DTL because of the disruption at the NSL. ?Susanna Loh? said she was charged for the entry and exit at Newton so she asked for a refund but was rudely informed by a staff at Newton that she would not be charged. At Paya Lebar Station, she was informed that as a favour to her, they would refund her fare, since they were unaware of the disruption. The netizen pointed out that the fare should not be refunded as a favour since she was charged despite the disruption.
Go-Ahead, Singapores newest bus operator, would start its operations on Sep 4, with routes serving commuters in the Pasir Ris and Punggol areas. 13 bus services would be launched followed by 11 more routes on Sep 18.Nigel Wood, Go-Ahead Singapore Managing Director said that they were in the final stage of preparations and "well-placed" to deliver its services for the Loyang bus package. Several netizens welcomed the introduction of more bus services since they find that trains could not be relied upon nowadays. Siah Jin Kim stated that more bus services were needed to connect towns to the city area. ??? asked what commuters should expect from the new bus operator. Lincoln Chen also asked if double-decker buses would be deployed for service 386. Robinhood Leong reported that the service at Punggol bus interchange was not up to standard because waiting time was too long and there were no bus routes to the city area.
On All Singapore Stuff, Mary Quek shared her Facebook post about SMRT Bus Captain Mohd Tuffille Farhan Bin Zaine who helped to retrieve her handbag which she had left behind in the bus on Jun 28 at around 9:30 p.m.The netizen mentioned that her handbag contained many sentimental items which were very valuable to her. She also praised the bus captain for his honesty as he refused to accept the monetary gift she offered to him. Mary Quek thanked SMRT for employing such honest people.
?David Quek? and May Yap? wondered why commuters were asked to alight from the train at Yishun Station on the North-South Line and Bartley Station, without providing any reason.David Quek was disappointed that he had to squeeze to an overcrowded train when he was already seated comfortably on the train before being asked to change trains.?May Yap wondered why the train was still in operation during peak hours if the train had to turn back. The netizen said she had to wait for two trains before being able to board again.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian claimed that the public has not heard anything from Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan regarding the defective trains issue because he was spending his time meditating.He alleged, however, that Minister Khaw could tell the public what was happening in the transport portfolio in between his meditations. He mentioned that the Transport Minister used to write in his Facebook page and that he should continue to do so. Several netizens agreed that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should keep the public informed about the safety levels of trains. Luke Wong observed that it has been three months since Minister Khaw Boon Wan wrote any updates on his blog.
Melvin Yong, Labour Member of Parliament and Executive Secretary of the National Transport Workers Union (NTWU), clarified that the NTWU had tried to ensure that affected bus workers are not short-changed in the transition to the new government bus contracting model, drivers must be offered employment terms which are not worse off than that enjoyed before transition, and affected employees could choose to join the new operator, or be redeployed by their current employer where feasible.MP Yong also mentioned that SMRTs new initiatives to increase its headcount and upgrade staff was developed in partnership with the union. On two forum threads, netizens wondered whether the public bus sector in Singapore was underpaid because the two new bus operators were able to offer better compensation packages.zul99z stated that the public bus sector was definitely underpaid, having long working hours and lower salaries.Azlan Bin Aziz believed that competition was needed so that salaries in all sectors would increase. Chong Steven mentioned that fares would increase as companies offer better services. winnipegjets said that the good-paying jobs in Singapore had been taken away by foreign talents.
While there were speculations that Temasek Holdings was considering a buyout of SMRT, analysts said it was unlikely to be a move towards nationalisation. They pointed out that the Government intends to keep the rail market contestable and to tender the operation of rail lines more often. Walter Theseira, an SIM University economist, stated that SMRT would have to be delisted and turned into a statutory corporation under LTA or Ministry of Transport's control, for nationalisation to occur. Senior Lecturer from SIM University Park Byung Joon said that nationalization would mean that the operator would be fully answerable to the government, and that would not be the case if it were bought over by Temasek Holdings. SMRT would still need to turn in healthy profits. Analysts also reckoned that if Temasek were to take over SMRT, it could lead to the transport operator's objectives being realigned to be more on track to meet commuters' needs and expectations. Transport researcher Lee Der Horng from the National University of Singapore also said: "While SMRT will remain private, it will be answerable to only one shareholder, which is Temasek, and not others, who could be more commercially driven."Walter Theseira said that if SMRT does decide to go private, a good takeaway would be that shareholder and stock market pressures are ill-aligned with running a reliable and efficient rail system. Several netizens stated that the most important element was still the efficiency and affordability of rail services whether listed or private-owned. Others assumed that privatisation would lead to higher fare rates. Some speculated about the logic behind why Temasek Holdings was considering to buyout SMRT shares not under its control. George Han said that the free market model has not proven to be ideal for meeting objectives. Audrey Hon asked how the government could terminate SMRTs licence with immediate effect without causing disruption to public services. Magdalene Shane Lee wondered whether SMRT would be subjected to antitrust and competitive commission oversight if Temasek Holdings takes SMRT private.
In a joint release on September 26, The National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) and SMRT said that an appeal panel had been convened to look into the firing of two staff involved in a fatal track accident in March. The panel would review the appeal and ensure fair and due process.The panel comprises senior management in the company who are not from the Trains Group. Some netizens asked whether the Land Transport Authority (LTA) or the Ministry of Manpower would conduct a public and transparent investigation on the critical safety lapse occurred which led to the demise of the two staff. Others believed that the NTWU could only assist in the appeal but could not insist that the two dismissed staff be reinstated.
?Zantet Heng asked how to report commuters who let their children eat on board trains. The netizen disapproved of such behaviour, making cleanliness a difficult task for SMRT and also making the ride unpleasant by attracting roaches and ants.
Doreen Lee observed that commuters refuse to move to the middle of the train because there were insufficient grab handles in the middle. The netizen said that people have to hold onto something because they felt unsafe during jerky rides.
On The Business Times News, SMRT was mentioned to be among the stocks to watch. It was mentioned that a recovery on Wall Street overnight might have offered some motivation for Singapore investors to scour for trading ideas on Apr 19. Corporations that just released their earnings results continue to provide some trading catalysts.Among them was SMRT Corporation unit SMRT Taxis which announced on Apr 18 that its subsidiary Strides Transportation has signed a one-year partnership with Grab to provide car-booking services to commuters via the GrabCar platform.
Five people were injured in an accident along Orchard Road involving two public buses, one operated by SMRT and one by SBS Transit (SBST), that collided outside Ngee Ann City shopping centre. The five injured, aged between 18 and 70, were onboard the SBS Transit bus when the accident happened.Tammy Tan, SBSTs Senior Vice President of Corporate Communications, said that the company had extended its assistance to the injured passengers at the hospital. Tan also apologised to other affected commuters for the distress and inconvenience caused by the accident. Several netizens observed that there were many accidents these days involving public buses. Some netizens stated that bus drivers work long hours, and that SBST and SMRT should take care of their welfare and give them enough rest. dark_aLLeY asked who would pay for the hospital bills for the five bus passengers sent to the hospital.
An SMRT taxi driver asked netizens to share the photo of an alleged fare evader to deter the person from repeating the same offence to other taxi drivers. He mentioned that the couple seemed high on drugs when they boarded the taxi with their baby. They were perspiring, could not speak properly and kept drinking water. The cabby had filed a police report against the fare evaders but was informed by a police officer that the incident was just a civil case and that it was SMRT to decide whether action should be taken against the passengers. Some netizens suggested reporting the incident to SMRT and let the company decide on what action to take. Dumas Tang thought that fare evasion was already a criminal offence and wondered why the police stated that the incident was only a civil case. Mike Lo suggested that taxi companies require all drivers to purchase low cost insurance to guard them against such incidents or their companies to compensate their drivers should they encounter such incidents. Agongkia Goh mentioned that taxi drivers also cheat passengers by not picking up those flagging down taxis by the road before the start of midnight surcharge.
Tan Kok Tim? suggested the installation of solar panels on open MRT tracks to reduce noise pollution by acting as noise barriers on densely populated residential areas. In his blog post and letter published on The Straits Times online forum, the netizen hoped that the Government would study and allow the installation of solar panels above the expressways and on open MRT tracks to give shade and generate electricity. The netizen mentioned that for Singapore to remain competitive and relevant, it must find ways not to be reliant on fossil oil and gas to generate electricity. He added that other countries were already using solar and wind power.
Fadly stated that it was very difficult to hail a taxi on the road nowadays because most taxi drivers would purposely put the on call sign and would just drive aimlessly. Taxi drivers also complained about not making enough money. The netizen said that if taxi drivers were not choosy about destinations and greedy for that extra booking fee, they would have made enough money.The netizen mentioned that s/he would now use taxis only when no alternative travel options were available after taking a taxi whose driver kept complaining about everything, including Uber and GrabCar. Fadly also mentioned informing the driver that using GrabCar was cheaper and easier to book during peak hours. Several netizens explained that the on call sign was switched on by the control centre when the driver accepts a booking and could not be turned on or off by the driver. Others agreed with the contributor that it was very difficult to flagdown a taxi on the road and many would claim that they were either changing shift or on call. Some said that taxi drivers should not be judged based on the poor attitude of some drivers because many taxi drivers were good and hardworking. Siah Jin Kim mentioned that the life of taxi drivers got tougher since the introduction of all the third-party booking apps. Su Wee claimed that most Comfort and CityCab drivers usually avoid wheelchair bound commuters. Chris Cheung said that most of the time the service of cab drivers were good excluding those from Prime and Silver. The netizen added that Comfort offered the best service.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian stated that taxi fares were expensive in Singapore and asked where do taxi fares go since taxi drivers do not earn much in spite of working long hours.Several netizens stated that taxi companies earn more than taxi drivers because of high rental rates Vincent Ng said that the taxi companies and the Government knew where the high cost went yet they had not narrowed the flow of those costs.
An SMRT bus service 307 knocked down a 17-year-old boy as he crossed the road at the junction of Choa Chu Kang Avenue 3 and Choa Chu Kang Way while allegedly distracted by his mobile phoneWitnesses saw the bus driver alighted after the accident and was seen crouching on the pavement beside the boy while talking on his phone. A couple who were passing the area on their motorbike also stopped to help and accompany the boy, who was semi-conscious, until paramedics arrived.The Singapore Civil Defence Force stated that the teenager had been sent to the hospital via ambulance with head injuries. Investigations were still ongoing. Several netizens stated that the accident was both the pedestrian and drivers fault as both did not pay attention to the road. Some said that pedestrians should not be using their mobile devices while walking. Helmi Mohd, who claimed to be the uncle of the victim, said that their family had been informed by the police that based on the CCTV footage, the bus driver was speeding at a zebra crossing when he was supposed to slow down. The netizen also urged others to stop lambasting the teenager online. Mutiara Diana, who claimed to be the sister of the victim, stated that her brother was in the intensive care unit and people should stop assuming about what happened. She added that the CCTV footage showed that her brother was not using the phone when he crossed the road.
On HardwareZone Forum, Patsfoo asked other netizens if they were willing to take driverless taxis. In a later post, the netizen noted that Singapore roads were not spacious enough to provide a lane for driverless taxis and cars. S/he also mentioned the driverless vehicles would have quieter and faster rides but were also dangerous in case of system error and might take away the jobs of taxi drivers. Several netizens believed that autonomous vehicles would be faster and cheaper than conventional cars. crazyliao was concerned about the safety of driverless vehicles citing the recent LRT incident. game goondu was uncertain that driverless vehicles would be used in Singapore after its trial as Singapore has many uncontrollable variables on the road.
?Mervyn Ang? reported the bus captain of service 965 (SMB1335M) for closing the bus doors on him before he was able to board.The netizen mentioned walking slowly towards the bus as there were a number of passengers still boarding the bus. When most of the passengers had boarded, the netizen decide to rush towards the bus but was too late as the bus captain already closed the doors and left the bus stop despite seeing him rush towards the bus. ?Mervyn Ang? hoped that SMRT could look into the matter and advise the bus captain to correct his bad attitude and manners. Zul Saibot stated that the bus was not the netizens personal transport that would wait for him should he decide to walk slowly to catch the bus. The netizen mentioned that if Mervyn Ang showed some urgency, the bus captain would have waited for him. Samuel Caleb asked whether closing the doors on commuters was part of SMRTs culture because he also experienced the same.
KikiLala shared photos of a young female commuter who was sitting in an indecent manner on bus service 123 at Clarke Quay.The netizen mentioned that the passenger was literally sitting with her legs up even though she was wearing a skirt. Several netizens disapproved of the contributors decision to share indecent photos of a young female passenger online. ??? said that STOMP has a responsibility to report the contributor to the police because s/he broke the law by taking indecent photos without the girl's permission. Mel Tan pointed out that service 123 does not go to Clarke Quay. Bollyhood wondered why the contributor did not have the audacity to confront the passenger for putting her feet up on the seat but decided to shame the passenger by posting the indecent photos.
?Herman Winston Seville? reported that the bus captain of service 188 did not stop at the bus stop despite him pressing the bell twice.The netizen claimed that the bus captain was racing with another bendy bus (TIB1108A) as he had noticed that there was bus bunching. Although the bus captain stopped a few metres away from his designated stop, he continued to speed away before the netizen was able to alight.
?Jackie Cant Thinkofaname? reported waiting for 10 minutes for bus service 975 during the peak hour. When the bus arrived, it did not stop to pick up passengers since it was already packed. According to the bus app, the next bus would arrive in 10 minutes. The netizen mentioned that the wait could be more than 10 minutes if the next bus was still overcrowded. SMRT has reached out to the netizen asking for more details to do checks as all bus arrival timings are now under LTA.
The LTA stated that they were studying the feasibility of an Account-Based Ticketing System so there would be no need for commuters to top-up their EZ-Link cards anymore. The system would work similar to the mobile phone subscriptions or utility bills, where fare transactions would be processed and charged at a specific date of the month. This would allow commuters to use contactless debit or credit cards for fare payments. Aaron Loy asked whether the same debit or credit card account could be used for concessions or whether there was a need to get a separate card or account for them reiko wondered how commuters with no debit or credit cards would be able to use such a system. TuscanSun also asked if there would be an additional charge per tap for using a credit card.
huihong shared Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans Facebook post on May 31 regarding rail reliability. The Transport Minister mentioned that improving rail reliability is a multi-year battle, and the cup is three quarters empty. He stressed that he is determined to make it a full cup. He added that although the strategy to improve the rail system was being implemented, it would take time for results to show. Several netizens stated that every time the Transport Minister talks about the rail system, disruptions were to be expected in the following days. ahkrong encouraged netizens to opt for alternative transport modes.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated in a media interview over the state of transport in Singapore that he needs at least 14 years to achieve a reliable public transport system and make Singapore car-lite.The Transport Minister mentioned that going car-lite depended on three factors: to have reliable public transport with the train system as the backbone, hassle-free connecting journeys to nearby train stations and bus interchanges, and a strong shared system comprising taxis, private-hire cars and car-sharing. He stated that all these were doable by 2030. He said that by 2030, there will be 360km of train lines and 80% of residential homes will be within a 10 minute walk of any station.Minister Khaw Boon Wan also reiterated his old speeches saying that his aim is to make car ownership and private-car usage unnecessary. Singapores public transport, however, is still far from being a viable alternative because of overcrowding and train breakdowns. Many netizens wondered why it would take Minister Khaw Boon Wan 14 years to improve public transport to be able to achieve a car-lite society. Several mentioned that the Ministers and other public officials should start using public transport to encourage the public not to use their cars. Some said that the Government should make commuting from point A to B more efficient and reduce the fares. Kelvin Lim Wrong suggested having covered walkways between houses and the nearest train or bus terminal.
Several netizens stated that SMRT should learn some manners from the Japanese. They also shared a link to SGAG post regarding how Japanese train conductors would walk around the train and personally apologize to commuters after a delay in its train services. A Proof of Lateness slip was also handed to each passenger as proof that it was not the passengers fault for being late for work or school. Chuen Siang Tay hoped that SMRT would elevate its service level to be near or at par with the Japanese. Martyn See said the people should not expect SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek to go around apologising but the proof of lateness slips would be useful to commuters. Kenneth Chang said that SMRT should learn some manners instead of just profiteering.
Following the death of two SMRT employees who were hit by a train while on duty last month, safety protocols and train reliability issues dominated the Ministry of Transport Committee of Supply debate, with some Members of Parliament (MP) raising concerns about SMRT's safety protocols and questioning whether the authorities would look into imposing financial penalties on the train operator.MP Sitoh Yih Pin said the accident provided a "stark reminder" that the safety and well-being of both employees and consumers of the public transport system are paramount. Chua Chu Kang GRC MP Yee Chia Hsing, stated that it was not acceptable for anyone to sustain serious injury, especially fatal ones, for a system which runs on tracks. He urged the Transport Ministry to conduct a comprehensive review of how train operators here carry out their maintenance work, to prevent such incidents from recurring. MP Yee also asked the ministry to look into whether financial or other penalties should be imposed on SMRT and its management.MP Dennis Tan said he was "surprised such a simple accident could be allowed to happen here" as the MRT system was not new. He said that the interim measures issued by the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and Ministry of Manpower (MOM) were expected to already be in place and standard operating procedures.Other issues raised by eight MPs include how bus drivers should be protected from abuse by commuters, and the measures taken to retain this group of workers.Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan is expected to address these issues in Parliament. Several netizens believed that financial penalties would not solve the issue, with some suggesting that the financial penalties should go directly to the victims families or be spent to improve safety. Some disapproved of having financial penalties as it would only be passed on to commuters later on as cost of operations. Kath K-wong said that the gravity of the offence naturally warrants punishment but asked what kind of punishment should be meted out and who would take full responsibility for it. Sorensen Lkh suggested changing the train operator in light of its poor performance over the years. Koh Denny believed that MOM has jurisdiction over the matter.
Tan My praised SMRT staff Jaya from Buona Vista station for assisting her when her slippers broke. The staff also offered a pair of slippers so she could continue with her journey.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) announced that by 2020 they would be expanding the free Wi-Fi across the island to 100 MRT stations, 43 LRT stations, 23 bus interchanges and 7 bus terminals due to the positive feedback from commuters. Most netizens hoped that the free Wi-Fi would be installed on all trains and buses as well. Raymond Fong stated that most commuters spend more time inside trains than on the platform and suggested installing free WirelessSG inside the trains instead. f??? mentioned that the data signal inside trains was weak, making it difficult to send photos.
Frederick Wong stated that SMRT bus service 173 was inefficient and that the arrival timings were infrequent. The netizen asked SMRT to have frequent buses or add another bus service that would ply to Beauty World MRT station.
?Glenc Soh? reported that the Night Rider bus with plate number SMB1430X almost skipped the Clarke Quay MRT bus stop without checking if there were any passengers. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain only stopped the bus when passengers ran onto the road to signal the bus captain to stop the bus. The netizen added that the bus captain later opened the doors when the bus was in a dangerous position in the middle of the road.He said that this was not the first time that such an incident involving SMRTs buses has happened.
In a post on its website, the Singapore Democratic Party (SDP) stated that the deaths of the two staff earlier this year raise serious questions. First, the dismissals have taken place before official investigations are completed.The article cited the case of the Hepatitis-C outbreak in Singapore General Hospital last year, where disciplinary action was taken against 12 hospital staff members in leadership positions and four Health Ministry officers holding director-level or equivalent roles over the incident which resulted in 25 patients being affected by the virus, of whom eight died. The sanctions, ranging from warnings to financial penalties, were meted out only after an inquiry into the saga was completed. Secondly, one of those dismissed was named by The Straits Times. The SDP questioned how the newspaper obtained the identity of the staff and why it was reported. Third, by taking action against some of its staff in such a manner, SDP said that SMRT may be unjustifiably absolving its other staff members especially those at the highest levels of any responsibility over the mishap.SDP also asked for Minister Khaw Boon Wan to address SMRTs decision to dismiss the workers and explain why the identity of the train captain was released. Several netizens hoped that the train captain who was dismissed would speak the truth about the accident.
News story about SMRT taxi driver who returned S$235,500 in cash that was left on his taxi (SHB1881L) by passenger Chukamon Khammat on 9 July, who claimed to be a Thai businessman, had been shared on several news feeds and social media channels.There were claims, however, that the story was untrue. SMRT is currently verifying the accuracy of the account. Several netizen lauded the taxi driver for his honesty. Others mentioned that the issue should be reported to the police as the man could be involved in money laundering for carrying such a big amount of money. A majority of the netizens said that SMRT should recognise the taxi driver. Fayne Ng said that someone had posted on the SMRT Facebook page that the story was fake and that the taxi driver and the businessmen were friends.
On Facebook, SMRT Feedback by The Vigilanteh asked others to explain as to why the issue about MRT trains being sent back to the manufacturer for repairs had been a big issue. Several netizens stated that the issue was not about the defective trains being sent back to its manufacturer but the secrecy and cover up of the matter. Davin Wong said that it was standard procedures for out of gauge cargo to be covered with canvas when being loaded on a flat rack container. Other netizens were afraid that taxpayers money was being used to buy substandard trains and that it would cost even more money for them to be repaired.
The new Bus Contracting Model (BCM) started on September 1 when the LTA would own all bus operating assets and lease them to SMRT and SBS Transit to operate and manage the bus services and bus depots. On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) mentioned that the buses under the BCM might cause confusion to commuters because some SBS Transit buses were now being used by SMRT. Commuters had to look closer to identify the route number and the bus captains uniform to determine that they were taking the correct bus. Several netizens observed that the bus operator sticker pasted on the buses were too small and not easily visible to commuters. Caleb Lee hoped that more new buses would be deployed for service 854 to replace the old bendy buses.
?Pang Soon Tan? reported that the bus captain of service 171 stopped at Block 183 bus stop instead of the next one. The driver informed the netizen that the bus stop scheme had been revised. The netizen wondered why there was no announcement of the bus stop relocation. S/he stated that the changes would confuse commuters and would be inconvenient for those with children and with disabilities.
jason910 wondered why many commuters ignore the 'Bags Down' signage on public transport. Some netizens stated that if the trains are not crowded, carrying backpacks in the trains should not be an issue. Some disapproved the act of placing bags on the floor as the bags may take up standing space and cause others to trip. CloudJames said that backpacks should be carried in front rather than placing them on the floor.
The ComfortDelGro taxi driver and the SBS Transit bus captain who helped extinguish a car fire on Jun 6 were awarded the Public Spiritedness Award by the Singapore Civil Defence Force (SCDF) on Jun 10 for their selfless acts and swift action. Both men were surprised as they did not expect to be given an award.Colonel Alan Chow, Commander of 1st SCDF Division who presented the awards, said: "Those were the right kind of actions to be taken by civic-minded individuals with the right skills and the right mind-set to help others in need." Most netizens lauded the bus captain and taxi driver for rendering their help.
Kenneth Alex Tan thanked SMRT bus captain of bus TIB832Z for giving him a smooth ride onboard the last Hispano bodied Mercedes Benz O405 in Singapore and probably one of the very few left in the world.The netizen asked SMRT to consider keeping the said bus as he had many memories with the bus since he was a young boy. He mentioned that his grandfather used to take him on a bus ride around Singapore onboard the O4O5. He said that many other bus enthusiasts also shared the same sentiments.
?Joyce Tan? posted on SMRTs Facebook page her disappointment with an alleged SMRT train captain for taking photos of a sleeping passenger and posting it online. The netizen said that the foreign worker might have slept on the train due to exhaustion from work and should not be humiliated online. The netizen hoped that the SMRT train captain involved be relieved from his job.
?Reena SyAi SaFiy SUfi? stated that it was unacceptable behaviour for a bus captain to suddenly step on the brakes at a traffic junction, causing passengers on board to fall.The netizen said that one of the passengers was her mother-in-law who suffered a slight abrasion on her knees and had injured her hands. Two other elderly passengers fell on top of each other.The bus captain did not bother to check on his passengers or apologise. In another post, ?Achong Aci? also complained of the same issue about the bus captain.
On Facebook, The Alternative View posted a screenshot of SMRTs tweet about a 10-minute additional travelling time between Bugis and Pasir Ris Stations on July 31 and asked whether the netizens were affected by the delay. William Choo mentioned that after SMRT runs out of excuses, the next disruption would be blamed on a 'window fault'. Chin Lee Wah stated in sarcasm that there was an improvement with SMRT as it frequently tweets about delays.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) announced some changes to the Peak Period Short Services (PPSS) starting September 1. Services 222P, 240P, 268P, 307P and 912P would be renamed 222B, 240M, 268B/268C, 307A and 912M respectively. The said services were operated by either SBS Transit or SMRT. The bus routes will remain the same and continue to offer commuters an alternative to get to a nearby bus interchange and/or MRT station during peak periods.Meanwhile, service 291P and 293P would be replaced by SBS Transit Bus Services 291 and 293. Additional trips will also be added for these services.LTA advised commuters taking the PPSS to check posters for any changes. Several netizens found the changes in the PPSS favourable. carbikebus said that there was no need for PPSS because buses for service 291 were already bunching during peak hours and the frequency was between one to two minutes. BusAnalayzer believed that it may be better for LTA to terminate PPSS and have SBS Transit and SMRT operate them as regular services and Short Working Trips services. SMB3163D hoped that bendy buses could be deployed for SMRT service 307A. Janice Chu also hoped that service 291 would have additional trips during peak hours. The netizen also asked LTA to monitor the bus timings of SBS Transit buses during peak hours at Tampines Street 32 and 33.
Anita S stated in a review about SMRT in TripAdvisor that the train system was easy to use and very inexpensive. She paid S$2.40 for her ride from Bugis Station to the airport and had paid even less to get around town. The netizen also noted that it was only a ten minutes walk from the MRT station to the cruise port and it was a mostly covered walkway.
The LTA said on Tuesday (Apr 26) that the massive power trip that crippled parts of the MRT network on Apr 25 was due to a power fault within the western sector of the North-South and East-West Lines and not because of a power dip as SMRT had earlier announced. In a statement issued to the media, LTA said preliminary investigations indicate that the 22kV circuit breakers at Buona Vista station tripped. Several netizens mentioned that the LTA failed to make the MRT power supply more robust as it added more MRT lines. Kelvin Lai suggested to build a bigger pool of maintenance technicians and engineers like what is being done in Hong Kong. Rey Ong mentioned that from an engineering point of view, there should not be a single point of failure and the system has to cater for some redundancy.
AS1 stated that a train breakdown was announced at Joo Koon MRT station on Jun 3. Trains leaving from Joo Koon were delayed. Several netizens asked for updates regarding the breakdown. couscous mentioned that travel along the East-West line was smooth. eyesawz mentioned that his/her friend who used to work in SMRTs maintenance department claimed that the management would not grant any budget to buy replacement parts for faulty components and would instead ask them to service the faulty part.
On Facebook, Melvin Yong, Member of Parliament for Tanjong Pagar GRC and Executive Secretary of the National Transport Workers Union (NTWU), mentioned meeting with the SMRT Permanent Way team's Emergency Response Unit (ERU) at SMRT Bishan Depot as part of his weekly NTWU worksite visit. He mentioned that the ERU was constantly on stand-by during operational hours to rectify faults on our MRT tracks. They spoke about workplace safety and the need to take care of each other's safety and protection when performing work on the train tracks. Suggestions to improve work processes were also discussed during the meeting.
Nastasha Kamsan shared a video showing a simple game trialled on selected subway cars in Seoul, Korea where passengers could greet a fellow passenger instead of just sleeping or looking at their phones while onboard the train. The netizen hoped SMRT could introduce the same in its trains.
Zhi Ling Ong? reported a burning smell from the platform level on the right escalator at Sembawang MRT station. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
Discussions were observed regarding ComfortDelGros plan to raise taxi fares being foiled by Ubers fare cuts. Several netizens believed that competition would prevent greedy taxi companies from increasing fares. Funk Doobiest said that taxis need to waive peak hour charges to be able to compete with Uber and Grab. greenbubble stated that since there had been a significant drop in oil prices, taxi companies had no reason to increase taxi fares or keep the price unchanged. dnsfpl said that ComfortDelGro did not have to increase fares in order to improve cabbies income.
In a joint press release from SMRT and Sunseap, SMRT announced that SMRT's Bishan Depot would be able to run on solar power by the end of the year, after the transport operator signed a deal with Sunseap Leasing, a clean energy provider. The power system to be installed at the premises could potentially generate enough electricity to power 270 four-room public housing flats for a year, and would be capable of meeting the depots operational energy needs, excluding the train movements within the depot. It would also allow SMRT to reduce its carbon footprint by 553 tonnes of CO2 annually. Several netizens noted that SMRT had been in the position to put solar panels all over its facilities in the past years but had not done so. Others hoped that the savings incurred from using solar power would be spent on maintenance. Alan Ng asked whether the solar panels would also improve train efficiency. Kheng Chun hoped that there would be no more breakdowns caused by power outage after the installation of the solar panels.
?Jessie Seah? reported the bus captain of bus licence plate SMB1516H for sudden braking and accelerating. The netizen stated that such driving attitude posed danger to passengers.
The LTA would impose stringent control on the works being carried out for the new Canberra MRT station along the North-South Line. The authority would coordinate with SMRT for access to the work area as the new station would be built on an existing rail line, which could increase safety risk. Temporary protection enclosures would be erected to cover and protect the existing railway tracks and trains at the site of the new station. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stressed that safety would be a top priority in building the station in the aftermath of the SMRT accident killing two maintenance workers.
Krabs. noticed that the stainless steel handrails at the ground level of the new Downtown Line2 above Bukit Panjang station were already rusting. Several netizens assumed that a lower grade of stainless steel was used for the project. Others mentioned that stainless steel was not rust-proof. RobinTeoHood claimed that the construction of the rail line was rushed, saying that many of the finishings were out of alignment.
It has been more than six months since the opening of the Downtown Line Stage 2 (DTL2). The Land Transport Authority (LTA) said that the average daily weekday ridership has nearly tripled from 83,000 in October 2015, before the DTL2 opened, to more than 250,000 as of mid-July this year.LTA believed that the increase in ridership was likely due to more commuters shifting from driving to taking the DTL.The DTL2 has also helped to reduce the passenger load on other MRT Lines by 10% during the morning peak hours. With more commuters switching from taking buses which run along the DTL corridor to taking the train, the speeds of bus services have also improved by up to 6% during peak periods. Several netizens stated that the DTL had made their train travel more convenient. Some said that the only thing they dislike with the DTL was the need to tap in and out again. Blindaim believed that there were more passengers because of the additional stations opened on the DTL. Jonathan Lim suggested connecting the DTL to Yew Tee, Kranji or Marsiling to give commuters more travel options. Sangha Vandana hoped that fare prices would not increase. May Ong noted that the trains were crowded even in the late evening.
?Jade Low? asked SMRT to review the bus schedules from Kranji MRT station to Johor Bahru Customs because it was outdated.The netizen also asked if SMRT could deploy more buses for the said route.
Alienated Singaporean shared her bad experience at Serangoon MRT station on the Circle Line where she was allegedly pushed several times from behind and was clawed by a foreign female passenger.She confronted the latter near the control station as she sustained scratches on her arm. The station manager and a CISCO security officer tried to break the argument and had asked both female passengers to leave the station despite informing the manager and security officer that she was attacked. The security officer insisted that the matter should be resolved outside the station or report the incident to the police. The netizen was disappointed with the security officer for asking for her particulars and letting the alleged assailant leave the station while waiting for the police to arrive. Julie Cucu TokMoin stated that the netizen should submit an official complaint to the proper channel and let the staff do their work according to protocol and standard operating procedures. The netizen added that the CCTV footage could shed light on what really transpired. Ashieru mentioned that the CISCO officer should have assisted in calling the police and detained the alleged assailant.
?Joanne NW? reported the bus captain of bus service 981 (SMB354P) for not waiting for her to make her way to the door to alight at her designated bus stop. The netizen mentioned that the bus was overcrowded and she had difficulty making her way through to the exit door. She claimed that the bus captain had seen her trying to make her way but still drove off from the bus stop. The netizen pressed the stop bell again to signal her intent to alight but she claimed that the driver ignored it. A passenger had also asked the bus captain to stop the bus. The bus captain, however, sped up and drove to the next bus stop. The netizen had to alight a stop later to take another bus back to her original destination. The netizen asked SMRT how it intends to discipline the bus captain involved and would like a personal apology from the bus captain. The netizen also asked SMRT to refund her the additional bus fare incurred.SMRT has reached out to the netizen to assure her that passenger safety is priority and requested for the netizens contact details so that the team can look into the issue.
?Magdalene Lao? reported that wrong station names were being announced on trains travelling from Raffles Place to Bishan. She was surprised that when Bishan Station was announced, she was actually at Ang Mo Kio Station. The incident occurred at around 7.35pm on July 14.The netizen mentioned that this was not the first time that wrong station names had been announced and asked SMRT to look into the issue.
?Ben Lim? reported that the SMRT taxi driver of SHF468H tried to issue a handwritten receipt and asked him how much mark-up he was willing to pay. When the netizen asked for a printed receipt, the driver said that only credit card payment would be accepted. The netizen agreed to pay with credit card and even taught the driver how to print the receipt.
?Joyce Leong? stated that it was the second day in a row that she had to wait for three trains before being able to board the train at Yio Chu Kang MRT station. The netizen mentioned that only two trains arrived within 11 minutes of waiting during the peak hour and she was not able to board as both trains were too packed. She arrived at the station at 7:08 a.m. and was only able to board the train towards Bishan at 7:22 a.m.
gallyban observed that despite SMRT staff asking commuters to give up their seats to a mother with a small child in a pram, those in the reserved seats still hesitated to give up their seats. Some netizens stated that all passengers pay the same fare so everyone was entitled to a seat. Others mentioned that there should not be any seats in MRT trains so there would not be any issue regarding who was entitled to a seat. nachtsider said that women in third world countries could carry a baby, a basket and a sack of rice and still be able to walk to their destination and back while Singaporean women with a child in hand riding the MRT must sit down and could not stand for 10-15 minutes.
Aaron Tan? states that the timing of bus service 966 was getting from bad to worse. The netizen mentioned that his sister waited at Eunos for over 20 minutes. He said that the interval was too long and that only single-decked buses, which were usually packed with passengers, were deployed during off-peak hours. The netizen hoped SMRT would shorten the interval during off-peak period.
?Amos Tan praised the bus captain of license plate number SMB308Z for waiting for his grandmother to board the bus before driving off.
The Straits Times shared SMRTs video of company intern Emilys interview with bus captain Krishnanraw, the smiley SMRT bus captain who sports a spiffy pilot's cap, was featured on The Straits Times.The video has been shared more than 150 times, and viewed more than 9,000 times as of 11 a.m. on Jun 15.It was not the first time that bus captain Krishnanraw's service was appreciated. In January 2015, SMRT said that it had received a number of compliments for the bus captain, whose currently serves bus service 913.The bus captain mentioned that a friend gave him his popular pilot's cap as a birthday present. Although he was reluctant to wear the cap at first, he was happy to see that most passengers liked his cap, adding that aunties tell him that he was "cool" when he wears it. Many netizens shared their encounters with bus captain Krishnanraw saying that he was humble, friendly, cheerful, caring and takes pride in his job. Several mentioned that Krishnanraw was their favourite bus captain. Victor Seah said that all bus captains should follow Krishnanraws example, be proud of their profession and always drive safely. Shuyi Jac said that s/he had never met such a good SMRT bus captain.
ImFromPipiForum wondered if there was an issue at the East-West Line because the waiting time seemed longer. Ah-Pin-Kor stated that delays were normal. boon_hou said that no issues were observed from Pasir Ris towards Jurong East. MrSinkie95 mentioned that it was overcrowded at Lakeside Station because an escalator was not working.
The Sengkang loop of the Sengkang-Punggol LRT now officially operates with two-car trains.The trains would help to alleviate the peak hour crowd in the mornings and evenings, and would run at intervals of three to four minutes.Lam Pin Min, Sengkang West Member of Parliament, stated that feedback from residents reported that waiting times for the LRT trains were quite long. With the implementation of the dual carriage, Lam Pin Min hoped that the waiting times would significantly decrease. Ng Chee Meng, Senior Minister of State for Transport, who launched the new trains, said he was "very happy" with the upgrade, and hoped it would bring more comfort to residents in the area.The Punggol Loop would also be upgraded to a similar two-car system by 2017. Many netizens were happy with the increased capacity. Several suggested having 3-car trains during peak hours. Jacky Lee said that the trains were more spacious. Ljc Lim said that every LRT stations should build half platform screen doors similar to the screen doors at the North-South and East-West Lines above ground stations, for safety.
NotWhatYouThink wondered whether the train air-conditioner was functioning as it was hot inside the train. tatsit believed that the train air-conditioner was functioning but was not being serviced, so there was no cold air coming from the air-conditioner. ComeOnYouSpurs claimed that the train air-conditioning system had never been cleaned for 10 years already.
?Low Leong Leyi? had her earphones while scrolling through her mobile phone onboard bus service 854 (TIB1134Z) on August 19 when she suddenly heard someone shouting. When she looked up the female bus captain was pointing at her and shouting at her to stand up and give up her seat to an elderly. The netizen was surprised since there were two other young passengers sitting in front of her also who pretended not to hear the bus captain. Although four months pregnant, she complied and gave up her seat for the elderly.The netizen pointed out that there was no need for the bus captain to shout at her and embarrass her in front of other passengers. The netizen said that the bus captain might have good intentions but it was inappropriate for her to shout at passengers and force them to give up their seats.?Low Leong Leyi? hoped that SMRT would look into the issue and suggested introducing the pink light alert similar to that in Korea where train passengers were alerted when a pregnant passenger came onboard.
?June Goh ?took an SMRT taxi with license plate number 4648 and was disappointed with the drivers slow driving. The netizen assumed that the driver drove slowly so as to wait for the meter fare to increase.
Netizens continued to discuss the first major breakdown on the Downtown Line 2 (DTL2). turbin95 did not expect that the DTL2 would breakdown since it was the most efficient among all MRT lines. syed putra mentioned that Bombardier trains have a design fault on its brakes. The netizen said that the Bombardier trains used in Kuala Lumpur now have revised brake systems. Yeo Francis Pay mentioned that the former Transport Minister Lui Tuck Yew had done a better job because he had travelled on the MRT and buses to find out what should be improved. Guan Wei stated that commuters should not expect the DTL2 to function properly since its construction was rushed so that it could have an earlier completion.
Yi JF? hoped that SMRT can plan its bus service schedules carefully as some buses were travelling too slowly, causing inconvenience to passengers and other road users. The netizen mentioned that a service 983 bus was travelling at about 40km per hour from Bukit Panjang to Choa Chu Kang.
?Bao Faith Ang? asked SMRT to look into the frequency of service 903. The netizen mentioned that three empty buses would arrive together while the next bus would arrive after 10 minutes packed with passengers.
Blogger Phillip Ang found it preposterous to claim that people were more satisfied with MRT services given the frequent delays and disruptions.The Customer Satisfaction Index was published by the Institute of Service Excellence at the Singapore Management University last week. The MRT had a customer satisfaction score of 66.4 from April to July 2016. This was up from its score of 62 for the same period last year. The blogger claimed that the members of its statutory board include a former Peoples Action Party Member of Parliament.The blogger also said that the public should be worried when the Government publishes its own survey with findings contrary to the real experience of MRT commuters, as they might be trying to cover up something. Some netizens pointed out that the result of the survey might be correct since it was conducted before the series of breakdowns occurred. Others asked who participated in the survey.
?Avinash Bala? reported an air-conditioning leak on train number 2233. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a video of its intern Emilys interview with Bus Captain Uncle Krishnanraw. Krishnanraw serves a route that operates from Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange and was very popular with many bus passengers because of his iconic pilot cap.In the video interview, Khrisnanraw was given a compliment from a netizen to read aloud, and was elated when he realised that the compliment was for his excellent service. Emily mentioned that the interview with the bus captain was extremely fun, positive and enthusiastic. Many netizens praised bus captain Krishnanraw for his good work and his friendliness and kindness to his passengers. Some netizens, who were passengers of bus service 913, shared their positive experience about bus captain Krishnanraw. Shannon Tan mentioned that he had boarded bus captain Khrisnanraws bus before, and had thought that he was in a first class cabin of an aeroplane, as the bus captains jovial way of greeting passengers livened up his bus journey. Others thanked SMRT and Emily for sharing the video interview with Krishnanraw.
dxdx999 stated that the train journey was slow along the North-South line because of a track fault at Marina South Pier. Several netizens posted on SMRTs Facebook page about the track fault but no announcements were made by SMRT. Peter Low asked if there was a train disruption at the North-South Line as he had been waiting for eight minutes for a train at Orchard MRT station. The netizen asked SMRT to announce disruptions on its Facebook page. Eva Lyh? mentioned that an announcement about the track fault was heard in the train but none on SMRTs official website or its social media accounts. David Quek? said that North-South Line was paralysed once again.
?Mona Bakar? reported that there was no air-conditioning on the North-South Line train towards Marina Bay.The netizen said that it was really frustrating to be standing in a cabin with poor ventilation as someone could have passed out. She mentioned that all trains should be well ventilated and that the air-conditioning should be in full blast during peak hours.
The LTA announced that starting September 19, Go-Ahead Singapore would operate services 358 and 359 as replacement for Peak Period Short Services (PPSS) 358P and 359P, respectively. There would be no changes to the bus routes and additional trips would be added for these services. Robinhood Leong asked LTA to increase the frequency of bus service 386. The netizen mentioned waiting for more than 15 minutes for the service at Punggol interchange. Matthew Tay wondered why one bus was deployed for service 912M compared to former service 912P when it was still under Commute Solutions.
Blogger Phillip Ang referred to the Jul 5 Channel NewsAsia report on defective SMRT trains which mentioned that the cost per train in 2009 was S$16.72M while in 2015 cost per train was S$11.41M.The blogger said that it was unbelievable that SMRT trains would cost S$5.3M less after six years. He mentioned that perhaps the cost savings should be passed on to commuters. Victor Loh said that lower costs could mean lower guarantee in quality of materials used. William Choo said that if the value of each MRT train had depreciated by S$5.3M after six years, then the 26 defective trains returned to CSR Sifang should be written off as a bad investment.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan revealed at the ground-breaking ceremony of the East Coast stretch of the Thomson-East Coast Line (TEL) that LTA was assessing the possibility of extending the TEL from Sungei Bedok station to the future Changi Airport Terminal 5 and the existing Changi Airport station.He stated that it woud provide a direct connection from the airport to the city which would benefit travellers and airport staff.He added that the authority would also be assessing the feasibility of connecting the Cross Island Line (CRL) to Terminal 5 and the new industrial zone serving the airport. Several netizens approved of the transport authoritys plan to extend the TEL to Changi Airport saying that it would be easier for people to catch their flights. K Tan Jas disapproved of having so many MRT stations for such a small country. Several others disagreed and supported the building of more stations for better accessibility. Aaron Tan believed that a dedicated airport train service with proper provisions for heavy luggage similar to that of Hong Kong, Tokyo and Seoul would be ideal. Alfred Yap hoped that security processes would not be compromised. Shian Bang hoped that SMRT could come up with an express train service to the city for easier access to the CBD.
Jared Ho shared a photo of a man taking photos of buses in SMRT Woodlands bus park. The man appeared to be on a nearby rooftop. The netizen was concerned of a possible security breach and hoped that appropriate measures would be taken to prevent such occurrences.
On Facebook, REACH Singapore posted about short-trip driverless taxis that would be introduced by 2018 as part of the Governments car-lite vision.Experts said self-driving vehicles (SDV) would be useful for Singapore's transport system, but ait will be a challenge to have them on such a scale within a few years. They were also concerned about the safety of such vehicles. Chun Chew Lam stated that SDVs have several disadvantages. S/he said that it could not carry many passengers like buses and charges could be higher. Siah Jin Kim asked who would control the vehicle in case of an emergency.
On Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road Facebook, a post was observed regarding an SMRT taxi driver (SHB5759G) who took a shortcut from Jalan Sayang to Jalan Kembangan by going against the traffic along Sims Avenue East on September 12. A video of the incident was shared by George Teo. Some netizens believed that the taxi driver might not be familiar with the route and was not aware of the traffic flow. Jack Chan hoped that more mobile traffic police would be deployed on the road instead of installing CCTV cameras.SMRT Facebook administrator has highlighted this incident to Taxis for their follow-up.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) and SMRT stated that they have been undertaking investigations into the cause of the intermittent loss of signalling communications between the trains and tracks on the Circle Line from August 29 to September 2.Following a series of tests, LTA, SMRT and train manufacturer Alstom assessed that an interfering signal could have disrupted the trains signalling systems and led to the loss of communications.In the meantime, authorities would explore using electromagnetic shields on trains to minimise the impact of interfering signals and also consider changing the signal system frequency. Several netizens asked whether the electromagnetic shields have been confirmed effective. Lloyd Sam observed that the North-East Line has not experienced signal interfering problems despite being fully underground and driverless. Ah-Pin-Kor wondered whether the electromagnetic shield would affect mobile signals on trains. SK Toh said that it was probable that the system was hacked or a prankster had carried an interference source on board the train. See Seah believed that the main cause of signal disruption was a parasitic oscillation that affected the transmission frequency.
Chan Yin Keng wrote about the assistance offered to her by Aileen Goh, a staff at Tanah Merah MRT station, when the sole came off the netizens shoe. The staff fixed her shoe and ensured it was properly repaired before handing it back to her. The netizen was deeply touched by her kindness and willingness to render assistance to an elderly commuter.
Jean Chia, a researcher with the Lee Kuan Yew School of Public Policys Case Studies Unit, asked whether the new rail financing framework (NRFF) creates the right environment for private-sector participation in the rail industry.She believed that the impact of the new framework reaches far beyond finances. By taking over the operating assets and leasing them to the operators, and shortening the licence period to 15 years, the LTA would be the sole provider of rail infrastructure and operating assets, while opening up the rail services segment to more competition. Timely action on expanding capacity, and replacing and upgrading the operating assets could be expected from the LTA, while the operators would remain responsible for maintenance benchmarked to certain performance standards.On the other hand, the NRFF has been prescriptive in moderating the revenue and profitability risks for the operators through adjustments to the licence charge. While this was likely intended to mitigate profit pressures faced by a listed firm, it also raises some concerns. The revenue and profit sharing scheme could potentially curtail the private sectors incentive to innovate or improve efficiency, or possibly create shortfalls in the Railway Sinking Fund.In a public-private partnership, the risk-reward allocation needs to be finely balanced. Too little profit for the operator would make the operations financially unsustainable. While with too much profit, the Government and ultimately the public, needlessly subsidises the operators shareholders. Some netizens believed that nationalisation of public transport would be better than the contracting model. Kinkok Sin wondered why the Government had to pay SMRT to take over assets that were given to them free. The netizen also asked where the money to be used to buy SMRT assets would come from.
Train service on the North-South Line (NSL) was disrupted for about half an hour on Apr 26, less than 12 hours after four train lines were affected by a power trip on Apr 25. This was also the third disruption on the NSL in less than a week.On Facebook, SMRT apologised for the disruption of train services between Kranji and Woodlands MRT stations on the NSL.SMRT added that it was currently investigating the cause to determine if it was related to the Apr 25 power fault. Several netizens were frustrated over the lack of announcements about the disruption and that some station staff were unaware of the situation. Some netizens said they were tired of hearing the same apology and reasons again. A netizen requested for concrete solutions and details to be shared. Some suggested that the whole rail system should be upgraded. Amelia Lim said that commuters already gave SMRT more time to fix problems with reduced operating hours but yet breakdowns still happen frequently. Alice Fong asked whether SMRT would compensate the taxi fares of those who missed catching their company transport at Tuas. Mohamad Salleh suggested that SMRT should reduce the fares in light of the continuous disruptions.
In his blog post, Law Kim Hwee stated that while the Minister of Transport has direct responsibility over the defective trains issue, he would like Deputy Prime Minister Tharman Shanmugaratnam to demand answers from the LTA and SMRT regarding the issue, as he had been preaching about open discussion and telling the truth to the public. Several netizen considered the request excellent but wondered whether the ruling political party would tell the public the truth. Others mentioned that the issue about defective trains should have been handled in a better way. rukidding wondered why Senior Minister of State for Transport Josephine Teo also seemed to be very quiet about this incident.
?Kayzel Kok Hui Xian? complimented the Bus Captain of service 804 with plate number TIB1080U for always greeting his passengers cheerfully. The Bus Captain also waits for elderly passengers to board the bus and to find a seat before moving off. She mentioned taking the bus at Yishun bus stop 59581 every morning at around 7:10 a.m. and in the evening at 7:02 p.m. The netizen said that the Bus Captains simple acts of kindness deserved to be complimented. She hoped that the Bus Captain would continue to drive for service 804 as most of his commuters enjoyed their ride with him.
The LTA stated on July 12 that all new MRT trains assembled by a Chinese rolling stock company in Qingdao, not just the 26 defective ones, would have a key component cast in Japan instead of China.LTA Deputy Chief Executive Chua Chong Kheng said that LTA insisted that Kawasaki-Sifang change the supplier, notwithstanding that it was a manufacturing process error.The LTA also clarified that the bid was awarded to Kawasaki-Sifang as they delivered the best proposal in terms of quality, price and life-cycle costs. Mr Chua added that the hairline-crack issue has been "put to rest" since the ongoing rectification works and the willingness of Kawasaki-Sifang to honour its obligations. ??? said that if it was not a serious issue, it should have been resolved in Singapore instead of wasting time, money and effort to send the trains back. Sangha Vandana mentioned that the Government should have insisted on changing suppliers and casting the key components in Japan before the tender was awarded. Kenneth Tan wondered why the LTA did not purchase Japanese trains again. Jeff Yeow said that neitzens should not put the blame on China. He said that Japanese companies also produce defective parts which can cause a recall, citing Tadaka as an example.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan visited Bukit Batok Bus Interchange on July 1 following the transition of all 26 bus services under the Bulim Package under the Bus Contracting Model. The Minister mentioned that the introduction of the third bus operator was carefully planned.Minister Khaw was particularly happy to note Tower Transits success in recruiting more Singaporeans into the bus profession, citing that the adjustments to wages and staff benefits helped. Commuters gave feedback that bus arrival timings have become more regular since the transition, but noticed that buses were travelling at a slower pace. The reason was the regulation of distances between the buses which required bus captains to slow down to avoid bus bunching, when several buses were too close. Pang Soon Tan mentioned that Tower Transit was able to eliminate the peak period bus layover queue at Jurong East Bus Interchange, which SBS Transit was unable to achieve previously. Norman Abdullah said that Tower Transit was very fortunate to get many variety of buses despite having only one depot and 26 bus routes. Ethan Lai observed that Tower Transit staff members were always on the ground to monitor the crowd situation and were very responsive and polite.
?Sirna Kalam Maya? mentioned that train cabin 1352 felt like a sauna because of faulty air-conditioner. The netizen hoped the train captains or whoever was in charge of checking the trains, would check the air-conditioning system before revenue service.
???? ?? ?? reported that there was a terrible burning plastic smell inside the train travelling from Bishan Station on Jun 23.
Sebastian Khehkaekay? appreciated SMRTs strengthening of security measures and mentioned that there were some exceptional personnel who went out their way to ensure that commuters were safe.The netizen mentioned that the security officer at Novena MRT station was one of those personnel who have not failed to remind commuters to be careful while on the escalator. Sebastian Khehkaekay? said that it might be a simple reminder but it made him feel that there were still kind people around.The netizen stated that the security officer was an asset to the organisation and should be recognised.
?Serene Tan thanked SMRT staff and members of the public who had assisted her late younger brother who collapsed after alighting from bus service 911 on Apr 29 at Woodlands bus interchange. The netizen also thanked the doctors and nurses who attended to her brother at Khoo Teck Puat Hospital Acute and Emergency Care division.
Netizens continued to discuss the plan to renew the Bukit Panjang LRT network. Some netizens stated that the Bukit Panjang LRT should just be demolished. Willy Wong said that the line was not needed anymore as Bukit Panjang was already being served by the Downtown Line. Dominic Goh suggested increasing bus services in the area because there were not enough services from Bukit Panjang to Choa Chu Kang. Mai Jiachild asked whether the newly purchased cars could still be used after the renewal.
Netizens continued to discuss about the contractor who suffered an electrical burn at Sembawang MRT station following the incident that took place on May 26. The comments were in response to news articles on May 27 which reported that the contractor proceeded to an adjacent sector for which prior approval had not been sought and where the traction power had not been switched off. SMRTs Vice President of Corporate Information and Communication Patrick Nathan said in a statement on May 26 that three SMRT staff, along with two contractors, were on the track by the platform of Sembawang MRT station to conduct maintenance work during engineering hours. Mr Nathan said that one of the contractors was using a third-rail gauging bar to measure the height and distance of the third rail from the running rail, to ensure the correct positioning of the third rail, which supplies power to the trains. While carrying this out, the contractor sustained a burn injury to his left hand. Mr Nathan said the necessary approval was given to the team to access the track for the maintenance work. He also said that SMRT would continue with more detailed investigations to determine how existing procedures can be effectively strengthened. Several netizens stated that whether or not approval was granted to the contractor, SMRT was still liable for the accident as a safety officer should have been present to ensure the safety of its workers. Others mentioned that there was a lapse in the safety protocols when a worker could enter an area without prior approval. Lee Wei Kiat John said that safety culture should be promoted in the workforce. The netizen mentioned that employers and employees both play a part in ensuring safety. Loh Wai Poon wondered why the rail circuit was still alive even after revenue service and during maintenance works. Bilal Ali Ahamed mentioned that due to the reach of social media, any train breakdowns or incidents are propagated into big issues, putting pressure on companies to fix problems immediately with less downtime. The netizen urged the public to stop putting the blame on companies and its workers, and let them do their job without pressure.
Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong has issued a statement via his Facebook page after the tragic death of two SMRT trainees on Mar 22.He said he was saddened about the deaths and conveyed his condolences to the families. He added that that faults and malfunctions do happen in the train system, and generally take them in stride but it was different when two young men lose their lives in a workplace accident.Minister of State for Manpower, Sam Tan also posted on Facebook regarding the unfortunate incident. He stated that safety at the workplace was of paramount importance and that all must do their part and work together to ensure a safe working environment for all workers. Darren Hui wondered why Minister Khaw had not come out to explain the tragedy.
In a Straits Times segment called askST, reader Gabriel Tham asked if hand rails in MRT trains were cleaned with sanitisers, and whether a train's air-conditioning system breed and spread germs - especially when commuters cough or sneeze in a packed carriage. Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan answered that to effectively clean the trains from viruses, the hand rails had to be wiped with sanitisers every hour at least. He suggested that commuters who were prone to infection should wash their hands after each ride. He added that air-conditioners and ventilation systems could be a breeding ground for bacteria and fungi because of dust and moisture build up. To prevent this, operators clean the system regularly, sometimes with strong chemical.Tan advised that commuters who were unwell should avoid packed places, or wear a mask.
Two threads were observed on HardwareZone Forum regarding the disruption of train service on the North-East Line. luei74 mentioned that the train travelling to Punggol and HarbourFront stopped at around 5:57 p.m. for about eight minutes. While mryang stated that there was a power trip at the same MRT line. In a later post, mryang said that the power trip occurred between Serangoon and Kovan Stations. Several netizens pointed out that delays of less than 30 minutes were not considered as disruptions. Others stated that it would be better to buy a car because public transport was unreliable. Slytherine claimed that s/he heard a loud sound. EdenHazard asked others not to spread fear among commuters and stated that the trains were running smoothly.
(buses[IN]gapore!) reported that commuters waiting for bus service 969 refused to queue at the berth at Tampines Bus Interchange, denying other passengers in the queue a chance to board. (buses[IN]gapore!) said in the post that the netizen who shared his/her encounter at Tampines Bus Interchange said a notice was put up after SMRT was notified thrice through feedback, but it did not work. The netizen urged passengers to be gracious. Chua ZT suggested relocating the berth for service 969. Mohamed Fauzan stated that if the area was cordoned off, it might prevent others from jumping the queue. Is Ming said that there should be an SMRT staff at the berth to prevent people from jumping the queue.
?Wei Da commended the bus captains of services 980 (SMB100E) and 169 (SMB1612M) for their initiative to chop and remove the fallen tree branches that was obstructing the road, so that buses and other vehicles could pass.
?May Yap? asked SMRT to stop renting food stalls at MRT stations as she has noticed an increasing number of people eating and drinking inside the trains and on the platforms.
Charmaine Chong Jie Ying wrote about the kind cabby who went the extra mile by taking her to Woodlands bus interchange to retrieve the laptop she left at bus service 972, and back home despite having to change shift at Bedok. The netizen said that she was told to collect her belongings at Bukit Panjang bus interchange but was not aware that it had relocated to Woodlands. Phee Yon Chen, the taxi driver offered to drive her to Woodlands and even accompanied her to the office. The driver also gave the netizen a S$10 discount on her ride.
?Diana Teng? mentioned that there were breastfeeding rooms at Taiwan train stations and hoped that SMRT could be as advanced and baby friendly as Taiwans train system. The netizen said that the Singapore Government encourages childbirth but nothing much was done to facilitate baby feeding.
?Minghui Ming? shared a video showing SMRT taxi with plate number SHD6238B emitting black smoke. The netizen urged SMRT to conduct checks on it.
gingerlyn found it strange that the police had never arrested any SMRT staff for criminal negligence in the death of two of its staff. The netizen asked if SMRT was exempted from the criminal negligence law. kukubird59 mentioned that for industrial accidents, the investigations would be carried out by investigators from the Occupational Safety and Health Division under the Ministry of Manpower, which could take some time. S/he added that SMRT and the responsible supervisors would likely be charged in court should they be found negligent.
Netizens continued to discuss Go-Aheads "short-term sub-contracting arrangements" with SBS Transit and SMRT Buses whereby the two operators would loan the British firm their drivers after fewer than 20 bus captains had left because of "the steep learning curve" of Go-Aheads interlining model. Several netizens stated that Go-Ahead should understand what it takes to hire and retain talents in Singapore. Others believed that there were some issues with the management that was the reason why some bus captains had resigned. KiatKuan ng at suggested providing a GPS navigator to help the bus captains with their routes.
?Melvin See reported waiting for bus service 811 at Yishun Temporary Bus Interchange for 45 minutes.? The netizen also mentioned that the queue was quite long because of the delayed arrival of the bus.
LTA has amended the Tamil names of four more Downtown Line stations after it was discovered that one of them had an inaccurate Tamil translation.Changes have been made to the translations for Promenade, Downtown, Telok Ayer and Cashew for "better clarity and more accurate pronunciations. Dr K Shanmugam, head of the Tamil Programme at SIM University, said that because many names of MRT stations were proper nouns there was no way one could translate the literal meaning.Dr A Ra Sivakumaran, a language specialist, said that the enunciation was now clearer and sounded more like how it was pronounced in English. Several netizens stated that LTA should have consulted the public for the translations. Patrick Ng suggested using either Kebun Bunga or Botanic Gardens instead of the station having two names as it might confuse commuters. Liang Xuan asked why there were no Bahasa names for the stations. Srini Vasan thanked LTA for the amendments. May Ong mentioned that it took LTA two rounds to build and rebuild the staircase before finally having an elderly friendly design.
Hayden Ng reported that water was leaking inside train cabin 2514. Bryan Tan assumed that the air-conditioner pump had a leak. Ed Rowan Lee mentioned that while there was a leak at cabin 2514, the cabin he boarded seemed like a sauna room.
Stephen Sturrock Peters? stated that he was the person who called 999 about burning rubber smell at Raffles Place MRT station on Jan 29. The netizen mentioned informing the Station Manager about the issue as it might be a potential fire hazard. The Station Manager, however, said that the smell was coming from the escalator and that it was already under control. Nevertheless, the netizen still called the emergency number 999 after seeing many people cough due to the smell of burning rubber. He commended the Singapore Civil Defence Force for their quick response. Thomas Daniel said that the netizen did the right thing.
R_G_Baker described Singapores trains as super clean, punctual and has comparatively cheap fares. S/he stated that the trains arrived at regular intervals and that signs at the stations were very clear and easy to follow. The netizen mentioned that having lived in Auckland for many years, it was a great change from its non-existent train service and terrible public transport. S/he also hoped that every big city would have a similar transport service like Singapores.
The DTL2 saw its first serious disruption on May 3, four months after it started operations.Tammy Tan, SBS Transit Senior Vice President of Group Corporate Communications, said train services between Bukit Panjang and Sixth Avenue Stations on the DTL were disrupted for about 30 minutes due to a train fault at the Beauty World Station. She said that the trains emergency brakes had been applied and could not be reset, preventing it from moving out of the station. Engineers worked to remove the faulty train from the line to enable service to resume. Some netizens wondered how a new line could have issues. Tan Kwong Moh said that it was shameful that even the new MRT line had problems.
?Matthias Ngan? shared a video of a bus with plate number SMB3099G (service 811) which was unable to pick up passengers at several bus stops because there was no more room for more passengers.The netizen stated that a bendy bus was supposed to be deployed for the route to accommodate the high volume of passengers but only regular bus was deployed.The netizen noticed that two bendy buses were deployed for bus service 811A but only a few bendy buses were deployed for the full route.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about the electronic sensors installed at the top of the entrance and exit doors in most of the companys buses. The electronic sensors prevent doors from closing when passengers were detected standing too near to the doors. This ensures passengers safety when they board and exit the bus. Heng Dylan said that the bus doors were still able to close even when people were standing near the bus doors. Gavin Lim claimed that the entrance sensors were only applicable on Citaro buses.
?Several netizens posted about the warm train cabins on SMRT Facebook page and hoped that SMRT would rectify the issue. Jie SiKe? said that it felt like they were inside an oven when riding the MRT.
On January 28, 2013, Azlin Amran fell into a gap of a descending escalator undergoing maintenance at Tanah Merah MRT station as she was rushing to meet her friend at Paya Lebar. She was unable to move or breathe after she fell. It took 30 minutes before someone heard her soft cries. The accident had fractured her pelvis and severed the nerves in her spinal cord. She is now wheelchair-bound. Azlin had to get over her fear of escalators and taking the train. Now, with proper training on the wheelchair, Azlin could travel on her own. She was also able to play badminton again and was sent by the Singapore Disability Sports Council to Taiwan for training. Many netizens praised Azlin for her determination and being an inspiration to others. Cheryl Li wondered how Azlin could take the escalator when she is wheelchair bound.
A track fault caused a delay in train services along the East-West Line during the evening rush hour on Feb 16. SMRT advised commuters through a tweet of an additional travelling time of 15 minutes from Tanjong Pagar to Aljunied MRT stations, in the direction of Pasir Ris. Several netizens expressed frustration that the MRT had broken down again. Some asked why there were no news stories about the breakdown. A few said that breakdowns were not considered as news anymore. ThoseWereTheDays asked if Minister Khaw Boon Wan had been present in any MRT or bus failures.
?Tam ZH? mentioned that the waiting time for service 852 during peak hours was 19 minutes. The netizen stated that SMRT has a problem with planning bus timings. He also questioned how much traffic could be encountered from the bus interchange to Northpoint which has a distance of less than one kilometre. Yi JF stated with sarcasm that SMRT was lucky that its bus services were affected by unforeseen factors every time.
?Muhammad Sir'an ?asked with sarcasm if SMRT was trying to set a world record for having a dysfunctional bus schedule. The netizen reported waiting 20 minutes for service 811 again. He added that he had been sending e-mails to SMRT since 2015 regarding the issue .
An impassioned citizen, Buskaran Traineran, wrote an appeal to Singaporeans to stop passing judgement on the Land Transport Authority.The netizen stated that Singaporeans were not an appreciative lot and all they do was complain, particularly during train breakdowns.Buskaran asked if commuters had noticed and appreciated the simple things that were implemented on bus and MRT stations such as the charging ports on train stations, USB ports on new buses, Wi-Fi connections at train platforms, and fans at bus stops. Jason Tan mentioned that improvements that were implemented were not free of charge because commuters eventually would pay for them. The netizen also pointed out that the said improvements were not essential and would rather have reliable train services and punctual bus systems. Ming Chuen said that Singapores trains and bus systems were acceptable. Tan Albert stated that occasional breakdowns were acceptable but it happened too frequently in Singapore. Tito Hsiao wondered why the Hong Kong MTR was also crowded but rarely experience any breakdown. Thomas NG Han Meng suggested hiring the Changi Airport Group management to take over the rail operations as their planning has shown to be steps ahead.
Yuhui BeeCee? reported that the speakers on train car 8063 at the Circle Line were faulty so there were no in-train announcements.
?Kai Cheong? reported a reckless bus captain of service 190 (TIBS1062Y). The netizen mentioned that the bus captain had been stepping on the brakes abruptly, causing passengers to lose their balance. The bus captain was also speeding when turning at sharp corners.The netizen asked SMRT to take immediate actions to make sure the driver was able to drive safely and courteously before being assigned back to driving duties.
?Linawaty Gosali was onboard bus service 857 travelling from the bus stop at Boon Keng MRT towards Khatib MRT station when she noticed a group of about 5 to 6 Chinese nationals boarding the bus through the rear door without tapping their EZ-Link cards. The netizen mentioned that because of the crowd, the bus captain had asked passengers to board at the rear door. The bus captain, however, did not remind the group of Chinese nationals to tap their EZ-Link cards. The netizen mentioned that there should be an SMRT staff to monitor passengers boarding through the rear door to ensure that all passengers pay their fare.
Tisha Tiu Gonzales? commended the bus captain of service 173 (SMB3048) for offering his assistance in boarding the bus. The netizen mentioned having difficulty carrying her two two-year-old child and a trolley. She also praised the driver for greeting the passengers.
Ajib Rostam? and Jemima Chan praised SMRT bus captains of service 965 and 700, respectively.Ajib Rostam? said that Bus Captain Vasantan was very polite and had consistently greeted every passenger boarding the bus at every bus stop.Meanwhile, Jemima Chan said that Bus Captain Murukan patiently waited for her as she ran to catch the bus.
Stephanie Ng? asked SMRT to improve the arrival frequency of service 859 because commuters had to wait up to 30 minutes for the bus. The netizen mentioned that four service 952 buses have already arrived at Admiralty before one service 850 appeared.Stephanie Ng? added that one of her neighbours observed bunching of three 859 buses between 7:30 to 7:45 a.m. The netizen hoped SMRT would take action on the issue.
?Mark Nathan reported seeing a duffle bag that was left on one of the benches at City Hall MRT Station for a whole 10 minutes. The netizen asked what was the point of having CCTVs and staff sitting in a control room when they could not even spot the bag.He mentioned that no one would have noticed the bag until he reported the matter.
In his first public comment since news broke last week that 26 China-made SMRT trains were found to have hairline cracks, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said the cracks were a routine matter that had been mis-spun into a controversy. He said during a media briefing at Bishan Depot on July 12 that had the hairline cracks found on the trains compromised safety or service availability, the authorities would have released the information immediately. During the same briefing, LTA Deputy Chief Executive Chua Chong Kheng said that 95% of the cracks were less than 30cm, while two bolsters were found with 40 to 50cm cracks. These train cars were among the earliest to be sent back to China. LTA also noted that the cracks found on the train had no relation to any train delays longer than five minutes. Most netizens disagreed with Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement that the news about the cracks could have caused undue panic to the public if it was explained earlier instead of waiting for a foreign report to break the news. Several netizens stated that the defective trains and its return to the manufacturer would not cause panic to the public but the fact that the Government did not disclose about the matter did. Others were still concerned about the safety of the train system. Some said that the Governments tender system should be reviewed. Several still wondered why the LTA and SMRT continued to purchase trains from the same manufacturer after finding out about the defects on most of the trains delivered. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox said that there should be no issue since the defective trains were sent back for repair. Debbie Loo mentioned the fact that SMRT sent back the defective trains showed that the SMRT engineers were doing their inspection and monitoring the situation. Arthur Lim stated that the public should be thankful that the cracks had been detected and sent back to the manufacturer for repairs. The netizen added that there is no need to have a public enquiry on everything, and believes that the actions by SMRT and the relevant ministries are reassuring enough.
On Facebook, Fabrications About The PAP shared a Facebook post by netizen Charmaine Yxy about an incident inside an MRT train where a male passenger fainted.Fellow passengers near the male passenger were able to grab him before he hit the floor and the crowd near him fanned out to give him air. Several passengers also vacated their seats to let the man rest. Another passenger pressed the emergency button and talked to a staff on the intercom. As the train halted at the station, the station staff arrived within minutes. The staff supported the passenger out of the train, released the emergency button and the train continued its journey.Charmaine Yxy mentioned that the incident happened in minutes and help came so smoothly that no one in the other carriages were even aware of what happened.The netizen was grateful and touched by the kindness and responsiveness of strangers in the peak hour traffic, and the efficiency of the train staff who appeared like magic out of nowhere, attended to the man and had the train moving. Most netizens praised the warm-heartedness and alertness of the people who helped the male passenger.
?Kelvin Ozaki? stated that the overcrowding issue on service 975 was still unresolved. The netizen hoped that SMRT would take action as soon as possible. Sammat Sam asked SMRT to deploy double-decker buses during peak hours.
Paul Chan Poh Hoi agreed that the senior management of SMRT must act promptly to improve safety standards for its rail operation. He stated that the accident on the tracks on Mar 22 was not a freak occurrence but a visible sign of the companys lack of focus on safety and operational standards.The netizen did not believe that the number of MRT service disruptions recently were caused simply by "ageing infrastructure", considering how significantly older metro systems in cities such as Hong Kong and Tokyo have continued to operate with superior reliability.Paul Chan Poh Hoi stated that it was completely inappropriate to cut corners or otherwise skimp on regular maintenance and safety measures.
?Suharti Surani? reported that the train travelling towards Marina South Pier was delayed at Braddell MRT station on August 13 for five minutes and there were no announcements made.
?Quek Chin Ching? was displeased with the bus captain of service 913E for asking him and a few other passengers to get down the bus as it would be stopping at Woodland interchange. The bus captain informed him not take the bus with an E on the service number.The netizen, however, had the understanding that service 913E would terminate at the Woodlands bus interchange after completing the West Loop. He added that he had no issues with other bus captains, except this particular captain. Izzul Haziq explained that E meant that it would terminate at the interchange and that the bus was not a separate service.
A month after it officially began bus services in Singapore, UK-based operator Tower Transit said it has been a very good first month, but theres always room for improvement.The operator currently runs buses under a new headway model, regulated by the Bus Operators Control Centre at the Bulim depot, where there was a fixed distance between each bus. It said the aim was to avoid bus bunching and give passengers more "consistent waits".Despite the system, the operator said it has received a range of feedback from commuters: Some have praised the operator for regular bus services and friendly service, but others have said they encountered slow-moving buses and long wait times. Several netizens wondered why SBS Transit and SMRT did not have the new headway model similar to the one used by Tower Transit. Others observed that Tower Transit buses were either slow as tortoises or were as fast as F1 race cars. Peter Tan mentioned that bus bunching usually happens during traffic congestion. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox disagreed that the best way to "solve" bus reliability and headways was to move slowly and add standby buses in between.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament and Executive Secretary of the National Transport Workers Union (NTWU) Melvin Yong shared photos taken during the first staff engagement session for NTWU union leaders on the New Rail Financing Framework (NRFF) and Temasek's offer to buy out SMRT. Mr Gerard Koh, SMRT Vice President for Human Resources, explained what the NRFF and Temasek's offer meant to the company and addressed the union leaders' queries. He also reiterated the management's assurance that no staff would lose their job due to the NRFF or the privatisation of SMRT.
bigsale shared photos of newspaper reports about several Tower Transit bus drivers who were unhappy over their working hours and shift rotation. It was stated that more than five drivers went on medical leave at the same time because of the issue. dxter said that the bus captains were too pampered. wsohplvr suggested that Tower Transit investigate those who took medical leave to find out if they were really sick.
Uber, the app-based private car hire service, has started a trial to allow cash payments for its rides, making Singapore the first developed city it is launching the trial in.Citing figures from a MasterCard global report, Uber said that its move to introduce cash payment was mainly because cash transactions still make up 31% of all transactions in Singapore, although credit cards were common.Uber added that it also hopes that the cash option would remove the fear factor for riders concerned about using their credit cards. Several netizens wondered why some people would like to pay with cash. AristDing assumed that the main point Uber wanted to express was that it prides itself as being more reliable than cabs. Lim Zhenghong mentioned that Uber would soon offer a family plan that would allow one person to foot the bill for up to 10 other riders of their choice.
A photo album of the move of the old Woodlands Regional Bus Interchange (WRI), as it prepared for its move to the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange was compiled by TODAYs photojournalist. Included is the journey on the last SMRT bus Service 900 from the WRI where over 150 bus fans journeyed with SMRT Chief Bus Captain Krishnanraw to mark the closing of the WRI.Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure and Minister of Transport Khaw Boon Wan was at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange on Mar 12 for its first day of operations. He was accompanied by Members of Parliament from the Sembawang and Marsiling-Yew Tee Group Representation Constituencies, including Acting Education Minister Ong Ye Kung, Parliament Speaker Madam Halimah Yacob, and Parliamentary Secretary for Home Affairs Amrin Amin. The Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange comes with a host of features, including free electric buggy services for those who need help getting around to cameras informing staff of how long queues were so as to deploy more buses. There were also Braille guidance on handrails for the visually impaired to locate waiting areas and wheelchair ramps which link the interchange to the MRT station. A SMART bus guidance system also displays information on large digital boards so that bus captains returning to the interchange could see which alighting berths and parking bays were available. Several netizens observed that the temporary bus interchange was not elderly-friendly because there were no escalators and commuters had to walk long distances to reach the berths. Some were glad with the new features at the temporary bus interchange. PTWeb Singapore asked SMRT to refill the racks with brochures regularly similar to SBS Transit. The brochure rack at Choa Chu Kang was always empty and the Bukit Batok service 173 schedule was not updated. The netizen also asked SMRT to put up more signs for intratown services because many people were boarding at the wrong berth. Edmund Low thanked SMRT for the special last bus departure from the Woodlands Regional Interchange.
Jomel Tan? shared a screenshot of his travel card transaction record wherein S$1.89 was deducted twice. The netizen also wondered why the entry showing the extra ride, which the netizen did not take, would suddenly disappear from the record the following day. The value in his card, however, remained unchanged.
KEVIN TAN ENG HWEE wrote that re-engineering of SMRT should start from the top, with SMRTs board of directors.The writer cited Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement in Parliament in January that rail reliability is an engineering problem (so) let our engineers solve it the engineers way. The writer claimed that less than half of the top SMRT officials have an engineering background, and while diversity on the board is valued, more engineers are clearly needed to have strategic resolutions to the increasing MRT breakdowns.The writer also mentioned that SMRT adopts an Economic Value Added (EVA) analysis in computing part of the chief executive officers annual remuneration. He added that SMRTs EVA is a deferred scheme of three years, which he believes is too short a time frame given SMRTs infrastructural nature. The writer stated that five years or even up to 10 years may be more appropriate.The writer also said that a clawback of bonuses paid to management could be used to fund transport schemes for less-privileged Singaporeans. Inom Chua believed that the breakdowns were caused by pure short-sightedness of top management who were more concerned on making profits than ensuring cheap and efficient public transport.
Josephine Teo, Senior Minister of State, together with Member of Parliament Melvin Yong, and some members of the National Transport Workers' Union, visited Kranji Depot early on Feb 8 to thank SMRT staff and wish them a happy Chinese New Year.Minister Teo said that at 4:30 a.m. the SMRT bus captains, engineering team and their management were already up and about, getting ready for the first passenger trip. Many netizens were thankful for the hard work and sacrifice of the SMRT staff. Others thanked Minister Josephine Teo for visiting the ground staff.
On Facebook, a two-year SMRT bus captain stated that although he liked his job, it was very tiring mentally.
?Wang Chiew Hui? expressed gratitude to the bus captain of SMRT service 851 (SMB8014T) for being friendly and considerate to his passengers. The netizen said that the bus captains attitude was very impressive.
By 2024, Singapore would have the worlds first four-in-one rail and bus depot that integrates three train depots and one bus depot within a single site, with the construction of the East Coast Integrated Depot. The integrated depot would house around 220 trains and 550 buses, while saving up to 44 hectares of land in land-scarce Singapore. The contract to build a four-in-one rail and bus depot has been awarded to Korea-based GS Engineering & Construction Corporation for around S$1.99B. The three train depots in the facility would be stacked one on top of the other, with a bus depot built next to them. The depot to serve the Downtown Line would be built underground, the Thomson-East Coast Line depot on the road level, and the East-West Line depot on top of it. Kok Chwee Sim stated that the four-in-one depot was a very efficient use of limited land. Roland Yeo could just imagine the logistics and electricity bill for the four-in-one rail and bus depot. Bin Hao wondered why the Changi Depot would be demolished when it could be used to store trains. Dante Yuxuan could not wait to find out which operator would be awarded the contract for the Thomson-East Coast MRT Line. Goh Poh Guan hoped that SBS Transit would get to operate the Thomson-East Coast MRT Line. Jan Janny Janatan asked whether the area around Ikea in Pasir Ris would have an MRT soon.
The Public Transport Council (PTC) announced that taxi passengers who do not pay their fares would face higher fines starting May 9. Taxi fare evaders would face a fine of S$200 for the first offence and S$400 for the second offence on top of the restitution payment for the unpaid fare. The council added that repeat offenders who commit three or more offences and those who do not make a restitution payment for the unpaid fare would be prosecuted in court.Some taxi drivers, however, told Channel NewsAsia that more could be done to improve driver welfare. Drivers suggested that having inward-facing cameras inside taxis could help protect them from unfavourable incidents. Another taxi driver added that speeding up the usual lengthy administrative processes of reporting fare evaders could better assist taxi drivers. Several netizens stated that taxi fare evaders should have higher penalties and jail terms. Many taxi drivers approved of having inward-facing cameras for their protection. Several commuters raised concern on privacy issues should cameras be installed inside taxis. Some pointed out that if CCTV cameras could be installed in lifts, trains, buses, and almost everywhere, it should be allowed in taxis as well. Others mentioned that many fare evading cases were unreported because of the long process of investigations. Some suggested that taxi drivers who cheat their passengers should be penalised as well. Kian Seng Ong stated that installing an inward-recording camera in all taxis was already overdue. Privacy would not be an issue if the cameras were owned and managed by the taxi companies, and could only be viewed and operated by them for investigative purposes. Profatsir Chan believed that the new penalties were useless because fare evaders were still able to run.
Parliamentary Secretary for Home Affairs Amrin Amin observed police officers from the Public Transport Security Command (TransCom) on their tour of duty at Boon Keng MRT Station on Feb 25 and was very inspired by the determination as well as professionalism of the police officers.TransCom, a specialist unit of the Singapore Police Force, was established to oversee and manage policing efforts throughout Singapore's public land transport network of buses and trains. TransCom officers attend to crime and security incidents in the network, and were deployed to maintain safety and security when exceptionally large crowds are expected near MRT stations and bus interchanges.MP Amrin also addressed the strain of limited manpower saying that even though there were trained officers patrolling the transport network every day, security is a shared effort and commuters have an important part to play as well. Several netizens wondered whether the young patrol officers were capable of countering terrorists. Some appreciated the presence of TransCom officers at MRT and bus stations Alvin Tan said that deploying troops on trains was useless when the officers hardly patrol or survey the cabins, claiming that they merely chat among themselves. Lee Huang Yang Albert believed that SMRT and the Singapore Police Force need to re-think their operation and deployment strategy. The netizen said that the best method was to pre-empt terrorists and that the first line of defence were the entry points at all MRT stations. Those with big bags should have a special lane for screening similar to that in airports. Boon Meng Lee asked why the officers must walk in groups of four and walk closely together.
Trains services between Marina Bay and Marina South Pier were delayed for 20 minutes due to a train fault near Marina Bay on July 26. Free bus services were made available for affected commuters.Delays were also reported on July 25 between Tanah Merah and Pasir Ris MRT stations and between Tanah Merah and Changi Airport due to sleeper replacement works. Billionaire was disappointed with the frequent delays and disruptions. walaneh considered the delays and disruptions as the new norm.
Filian Lee shared his experience riding bus service 913 driven by a courteous SMRT bus captain at Woodlands Regional Interchange. The netizen was glad to see a bus captain that did his job with pride, and even greets every single passenger who boarded the bus. Many netizens also mentioned experiencing the bus captain's extraordinary customer service. Another netizen, Tan Wen Bin Wilson, shared a selfie that he had taken with the bus captain. Most netizens shared their experiences with bus captain Krishna Rao, with some saying that he was the most courteous bus captain they had encountered. Others thanked the bus captain for his excellent service.
Josephine Teo, Senior Minister of State for Transport, announced yesterday (23 June) that the free early morning MRT rides in the city area before 7:45 a.m. would be extended until Jun 20, 2017.Mrs Teo said that about 65,000 commuters benefit from the Free Pre-Peak Travel scheme daily, resulting in a 7% reduction in the number of commuters during the morning peak period since the scheme was launched.The scheme was part of the overall Travel Smart Network, where the Government provided funds to organisations which encouraged their staff to travel during off-peak hours and use alternative forms of transportation, such as walking and cycling, to get to work.Mrs Teo also cited companies that have encouraged their staff to adopt a healthy lifestyle and switch to off-peak travel. Among them were Santa Fe Relocation Services which installed shower facilities with personal lockers in their office for their employees and Allianz which breakfast vouchers to encourage staff to reach the office before 8 a.m. Many netizens hoped that the free pre-peak rides would be offered to more or all MRT stations. Several were happy to hear about the extension, saying that they had benefited from the scheme. Others hoped that the scheme would be made permanent. Some stated that they do not need free rides but fast and reliable service and uncongested trains. A few wondered whether the scheme really alleviated overcrowding during peak hours. Others hoped that more employers would adjust their office hours so that more commuters would be encouraged to travel early.
The National Taxi Association (NTA) saw 2,090 new members between 30 and 40 years old in 2014, compared to just 350 of them four years before, as more younger drivers were joining the industry. Ang Hin Kee, NTA's Executive Adviser said that there was a need to replace the ageing workforce among the taxi driver pool to prevent the pipeline from getting closed. He also mentioned that more young people think driving a taxi is a "viable way to make a living". The NTAs Executive Adviser, however, stated that there was also the concern that younger cabbies were clocking 15 to 16-hour shifts, just because they can, resulting in lack of rest. BACP Singapore said that it was quite a loss for the nation to have a trained professional who spent 12 years with the Singapore Armed Forces to become a taxi driver. Travis Lin mentioned that drivers could earn more with Uber and Grab because car rental was only around S$60 compared with the S$130 rental with taxi companies. Shawn Shawket said that young taxi drivers were earning 50% more than the old timers because of mobile apps like Grab, Uber and Hailo. Tay Stephen mentioned that driving a taxi was a 365-day job without sick leave entitlement. Osman Hussain believed that the article was just an advertisement by taxi companies to attract more people to apply and drive taxis. Simon Lim said that young men should do something better for their families and themselves during their prime and just drive a taxi 20 years later. Winson Kang stated that Singaporeans were trained to become taxi drivers because that was the only option for them after age 30 if they had not planned something for their future.
lobo76 shared a link to a letter published on The Straits Times - Forum Letters on Jan 14 suggesting that hoverboards should not be allowed on MRT trains and buses because its batteries could explode and catch fire. The netizen quipped that iPhones should also be banned on trains and buses as an iPhone also caught fire before.
?On SMRT Facebook page, several comments were observed regarding the air-conditioning on trains. Gabriel Swee? asked SMRT to turn on its air-conditioning as it was very hot during the afternoons and evenings. The netizen also asked SMRT to have its 4G transmitters fixed especially at Raffles Place and City Hall stations. Kelly Lau said that SMRT should spend its revenue on improving the train air-conditioning system rather than spending on things such as commemorative fridge magnets. Christopher Sng? stated that SMRT was again scrimping on the train air-conditioning system. Syed M Daniel explained that there were a number of factors that could affect the temperature inside the train such as the opening of doors at each station allowing warm air inside the train, the temperature outside during mid-morning up to early evening and the number of people inside the train. He also mentioned that train captains could not change the thermostat temperature as it was already set to a desired temperature decided upon by SMRT.
At the onset of the new rail financing framework, the majority shareholders of Temasek aggressively campaigned to fully takeover transportation giant SMRT to focus on improving its services.According to a report by UOB Kay Hian Holdings, however, if the takeover offer fails, Temasek would not be able to acquire any shares of SMRT soon.UOB Kay Hian stated that from their understanding of Rule 34 of the Singapore Code on Takeovers and Mergers administered by the Securities Industry Council, in the event a take-over offer was unsuccessful, an offeror and its concert parties of a failed offer may not make an offer or acquire any shares of the offeree company within 12 months of the date on which the offer lapsed.
?Mary Lim? mentioned receiving two taxi vouchers which could be used to offset taxi fares. On Mar 14, however, an SMRT taxi driver refused to accept the vouchers. The netizen asked how could she use the vouchers instead. In a later post, Mary Lim said that she was unable to submit her contact details because she was unable to get the complete licence plate of the taxi.
Netizens continued to discuss the free WiFi service on two SMRT Service 176 buses. Several netizens stated that free Wi-Fi on buses had already been implemented in other countries ahead of Singapore. Saiful Anwar explained that Singapore has a 4G+ connected Wi-Fi module that is faster and better to use for more users to connect, while other countries only offer 3G services. LOL said that many commuters would miss their stops because everyone would be busy using their mobile devices. Jin Hahn mentioned that instead of solving transportation problems, the LTA spent money on things that would not improve the efficiency of public transport.
On Facebook, Edward Yeo posted about the reasons why commuters should choose Grab and Uber instead of the picky taxi drivers.The netizen stated that when taking traditional taxis:1. There was no cab from 11:45 p.m. to 12 a.m. but all taxi lights would suddenly turn green by midnight.2. Drivers were choosy over notes but would inform commuters that their credit card terminal was faulty.3. Drivers refuse to turn on the GPS.4. Commuters had to pay extra to book a taxi.5. 75% of taxi drivers were anti-government.6. Drivers take coffee breaks between 10 and 11:30 a.m.7. Drivers would not pick up passengers going to Tuas at 7 p.m. Several netizens agreed with the contributor. Muhammad Fuad Kamroden wondered how much Uber and Grab paid the contributor to badmouth taxi drivers. TY Tang said that taxi drivers who were selective and choosy should have their licences revoked immediately.
On Facebook, the National Solidarity Party (NSP) stated that the latest announcement that LTA would take over the MRT assets from SMRT was a vindication of the NSPs disapproval of privatised public services. It was mentioned that the NSP has always believed that essential public services such as transportation should never be sacrificed at the altar of corporate profits.
Netizens continued to discuss about the free magnets in the Paving the way for better journeys information packs distributed by SMRT to homes located along the East-West Line. Several netizens stated that they did not have much use for the free magnets and that it was a waste of money. Cloud_Evolution stated that SMRT did not use taxpayers money for the free magnets but its own revenue. Poomer stated that the free magnets was a way for the Government to distract the public from the problems at hand.
In an article at Goody Feed, it was mentioned that on the North-South Line MRT Map, there was no NS6 after NS5 (Yew Tee MRT Station) and skipped directly to NS7 (Kranji). It was revealed that NS6 (Sungei Kadut MRT Station) was apparently planned between the said two stations but was omitted from the plan since the area was comprised mainly of factories. The station would only be built if population there requires it. "Keith Lim asked about the missing station number at the North-East Line. The netizen said that after NE1 (HarbourFront Station) was already the NE3 (Outram Station).
SMRT Commercial has launched WINK+, a loyalty app in Singapore that rewards commuters who ride and scan on WINK+ icons.Customers would need to download the app, ride SMRT or scan WINK+ QR codes at SMRT Media OOH spaces and earn WINK+ points to redeem rewards at participating retailers and partners.Dawn Low, SMRT Commercials Managing Director, said: For the first time, retailers as well as OOH and digital advertisers in the SMRT network can integrate their offline and online campaigns with real-time ROI tracking, and soon, analytics.SMRT Commercial has engaged Po and Mei Mei from the upcoming movie Kung Fu Panda 3 to launch WINK+. Po and Mei Mei would be making special appearances in the SMRT Media network and selected partners sites to get consumers to grab WINK+.
Many questions have been raised about the recent accident on the MRT tracks that killed two SMRT trainees, the most pertinent of which was: Why were trains functioning as normal during such on-the-job training where newbies are made to go down to the tracks?A source sent a screengrab of a chat group message to Redwire, alleging that the accident occurred because of a failure to communicate. Allegedly, the train driver and SMRTs Operations Control Centre (OCC) were unaware that there were workers on the track because they were not informed. Redwire was unable to vouch for the accuracy of the account. Many netizens asked SMRT to shed light on how the accident actually happened. Several wondered how the two were hit by the train when they were walking at the track walkway with their supervisor in front of them. Some speculated that SMRT would blame the incident to the two victims. Farzana Shariq Mujtaba said that allowing staff or workers to be on the track while the line was operating as per normal was a total violation of proper safety and to say that protocol has been followed was even more wrong. The netizen mentioned that no one should be placed in such a risk. Mike Yam Beng Hwa stated that the Transport Minister should be responsible for the death of the two trainees. TY Tang believed that both the management and maintenance department did not follow the standard operating procedures.
In response to a Malaysian news report claiming that several aspects of the Kuala Lumpur-Singapore High-Speed rail (HSR) joint project had been decided, the Ministry of Transport stated that both Singapore and Malaysia were still in discussion over the commercial and operating models of the HSR.A Ministry spokesman said the possibility of having two services for the HSR linking Singapore and Kuala Lumpur, one a non-stop express service, and the other a transit service calling at stations in between, were still being discussed. Many disapproved of having shared ownership of the HSR project with Malaysia. Some stated that security issues should be addressed properly. Others were surprised of the sudden increase in project cost from the proposed RM8B to the current RM70B. A few doubted that Singapore was ready for a more sophisticated technology because it had yet to resolve the issues with MRT and LRT lines. Some believed that only Malaysia would benefit from the project.
Another company, EthozCab, has joined the private car-hire bandwagon. EthozCab was launched by Ethoz Group, a leasing and financing company part-owned by Nissan and Subaru dealer Tan Chong International.Individuals could get a car from EthozCab to start ferrying fares at rental charges that start from S$50 a day, which was half the average rate of taxis. Hirers only need to be citizens or permanent residents, at least 21-years-old holding a Class 3 or 3A driving licence and registered under the Private Car for Hire with Operator classification.
Starting May 9, a S$3 surcharge will be imposed on each passenger when more than four adult passengers take ComfortDelGros MaxiCabs, a seven-seater limousine taxi.The fee, however, would not apply to flat-rate transfer services including bookings to go to the airport for $55, for example.Sources said the majority of its drivers had signed a petition requesting the levy, to cover the high daily rentals of over S$160.Since 2011, SMRT has levied a S$2 surcharge for every passenger exceeding four adults in its seven-seater Ssangyong and London taxis. It was reported in Straits Times that when asked if SMRT would follow the S$3 surcharge, SMRT Taxis General Manager Tony Heng said that SMRT reviews such surcharges from time to time, and will make revisions when necessary. Some MaxiCab drivers expressed concern that, after this surcharge, passengers may start to shun them. Several netizens questioned the purpose of hiring a MaxiCab if additional charges would be imposed on additional passengers. Tan CB said that cab companies have been overly protected by the Government to do what they want by continually raising flag down fares and imposing unreasonable surcharges that have never been adequate in solving the problem of "missing cabs. Jeriel Lim mentioned that taxi companies complained that Uber and Grab have been stealing their income, yet continue to introduce more surcharges.
?Victor Xie reported that train 117 at the Bukit Panjang LRT was having an air-conditioner malfunction.
A commuter travelling from Clementi to Outram Park on the East-West Line on Monday (July 18) evening posted a video online, saying that water was pouring from the roof of the train. According to the commuter, water was leaking from the air-con vent and continued throughout the entire journey, drenching many passengers in the train. A similar incident happened last July on the North-East Line. SMRT Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan said: "On Monday evening, our Operations Control Centre was alerted to a leak in the air conditioning system in a train travelling towards Pasir Ris. Our staff boarded the train at Commonwealth Station to check the leak, and a cleaner was quickly sent to clear up the water. The train was subsequently withdrawn from service. We apologise to affected commuters." Some were concerned about the safety of passengers should the water come in contact with electric circuits. A few asked if any passenger had pressed the emergency button to alert the train captain about the leak. A few netizens said that MRT trains need to undergo repair and overhaul. Tan Shi Wen suspected that the train air-conditioner had not been serviced for a long period.
In his latest blogpost, Tan Kin Lian said that SMRT should learn from Tokyo on how to improve its service. He stated that at the Yamanote Line, the name of the next station and which side the doors would open were announced in Japanese and English. In the MRT in Singapore, there is a voice announcement in English only of the next station but no announcement on which side the door will open. Tan said that he would often have to look at both sides of the train to decide on whether to move towards the left or the right side. He cited that in some trains, there are displays to tell which side the doors will open, but there are no such display on other trains.Tan Kin Lian hoped that the management would update the voice announcement to include the opening of the door. Chia Wei mentioned that in Taipei it was also announced which side of the door would open. Yan Gerek was uncertain if such an announcement would be introduced anytime soon.
?Gary Khun? boarded the southbound train from Bishan MRT Station and noticed that there was no air-conditioning at cabin number 3312.
?Jacqueline Bong? boarded the train with a friend at Segar LRT station along the Bukit Panjang LRT Line and was supposed to alight at Jelapang LRT station. The netizen was surprised that the train did not stop at Jelapang LRT station. Hence, the netizen pressed the emergency button but it did not work. Another male passenger picked up the emergency phone, intending to alert the control station on this issue, but there was no response too.The netizen mentioned that the train was travelling at a high speed, faster than usual, and had passed three stations without stopping. Jacqueline Bong? said that a female passenger had to use her mobile phone to call the control station before the train started to slow down. The train finally stopped before the platform near Phoenix LRT station. Passengers at Phoenix LRT station were concerned as there was another train ahead. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue particularly why the emergency button and phone in the train were not working. She also wondered how frequent SMRT checks the emergency button and phone to ensure that both are functioning normally.
On The Workers Party Facebook page, Member of Parliament Dennis Tan Lip Fong highlighted the troubling consistency of train disruptions. He stated that Singaporeans should not have to get used to the regularity of disruptions. He added that authorities should also be greatly concerned with the loss of productivity to all workers and the economy arising from the man-hours lost to all delays over the last few years.Gary Chan said that any Minister could bring up this matter but the question of how to fix it remains. Richard Low was concerned about losing his job because of being constantly late due to train breakdowns.
On Facebook, Go-Ahead Singapore reminded the public to catch the Loyang Bus Depot opening ceremony at the carnival on Jun 19. The opening would be officiated by Zainal Bin Sapari, Member of Parliament for Pasir Ris Punggol GRC and David Brown, Group Chief Executive of The Go-Ahead Group. Lim Kokhui stated that he wanted to join the Go-Ahead Singapore team.
In recent weeks, Japanese and Chinese government officials, together with their private-sector executives from the rail industry, have been lobbying the Malaysian government and key agencies overseeing the transport sector to push their respective agendas for the construction of the 350km Kuala Lumpur-Singapore High-Speed rail. This, despite the fact that Malaysia and Singapore have yet to iron out major elements that would shape the multibillion-dollar high-speed rail project.Executives from the East Japan Railway Company, better known as JR East, and officials from the Japanese Embassy in Kuala Lumpur met Malaysian Transport Ministry officials last month to press their case for a lead role in the rail project.China, on the other hand, has used more muscle, with Chinese Premier Li Keqiang writing a personal letter to Malaysian Prime Minister Najib Razak last month reiterating Beijing's commitment to their investments in Malaysia, which include property and infrastructure developments. He also stressed China's deep interest in securing the high-speed rail project.After being shelved temporarily due to budgetary concerns on the Malaysian side, the high-speed rail link proposal is back on track with the recent appointment of a team of consultants to establish broad parameters on the project for the consideration of the Malaysian and Singapore governments. Most netizens preferred Japan for the projects because of its dedication on this kind of project. Others stated that Chinas rail system quality was inferior to that of Japan. Vicky Li had apprehensions with the Japanese high-speed rail system as it has yet to be tested in tropical countries with high temperatures.
?Lim Guan Heng Bahamut? stated that train passengers seemed to be in a sauna environment while inside cabin 1510 because of a faulty air-conditioner. The netizen asked SMRT to check with the control staff at Toa Payoh Station to verify the number of feedback received regarding the matter.SMRT replied that the trains have thermostats that regulate the temperature in each train car and that external factors may result in hot air entering the vehicles.The netizen retorted that the trains thermostats might not be working properly.
The LTA has awarded the S$1.99B contract for the construction of the East Coast Integrated Depot, the worlds first four-in-one rail and bus depot, to Korea-based GS Engineering & Construction Corporation. The contract also includes construction of the depot's reception tunnels.The four-in-one depot would be stacking the train depots for the East-West Line, Downtown Line and Thomson-East Coast Line with a bus depot located next to them. The integrated depot can house around 220 trains and 550 buses. This land integration saves Singapore 44 hectares of land, or an area of approximately 60 football fields. Several netizens stated that most commuters would not care about the new depot because all they want was reliable and efficient transport services. Others said that the LTA should first resolve the causes of transport delays and disruptions. Sean Kevin wondered why LTA could award a S$2B contract to build a depot but would not spend S$2B to skirt the Cross Island Line around the nature reserve. Lee Kim Soon hoped that SMRT and other transport companies could invest to improve the safety and reliability of equipment and workers. Lester Chin said that some money should be devoted to safety training and in purchasing safety equipment in light of the fatal accident on the MRT tracks.
On his latest blogpost, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the ridership on the Downtown Line (DTL) increased by up to 30% since Jan 4, the first school and work day of the year. Some 5% of commuters on the East-West Line have shifted to the DTL resulting in slight reduction of crowding at stations like Jurong East. Even the buses plying the DTL2 corridor were less crowded.Minister Khaw hoped that the opening of DTL2 would be a game changer and encourage more motorists towards a car-lite lifestyle. Terence Choo stated that the DTL was a game changer for him and his family because now they have doorstep to doorstep connectivity to his office and his daughter's school. The netizen added that the trains were also very comfortable. Spawny Lee assumed that the ridership increased because the commuters had switched from their usual MRT lines and bus services and not because commuters gave up their cars. Cherlek Toh" said that ridership would further increase when the line extends northward beyond Bukit Panjang Station. Kilo Tami asked whether the DTL2 could be linked up to the Jurong region MRT Line in the future to provide an alternative rail line linking the central and western regions. The netizen said that the link would help cushion the impact if there would be another major breakdown on the East-West Line. Koo Hansen sad that those complaining about Singapores rail system had not experienced a public transport that was much worse.
?Giovanni Sebaste? sought SMRTs assistance in finding his tablet which he believed was left inside an SMRT Toyota Crown taxi he took from Lucky Plaza to 6 Balmoral Road.
(buses[IN]gapore!) stated that Volvo Diesel Hybrid buses would soon run several SBS Transit services. Several netizens asked why hybrid Volvo buses would again be introduced after it failed last year. Jerms Lin wondered why the hybrid buses did not work out in Singapore when it was already in use in North America and in London. (buses[IN]gapore!) said that the hybrid bus performance somehow could not work in Singapore or speculated that it might be due to cost.
Full-time national serviceman Xavier Lur spotted a sign at the Beauty World Station on the Downtown Line with a rule which states that "No person shall for the purpose of any trade or business transfer any article or goods between the paid area and unpaid area unless the article or goods is taken by a person through an automatic gate." The netizen said that he had been unaware of the rule and that this was the first time he had seen such a notice in an MRT station. This rule has been in place for decades, and is a Rapid Transit Systems Regulations prohibition against selling goods across the fare gate, but many commuters have not been aware. Tammy Tan, SBS Transits Senior Vice President of Corporate Communications, explained that "for commuter safety and security, we do not encourage loitering in our premises particularly at stations with high passenger flow. Ms Tan added that the notice has been put up at the Beauty World Station as the company has noticed increasing numbers of commuters loitering to conduct what appears to be transactions in its premises. LTA explained that the rule existed to discourage people from using public transportation for commercial goods delivery, since bus and train services were meant for carrying passengers. SMRT declined to comment about the said rule. Many netizens wondered why train operators had to implement such a rule, as it has not affected the safety of commuters. Several believed that the rule was implemented so people had to exit and tap again, which meant more profit for the operators. Others stated that insurance agents and other sales people should also be banned in all MRT stations as they obstruct passenger flow. Some mentioned that transport operators should focus on providing reliable and efficient service rather than imposing such rules. Ke Yi Yong explained that the rule was solely for security purposes. Otherwise, drugs, illegal or dangerous items could be transferred from one location or person to another. Ong Qizong mentioned that passing goods over the gantry was also common in Hong Kong.
?Jasmine Mwl? said that she was waiting for the train at Bishan MRT station towards Braddell station with her family on June 18, between 9.20pm to 9.25pm.When the train arrived, the netizen and her husband, who was holding their seven-month-old baby, waited for their turn to board the train while passengers alighted. Shortly after about 30 seconds as her husband was boarding, the train doors closed immediately after the closing door alarm was sounded. The netizen raised concern that her husband and other commuters such as the elderly or those with disabilities could have been hit or crushed by the doors if they were not fast enough. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the matter.
Jeffrey Lim? reported that someone had torn off the paper covering the MacPherson DTL Station name on the Dynamic Route Map Display of carriage C803C (set 845; car number 3). Dante Yuxuan said that the door code and train car number should be indicated when reporting to SMRT.
SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek said on Mar 22 that SMRT would investigate exactly how the two trainees got hit by the train when there was a clear line of sight and a supervisor in charge.Mr Kuek mentioned that it was a routine activity for staff to walk on the walkways beside the tracks a few times a month to carry out maintenance during service hours. Many netizens stated that if the staff had followed the standard safety procedure while on the track, the accident could have been avoided. Boiyus Da Chillout wondered what the coordinator at the control room was doing at that time of the accident.
SMRT taxi partner Christopher Maria Dass was featured as a driver who not only ferries his passengers to their destination safely, but also shows care and concern for them. SMRT mentioned that one rainy day, an elderly couple boarded Christophers taxi with their grocery bags. Christopher helped them load the items into the boot even though it was drizzling and also helped them unload and carry their bags to a sheltered area, getting himself drenched in the process. Danish Mohamed" praised Christopher Maria Dass for being a superhero cabby.
In response to Seow Joo Hengs letter to The Straits Times suggesting the installation of metal detector gates at MRT stations, writer Seah Yam Meng stated that the implementation of such a measure would cause too much disruption and inconvenience to commuters. The netizen said that such a drastic measure might unnecessarily affect the quality of life in Singapore where people would live in constant anxiety and fear. She stated that a small country like Singapore should spend more effort in beefing up security at the airport, borders and checkpoints to ensure that no harmful elements cross the borders. Internally, the authorities should boost intelligence to ensure that those with ill intentions would be stopped before they could cause any harm.The netizen believes that the Home Team has been doing a wonderful job in ensuring safety and security. Several netizens stated that having metal detectors or security checks at MRT stations would further slow down what was already a congested flow of people. Some cited that in China, x-ray scanners were installed and soldiers deployed to the railway stations after an incident of a terror attack, which caused long queues during peak hours. Others assumed that Singapore would only increase security measures after a terror attack. blackestvoid mentioned that terrorists nowadays use plastic or liquid explosives which could not be detected by metal detectors.
Hiday St Cloud shared a post from Oh! Media Facebook Page regarding proper commuter behaviour on public transport. The netizen said that SMRT should consider them for their next campaign.
The LTA introduced a new division, the Bus Transition Management Division, that would ensure a smooth handover of buses and services from incumbent operators to new players. Anglo-Australian firm Tower Transit, one of two new players, would take over some bus routes from incumbents SMRT and SBS Transit as early as May, but the exact date has not been announced. The new LTA unit has to work quickly on the night of the handover as it has only a window of about five hours, from the moment the first bus that has completed its service pulls into the depot until the start of the next day's service. The new division has been working with Tower Transit to make sure that its bus captains have the required vocational licences and were competent in operating the systems on the buses. Mark Davies wondered if SBS and SMRT would cease to exist if all the bus routes eventually go to new players. Andrew Singh mentioned that the LTA should ensure the smooth transition because commuters only know how to complain.
Netizens continued to discuss the departures of several senior management officials from the Singapore Sports Hub (SHPL), following a first wave of resignations back in December.Several former SHPL staff, who spoke on condition of anonymity, claimed that the departures were not unexpected given the low morale among their colleagues caused by the lack of communication and actions by the companys leadership. They also mentioned that since the new CEO came on board, relationships between the consortium partners have not been very strong. Several netizens believed that the issue was caused by poor management. Others said that the Government should not have allowed the demolition of the old stadium. Curio WS wondered whether the Government would take over the management of the Sports Hub in the event that the project went bankrupt. Ramesh Perumalsamy claimed to have worked with the Sports Hub on a project and mentioned that the group was extremely difficult to work with especially its "foreign talents".
?Jia Hao Ten? asked why the train had stopped at Ang Mo Kio Station for quite a while. The netizen considered it unacceptable.
?Andrew Lum wrote to SMRT on behalf of a resident living in his area at 10 Teck Whye Avenue. According to the resident, there was no bus service from Teck Whye and Choa Chu Kang to the new Bukit Panjang Station. The bus services available were service 190 which travels past Bukit Panjang to the highway and service 975 which travels to the interchange. The netizen suggested rerouting service 975 past the new Bukit Panjang MRT station so as to facilitate children attending schools near Bukit Timah.
Fitra Hamzah asked the Singapore Police Force what the Security Checked stickers seen around SMRT buses were for.
SMRT announced the discontinuation of its Premium Bus Service 546. The service would take its last trip on August 26.The Premium Bus Service was first introduced in April 2008 which travelled from Geylang Bahru to Shenton Way.
It was earlier reported that cracks were found on the bolsters of the defective Chinese-made trains. LTA had said that this key component of the SMRT trains would now be cast in Japan instead of China.It was posted in The Independent Singapore that previously, the casting of the bolsters were outsourced by CSR Sifang to a Chinese aluminium subcontractor Longkou Conglin Ltd. LTA said that the bolsters made by Longkou Conglin have impurities inside, leading to cracks developing over time. These cracks were found in July 2013 some two years after the trains were put into service.LTA Deputy Chief Executive Chua Chong Kheng said on July 12 that it still had a high safety margin despite tests that Longkou Conglins bolsters could not withstand pressure loads of 3.7 times as required in the design specifications. He said that the Chinese-made bolsters did not pose any safety risk.LTA, nonetheless, wanted the new bolsters to be cast in Japan. They would now be cast by Japanese supplier Kobe Steel while CSR Sifang would continue to make the car bodies and assemble the trains.A check on Longkou Conglins website showed that it was a business group that seems to do all kinds of business and appears to have its fair share of controversies in the news. Several netizens were concerned that the Government still continued to buy trains from a company that could not meet safety standards, putting its passengers at risk. Eugene Tavano questioned LTAs procurement procedures, including the qualification of vendors and subcontractors.
?Apple Tan? reported the bus captain of bus service 167 (SMB1501A) for driving recklessly during her trip on August 23. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain suddenly stepped on the brakes at the first traffic light after the bus left the interchange, and did the same at the second traffic light. The netizen asked SMRT to remind its bus captains to drive safely and not try to beat the amber light. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen to follow up and to reassure her of SMRTs commitment to safety.
On Facebook, Temasek shared a video showing how SMRT tapped on ??innovation to increase the availability of Automated External Defibrillators (AEDs) in the community.The public was also encouraged to attend Temasek Cares Stay Prepared community outreach event from Mar 18-20 to learn how to save someones life.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) said that the new buses to be rolled out soon would have USB charging ports at each pair of seats. Jing Hui assumed that the new buses would be introduced from September 1, when bus operators are required to have sufficient buses under LTAs regulations. (buses[IN]gapore!) believed that there would be seat-hogging passengers using the USB ports to charge their phones. Is Ming assumed that fares would increase because of the new bus features.
Commuters travelling on the Circle Line experienced delays of more than 30 minutes after a train fault occurred on Mar 3. According to a Channel NewsAsia reporter on the ground, SMRT staff said the fault occurred near Nicoll Highway station. Peter posted on STOMP that the train he was on got stalled between Stadium MRT Station and Nicoll Highway MRT Station from 11:20 a.m. to 12:10 p.m. He also mentioned that technicians who responded to the situation attempted to use another train to tow the stalled train to the nearest station. When the train reached the station, the netizen observed that there were no station staff or MRT personnel to guide or inform the frustrated commuters. Peter also stated that no bus bridging services were provided and that he was charged the normal fare despite the disruption. Train services in both directions resumed by 12:23 p.m., although trains and platforms remained crowded. Many netizens were disappointed that train delays and disruptions had become the norm. Some stated that despite several breakdowns, SMRT never improved in their response to such situations. Anne Chin urged others to understand the situation and be patient since technical faults could occasionally occur. Amos Maximilian Lee highlighted to Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan that the frequent disruption was the real problem and not the skirting of the planned Cross Island Line around the nature reserve. Jeffrey Lim was surprised that there were two delays within the same day and speculated that it might be caused by the earthquake in Sumatra which was also felt in Singapore. Alvin Chon mentioned that no feeder buses were deployed but passengers were asked to leave Dakota station. There was also no announcements on the display screens regarding the train fault. Jack Chan claimed being caught by the disruption at Paya Lebar Station where passengers were informed to take the middle platform train towards the direction of Serangoon. The netizen mentioned that throughout the journey to Serangoon, the wrong 'next station announcement was displayed and communicated inside the train.
?Adam Michael? stated that the Circle Line train he was on which was travelling towards Dhoby Ghaut did not stop at Bras Basah MRT station at 6.35p.m. on May 26. The netizen mentioned that it was the second time he had encountered such an incident.
In a press release issued on Apr 25, SMRT said it has completed its investigations into the fatal accident on Mar 22, following a review by an Accident Review Panel.SMRT said that before a work team is allowed onto the track, protection measures must be applied. This includes code setting the speed limit on the affected track sector to 0 km/h so that no train can enter on automated mode, and deploying watchmen to look out for approaching trains and provide early warning to the work team.The Accident Review Panel determined that this vital safety protection measure was not applied and that the effectiveness of such protection before entry into the work site was not ensured as required under existing procedure, directly causing the accident.Other factors identified as areas for improvement were: track access management controls, communication protocols and track vigilance by various parties.SMRT deeply regrets that the failure to apply a vital safety procedure led to the tragic accident on 22 March 2016.The report of the review of the accident has been submitted to the Ministry of Manpower (MOM), Singapore Police Force and Land Transport Authority (LTA) to assist with their statutory investigations. Many netizens expect that the supervisor would be used as a scapegoat, while top transport officials would be excused from responsibilities related to the accident. Others said that the families of the deceased should now file legal action against SMRT. grim wondered why MOM did not issue a short duration Stop Work Order to SMRT after the accident as per Workplace Safety and Health Act regulations, similar to those issued to private companies.
Sannie Cheng? asked SMRT whether drinking water at train platforms was prohibited and that those caught could be fined S$500. The netizen mentioned being caught by an SMRT staff drinking plain water at the platform. She said that the fine was too much for simply drinking plain water at the platform.
A Facebook post by Gabriel Huang which showed two nurses who had helped to dress the wound of a MRT passenger who had hurt her foot on the escalator was shared online. Many netizens praised the two nurses for helping the injured passenger. Several stated that the nurses should be recognised by their employers. Mike Lo wondered why the wound was being treated inside the train when the passenger hurt her foot on the escalator at the station. Gabriel Huang explained that the wound seemed superficial but continued to bleed after the passenger boarded the train.
On All Singapore Stuff Facebook Page, Peter shared a video showing a male bus passenger having an argument with an SBS Transit bus captain apparently because the bus captain could not speak English. Several netizens were surprised that many drivers were allowed to drive public buses without having basic English knowledge. Others stated that a basic knowledge in English should be required when recruiting PRC drivers since the job scope requires them to meet the commuters daily. Some suggested that bus operators should at least send its foreign bus captains to a basic English course. Some disapproved of the male passengers behaviour of shouting at the bus captain because s/he could not understand or speak English.
On the SMRT Facebook page, several netizens posted complaints about the non-functioning air-conditioners on its trains. ?Dennis Yong? said that he was sweating inside the train. ?Brunce Lovetosleep? aksed why he was paying for an air-conditioned train fare when the air-conditioner was not actually working. ?Peh Hong Huat Ashley? said that the train car 1507 air-conditioner was blowing hot air. ?Bernard Loke? asked why the air-conditioners at the North-South Line trains were not cool. The netizen mentioned that the natural air at the platforms were even cooler than the air coming from the air-conditioners on trains.
RH Tng? reported his/her experience with an SMRT staff at Jurong East MRT platform on August 30 at around 7.30am. The netizen stated that aside from experiencing delays on the North-South Line, s/he had been shouted at by a staff while being told to move to the other platform where the netizen was supposed to board the train towards Marina Bay. The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the matter seriously. SMRT has reached out to the netizen asking for more details as follow up.
The new bus service 666, which was among the five new City Direct Services announced by the LTA, continued to draw online responses because the number was linked to the devil in Christianity.Most netizens were amused and joked about the association with Satan and hell. But others were serious and concerned it could be insensitive to Christians. The LTA declined to comment on the issue.Many netizens stated that Singapore is a multiracial and multicultural society and should not allow individual religious beliefs and superstitions to interfere with the numbering of bus services. Others said that there were other numbers considered unlucky in other countries and wondered if those should be removed as well from the publics eyes. Jacq Oh Jacq said that people were difficult to please since they would complain about the lack of buses but were still not happy with the new bus service because of its number. James K S Tan mentioned that the only time a ride felt like it was going to hell was whenever the bus was caught in traffic on the expressway.Juanie Bouw encouraged others to give constructive feedback on the route and not make a big issue out of the bus number.Darann Tan mentioned that s/he would not take the service 666 bus even if it would be more convenient for him/her to do so. Donald Neo Wei Jian said to let others boycott the bus service so there would be more seats to choose from.
?Siti Aminah? complimented two bus captains from Yishun Bus Interchange, Hairol and Muhammad Hamzah bin Mohd Zaini. The netizen said that the bus captains greeted passengers and ensured that all passengers, particularly those with special needs, were seated before moving off. Passengers also had a smooth and pleasant ride.
?Komred Rashidah? thanked an SMRT staff at Newton MRT station who had warmly greeted commuters despite everyone walking quickly and rushing to catch the train. The netizen mentioned that it was not easy to stay cheerful all day long. The netizen added that she did not manage to get the name of the staff but asked SMRT to convey her best regards to her.
Commuters experienced two train disruptions and delays on May 3 as two separate incidents occurred on MRT lines operated by SBS Transit and SMRT.Services on SBSTs Downtown Line 2 (DTL2) were interrupted at 11 a.m. after a train applied its emergency brakes but the brakes could not be disengaged. The disruption was DTL2's first major breakdown since it was launched four months ago. The problem was resolved in about half an hour.At 5:45 p.m., SMRT tweeted that trains were moving slower in the direction of Jurong East, due to a train fault which had been reported on the North South Line (NSL) at Toa Payoh station.
On Facebook, SMRT shared some behind-the-scenes story about the heroic acts of their staff when a fire broke out at the construction site of Tanjong Pagar Centre on Mar 3.When Tanjong Pagars Station Manager (SM) Rahmat Bin Aman and Assistant Station Manager (ASM) Amutha D/O Subramaniam heard about the fire that was close to an exit, they instinctively grabbed fire extinguishers and ran towards it. Their top priority was to get the affected commuters to safety. SM Rahmat led the way out of the station while ASM Amutha ensured that no one was left behind. ASM Amutha also placed the commuters safety above her own even though she was asthmatic and had inhaled smoke. Netizens praised the staff for their great job. Omar Mohd Amin said that SMRT should award the two staff members for their good action.
Jon Veel boarded SBS Transit service 155 (SBS5209J) and noticed a poster displaying information on road closures and bus diversions for the Thaipusam festival from Jan 23 to 25 2016. The netizen wondered why the bus was still displaying outdated information.He stated that the poster space could be better used for advertising, instead of showing outdated information.
Netizens continued to discuss the post about the SMRT bus captain who provides candies from a small rack at the exit of the bus. LonelyHeart wondered whether bus captains were in some kind of "competition" for the best or most courteous bus captain award. The netizen said that it is good enough that bus captains drive safely, put on a smile and be helpful to their passengers. Juffry Bin Sulaiman mentioned that a GrabCar driver had also offered free biscuits and drinks to his passengers. OhReallyOk said that the post might get the driver into trouble since eating and drinking were prohibited inside the bus.
To retain drivers who have begun to transfer to private-hire fleets run by third-party taxi app companies, taxi operators are taking the fight to Uber and Grab by setting up their own private-hire and limousine service. The first to branch out into this new business was Prime Taxi, which started a fleet in 2014.The Straits Times understands that SMRT Corp has ordered a fleet of more than 300 new Toyota Vellfire multi-purpose vehicles (MPVs), Corolla Altis sedans and some Lexus cars for this purpose. In a recent announcement to the Stock Exchange, SMRT said it has set up a wholly-owned indirect subsidiary known as Strides Transportation with limousine and chauffeured services, and car rental as its principal business.Trans-Cab is doing the same. Its Managing Director Teo Kiang Ang said that the changing industry landscape prompted him to move in this new direction.Dr Walter Theseira, an economist at SIM University, said: "Taxi companies have to understand that innovation in their business model is still needed rather than just attempting to replicate or ride on the success of Uber and Grab." ?Several netizens stated that instead of helping taxi drivers, the establishment of Grab and Uber-like services by taxi companies would damage the source of income for taxi drivers. Kaiyan Leong stated that The Straits Times should correct the misleading information regarding taxi-related insurance in its news report. The netizen pointed out that Uber drivers were covered by insurance which also covers the passengers. He added that the reason why traditional taxi companies pay higher road taxes for some of their vehicles was because of their use of diesel cars. Ramalingam Sivakumar stated that third-party taxi apps like Uber and Grab would not survive longer if they would not reduce the 20% commission being deducted from the drivers.
spiritGate started a forum thread to ask which bus arrival app was accurate. In a later post, the netizen mentioned having to wait for 40 minutes for bus service 178 although the bus arrival app stated that the bus was arriving in one minute.Several netizens stated that although the data from all bus arrival apps were from the LTA, SG Buses app was the most accurate.Others suggested using the SG BusLeh app.Some mentioned that SMRT bus timings were mostly inaccurate.ethan89 state that service 178 arrival was usually inaccurate on weekends, claiming that the buses were sometimes re-routed to go through Kranji and Woodlands Railway Station during peak hours.
A relative of one of the deceased SMRT maintenance workers who died in the recent SMRT tragedy has written an open letter to SMRT. The letter was posted on Kent Ridge Common News.The supposed relative of the deceased stated that despite SMRTs apology and expression of sympathy to the victims relatives, SMRT would not fully understand their grief of losing a family member.S/he claimed that to SMRT, the two young workers were just a statistic and would soon be forgotten. To the victims families, however, they were beloved sons, brothers, cousins, nephews, friends. Brilliant human beings who had promising futures ahead of them. They followed their superiors orders only to be betrayed.The writer stated that they resent the companys negligence. They resent the attempts to clear the company of any fault, insisting that all the standard operating procedures have been observed. The writer added that instead of being so quick to protect SMRTs interests, the company should seek the humanity deep within themselves to acknowledge the mistakes and learn from them to ensure that this tragedy would not happen to anyone elses son again. S/he stated that currently, the families were grieving at the loss of a beloved, but the grief would soon turn into anger.
Aaron Tan? reported that smoke was seen at the rear of the SMRT bus with plate number SMB164X. The netizen suggested withdrawing the bus from service for safety reasons. Several netizens explained that it was common for Citaro buses to emit smoke.
?Ahpop Cho? shared a photo of a bus on the Senoko loop area which had an open part at the front of the bus. The netizen stated that the protruding part could be dangerous to motorcyclists. The netizen was not able to get the bus details but hoped that SMRT would act on the matter promptly.
rabbit1 stated with sarcasm that s/he liked SMRT buses because its bus captains drive similar to F1 race drivers and was fond of overtaking other vehicles, unlike SBS Transit bus captains who drive more slowly. Some netizen mentioned that SMRT bus captains like to drive dangerously fast. Molely stated that SBS Transit buses have an Engine Control Unit (ECU) that controls the various functions of the engine to ensure gradual and smooth acceleration.
Skye boarded bus service 804 (SMB8004Y) from Yishun temporary bus interchange on Mar 1 when a boy boarded the bus and told the bus driver to wait for his mother who was just behind him with three small children. The bus driver, however, ignored the boy and closed the door, and informed the boy to catch the next bus if they could not catch up. The driver eventually opened the door for the boys mother and other children to board the bus.The netizen was disappointed with the driver for being rude to the boy.Some netizens pointed out that bus drivers have a schedule to meet and could not wait for every passenger trying to catch the bus.Nanny Lila Seeye mentioned that many bus drivers do wait for passengers running towards the bus and assumed that bus punctuality performance might have indirectly made some bus drivers less patient.
A poll by the Government's feedback unit, REACH, revealed that commuters' perceptions towards the quality and affordability of the public transport system have improved. REACH conducted a telephone poll from Feb 29 to Mar 4 with 1,200 randomly selected Singapore residents aged 15 and above to gauge public sentiment on key public transport issues.80% agreed that Singapore has a good public transport system, up from 74% last year. 66% agreed that public transport in Singapore was generally affordable, up from 63% last year. On bus services, 37% felt that wait time has improved, while 10% said it was longer. 29% felt that it was less crowded on buses while 20% felt it was now more crowded.About six in 10 respondents said they were confident that the Government's efforts will help improve the reliability of train services. Jonathan Goh commended Singapore for its transport system, comparing it with the Malaysian transport system. The netizen challenged commuters that were unhappy with Singapores transport system to come to Kuala Lumpur to experience the difference. Derrick Yiu said that by 2020 the Government would ask the public to give up their cars and use public transportation. Simon The believed that Singapores public transport has not improved especially SMRT and taxis. Ace Chiu mentioned that Hong Kong has managed its transport system to be in a better shape than Singapores despite its population of 7M. The netizen deemed that population was never an issue for Hong Kong. He stated that Singapore should copy Hong Kongs transport management philosophy.
?Ng Gw? reported about the bus captain of service 857 (SMB5074P) who did not stop at bus stop B55249, where his/her elderly parent was supposed to alight despite pressing the bell and tapping the card. The bus captain seemed aware of the situation but only stopped on the next bus stop. The elderly had to walk a distance back. The bus captain did not even apologise to the elderly. Although not many passengers alight at bus stops B55249 and B55241, it does not give the bus captain the right to neglect his passengers who want to alight.
After a pigeon was seen inside a train on the North East Line on Jan 12, another one was seen inside a public bus. Several netizens taunted that the pigeon might be the latest auditors secretly trained by relevant authorities to look into the level of service or that the pigeon was looking for Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan. Jeremy Tan thought that the photo looked like it was digitally altered. William Choo said that the pigeon took the bus because no one knows when the MRT would break down again.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about an exercise on the Circle Line to test bi-directional operations on a single track between Promenade and Marina Bay stations on Jan 17 from 7:30 to 9:00 a.m. Commuters travelling on the Circle Line from or between Promenade, Bayfront and Marina Bay stations were advised that waiting times at said stations might be longer by up to 15 minutes. Alternatively, commuters could continue their travel on the North-South or Downtown Line. Samantha Needs Vacation said that the exercise should be done at midnight so services would not be delayed. Lee Hong Hui said that the testing was a good idea but wondered why SMRT would suddenly conduct such tests.
?Lee Guan Choon? shared a photo of a bus that did not stop close to the bus stop when it was raining. The netizen claimed that many passengers were drenched because of the inconsiderate bus captain.
A train fault was reported on the North-East line. Passengers reported being left stranded in stationary trains along the line.This is the fourth disruption on SBS-managed train lines in less than a week, including the Mar 29 breakdown on the Sengkang LRT. Muhd Nur Hisham said that breakdowns are becoming the norm. Alice Wong claimed that there was no train fault but the delay was caused by a female passenger who had fainted at Clarke Quay MRT station. The netizen said she was at the scene and was late to work because of the delay. ?Faith WH? stated that trains from HarbourFront towards Punggol were 30 minutes late.
?Ronald Zhong? reported that free shuttle bus drivers could not handle questions and could not direct passengers affected by the disruption. There was chaos and confusion because of ineffective communication.The netizen stated that after so many breakdowns, SMRT still was unable to handle such situations. Nicholas Shogun Armani said that SMRT was always sorry for the breakdowns but always fail to fix the problems.
?Syila Ahmad? praised the bus captain of service 172 travelling from Boon Lay interchange for greeting the passengers and for slowing down at every bus stop to check for passengers flagging the bus. The driver also ensures that the elderly and other passengers had alighted safely before driving off.
The LTA, SBS Transit and SMRT announced in a joint statement that new bus routes would be coming to Eunos, Marine Parade and Yishun by March as part of the Bus Service Enhancement Programme (BSEP).Another new route, SBS Transit's service 382, which serves the housing developments in Punggol West and the new Punggol SAFRA Clubhouse, was launched on Jan 3. A total of 760 buses have been added to the public transport network as of Dec 31 under the BSEP, out of 1,000 expected to be rolled out by 2017. Aaron Tan was thankful for the improvement of service 966. Silvester Chua suggested realigning SBS Transit service 36 to travel further onto Upper East Coast Road on its journey towards Changi Airport to benefit more commuters. Lena Loh approved of the new bus routes and stated that LTA should keep up the good work.
On a post by SMRT on its Facebook page regarding escalator safety, Justin Chua posted about bus service 980 that sped past him at the bus stop after Springside, despite his flagging for the bus. The netizen was forced to take a taxi home as it was the last bus that sped past him. In a later post, the netizen was impressed with SMRTs Facebook page administrator for replying to the comment at such a late hour.
?Chris Cheong asked whether SMRT was trying to save cost by turning off the air-conditioning on trains on the East-West Line. The netizen said that commuters were perspiring inside the train as it was also crowded.
The LTA announced that Singapores public bus industry would be transiting to the Bus Contracting Model (?BCM) in the second half of 2016. The Government would own all bus assets under the BCM, which would enable LTA to make bus services more responsive to commuters needs, such as shorter waiting times during peak periods.The move to the BCM would see all public buses bear a common exterior colour scheme to create a unified and distinctive identity for the Singapore Bus, and the public was invited to select from two colours: bright red or lush green. Buses would also have a new distinct logo which features the word SG Bus with an embedded stylised heart. The logo conveys commuters experience in their daily rides, and cultivates a sense of public ownership for the SG Bus.Fifty lucky voters stand a chance win a S$50 shopping voucher in a lucky draw.The LTA also explained why the two colours were chosen: both colours signify positive traits of the public transport system. The colour red was Singapores national colour and was associated with passion, excitement and vibrancy. While the colour green, depicts environmental friendliness and was a symbol of growth, vitality, prosperity and progress.To help commuters visualise the colour schemes, 10 red and 10 green buses would be deployed at 10 bus routes during the voting period. Meanwhile, commuters CNA spoke to said they find the colour red much more appealing. Many netizens preferred the colour red as they found it more appealing and that it was Singapores national colour. Several mentioned that the bus colours did not matter because commuters said that reliability, comfort and level of service was more important. Some stated that the Government should conduct referendums for medical insurance scheme and ministers salary scales, and not these kinds of ridiculously immaterial and irrelevant public consultations. Kim Ong commented on behalf of visually disabled artist and Cultural Medallion holder Miss Chng Seok Tin that the colour green was preferred because it was soothing. Victor Raj suggested using LTAs corporate livery similar to DTL trains. Muhd Hafiz said that both colours seemed ideal and suggested having red buses to ply Orchard and CBD areas while heartlands (feeder) buses use the colour green. Farhan Tre' asked LTA to use its logo and not the SG "Heart" Bus logo, and add more designs on the livery.
Temasek Holdings' unit Belford Investments has proposed a buyout of transport operator SMRT at S$1.68 a share, in a deal that values the firm at close to S$2.57B.In a joint statement on July 20, Temasek and SMRT stated that the proposed acquisition for all the shares in SMRT not already owned by Temasek would be affected by way of a scheme of arrangement in accordance with the Singapore Companies Act and The Singapore Code on Take-overs and Mergers. Once the acquisition is completed, SMRT would become a wholly-owned subsidiary of Temasek and would be delisted from the Singapore Exchange.The exercise would also remove all costs and distractions associated with SMRT's listing requirements, including quarterly financial reporting.Bank of America Merrill Lynch (Singapore) has been appointed by SMRT directors as the deals financial adviser. Based on their advice, the directors viewed the scheme favourably and were supportive of the acquisition, subject to the advice of an independent financial adviser on the terms of the scheme.SMRT has given its assurance to the National Transport Workers Union that no SMRT staff would lose his or her job, following Temasek Holdings offer to take the public transport operator private. Many netizens believed that transport fares would increase once the acquisition had been completed as private companies focus more on profits than customer satisfaction. Several others worried about transparency and rising costs as SMRT would no longer have to make their earnings public after being delisted. Several disapproved of privatising public transport operations. Others wondered why SMRT had to be privatised. Some considered the buyout price to be too low. Others wondered where Temasek gets its money to buyout SMRT. Some stated that the buyout was actually re-nationalisation and not privatisation of SMRT. Joyce Chew said that after the acquisition, the public would not be able to complain about breakdowns and fare increases.
Effa Teece thanked SMRT for making commuting in Singapore easy and accessible but disapproved of having to fold the pram before boarding the bus.The netizen said that it was difficult for commuters with prams to fold the pram, hold on to their child or children and their belongings, tap their travel card, and find a seat inside the bus. She asked SMRT to allow commuters with prams to have similar privilege as those commuters in wheelchairs, and not require them to fold the prams onboard buses.
?Kelly You? stated that the routing of service 812 from Chong Pang to Yishun Temporary Bus Interchange was horrible.The netizen mentioned that recently, the bus frequency was disrupted with at least one missing trip from 7 to 7:30 a.m. During this period of time, about five to six buses of services 800 and 812 have already arrived and left the bus stop at block 121 but no 812 buses arrived at the bus stop opposite block 121 in that same time frame. The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the issue.
?Dante Yuxuan? asked about the train testing of the C151B train. The netizen said he was looking forward to the introduction of the train.
?Thomas Daniel? reported that the air-conditioner on TIB1057M was not working. The netizen said that he was going to write to the LTA about the issue.
In response to queries by Chinese daily Lianhe Zaobao in an e-mail interview, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the new bus contracting model, which would take effect on September 1, would raise service standards of public buses. The Minister, however, stated that the services could not be improved without increasing the fares as well. In spite of that, he ensured that fares would still be affordable. Most netizens questioned why it was necessary to increase fares to have better services. Several stated that there was no need to increase fares since the infrastructures and buses were already owned by the Government under the new bus contracting model. An AfiqAqif Ryan mentioned that higher fares would mean higher cost for the public. The netizen stated that if the Government could not provide good bus service then fares should not be increased. Adrian Pah believed that the new scheme was supposed to keep bus fares affordable. Jasper Pung agreed that fares should be raised to sustain improvements but wondered where the improvements would be after the fare has been raised.
Netizens continued to discuss the submission of an appeal by the National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) to SMRT to reverse the dismissal of two workers who had been involved in a fatal track accident in March. Mr Melvin Yong, NTWU's Executive Secretary said that the union has reviewed the cases, and has "raised further queries relating to the incident" in its appeal to SMRT. Mr Yong added that they would continue to render support and assistance to the affected employees during this difficult time while waiting for SMRTs decision on the appeal. Several netizens asked why the union did not assist the affected employees earlier. Edwaard Tan, who claimed to be a former unionist, mentioned that if the issue warrants immediate termination, the union has to step in and discuss with senior management the correct course of action to be taken before dismissing an employee.
?June Serav? reported seeing a passenger consuming a packet of drink as he walked past the station security officer. The netizen was surprised that the security officer ignored the passenger.The netizen called the attention of the security officer to inform him that the passenger was drinking, but the officer dismissed the netizen. David Bala asked the netizen to stop being childish by complaining about everything, adding that the staff were already doing their best. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can follow up.
A news story on AsiaOne was observed regarding the book published by the two American graffiti artists that revealed how they managed to enter the Bishan MRT depot in 2011 to commit the vandalism of an SMRT train. A video footage of the crime also surfaced after five years.The vandals said that they staked out Bishan depot the night before their "act" in a park opposite the depot. They observed the "five or six staff members and a supervisor working to inspect and clean each train before closing the trains' doors".The vandals also mentioned that they did not see anyone else throughout the night after the staff left. They called the depot a "ghost town", saying that there was no patrol or inspection.
SMRT Taxis new venture in private-hire and limousine service, Strides, headed by SMRT Taxis General Manager Tony Heng, would have a fleet of more than 3,500 sedans.The new company would take current SMRT taxi drivers with no restrictions, and cabbies would still enjoy their existing loyalty incentives if they choose to switch. Lee Der Horng, National University of Singapore transport researcher, said that although greater supply of private-hire cars would benefit commuters, it would not benefit the local taxi industry as the more attractive terms meant more cabbies would defect. Some netizens stated that SMRT should focus on having reliable train service before venturing in other transport businesses. Others said that the additional cars to be used for SMRTs new service would only add congestion to roads. Douglas Chow stated that the Government should have premium COE rates for commercially driven cars.
On Facebook, SMRT shared some escalator safety tips. The public was advised to look ahead, watch their step, not to be distracted by their mobile devices and check the direction of the escalator before stepping on it.Damus Goh suggested having a stand to the left campaign.Joey Tan said that the unwritten rule all over the world when on escalators was to keep to the right. The netizen also asked SMRT to stop deviating from the real issue, which was the unreliable train services.Dante Yuxuan stated that people should not use their phones when boarding and alighting trains to avoid bumping into other commuters and dropping their phone in between the platform gap.
Averie Lim? was disappointed with the bus captain of service 302 for closing the bus door on a passenger on a wheelchair instead of assisting him to board the bus.The netizen stated that SMRT should educate its bus captains on what they ought to do in such instances and also to prevent such discrimination against the disabled community. SMRT explained that service 302 was not wheelchair accessible and could not allow wheelchair bound passengers onboard. Liu Xinyu explained that all wheelchair accessible buses displayed a blue coloured sign with a wheelchair at the bottom left front of the windscreen.
Following a track accident which killed two SMRT maintenance staff, the company is helping employees cope with the tragedy. According to some employees, contribution boxes have been placed at nine locations, including the SMRT headquarters and depots, for staff to contribute to the families of the two men killed in the accident.The company also observed a minute of silence at noon on March 23 and changed its logos to black and white on its online and social media platforms. Elaine Chua said that SMRT was the one who committed a breach in safety protocol and should be responsible for the tragedy. Patrick Tan applauded SMRT for the minute of silence for the loss of lives but wondered the need for a donation drive. Leon Chow said that SMRT should just take a tiny percentage of their profit to sufficiently compensate the families of the two victims. (Note: On Channel NewsAsias Facebook page, CNA commented that SMRT has clarified that the donation drive is internal and only meant for staff who wish to contribute to the families of the deceased. Several netizens assumed that it was a public donation drive. CNA apologised for the confusion and had made the clarification in their story.)
Xence Lim mentioned taking an SMRT cab from Chinatown and realised that s/he left his phone inside the taxi upon reaching home. The netizen immediately called SMRT hotline and was happy that his/her phone was delivered back to him/her. The netizen thanked SMRT taxi service for being efficient and the taxi driver for returning his/her phone.
Writer Seow Joo Heng raised concern about reports of terror attacks that have been prevalent lately, and that they were inching closer to Singapore. The writer suggested having metal detector gates at MRT stations to minimise potential casualties in such an eventuality. He said that the bag-check counters at MRT stations were ineffective as the checks were ad hoc. Although the implementation will slow down passenger flow, the writer feels that passengers will understand and get used to it. Most netizens stated that metal detectors alone could not detect explosives and should be used with a scanner or x-ray machine. Several mentioned that installing metal detectors on MRT stations would inconvenience commuters as it would slow down the flow of passengers. Some said that the writer did not have a clear understanding that the metal detectors would sound off every second as most passengers either carry mobile phones or electronic devices with them.
SMRT and SBS Transit announced that train and selected bus services would be extended on the eve of National Day on August 8. The North-East and Downtown Lines, as well as the Sengkang and Punggol LRT systems, would run for an additional 30 minutes. The North-South, East-West and Circle Lines, and the Bukit Panjang LRT would have similar extensions. Both operators said that selected bus services would have their last bus timings adjusted so that passengers on the last trains could catch their buses.
JOEY GAN wrote to TODAY to express his concern about the planned Cross Island Line. The netizen believed that the line should be routed along Lornie Road, one of the two proposed alignments, to avoid cutting under the Central Catchment Nature Reserve.The MacRitchie forest is home to one of the largest patches of primary rainforest and lowland swamp forest in Singapore. It is a national treasure. The netizen said that even with mitigation measures in place, it would be nearly impossible to enforce these measures on a daily basis. He urged Minister of Transport Khaw Boon Wan and those involved in the project to consider their decision carefully, for the sake of the forests and for Singapore.Many netizens believed that the Government would still carry out its plan and that the decision has already been made no matter how much people oppose the project. Several said that the nature reserve should be preserved.Mike Lo said that the animals might inadvertently enter into viaducts accidentally. The netizen wondered whether animal crossings would be constructed and how viaducts or tunnels would be constructed to prevent animals from straying into them and being killed or electrocuted.
?Jacky Ho? reported that a pedestrian was hit by an SMRT bus at the junction of Woodlands Square and Woodlands Avenue 2 and 7 at 11 p.m. on July 10. The netizen asked for updates on the incident.
Train services along SBSTs NEL were delayed in both directions on Apr 22 due to a train fault.Some netizens also reported that the NEL service towards HarbourFront was delayed due to a passenger requiring assistance. A pregnant passenger had fainted at Boon Keng Station but others were unsure whether that was the cause of the delay. Toh Yiu Kwong believed that there was an underlying problem that was afflicting the MRT system which the Government should seriously look into. imba1328 said that commuters should be compensated for lost time and other monetary losses caused by the delay.
Giving a more detailed timeline of the incident in an update on Mar 23, SMRT said that staff did not give station control notice so that trains could be stopped. It says there were no records that such communication took place. The train operator, however, could not confirm if the victims were on the trackway or the walkway when they were hit, or whether anyone in the team had deviated from the walkway. Meanwhile, The Straits Times Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan stated that there must have been more than one safety lapse that led to the deaths of two SMRT maintenance staff. Many netizens asked for clear answers on who were responsible for the safety lapses that caused the tragic accident. Most were disappointed that SMRT seemed to be shifting the blame to the victims of the accident. Some stated that the supervisor of the maintenance team and the person manning the control station should be responsible for the accident. Razor So said that CEO Desmond Kuek should not have issued a statement that procedures were followed without investigating properly. Leslie Chong stated that the supervisor should have informed the trainees about the approaching train since he was the first in line. Johnny Tan mentioned that those responsible for the death of the two young men ought to resign and be charged with negligence. The netizen added that the Singapore Police Force should press charges since SMRT had confirmed lapses in following safety procedures. Terence Teo wondered why no safety officer was deployed to oversee the safety of the team. forum456 pointed out that if the team did not contact the station, the station should contact the team and inform them about an oncoming train before allowing the train to move in. Chan Lai Sun suggested having a more thorough investigation and asked SMRT to provide viable precautionary measures immediately as such maintenance was expected on a daily basis. Amon Zuwan noted that there were warning signs that the track has high voltage and wondered why the staff were allowed despite the high voltage. Peter Malcolm De Silva said that only a Commission of Inquiry would get to the root of the problem.
Agent Salt shared the link to a blogpost which claimed that the story about the SMRT taxi driver who returned a bag of cash left in his taxi was fake as the passenger and taxi driver had been friends since 2010. The blogger posted screenshots of Facebook conversations of the taxi driver and said businessman. Some netizens wondered why the taxi driver and the businessman had to make up a story about a good deed. obsceneK2 wondered why The Straits Times posted the story without first verifying its authenticity. Lee Jeremy said that netizens should be smart enough to know that there were many false stories on the internet .
Ho Hsin Chun? stated that bus service 975 was unreliable and inefficient. The netizen disapproved of the 20-minute waiting time for a bus during peak hours because buses become crowded and people could not even board. Ho Hsin Chun? hoped that Tower Transit and Go-Ahead or any other reputable companies would take over SMRTs terrible bus services.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan shared a video showing how the new Smart Urban Rail Corporate Laboratory of SMRT and Nanyang Technological University (NTU) aimed to develop technological solutions to make the train system more resilient and reliable.The Minister stated that the Corporate Lab taps on NTUs expertise to help the SMRT engineers enhance the rail service. Several netizens considered the collaboration a good start to improving the rail system. Joe Tang approved of developing local talents, investing in the education of young Singaporeans and tapping on the expertise, experience and maturity of local professionals, managers, executives and technicians to lead their younger counterparts. Pang Soon Tan hoped that the collaboration would help bring in engineers into the public transport industry.
Ron Goh shared on The Online Citizen blog a photo of an East-West Line train showing a pond of water on the train cabin floor during the heavy downpour of rain on September 14.Twitter user, Ken Ying posted a video of the cabin, and wrote, "Poor design of Tanah Merah station cause rivers of water through MRT train during downpour!"Facebook netizen, Mihar Nirza also posted a series of photos on her account asking if there was water seepage along the East-West Line.From the posts, it seemed that there have been a couple of trains with the same issue of "ponding" due to the heavy rain. Despite the water in the cabin, services on the East-West Line ran as per normal. Some said that the SMRT rail network was now similar to train networks in third-world countries. Others speculated that the water might have seeped through the hairline cracks found on some MRT trains.
Tower Transits first weekday operations went smoothly on May 30, with passengers being impressed by improvements in service, such as drivers being more personable and patient. Commuters also noted that buses were moving at a less frantic pace making the journey safer and more comfortable. During their trips, bus drivers were also seen communicating with the operations control centre over the radio frequently to regulate headway.Ushers were also stationed at the bus bays at the Bukit Batok Bus Interchange, signalling to bus captains to wait for passengers who were rushing to board. Tower Transit personnel were also present to make sure the buses kept to departure timings.Many commuters, on the other hand, said that they had not noticed any difference after Tower Transit took over from SMRT. Several netizens believed that Tower Transit buses were slower because bus captains were still getting familiar with their routes. Some mentioned that the bus captains have to adhere to the schedule. Others stated that safety should be the top priority in a public transport service. Khairul Ashab said the bus was so ridiculously slow that even a cyclist overtook the bus. Fam Jiamin mentioned waiting for 20 minutes for service 106 during the morning peak hour. The netizen hoped that the waiting time would be shortened in the following days.
testart and Garry Lo? suggested that SMRT should install feedback devices on trains and buses so commuters could grade the standard of service provided. Garry Lo? said that the system was not new as airport washrooms already have them. chronorec thought that the idea was brilliant and suggested installing the feedback devices at exits.
?Mervyn Ang?, a bus spotter, praised the bus captain of service 859 (TIB1111P) for his hospitality, friendliness, and dedicated service to his passengers. The netizen mentioned rushing to Sembawang to take service 859s bendy bus as it was rare but was snapped at by the bus captain. After explaining that he was bus-spotting, the netizen was allowed to board the bus. Although he found the bus captain hostile at first, the netizen observed that the bus captain was quite friendly. The bus captain was also seen assisting passengers, helped many passengers in getting their fares right and waited patiently for commuters while they rushed for the bus. Before the netizen alighted, he thanked the bus captain and received a wide smile in return. The netizen said that the bus captain is one of the few rare kinds that warmed his day. He praised the bus captain for his actions and hoped that other bus captains would provide an equally high quality of service for passengers.
Muhammad Sir'an? stated with sarcasm that Feb 3 was one of the best days for commuters of service 811 across Chongfu School because five service 811 buses arrived at the same time.The netizen mentioned three service 965, four service 169 and three service 800 buses had arrived during the 20-minute interval but not one service 811 arrived. Service 811 was supposed to arrive every four to five minutes during peak hours according to the bus schedule board at the bus stop.The netizen stated that buses arriving late have a direct impact on peoples lives: people arrive late for work and would probably be reprimanded by their supervisors which could also affect their pay and bonuses. Children who were late for school were sometimes sent to detention.Muhammad Sir'an? said that he had seen no improvement in SMRT services since January 2015. Many netizens said they had similar experiences with SMRT bus services. Mohammed Muflehi stated that the issue might be in SMRTs management system. Jiajun Kang mentioned that the issue was the number of traffic lights and lanes along Yishun Avenue 6, the massive traffic jam caused by heavy vehicles from a nearby factory and illegally parked vehicles around Chongfu Primary School. Syed Mohammed Shariff suggested sending an e-mail to the Transport Minister or to the Member of Parliament that represents his area. Matthias Ngan said that service 811 suffers from bunching due to severely congested roads in the industrial area.
Ministry of Transport has responded on 5 July to the report by the Hong Kong news agency about the defective MRT trains being sent back to its manufacturer in China on its Factually microsite. It was mentioned that the defects were found during a check of new trains manufactured by Kawasaki Heavy Industries and CSR Sifang in late 2013. The hairline cracks were not structural and were not safety-critical.To ensure that trains were safe for passenger service, all defects were monitored closely. Monthly safety assessments were also conducted by LTA and the manufacturer before trains were put into service. LTA also commissioned an external third party assessment in 2013 which had confirmed that the trains were safe to operate.Ministry of Transport explained that the trains were being transported at night, with auxiliary police officers clearing the way ahead, to minimise obstruction and inconvenience to road users. Likewise, new trains that arrive in Singapore were also transported on roads at night.The green covers were to protect the trains, just as how people would bubble-wrap, box up, or Styrofoam-pad electronic equipment and machinery. Several netizens wondered why trains had to be monitored closely if the defects were not safety-critical. Others asked why new trains being delivered to Singapore were not protected with covers. Lee HT stated that the manufacturer should be the one explaining about the defective trains and not SMRT.
The 45-year-old Englishman, Senior Diagnostic Engineer Ray Silcox, had joined Tower Transit Singapore to lead a 44-strong team of engineers and technicians. His team would be responsible for keeping the company's 360-plus buses in shape and running smoothly.Silcox was reported to be very familiar with his trade, spending about 25 years servicing and maintaining buses, that he could single out a problem just by listening carefully.On the technological side, Tower Transit would be implementing a digital fleet management system called Freeway in Singapore, a first for the entire company. Bus captains would be allowed to take photos and report defects on their vehicles using their mobile phones to alert the engineers to resolve the issues. The Freeway system could also calculate and pre-emptively order what the fleet needs, such as oil.Another Tower Transit feature was that the firm's customer service department could also flag issues raised by passengers - such as if exhaust emissions smell foul. Ahmad Mian wondered why Tower Transit would be using SBS Transits new buses. The netizen also asked if Tower Transit could not afford to buy a bus on their own considering that the buses in London were more advanced than those used in Singapore.
Sean Goh? reported that a LRT at Choa Chu Kang LRT station was travelling at a dangerous speed.The SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen and highlighted this incident to BPLRT for their follow-up.
?Christiane Seemann? asked SMRT if they could not work on the track at 1:30 in the morning. The netizen mentioned that it was the third day that residents around the blocks surrounding Ang Mo Kio had difficulty sleeping because of the noise. She said she had played music, transferred to another room and had blocked the door with pillows to reduce the noise levels but to no avail. The netizen said that SMRT should take the slogan "while you sleep" off, because most residents in the area were unable to do so.
Services on the Punggol Light Rail Transit (LRT) line were disrupted for about an hour on June 22 due to a power fault. SBS Transit announced the disruption on Twitter at about 5:50 p.m. on Wednesday evening (22 June). Free bus services and bus bridging services were activated.A video sent by Channel NewsAsia viewer Naseem Fathima showed passengers being detrained from an LRT carriage that appeared to be stuck on the tracks. A commuter who was onboard the stalled train said that the lights and ventilation in the carriage stopped working before it came to a halt.SBS Transit staff arrived 10 to 15 minutes after the train stalled and assisted commuters in getting off the train via the emergency ladder. Several netizens were frustrated that train breakdowns have now become a part of Singaporeans lives. Some expressed concern for the disabled and elderly during such times when commuters were forced to walk on the tracks. Others stated that the emergency ladder was too steep and might be unsafe to use during emergencies. Davy Devaraj said that Singapore Civil Defence Force personnel should be at the scene to supervise the evacuation especially when it involves driverless trains. Richardo Link wondered why SBS Transit did not have any backup generators. Ee Seng Koh said that the responses provided by LTA and SBS Transit that they were investigating the occurrence of power faults on the LRT have become too consistent and patronising.
?Dionte Lee? hoped that SMRT would again deploy bendy buses for service 912 because commuters experienced overcrowding at 888 Plaza after SMRT decided to use single-decked buses. Jiajun Kang said that deploying double-decker buses for service 912 might not be possible as service 912 will be a wheelchair accessible bus (WAB) service starting Apr 3. The netizen added that SMRT did not have sufficient bendy WABs as of now.
Mus Muliyadi Abdullah? posted a photo showing a can of lubricant (WD40) left behind in the elevator shaft at Bukit Batok MRT station on August 18.
?Basil Fu? requested for SMRT to lower the volume of public service announcements at train stations on the Circle Line as commuters have to bear with the uncomfortable loudness of the announcements.
A comment by ??? was observed on SMRTs Facebook post regarding the solar eclipse. The netizen said that he was grateful to SMRT and its drivers for the days that SMRT had served the public and had taken commuters from one destination to another despite the occasional delays and disruptions. The netizen mentioned that he was almost always punctual in reporting to school or work because of the efforts of SMRT.He also thanked the drivers at Woodlands for transferring the religious icons of worship to the new temporary bus interchange before the new terminal starts its operations.
?Charles Laudia? reported that a train at Tai Seng MRT station closed its doors too early. The netizen said that passengers who were alighting from the train almost got stuck in between the doors and some were unable to alight.
Lee Teen Yen? reported that the North-South Line trains were frequently running without air-conditioning. The netizen said that It was really uncomfortable especially during the evening rush hour. Wong Ee Hong agreed with the netizen and mentioned that the heat inside the train was not caused by external factors and high passenger loading. The netizen said that she had checked the vents and no air was coming out. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut said that it was much cooler at the train stations than inside the trains.
Raj was concerned when he saw a potential mosquito breeding hazard on the roof of Buangkok MRT station. The netizen shared a photo of a pool of stagnant water that had collected on the roof of the station.The netizen said that the issue had been reported to the proper authorities and had requested for regular checks to remove any water clogging on the roof. Ruthie Tootie said that the rooftop was an outdoor area and that the water should be able to dry up from the heat of the sun. Allan Chong pointed out that if there was a proper drainage system, having stagnant water at the rooftop would not be an issue.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a video of an interview with SMRT Service Ambassador Aunty Haslina from Buona Vista MRT station. Aunty Haslina always ensured that commuters have a comfortable commute. She was also seen with her signature black sling bag which contained tissues, fan, oil and plastic bags for passengers who need them. Danish Mohamed stated that the sling bag carried around by Haslina could help sick passengers. The netizen praised Haslina for the way she serves the public. Eve Leong Sees mentioned seeing Aunty Haslina every morning at Buona Vista station. The netizen did not know her name previously but noticed that the Service Ambassador was very friendly and pretty in person.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? claimed that bus service 911 and 911E have been travelling at a slower speed. The netizen asked SMRT to return to the normal driving speed for its buses.
In Parliament on Jan 29, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan responded to questions from Non-Constituency Member of Parliament (MP) Dennis Tan on whether there were parts in the MRT system that were operating beyond their expiry dates. MP Tan also asked if the Government would publish key performance indices (KPI) to "measure parts replacement and maintenance works". Minister Khaw stated that many train components were replaced before their expiry for safety and reliability reasons even before the recommended lifespan was reached. The Minister added that the actual life span also depends on other factors such as how often they were used, how they were treated and maintained, and the operating environment. The Transport Minister believed that the engineers should resolve rail issues the engineers way since rail reliability is an engineering problem. He, however, admitted that the rail system was not quite where the authorities and the public would want it to be. Concurrently, Minister Khaw reiterated that his and the Transport Ministrys top priority was to make improvements in the rail system. Some netizens stated that engineers should be running the Transport Ministry since they know how to resolve the rail issues. Boon Seng Ter mentioned that if frequent replacement of train components did not work, then frequent replacement of the people doing the work should be considered. The netizen added that the problem was likely with the people and not the components. Heng Dylan wondered why there were still breakdowns if replacement were done often. The netizen also asked why the need for frequent replacements if trains and tracks were properly maintained. Lee Suping noted that the parts were likely of inferior quality as there was a need to replace more frequently than recommended. Elijah Tsi stated that there seemed to be a lot of assurances from the Government but no concrete action had been taken.
Lawrence Wong, Member of Parliament for Marsiling-Yew Tee GRC, joined SMRT on a familiarisation ride on the new bus service 979M last week. He introduced the new service to the residents and distributed limited edition bus folders. Service 979M would ply between Bukit Panjang LRT station and Choa Chu Kang North 5 (loop) and provide residents of Choa Chu Kang North 5 with a direct connection to key transport node at Bukit Panjang MRT Station. Shawn Ong stated that the service has significantly low demand.
?Aslindah Anuar? asked whether bus captains were allowed to use their phones while driving. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain of service 178 (SMB1355E) was busy talking on the phone on loudspeaker and did not notice a passenger who wanted to board the bus at bus stop 43201.SMRT has reached out to the netizen to follow up with her.
Channel 8 News reported about the delay in train services between Woodlands and Yishun stations during the morning rush hour on May 24.Several netizens posted on social media about the delay. Commuter JusChev told Channel 8 News that she saw a group of SMRT staff wearing safety vests standing at the end of the platform in Sembawang MRT Station. Several netizens stated that it has become normal for the MRT to break down. Ann Teo wondered why most disruptions occur during the morning and evening peak hours.
Commuters can soon use their mobile devices to pay for their MRT, LRT, and bus rides after installing the new EZ-Link Near Field Communication (NFC) SIM card. Users need to turn on the NFC function on their mobile phones to make payments and top up the purse, as they would with an EZ-Link card. Users can also check their EZ-Link purse balance, transaction history, and top-up value using the EZ-Link mobile application. LTA Chief Executive Chew Men Leong stated that they had been testing various innovative fare payment systems, and bringing the NFC SIMs and mobile phone models into the public transit ticketing environment bears fruit to LTAs on-going efforts to leverage on technology to bring greater convenience to commuters through new and convenient ways to pay for travel. As of Mar 29, however, only 19 handsets from LG, Samsung and Sony have been approved for transit payments in Singapore as Apple had reportedly restricted the use of its NFC chip to its mobile payments platform Apple Pay. The EZ-Link NFC SIM would cost S$37.45, but the telcos announced that the activation fee would be waived for a limited time only.M1 mobile customers will be the first in Singapore to enjoy the NFC service from Mar 29. StarHubs NFC Transit SIM cards will be available from Apr 2 while sale of SingTel Transit NFC SIMs will be available late April 2016. ??? was concerned that his/her monthly mobile bills would increase. The netizen also found it ridiculous to buy a new SIM card for S$37.45 to use for the MRT. YJ Tan was afraid that telcos would use the NFC-enabled SIM card to charge more from its subscribers.
WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? shared a photo of bus service 965 blocking the entire lane of the bus interchange.
Joshua Woo said that people always complain about train disruptions due to MRT track faults and other issues. The netizen, however, asked others to stop complaining and stated that maintenance crew worked throughout the night to make sure that commuters would have a smooth travelling experience. He thanked SMRT and Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan.Farah Shafiqah was glad that someone appreciated the hard work by the maintenance crew.
UOB Kay Hian urged SMRT shareholders to accept the offer price of S$1.68 per share by Temasek Holdings as 1QFY17 results continue to be impacted by rail issues while its bus, taxi and rental business showed poor performance.Lead analyst Thai Wei Ying said in a report on August 10 that the offer could provide SMRT a more palatable exit as fundamentals could deteriorate further. SMRT shares are currently trading at S$1.63.
?Abel Koh reported that the train travelling from Yio Chu Kang to Bishan kept stopping and the ride took more than 15 minutes but there was no announcement regarding any train issue.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian mentioned that the usher at the taxi queue in Changi Airport directed him to the taxi at a certain spot. Since it was already dark at that time, he did not pay attention to the type of taxi or the fare.Upon reaching home, he was charged a taxi fare of S$35, compared to the usual S$25. The taxi driver explained that he was driving a Chrysler taxi.Tan Kin Lian said that such issues were caused by the confusing deregulated taxi fares that instead of offering more choice to consumers, it allows taxi drivers to take advantage of confused customers. He added that to avoid taking advantage of consumers, the LTA should mandate that only taxis charging "standard fare" could pick up passengers at taxi stops and the road side. Those charging premium fares should only take passengers through booking. Ting Hoe Keong mentioned that luxury taxis should have a separate queue. The netizen said that commuters were under pressure to board the taxi directed by the usher even if it was a luxury cab, when the queue to regular taxis were long.
?Tan Janet? thanked the two SMRT staff - Rahman and Suriyana - for their help in providing medicine and water and for waiting for a cab with her along the road for more than an hour.
SMRT posted on Twitter at 11:39 a.m. on July 13 about a track fault on southbound train services on the North-South Line between Bishan and Khatib stations. Another tweet was sent by at 11:12 a.m. informing commuters to expect an additional 10 minutes in travel time towards Jurong East as SMRT worked to repair the fault. At 12:07 p.m., train services from Bishan to Khatib resumed. Several netizens said that reports about train faults were already the norm. Some mentioned that the Transport Minister should stop issuing statements as train faults would usually follow the next day. Md Rizal Bin Jani said that SMRT had already caused inconvenience on Sunday mornings to do track maintenance yet there were still track faults. Ho Samuel urged netizens to accept it as a 10-minute delay was no big deal.
?Jonas Tan? asked whether the bus captain of service 854 had a valid licence to drive as he could not gauge when the traffic lights would turn to amber. The netizen said that the bus captain suddenly stepped on the brakes at a junction, which caused passengers belongings to fall on the floor. The netizen added that there were no apologies from the bus captain.
Sports Hub Pte Ltd (SHPL) has seen seven senior staff depart the organisation in the last six months. Another two members of senior management at SHPL have resigned from the consortium, with legal director Maud Brotons and Tan Ai Sim, head of human resources, resigning from their positions.Since its opening in June 2014, the Sports Hub has run into a number of issues, including problems with the National Stadiums grass pitch, a roof leak during a concert, and event organisers complaining about the high cost of hosting sports events at the 55,000-seater stadium.Manu Sawhney, CEO of SHPL, said in a statement that there have been some departures within SHPL over the last months, but all of these have happened in the normal course of business. He added that the consortium would learn from its mistakes and work on winning Singaporeans over. Sawhney said that the ultimate goal would be to make the Sports Hub an integrated hub for sports, entertainment and lifestyle.Maria Martin said that she was missing the old Kallang stadium with its simple structure and humble architecture.Alvin Tan said that the Sports Hub management was thinking of how much money to make and not how to bring the crowd to the stadium. Tong Bn mentioned that it was difficult for a private establishment to make money when it also has to cater to national needs being semi-public. He added that the concept for the sport hub needs a total makeover.
rathalos claimed that the reason why there were so many track faults was because of the ponding on MRT tracks. diamond_guy said that ponding was normal in Singapore. chekchek wondered how the water had seeped in. diver-hloc mentioned that it was normal for water to seep in on the tracks but the water should not touch the running rail.
jason910 claimed that there was a track fault at Bishan MRT station on the Circle Line in the early morning of Jul 12. The netizen said that the trains were packed to maximum capacity and many had to wait for the third train to be able to board. S/he added that there were no news about the fault. Vincentlow82 said that the trains were moving normally but many could not board because of the crowd. Ah-Pin-Kor mentioned that Circle Line stations were too small and the trains were too short.
?Xixu Sim? thanked the SBS Transit team at Bukit Panjang Station for assisting in finding her brother who got lost on Mar 14. The MRT staff noticed her brother around the station wandering around and immediately kept him at the station and notified them.
SMRT bus captain Ramasamy Krishnan continued to receive praises for preventing a passengers laptop from being stolen by another passenger after it was accidentally left in the bus. In an interview, Ramasamy, stated that when he was driving the bus, he wanted everything to be perfect. He added that he cared about his passengers and his bus.Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, hoped that Ramasamy's actions would "inspire his colleagues to look out for their passengers as they would for their own family and friends". Many netizens commended Ramasamy for his alertness and concern towards his passengers. Andrew Singh said that there were many similar cases in taxis and SBS Transit buses that were not reported. Tracy Carrington appreciated most of the bus captains, saying that their jobs were not easy.
?Cocoon Chan? thanked SMRT staff for their hard work in providing a safe and reliable transport system. However, she also would like to see more improvements. She mentioned that SMRT staff could assist or guide commuters at Pioneer MRT station to prevent crowding at the escalator in front of the passenger service centre. The netizen mentioned that the two SMRT staff who were standing by the faulty escalator with barriers should instead guide commuters at the congested escalator.
forum456 posted a screenshot of SMRTs advertisement for a Safety Coordinator, saying that SMRT was so scared about the recent track accident that the company advertised for a safety coordinator. kaka stated that the advertisement was just to show SMRT was serious about safety. Mark Koh asked whether the existing safety coordinator resigned, had been terminated, or had been made a scapegoat for the SMRT accident. walaneh wondered whether SMRT had no such safety coordinator post all along.
?Asyraf Sns? asked SMRT why several service 172 high capacity buses were off service during peak hours and why only small buses were deployed. The netizen mentioned waiting for about 40 minutes before passengers could board a fully packed bus.S/he added that the issue had been reported to SMRT before yet there was no difference.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) has confirmed that is assessing an application from HDT Singapore Taxi to be the first to launch an all-electric taxi fleet in Singapore. The introduction of electric taxis would correspond with the Government's plans to widen the testing of the viability of Electric Vehicles (EV) in Singapore. Professor Subodh Mhaisalkar, Executive Director of Nanyang Technological University's Energy Research Institute (ERI@N), stated that the potential entry of electric taxis was a welcome move because cabs, in general, clock high mileage. Some netizens wondered how many taxis could a small island like Singapore accommodate. Others said that the introduction of electric taxis would only complicate the land transport issues in Singapore, since the LTA has yet to resolve issues with public transport. Wilkie Ong Keng Soon was uncertain whether using electric cars as taxis would be viable, pointing out that there would be downtime when charging. Jimmy Ng asked whether taxis would be easily available without having to resort to booking apps or be subjected to cab booking surcharges. The netizen also asked if fares would be cheaper if electric cars are used by taxi companies. Alfred Gan mentioned that there was insufficient infrastructure to support electric vehicles at the moment.
Train service on the North-east Line was delayed for about 20 minutes on Mar 19 due to a signalling fault at the HarbourFront Station. Some netizens stated that train disruptions were the norm now. bastogne said that SBS Transit has better recovery measures than SMRT.
The Public Transport Council (PTC) announced the commencement of the 2016 Fare Review Exercise. Train operators have until October 7 to submit their fare adjustment applications.Bus operators, however, would not be required to apply to the PTC for approval of fares with the transition of the public bus industry to the bus contracting model. The PTC would use the existing fare adjustment formula, which takes into account the consumer price index, energy costs and wages as guide for the fare review. The maximum allowable fare adjustment quantum would be -5.7%.Dr Park Byung Joon, a senior lecturer at SIM University's School of Business, believed that the fares would go down with the decline in consumer price index and energy costs this year.Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was also expecting a reduction in fares. In a written reply to a Parliamentary question from Member of Parliament Gan Thiam Poh whether the council will consider a reduction in fares in the annual review, Minister Khaw was expecting the PTC to consider "a maximum fare reduction of 5.7%". Most netizens stated that train fares should not increase because of the series of disruptions that happened this year which had inconvenienced commuters. Some netizens pointed out to others to read the article before complaining, as the article stated that the maximum allowable fare adjustment quantum was -5.7 per cent, which could mean a fare decrease. rathalos wondered which operator would apply for a reduction in fares. William Ng mentioned that the Transport Minister already hinted that fares would increase by stating a few weeks ago that improvements in the transport industry could not be sustained without raising fares. Tan Kwong Moh asked the authorities to think about the low-income group and senior citizens before deciding on any fare hikes.
On SMRTs Facebook page, a video titled Through each generation, were always here for you that was produced by SMRT, shows an SMRT bus captains act of kindness and how her words of wisdom contributed to the lives of others. Several netizens were touched by the video saying that it was sweet and heartwarming. Matthew Chua wondered if it was a true story. Edmund Low stated that it was a true story and the bus captains story was featured on a television programme. Hazad Sydee mentioned that the bus captain has high regards for her job. Bryan Chew agreed that there were many outstanding bus captains around.
?Alex Ong? asked SMRT to inform its staff at Serangoon MRT station to follow the rules when using the escalators. The netizen noted that the staff were standing on the right of the escalator.
?Heng Dylan? noticed that Clementi MRT station has three escalators leading to the platforms, two of which were set on a downward direction. The netizen believed that by setting the middle escalator on an upward direction and the two side escalators on a downward direction would allow better flow of commuters. They would have easier access to the escalators going down to the gates. Evelyn Nah mentioned that Boon Lay MRT has the same issue and suggested that the direction of the two escalators should be changed to ease the flow of people especially during peak hours.
DanielsaN8 asked others whether they think that Singapore has one of the worst MRT in Asia. Several netizens stated that Singapores MRT may not be the best in Asia but it was not the worst either. cookie29 believed that Singapores MRT was the best in Southeast Asia but around the same as the Metro in East Asia. Magickiller9 said that the issue was not being the worse but rather why Singapores MRT was not the first. The netizen stated that MRT stations should be bigger and have more maintenance and checking during non-peak hours. fox1 mentioned that even the MRT in Johor Bahru was better than Singapore. jace88 believed that some stations could have been designed a bit better.
Train service on the North-South Line from Woodlands to Ang Mo Kio was delayed for 15 minutes due to a track fault yesterday evening (29 June). The additional travelling time is due to a track fault, SMRT tweeted at 9.19pm.SMRT tweeted at 10.03pm that a 10-minute delay was expected from Yishun to Ang Mo Kio towards Marina Bay.In another update at 10.27pm, SMRT said that a five-minute additional travelling time was expected from Yio Chu Kang to Ang Mo Kio. Normal train service resumed at 10.49pm. A few netizens stated that train delays were already a norm in Singapore. ??? mentioned waiting seven minutes for the north-bound train to arrive. The netizen said that most passengers at Toa Payoh and Novena stations were unable to board the train. Sharon Lim said that the delay also affected trains heading in the opposite direction towards Woodlands and added that it was overcrowded at Bishan. bladez87 there was a very long queue at Choa Chu Kang and that the entire platform was crowded.
Tan Kok Tim posted on his self-titled blog regarding the steep steps outside MRT entrances that should be replaced with graduated-gradient-smooth wide ramps. The netizen reiterated his request to the LTA after reading a news story about an elderly falling at a flight of stairs near Yishun MRT.The netizen also shared his e-mail exchanges with the LTA regarding similar issues. Tan Kok Tim mentioned that not all MRT entrances have wide open smooth-graduated ramps.The LTA responded that they were unable to accede to the suggestion to convert entrance steps to ramps because escalator and staircase (leading from entrance to concourse) were not barrier free and that most of the commuters still prefer a fast and direct access to the stations via the entrance steps. The LTA added that they have received numerous feedbacks from the public that the sloping profile of the ramps caused people to fall and injure themselves.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that fares were higher when travelling between some stations on the Downtown Line 2 (DTL2) because of the method of fare calculation used by the Public Transport Council (PTC) for concessionary fares.Before the opening of DTL2, commuters travelling from Bukit Panjang to Newton or Bugis would have had to use the North-South East-West (NSEW) Lines. Minister Khaw explained that Fares from Bukit Panjang to Newton or Bugis for these two vulnerable groups are currently S$0.88 based on the NSEW Lines routing. Had the PTC used the DTL2 routing, our seniors and disabled would have had to pay a higher fare of S$0.92.The fares were calculated based on the actual distance covered by commuters, but different routes could be taken to connect between two stations, and as such the route with the shortest travelling time was used instead. Harry Chia stated that the PTC have always taken the senior citizens into consideration when adjusting fares. Ho Hsin Chun said with sarcasm that Minister Khaw made a perfectly reasonable explanation the DTL2 costs more than a billion to build so they start charging more.
Pang Soon Tan? stated that the Circle Line had not been adhering to the safety procedures on closing the platform screen doors. He noticed that the platform doors close even before the door closing warnings were sounded off. The netizen said that both the platform doors and train doors should only be closed after the warnings have sounded off.
jericho75 stated that there was a delay at Buona Vista MRT station on the East-West Line. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that s/he queued for the train for 25 minutes. euko82 said that there was no news about the delay. PiPiChew suggested exiting the station for a while during such scenarios and come back later when regular train service had resumed. ?Mae Han? said that the platform at Buona Vista Station was crowded and the trains were full.
More uncertainty were expected at the Sports Hub which had been affected by a number of issues since its opening in 2014.TODAY News learned that the Sports Hub Ptd Ltd (SHPL) board, led by major equity partner InfraRed Capital Partners, had proposed to terminate the contract of its venue operation partner, Global Spectrum Pico, at a meeting in the United States on Feb 18.Sources said that the SHPL board were unhappy with the commercial deals undertaken or signed by Global Spectrum Pico. The board members were expected to meet in Philadelphia to discuss the proposal to end the partnership with Global Spectrum Pico. Several netizens claimed that they had anticipated that the partnership would fail because of mismatched personalities. Kelvin Tan wondered why there were no issues when the stadium was still under Sports SG. Eddie Goh asked the Government to step in and take the ownership rights to the Sports Hub before it goes into further disgrace and become an international joke. Chong Onn Chan wondered whether the Sports Hub would end up like the Singapore Flyer which was sold off at a sale price to a foreign company.
Frank Young said that the issue was not just about nature but also about the homes that would be displaced along the perimeter. The netizen assessed that the social cost was enormous compared to the S$2B additional cost and should not be discounted.
SMRT announced on Jan 25 a 63.5% increase in net profit to S$36.9M for Q3 of FY2016 because of higher operating profit in the train, bus and taxi segments as well as higher funding and grants.The transport operator, however, admonished that on a year-to-date basis, its rail operations were still making losses, with a combined loss of S$1.1M in FY2016 and that operating expenses would continue to increase due to intensive maintenance and renewal programmes of the ageing network. The fare revenue would also be affected by the 1.9% fare reduction and the commencement of Downtown Line 2 in Dec 27.Desmond Kuek, SMRTs President and Group Chief Executive Officer, stated that While there is more to be done in reducing major train disruptions, we are encouraged that our consistent efforts in enhancing the reliability of the network have seen results. As a key reliability indicator, service delays longer than 5 minutes for every 100,000 kilometres improved from 1.80 in 2011 to 0.71 in 2015, the best performance achieved on the North-South and East-West lines in the past decade. Several netizens stated that with the increase in its profits, SMRT should allocate more funds into maintenance and better pay package. Some mentioned that portion of the profits should be shared to commuters that were affected by the frequent breakdowns. Others said that they would be buying SMRT shares of stock. Some assumed that fares would again increase. Francis Goh believed that from the latest financial results, SMRT could reduce bus and train fares by at least 3-5%. JF Gary Tom stated that the rental income received within the MRT station compound should be formed as part of the rail operating revenue. Leng Leng Clara believed that a public transport company should not be making profits.
?Kinston Nah? observed that bendy bus model is the most suitable for a high demand bus services such as service 187 as it have more standing capacity.
SMRT Commercial would push through its growth plans with the set-up of The X Collective (XCO), a wholly owned subsidiary of SMRT Commercial that leverages on the strengths, capabilities and experience of SMRT Commercial in media and marketing, to solve business challenges and develop impactful platforms, powerful ideas and a social currency that creates authentic connections with their audience. XCO Media+ team has been tasked to manage SMRTs Media advertising assets while expanding the companys footprint with new digital+ and out-of-home (OOH) assets. yonglimm asked whether SMRTs priority was being a transport company or a media company. Mystyque stated that SMRT is a private company and that its priority would be to make money. Herzberg mentioned that SMRT was trying to make more money from other avenues so they could hire better maintenance workers to prevent train breakdowns. hnzfaz said that SMRT had to branch out to something completely different in order to grow, since their track record as transport operator was sub-par.
Lee Wang Zheng? praised bus captain Krishna Rao of service 913 for being friendly to passengers. The netizen also admired the "aeroplane" cap that the bus captain was wearing.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian wrote that it was quite unusual that SMRT has yet to install any protection against signal interference.Tan said that many train systems depend on signals and communication but the mass transit systems in other cities do not have the same signal interference problem. The issue seemed to be unique to Singapore and to the Circle Line. William suspected a sabotage from a very sophisticated group. Manu Lee deemed that safety and welfare of the public was not important to SMRT and the Government.
Ho Jun Yi? asked SMRT to look into the overcrowding situation on bus service 851. The netizen suggested deploying more double-decker buses or bendy buses for said service.
?Kircheis Csm? reported a leak on the bus air-conditioning vent on service 903 (TIB1194A) and the long waiting time for the said bus.
On Facebook, the LTA shared the benefits of participating in Travel Smart Rewards such as winning cash rewards and receiving a sign-up bonus for employees of companies under the Travel Smart Network. Annice Tan, an employee at DBS Marina Bay Financial Centre, was quoted that she enjoyed travelling before the peak period as trains were less crowded and fares were cheaper. Pang Soon Tan claimed that everyone in Jurong goes to work early, but SBS Transit buses were not dispatched on time. The netizen said that the LTA and SBS Transit had not ensured the reliability of bus schedules.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament Louis Ng Kok Kwang thanked all those who were working during the Chinese New Year, including the SMRT staff, while many were celebrating with family and friends. Netizens appreciated MP Louis Ng Kok Kwangs effort in reaching out to the underappreciated workers.
On The Online Citizen blog, a video from Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road Facebook was reposted showing an SMRT taxi (SHB5759G) taking a "shortcut" from Jalan Sayang to Jalan Kembangan, going against traffic directions along Sims Avenue East. The incident happened on September 12 at around 12 p.m.Referring to the map where the incident took place, the road is a one-way road. It might be possible that the taxi driver took a wrong turn at one of the small roads.LTA could impose the following penalty for driving against the flow of traffic in Singapore:- Four demerit points and a fine of S$130 for obstructing traffic, and,- Six demerit points and a fine of S$150 for driving against the flow.Comments made to the post showed the different perceptions about this incident. Some netizens assumed that the taxi driver was not familiar with the roads and simply made a wrong turn. nicnacnoe lobo_arisen observed from the video that the taxi driver first drove to the third lane and filtered to the extreme left lane when he realised his mistake.Note: Taxis have investigated the incident and found that the taxi partner had unintentionally made a wrong turn. The driver has a clean record since he joined and has received 3 compliments for good customer service. The driver has been given a verbal warning for this incident.
Diamond Joe Angeline? thanked two SMRT staff members at Yishun MRT station and the commuter, believed to be a nurse, for attending to her brother who had a heart seizure and collapsed while on his way to work. The netizen mentioned that the SMRT staff immediately informed the family about the incident, and went the extra mile to follow up with a call to check on her brothers condition. The netizen hoped that SMRT can give compliments to the staff for their act of kindness.
?Tan Whee Boon?, a wheelchair user, reported the female SMRT bus captain of service 900 (SMB1446B) for refusing to pick him up although the bus had the ramp for wheelchair access. When informed that the incident would be reported to SMRT, the bus captain said that the passenger could go ahead and do so. The netizen mentioned that the incident happened at the bus stop opposite 888 Plaza at around 10:15 a.m. on August 6.The netizen said that four non-wheelchair accessible buses had already passed him by and the fifth bus that came by with wheelchair access refused to pick him up. He was only able to board the sixth bus. Tamim Al Tamimi said that there were many rude drivers. Aloysius Liow pointed out that buses that were not wheelchair-certified were not allowed to pick up passengers in wheelchairs. Edmund Wan stated that service 900 was not yet wheelchair accessible.
On Facebook, SMRT shared the heartwarming note that accompanied a generous contribution from an anonymous donor to the families of the two SMRT trainees who passed away on Mar 22.SMRT stated that the note was encouraging to the families of the victims during this difficult period. Ray Lim asked SMRT to release the other notes from other donors and reveal the amount the "anonymous" donor had given the families of the victims. Izwan Shah said that the public should keep their negative comments to themselves because they were not aware of what was happening behind closed doors. The netizen noted that SMRT did bear and take all the responsibilities. Lauschke Amy stated that SMRT is a public company providing public service so its CEO has accountability to the investors as well as the public.
?Victoria Loh? expressed her frustration having waited for 20 minutes for a train to arrive at Jurong East MRT station. The netizen also mentioned that there were no announcements about the delay.
SBS Transit introduced a new bus service 181M to better serve the needs of Corporation Primary School students. It would serve an additional bus stop along Jurong West Street 23 (bus stop code 27479), starting Mar 21. The new service would make it more convenient for students to travel to and from the school.
On TODAY Online - Voices, HAN WENQI wrote that SMRT was on the right track by establishing a review committee to enhance safety systems. The writer stated that there are potential and predictable hazards in all workplaces and that employers should do a thorough site review regularly.He added that SMRT and the relevant authorities that were assisting in the investigation in the recent SMRT track accident should be commended when their hard work brings improvements in workplace safety.
majestixv3 asked which MRT line was the most reliable. Several netizens stated that the Circle and North-East Line were the most reliable MRT lines since it had less problems compared to other lines. Some mentioned that the East-West Line was the most stable line. Others said that none of the lines were reliable. A few hoped that the new lines to be constructed would be reliable.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament Melvin Yong posted photos of his visit to SMRT Bishan Depot for his weekly worksite ground visit to talk to public transport workers. MP Yong mentioned visiting the Rolling Stock Workshop and the Integrated Electronics Workshop where the small things were worked on to keep the big trains moving every day. The workshops also invest in various innovations to improve productivity at the workplace, including the "consumable supplies" vending machine which dispenses consumable items such as safety gloves, batteries, brushes and tapes. The vending machine removes the need to travel to the store-room, and also reduces over-indenting, thus reducing wastage. He ended his visit with a dialogue between union leaders and SMRT Trains senior management.
Minghui Ming? shared a video showing an SMRT taxi with plate number SHF7E emitting black smoke. SMRT has reached out to ask for the netizens contact details and also the date of the video.
Netizens continued to discuss the new bus service 308 to ply Choa Chu Kang starting May 15. Khairul Hamzah stated that the new bus service was just a feeder service which duplicates two existing services. The netizen mentioned that it would be better if the service would be connected to another part of Singapore.
On Mothership.sg blog, Martino Tan stated that despite SMRTs statement that there had been a safety lapse in the SMRT tragedy, many questions still remain: 1. Why was the third rail still live? 2. Why is the train in auto mode when the staff are on the track? 3. Is there a need for a 15-member team to carry out the maintenance? 4. Were the staff wearing safety vests? 5. Why were four trainees involved? Martino Tan mentioned that Park Byung Joon, adjunct professor at SIM University (UniSIM), stated that the big danger of walking on the track is the chance of being electrocuted. Park also said that a crew of 15 to investigate a reported alarm that had gone off at a servicing point about 150 metres from the platform was slightly large. Martino Tan also added that it was not clear whether the team members were wearing luminous safety vests or whether there were safety personnel flagging for danger in the event of an oncoming train. The writer wondered whether there was an alternative and safer way to teach the trainees rather than sending them on live tracks. He mentioned that the SMRT training centre in the Bishan Depot would be a safer place to teach the trainees as it has training tracks available. The writer hoped that the police and the Ministry of Manpower (MOM) investigations would shed light on the steps taken by SMRT to minimise the risks faced by maintenance staff, and why those procedures failed in the recent tragedy. Andrew Leung said that the LTA should employ more site managers to oversee SMRT daily operations at all the MRT stations and have an operations room and command centre at the stations.
Teckfun Wee? stated that the East-West Line malfunctioned on Mar 30 between 9:15 to 9:41 a.m. The netizen mentioned that the trains did not move and no explanation or announcement was provided.
SBS Transit announced on May 11 a 69.5% increase in its Q1 net profit to S$8.08M. The public transport operator said that its group operating profit for the three months ended Mar 31 was SS$11M, a 60.7% increase from the same period a year ago. SBS Transit noted that revenue from the bus segment was 1.2% at S$198.5M in Q1, due to higher daily ridership. Average daily ridership on buses rose by 3% to 2.9 million passenger trips. Meanwhile, SBS Transits revenue from the train segment climbed 27.4% to S$65M. This was due to the increase in average daily ridership following the commencement of revenue service of Downtown Line 2, offset by lower average fares for North-East Line and LRT due to the fare reduction in December 2015. Several netizens stated that the profits of transport operators should be passed to commuters either through fare rebates or lower fares. Others said that profits of transport operators kept soaring but they also keep asking for higher fares every year. tamago_ said that SBS Transit was smart to introduce bus service 170A to complement its Downtown Line as it had contributed to the public transport fare revenue.
?Gigg Grett? was frustrated for having to wait nearly half an hour for service 912. The netizen also mentioned the bunching of buses, as three buses arrived together.
SBS Transit and the National Transport Workers Union (NTWU) announced in a joint media release on June 1 that Singaporeans and Singapore Permanent Residents (PR) that would join as bus captains would be able to earn a gross monthly salary of up to S$3,460 within their first year, more than 15% higher than before. They would start with a basic monthly salary of S$1,950, S$175 more than the current S$1,775 starting salary. The bus captains salaries would also be bolstered with the extension of a newly introduced reliability incentive which pays up to S$300 a month, if bus captains for 25 trial bus services achieve set targets until August 2016. Gan Juay Kiat, SBS Transit Chief Executive Officer, said that they hope to strengthen its "Singaporean core" with the new package. Melvin Yong, NTWU Executive Secretary, said that SBS Transit had set a "good example" as the biggest local public bus operator. Several netizens stated that SBS Transit increased the salaries of its bus captains because they wanted to remain competitive with the new bus operators who offered higher salaries. Some considered the increase in basic pay good news for bus captains but grave news for commuters, speculating an increase in fares soon. Tan Yeow Kee said that the main objective of the announcement is to get more locals to consider bus driving as a career, which is a good long term move for Singapore. Others stated that the increased basic salary is still too low for Singaporeans. Roger Tan asked whether SMRT would follow suit.
Amrin Amin, Parliamentary Secretary for Home Affairs and Member of Parliament for Sembawang GRC joined the familiarisation tour with the Singapore Association of the Visually Handicapped (SAVH) and Handicaps Welfare Association at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange, to reach out to Woodlands residents on wheelchairs and those who are visually handicapped.The tour allowed this special group of passengers to familiarize themselves with the boarding and alighting berths, handicapped toilets, and ramps.Besides features such as ramps and tactile paving to help the visually impaired find their way, the temporary interchange also has priority queue zones at boarding areas.MP Amrin tried the facilities using a wheelchair to experience it first-hand. He discovered that wheeling-up the ramp was the hardest part for wheelchair users. He stated that "simple everyday things can be very trying. I have a newfound and profound respect for our friends with disabilities".Several netizens praised SMRT and MP Amrin for thinking about the disabled residents and commuters by attending to their transport needs.Shareeda Morrison said that more districts should be disabled friendly. Wilber Yip thanked MP Amrin for personally experiencing what the strong hearted and strong minded people were going through when taking public transport. Bujang Teruna suggested monitoring SMRT bus and train services. Sallie Mikail was happy that someone had finally realised the need for ramps for wheelchair users.
Freeman Cheung Ho Hoi? praised the SMRT staff who was assigned to check the punctuality of buses at Block 335 for assisting an SBS Transit driver in deploying the ramp for wheelchair users to ensure speedy boarding.
Trade visitors and exhibitors had to wait up to over two and a half hours for a taxi on the first day of the Singapore Airshow.For this years Airshow, organiser Experia Events banned taxi bookings in a bid to manage traffic congestion experienced in 2014. Visitors must queue for a taxi - subject to a S$10 surcharge - or pay S$8 for a shuttle bus ride to Singapore Expo. Bicycles and personal mobility devices (PMDs) were also prohibited.The organisers had set aside five lots for taxis to pull over, but commuters only saw a steadier stream of taxis, mainly premium taxis such as Mercedes Cabs and Chrysler Taxi Cabs at around 7 p.m.An exhibitor who has regularly attended the airshow since the 1990s said that the Feb 16 taxi situation was the most poorly managed she has experienced.The organisers said that it has implemented measures such as increasing the frequency of shuttle bus services and working with taxi companies to provide a constant supply of taxis during the event. It would also ensure that restriction notices on bicycles and PMDs are displayed on site and on the event website. Many netizens stated that public transport during the event was poorly managed. Several said that the organisers tried to organise things too systematically that only a few taxis turned up causing inconvenience to visitors. Some said that taxi drivers were partly to blame because they only arrived two hours after the event ended Lim Kiam Peng explained that the taxi drivers that were changing shift at 5 p.m. had to prepare themselves at 4 p.m. because they needed to queue for petrol and wash their taxis at their respective depots where free water and cheaper fuel were provided. For those changing shift at 6 p.m., they needed to stop driving by 5 p.m. to get ready to handover. Chou Shou Kang said that if the Transport Minister and other VIPs were made to queue for the taxis too, the situation might have been resolved promptly.
On Today Online, Voices, Lee Joo Mong wondered why only the small fry got dismissed by SMRT over the fatal train accident in March.The netizen noted that SMRT did not mention the disciplinary action taken against those who were supposed to have trained the supervisors of the maintenance group, the two victims and the train captain. Several stated that sacrificing the ground staff to appease the masses was the way the system works in Singapore.
Alvin Teng wrote on The Straits Times - Forum Letters regarding the improvement of bus bridging services during train disruptions. While the netizen applauded the quick activation of free shuttle bus services during the recent MRT disruption between the Kranji and Admiralty stations on Jan 10, which might be due to the proximity of the Kranji Bus Depot to Kranji MRT Station, he noticed that many of the shuttle bus drivers did not know the proper MRT bus bridging route between Kranji and Sembawang stations. The result was that busloads of passengers went around in circles within housing estates.The netizen said bus drivers should be familiar with the route around the MRT stations.There were also instances of miscommunication among SMRT staff, one example being seen at the Woodlands Bus Interchange, where SMRT staff said the bridging route went all the way to Yishun when the official statement by SMRT and the LTA stated that the shuttle route ended at Sembawang.The signs for the shuttle bus boarding points for commuters were also unclear, stating only that the bridging service could be boarded at the bus interchange, instead of specifying which berth.
Trains on the Circle Line have been running smoothly since Friday evening (September 2) but investigations into the source of the interference were "still ongoing" with the driverless trains still being manned just in case.Together with train signalling systems supplier Alstom, SMRT and the LTA found last week that there was a "presence of an interfering signal" in the Circle Line tunnels which was "within the operating frequency band" of the trains' signalling system. But the experts have not been able yet to identify the source or nature of the interference.Mr Sitoh Yih Pin, Chairman of the Government Parliamentary Committee for Transport, said that the issue was "a cause for concern that needs to be fully investigated and rectified". He added that "we should allow the authorities and SMRT to complete their investigations". Most expressed concern that the source of the interference has yet to be determined. Some pointed out that in engineering, some faults mysteriously appear and disappear and that it was the most difficult fault to troubleshoot.
Following SMRTs announcement of a scheme meeting on September 29 when shareholders would vote on SMRTs privatisation, Rothschild, SMRTs Independent Financial Adviser (IFA), stated that Temasek Holdings' S$1.68-a-share offer to take SMRT private was "fair and reasonable".Rothschild recommended that shareholders either vote in favour of the scheme at a meeting on September 29, or sell their shares in the open market if they were able to obtain a higher price.Some minority shareholders, however, were set to vote against the scheme citing the lowball offer and issues with the new rail financing framework, even though SMRTs independent directors agreed with the findings of the IFA and unanimously recommend shareholders to vote in favour of the buyout. Mark Chan stated that SMRTs privatisation would also remove its accountability to the public. Buck Wee Sim wondered who would be the biggest gainer after the privatisation of SMRT.
When plans for the construction of the Cross Island Line was first announced in 2013, nature groups had expressed serious concerns that it would cut directly under primary and regrowth forests that were over a century old, and over the potential impact of surface works. The nature groups input was incorporated when LTA called for the Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) tender.Phase One of the EIA report concluded that with mitigating measures and controlled access, the proposed drillings would have moderate impact on areas of the nature reserve where the works would take place.The original plan of drilling 72 holes had been reduced to 16 which would be drilled in the Central Catchment Nature Reserve on public trails and areas without vegetation only as part of measures to manage their impact on the nature reserve. There would also be a 30m buffer zone around streams, wetlands and marshes, as well as fluid containment tanks, to ensure no spillage of drilling fluid and to minimise erosion and siltation. The machines would have enclosures added, to reduce noise from the drilling. Several netizens stated that the impact to the environment should be the main focus in the construction of the Cross Island Line. Others disapproved of the construction of the MRT line through the nature reserve. Some were glad that the LTA had consulted nature groups before drilling holes in the Central Catchment Nature Reserve. Lapsang Souchong deemed that the LTA had already decided what to do and was not waiting for the publics feedback from the EIA report. Soh Wee Meng disapproved of drilling holes even at the non-vegetation or trail areas. The netizen suggested using the Circle Line to cross over. Goh Poh Guan hoped that the operation of the Cross Island Line would be awarded to SBS Transit.
Yi JF? asked if SMRT could switch the boarding berth of service 913 with that of service 902. The netizen mentioned that commuters were having a difficult time boarding service 913 because of the long queue for services 164 and 964 during morning peak hours. The makeshift fence around the boarding area also obstructed commuters from walking directly to the bus.
Shawn Ong reported that there was a train breakdown at Jurong East MRT and he was stuck inside the train. The netizen mentioned that the staff had not informed them of the situation.
Netizens continued to comment on Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement that the extra six minutes of travel time as a result of skirting the CRL around the CCNR could not just be "brushed aside" because with a minute's delay, a commuter could post 100 times on Twitter to "flame" the LTA and SMRT.Many netizens stated that the time taken for a journey and a break down creating unexpected waiting times were two different things.On AsiaOne Forum regulation asked others whether they agree to give up six minutes of travel time in order to save the nature reserve. Peter Kwok noted that Minister Khaw did not mention how much the two-year study would cost. Ritz Yeo Weh wondered the need to put a price tag on nature reserves that were priceless. Mustapha Kamal mentioned that Singaporeans were not willing to be delayed for even a minute of travelling time. Peter Ho said that commuters were upset during train breakdowns because of the uncertainty and disruption of service and not because it takes a minute longer to travel. Sas Karma stated that trains break down so frequently that commuters have wasted more than the extra six minutes travel time that caused them to be late for work, appointments and school examinations. Eric Ng remarked that the Government's decision making process was always based on economic benefits.
?Lau Junhe? wondered what happened to bus service 804. The netizen reported that three or four buses always arrive together and commuters had to wait up to 25 minutes for the next bus.
Jun Xiong? asked SMRT to check the fire alarm at Redhill Station which seemed faulty. The netizen mentioned that it was quite a nuisance to hear the alarm in the middle of the night.
?Muhd Naz Farihin? was onboard bus service 911 (SMB1305A) and noticed that the bus had a STOP warning sign displayed on the dashboard, signalling that there was a fault with the engine.The netizen stated that the bus captain should have stopped the bus and contacted the bus operations centre about the fault. The bus captain should have noticed the fault during the bus check before leaving the depot.The netizen hoped that the issue would be highlighted to the maintenance team for the safety of commuters.
Some schools noticed that the traffic situation in the morning outside the schools in the Bukit Timah area appears to have improved slightly with the opening of the new Downtown Line 2.A Straits Times poll of 50 students from schools in the area found that 40% have been taking the train to school since school reopened on Jan 4. Several netizens believed that even if LTA built the stations next to houses it would not solve the peak hour congestion. Some mentioned that parents would still use their cars to take their children to school even if the Government builds 10 more MRT lines. Christina Lau asked the government to reassess the urgency of connecting the MRT from Punggol to Pasir Ris to ease the traffic towards the east side as the population in the area increases.
?Norisah Harun? boarded double-decker bus service 963 (SMB5018C) while carrying her three-year-old child and a bag of medicine. While still on her way up the stairs, the bus started to move off causing her to lose balance. She fell down the stairs with her child and sustained bruises on her leg. While acknowledging that stairs on the bus was a blind spot for the bus captain, she said that he should be more mindful of his passengers and ensure that they are safely seated before deciding to drive off. Sugarbeb Hyda Norisah suggested consulting a doctor and engaging a lawyer to file a case against the bus captain. Normala Harun mentioned that there was a rear mirror where the bus captain could see passengers behind the bus, and refuted that there was a blind spot. The netizen said that it was sheer negligence and poor attitude by some of SMRT bus captains. The netizen mentioned that the injured passengers should be compensated for the suffering and inconvenience.SMRT has since replied to ask for more details to follow up with the case.
An SMRT taxi hit the back of a Comfort taxi at the taxi stand then crashed into a shop unit that was under renovation at Bugis+, injuring a worker. The male victim sustained head injuries and complained of giddiness. He was taken to Tan Tock Seng Hospital.The 65-year-old taxi driver said that he did not know why the car suddenly drove forward and claimed that his foot was on the brake pedal during the entire accident. Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications, said that investigations into the accident were being carried out by SMRT and the Police. Jimmy Tang observed that recent cab accidents showed a common element - elderly cabbies. The netizen said that cab companies need to carefully assess the driving skills of elderly cabbies. Edward Yeo noted that Sudden Unintended Acceleration (SUA) has been a common reason given by taxi drivers during accidents ever since someone reported that a Hyundai taxi had SUA.
Netizens continued to discuss the young female passenger who was smacked on her arm and locked inside the bus by an SBS Transit bus captain and bus inspector because of an expired travel pass. Several netizens stated that although the passenger had an expired travel card, the bus captain and inspector had no right to detain her inside the bus. Some said that when a student concession pass had expired the cardholder would be charged with an adult fare. jurongresident explained that the law states that the bus inspector has the right to detain a passenger who fails to cooperate. sgbuses mentioned that the CCTV inside the bus could reveal what really transpired between the bus inspector and the student passenger.
?Janet Ong? asked why there was no air-conditioning on the train travelling towards Joo Koon. The netizen also reported the escalator at Raffles Place station was down again for maintenance.
bunegg observed that the trains at the North-East line towards Serangoon, Woodleigh, Little India, Dhoby Ghaut and HarbourFront had no data coverage. The netizen mentioned that s/he is an M1 subscriber and asked others if they had the same experience. Elnin0 said that during peak hours there was no coverage at City Hall and Raffles Place. djchris mentioned that the North-South Line from Toa Payoh to Marina South Pier was a dead zone for his/her SingTel line. mata_hippo, who was a StarHub subscriber, had normal connections at the North-South Line. ledzepfan said that the three telcos seemed to have issues with underground coverage and wondered if it was SMRTs fault.
Muhd Khairi who claimed to be a medical personnel from Wild Wild Wet, assisted a passenger who had a seizure attack inside the train. The passenger had hit his head on the metal railing and fell to the ground. Sensing that something was not right, s/he immediately pressed the emergency button and attended to the unwell passenger. Another passenger, who happened to be a nurse, also came forward to offer assistance. The netizen said that s/he attended to the passenger until SMRT staff at Tanah Merah MRT station came and took over. The ambulance was also activated.Muhd Khairi thanked SMRT staff for their quick response.
Adrian Goh stated that the air-conditioning system on the train (Car 3230 at door A1) travelling from Lavender Station seemed to be faulty. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
gallyban stated that trains on the North-South Line was overcrowded and wondered if it was because of the opening of the school term. Some netizens mentioned that the reason for overcrowding was that most schools had started its term already. Singaporeans First said that most foreign talents were also back to work this week. idolcritic stated that commuters should not worry about overcrowding because Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan would resolve the issue. whitegenki claimed that someone had pressed the emergency button at Bishan. whatmeworry said that it was the commuters fault that trains were overcrowded because they chose to take the train at the same time. Genome123 mentioned that train and station capacity was not designed for the current population.
Caleb Ang reported the taxi driver of vehicle with licence plate SHC4772T for overcharging him for a trip on August 14.The netizen said that the taxi picked him up at bus stop number 10099 in Jalan Bukit Merah, opposite Bukit Merah Town Centre. His destination was Tampines Ave 3 and mentioned that he wanted to go by Bartley Road East. The driver, however, informed the netizen that he would take the Central Expressway, to which he agreed. The netizen fell asleep and when he woke up, the taxi was making a U-turn at the Shell Station along Geylang Lorong 7. The netizen said that it was not part of the agreed travel route. When the driver realised that he was awake, he proceeded to the KallangPaya Lebar Expressway.When they arrived at the destination, the fare was already more than S$38. When asked about the expensive fare, the driver only pointed at the taximeter. The netizen asked SMRT to follow up on the issue. Lawrence Teo suggested writing to LTA about the issue. Daniel Fernandez said that the netizen should have confronted the driver about the fare. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the relevant teams can get in touch with him.
Netizens continued to discuss the Bukit Panjang LRT (BPLRT) train that failed to stop at three stations on Jul 28. Responding to a Facebook post by Jacqueline Bong who detailed her experience on the train, SMRT stated on Monday (August 1) that the trains antenna, which ensures the fully-automated train stops accurately at each station, was faulty. Blogger Phillip Ang stated that due to inadequate or improper maintenance, commuters have been made to accept excuses after excuses for major disruptions. The blogger said that SMRT appeared to have insufficient staff at the operations control centre and was unlikely to cope in an emergency as the call from the train intercom was put on queue. He added that the staff at the operations control centre could have executed a manual override to bring the train under control earlier. Kenneth Chung said that SMRTs response sounded like commuters ought to be comforted by the fact that the train did not exceed 55km/h during the incident. The netizen could just imagine the disaster that would have happened if the Automatic Train Protection System had failed too, and no one could alert the operations control centre staff in time. LRT a ticking timebomb was worried that trains were breaking down frequently and that people were getting used to it. Xmen said that it was extremely irresponsible for SMRT to downplay the incident. Woo Qi Lun asked SMRT why they programed an emergency button that only works on a non-moving train.
Japan made an offer to Singaporean authorities to help develop the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur High Speed Rail (HSR), promising that commercial operations could start in seven years if the project were to be placed in Japanese hands. This came after the signing of a memorandum of understanding between Singapore and Malaysia on July 19. At the Second High Speed Rail Symposium held in Singapore on July 22, Yuji Fukasawa, Executive Vice President of East Japan Railway Company (JR East), said that they were confident of contributing their experience and technology to the Singapore-Malaysia HSR project. Fukasawa also presented a graphic that showed how JR East could contribute to the Singapore-KL HSR project should it get the go-ahead. Several netizens hoped that Japan would be awarded the contract for the HSR project. Some stated that it was more important that the trains would be maintained regularly and properly regardless of whoever was supplying the trains. Others mentioned that the main focus should be safety.
?Yvoonne Tan-Tan? praised the SMRT Service Ambassadors (SAs) for reminding passengers to move into the centre of the cabin so that more passengers could board the train during rush hours. The netizen mentioned that an SMRT SA at Eunos MRT station did a good job guiding more passengers into the train cabin. The SA also alerted passengers when the train doors were about to close.
A startup company called nuTonomy plans to launch thousands of driverless taxis in Singapore, a move that could serve as a perfect test case for other major cities around the world looking to introduce driverless cars to their streets. The car would operate using a combination of algorithmic software that employs fleet management. The vehicle would also use Light Detection and Ranging (LIDAR) technology to detect cars on the road as well as stationary objects.Emilio Frazzoli, co-founder of nuTonomy, stated that the nuTonomy autonomous vehicle passed its first obstacle course test in Singapore. The company landed a $3.6M funding, which included a cash infusion from Samsung Ventures.Frazzoli expressed doubts that it would have any local effect on regular taxi drivers and Uber drivers, amid the concern that such efforts might put human workers out of work. Most netizens still prefer being driven by experienced drivers rather than just rely on technology of driverless vehicles. Several asked about the safety of riding driverless vehicles. Some believed that many taxi drivers would be out of their job with the launching of driverless taxis.
?Stanley Eng? thanked SMRT for improving the frequency of bus service 857 in Yishun.
FactWire, the Hong Kong news agency that first broke news of the hairline cracks found on 26 China-made SMRT trains, has defended its reporting amid suggestions that its articles were politically motivated in an open letter to Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan. FactWire cited an article by Singapore socio-political website The Independent, which reported that the minister linked the news by FactWire to factions in Hong Kong with an anti-China political agenda. It quoted the minister who said, We are caught in a crossfire and there are factions in Hong Kong who wanted to cause some difficulties for mainland China. I have no inside information on whether that is true or not, but its possible. Unfortunately, we become a convenient bullet and collateral damage. Whatever it is, it is of legitimate concern to Singaporeans and we have to address them. FactWire maintained that it is funded by the Hong Kong public and that its reporting is independent of commercial or political considerations. Every investigative report posted is founded upon evidence and cover serious public interests. Several netizens stated that the issue and war on words could have been avoided with a principle of transparency from the Singapore Government. Some said that the Government should learn how to better handle such issues in the future and engage the public by releasing information earlier. Some stated that the cracks might not be serious in the short term but might lead to major breakdowns in future. Linda Chiang believed that Factwire clearly had a politically motivated agenda and had carefully planned their expose by going to great lengths to employ drones. Joseph Tan deemed that Factwire was making a point to their countrys authority on its train buying decision and cited similar buyers unfavourable experiences by providing proof in their article. The netizen stated that Singapore was caught unaware because the authorities had chosen to cover things up. He also perceived Factwires article as a persuasion or caution to its own Government with regards to the buying decision and that no other agenda was apparent. Andrew Chua said that the public should accept the explanation given by Minister Khaw Boon Wan and move on from this saga. He mentioned that he was initially critical of the way the Land Transport Authority (LTA) handled the matter but it was important to note that the problems were detected early before any untoward incident happened. Ivan Spencer Wong wondered why the entire delivery of defective products was not rejected in the first place. Some praised Factwire for its professional and prompt response to the false allegations.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan informed Parliament on Apr 12 his bold target for MRT network reliability this year, which is for trains to travel about 50% further without a disruption taking place. The goal is for MRT trains to travel an average of 200,000km between delays of more than five minutes.The "mean kilometre before failure" figure last year was an average of 133,000 train-km travelled between delays, an improvement of about 40% from 2014's 93,000km.Minister Khaw also acknowledged that Singapore's MRT was "way below" Hong Kong's Mass Transit Railway in terms of reliability, which registered 300,000 train-km before a delay.He said Singapore's future could not be car-dominant, and public transport must make a "quantum leap" - through improving the rail system and bus services, and creating a conducive environment to facilitate point-to-point mobility solutions.
ON SMRT Facebook Page, Ryan Ng Wen Song shared a video showing the futuristic Chinese bus concept called the Transit Elevated Bus (TEB) that rides above the roadway allowing traffic to pass underneath the bus thus increasing road space. A scale model of the TEB was shown at the China Beijing International High Tech Expo. Zul Saibot stated that the concept was superb.
SMRT introduced new wheelchair accessible buses (WAB) to eight bus routes including services 302, 800, 812, 903, 912, 913, 960 and 962. Netizens were glad to have more wheelchair accessible buses.
Chang Jueying? commended the SMRT staff members for their effort to provide the best and prompt service to the public. The netizens was impressed with the staffs quick response in assisting a pregnant passenger who was feeling unwell.Other commuters were quick to press the emergency button and that the SMRT staff members of the next station were already waiting to provide emergency assistance.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) wondered if it would encourage people to move to the rear of the bus, if Singapore could accommodate three-door double-decker buses. Ervin Yang stated that it would be interesting if Singapore could accommodate three-door double-decker buses. Chin Zhen Cheng said that instead of moving in the rear, commuters might use the opportunity to take the bus for free with the three-door buses. Muhsin Man said that SMRT should buy such buses and deploy them on feeder services.
?Lin Yong Da? stated that he was woken up by the noise coming from the maintenance works between Fajar and Bangkit LRT stations at 2:10 am. The netizen said that he was losing sleep every time there were maintenance works on the rail track.
Santa Baby stated that to support LTAs call to Give Your Car A Break and have a free ride on the newly opened Downtown Line 2 (DTL2), s/he got on the DTL2 train that passed through twelve stations. The writer also kept track of the exact time every station was reached to confirm with SBS Transits saying that Its closer than you think.The writer mentioned that DTL2 was very auspicious, has good facilities, long escalators, and convenient to use since the bus services were also enhanced.The completion of DTL2 also benefited commercial properties, prestigious areas such as Sixth Avenue, Watten Estate, Robin Road were no longer exclusive, and prestigious girls schools were now more accessible. Two netizens mentioned that DT4 Station was already being built but was not yet commissioned.
Sengkang LRT had a system failure on Apr 11. Commuters posted their complaints on social media, such as the lack of announcements and clear instructions from the staff.
Colin Miles? reported the good deed by the bus captain of service 853C (SMB 7S) who went out of his way to return the netizens phone which had fallen from his pocket. The netizen said that the bus captain refused to accept any reward.
A video shared on Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Facebook page by Net Chen showing a taxi vehicle (SHA4267X) driving into a parked car at Fu Lu Shou Complex has become viral. The owner of the affected car was looking for witnesses or any assistance to track down the driver of the taxi to face the consequences. The vehicle owner reported the incident through ComfortDelGro hotline and asked for assistance. The company was able to locate the driver but the driver denied the incident had occurred. The customer service officer also denied further assistance and any further information about the driver. Fisherman53 suggested sending the video to ComfortDelGro and to make sure that the driver would be apprehended. Peter Lim said that the incident should be reported to the police with the video as evidence against the taxi driver.
News stories were observed regarding the increased in sale volumes and prices of homes near the Downtown Line 2 after its completion.Analysts stated that the MRT effect was a well-recognised one, when price adjustments were likely once a station was completed and started operating. Several netizens noted that the increase in home prices after the opening of an MRT Line was not a new phenomenon. Soonsiang Teo said that the Government should build more lines to boost home prices.
?Aaron Tan? asked SMRT to adjust the timings for service 966 and deploy double-decker buses to accommodate the high volume of passengers.The netizen mentioned that during off peak hours commuters had to wait up to 44 minutes and up to 34 minutes during peak hours.
The LTA, which gave the S$2B figure in response to proposals for the line to skirt around the nature reserve, said that it had yet to estimate the total cost of the 50km Cross Island Line (CRL) as studies on the entire line have not been completed.Industry experts, however, estimated that the project would cost as much as S$40.7B, based in part on calculations for past and ongoing MRT projects. The extra S$2B to build the CRL around the nature reserve would work out to less than 5% of the total cost of the project.Various responses were observed with some suggesting the scrapping of the proposed rail line, while others said that an alternative route should be considered instead of going through the nature reserve.Chua Chee How pointed out that animals were known to be more sensitive to the environment and could feel the rumbling deep within the earth. The netizen said that the residents around the nature reserve could have issues with rodents and primates escaping in huge numbers during tunnelling.Chris Loup said that the Government should not bother with the 4.9% increase in cost to skirt the rail line around the nature reserve if they would be able to serve more people. James B Wright-Brown mentioned that the CRL calls for long term planning and not short term cost counting. Lek Guan wondered whether environmentalist groups were inherently short-sighted for not seeing the greater long-term impact of the rail line compared to the short-term impact of the construction to the environment. The netizen stated that more people could be convinced to stop driving their cars due to shorter MRT travel time.Lye Choon OH asked if there was a need to build the line or whether it was just for the sake of building something. Gu Yanting preferred to have a line that would go to the outer rim of the costal lines rather than having a line which overlaps with existing lines. The netizen mentioned that there is no line that runs from Jurong to Woodlands to Punggol and to Changi directly.Alvin Chong stated that the Government could have better use of the S$40B estimated cost than the rail line.
On current affairs commentary site, The Independent Singapore, Chris Kuan mentioned that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans target to emulate Taipeis efficient rail system was good but was unlikely to be attained as long as conflicts of interest were prevalent in the system. The writer said that LTA should enforce its regulatory role effectively and ensure that the interest of commuters were protected as well as the safety and efficiency of public transport. The trouble, however, was that SMRT is majority owned by Temasek, the state investment holding company tasked with delivering greater amounts of revenue to the Government budget via its net investment return contributions. The objectives of SMRT and LTA were therefore in direct conflict. Chris Kuan also expressed concern that the Government might have to step in with taxpayers money to keep the system running, similar to what it did for the buses. He said that it would be better to delist SMRT and take it off the hands of Temasek and let the Government run SMRT directly. Frank Chong stated that public transport was one of the golden eggs of Singapore and that the Government would do whatever it takes to make profits.
On August 16, SMRT announced in a press release that it would be refurbishing escalators at 42 MRT stations on the North-South and East-West Lines (NSEWL). This would be the first major refurbishment of escalators since 1987 when the MRT began its operations. The escalators would have new features such as traffic lights to indicate the direction of travel and visual indicators, and enhanced safety features. The refurbishment works have already started at Ang Mo Kio MRT station while those at the Tanah Merah and Tanjong Pagar MRT stations would start later this month and in November this year respectively. The project has been contracted to OTIS Singapore for S$47.3M. Several netizens supported the upgrading and refurbishment of the escalators. Some stated that the funds for the escalators should have been used to refurbish the trains. Vickna Anandarajah suggested replacing the escalators with more user-friendly travellators. ??? said that the escalators should be at moderate speed which is slow enough for elderly passengers and fast enough to move commuters safely to the next level. Siah Jin Kim hoped SMRT would not use inferior quality parts for the escalators.
A netizen reported a train fault at Bukit Panjang LRT station apparently because of some train door issues. Sunny Loh said that SMRT should upgrade its trains. (buses[IN]gapore!) mentioned that the train suddenly stopped at the station.
LTA announced that after signing the Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) for the Kuala Lumpur-Singapore High Speed Rail (?HSR) project, Singapore and Malaysia together with MyHSR Corporation Sdn Bhd of Malaysia, would be calling for a joint tender on August 22 to appoint a Joint Development Partner (JDP) to assist in the development of the HSR. The JDP would be expected to provide project management support, technical and procurement advice relating to the high speed railway systems and operations. The JDP would also assist the Joint Project Team established between Singapore and Malaysia with the preparation of documents for the forthcoming tenders relating to the joint aspects of the project. On The Edge Property, MyHSR Corp Sdn Bhd stated that alignments and station locations for the HSR project has yet to be finalised, except for the location of HSR Terminus in Kuala Lumpur in Bandar Malaysia. Chael Tan was uncertain that the HSR project would be completed by 2026 as forecasted, saying the Malaysian Government has yet to decide where the HSR stations would be built. Salihin Hin asked whether LTA already has a plan for the increase in number of commuters from Malaysia at bus interchanges and MRT stations. The netizen asked whether additional bus services would be deployed or would LTA implement shorter headways for both train and buses.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) wondered whether bus intervals were deliberately being controlled under the new bus contracting model scheme to get people to switch to alternative public transport modes such as the MRT or taxis. Several netizens reported that waiting times for buses run by all four operators were longer after the bus contracting model had been implemented. (buses[IN]gapore!) said that the MRT is still faster than buses when there are no delays.
In a written reply on August 15 to a Parliamentary question from Member of Parliament (MP) Zaqy Mohamad on whether the Ministry would review the building of an additional MRT station between Chua Chu Kang and Bukit Gombak MRT stations as large number of residents would be moving into Build-to-Order units in Keat Hong and Chua Chu Kang Towns and the future Tengah Town, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the increase in ridership was insufficient to support a new station.Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that they would continue to monitor the developments in the area and would reconsider their decision based on the ridership, which was a key consideration when deciding to build an additional MRT station.The Transport Minister added that three bus services have been introduced to serve additional residents in the area as part of the Bus Service Enhancement Programme, which he believed would be sufficient to serve the current number of commuters in the area as of now.
?Rei Park Kyungri? asked whether other netizens have heard about Uncle Rickee, the bus captain of service 858 who has provided extraordinary service to his passengers.
The Palmer House and part of the Bestway Building in Tanjong Pagar would be demolished to construct Prince Edward station, while Mount Palmer and a single-storey structure in the Bestway compound would make way for the new Shenton Way Bus Terminal, despite being flagged as worthy of heritage protection by the Singapore Heritage Society. Heritage expert Johannes Widodo from the National University of Singapore described it as "one of the most important places in the history of early 19th-century Singapore".The LTA announced the station last October as part of the 4km Circle Line Stage 6 but some in the heritage community said they were not informed or consulted about the demolition of these places. Dr Yeo Kang Shua, Singapore Heritage Society Executive Committee member called for the authorities to carry out heritage impact assessments before any development plans are finalised. He said, "This will help to address heritage and developmental issues in a transparent manner with proper documentation as well as mitigation measures to help protect heritage concerns and allow more time for documentation." Several netizens disapproved of the plans to demolish the heritage sites saying that most of Singapores history had been torn town. Deuter Onomy noted that there were many unnecessary MRT stations particularly along the downtown line, which were empty most of the time. The netizen said that it was a waste of resources. Yasuo Kuek and Paul Tan suggested using the Palmer House structure to be the MRT station to preserve the exterior of the building. Lee Peng Soon said that in the future, the only heritage sites would be the MRT stations.
Just two days after Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan announced that the North-South Line had cleared 100 days without major disruptions, Singapores MRT system saw two breakdowns on Apr 21, first on the North-South Line (NSL) and later along the North-East Line (NEL). For close to an hour from 6:09a.m., services from Marina South Pier to Newton towards Jurong East along the NSL were disrupted due to a stalled engineering vehicle at Raffles Place that was used for maintenance work.Later at about 11:11 a.m., train services on the NEL were disrupted between Chinatown and Farrer Park Stations in both directions due to a power fault at Dhoby Ghaut Station. Several netizens observed that every time the Transport Minister said something positive about the rail system, a train would break down within a couple of days. SmarTIndex stated that working harder would not improve the MRT. The netizen said that the Transport Minister should hire the right people to pinpoint the main cause of the rail issues. Ong Pang Yaw mentioned that there was almost another disruption at Tampines Station around 6 p.m. when a train was seen stalled. However, train service resumed after a short while.
?Ong Weijian? reported the last bus service 851 (SMB1483T) that was headed to Bukit Merah Interchange on August 14 for not stopping at bus stop 53129 despite him flagging for the bus.The netizen mentioned having to take a cab home because of the incident. Sonia Alex mentioned having a similar experience with bus service 979M but she had no money to take a cab.
?Jayden Yap? complimented the bus captain of bus plate number SMB1526D for his assistance.The netizen mentioned boarding the bus and had accidentally paid the fare using an adult travel card. S/he asked that bus captain for a refund and the bus captain willingly helped without any hesitation.
?Willy Soo? shared a video showing an SMRT bus beating the red light at Jalan Bukit Merah. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it. CMC has also informed Buses, and the team is currently investigating the incident.
?Denise Ng? asked why did bus service 979M travelling from Bukit Panjang not stop along Choa Chu Kang North 6. The netizen said that the bus passed by the bus stop at Blk 634 and stopped at Opposite Yew Mei Green. Jared Ho explained that service 979M was a temporary route and the stops that it calls at would be integrated into service 979 once Stagmont Ring had been widened. The netizen also explained to ?Denise Ng? that Service 979M only calls at bus stops that Service 979 will call at in future. Jemond Lee said that it was inconvenient if not all bus stops were not included in the route. The netizen said that he had to walk to the bus stop opposite Yew Tee MRT to take 979 instead.
?Mervyn Ang asked if there had been changes with bus service 853's timetable because the bus departed from Yishun at 06:52 a.m. instead of 06:50 a.m., and the next bus departed at 06:59 a.m. instead of 06:57 a.m. The netizen noticed the changes starting last week.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about service 77 bus captain Seah Kian Chye who pays great attention to the safety of commuters, waiting for them to be seated before driving off and reminding them to hold on to railings.In a video interview posted, Seah stated that he was prompted to start announcing the locations after a passenger missed the stop. Jomari Punzalan stated that the announcements were very helpful to those not familiar with the place. Au Angela thanked bus captain Seah for making the passengers journey pleasant.
Bobby Chan? asked SMRT for advice on how to retrieve the scooter he left in an SMRT taxi.
Some-one observed that the MRT lines were getting more and more complex. S/he said that there was no need to refer to the MRT map previously as the whole map could be registered in his/her head. Nowadays, however, s/he needed to refer to the map especially when using the Circle Line, which was confusing. Some netizens stated that they did not need to refer to a map when taking the MRT. Others said that train lines in other countries were more confusing. Whisper mentioned that s/he took the wrong line and ended up in Johor Bahru. hotstuff4u said that there were so many changes in the MRT lines and even the bus interchanges had also changed.
Joel wrote about bus service 960 which emitted smoke while travelling along Woodlands Avenue 3.The netizen who was onboard the bus recounted hearing a loud bang from behind the bus before grey smoke started to emit from the buss engine. The passengers took the initiative to alight from the bus and looked for alternative transport as the bus captain did not request for a replacement bus or offer free rides for commuters to continue with their journey.Several netizens stated that during emergency situations, commuters should not wait for the bus captains instructions for them to get off the bus.Mohamad Syahid Bin Arif assumed that the driver was new and was not sure on what to do. The netizen hoped SMRT would investigate the incident.Md Alf said that in his years of driving both private and SBS Transit bus, they were trained to give instructions to passengers in cases of breakdown, accident or anything that compromise safety.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian shared a link to an article which makes a fair comparison between the rail system in Singapore and Hong Kong.Dheera Venkatraman, Chief Technology Officer at Virtulus, stated that Singapore and Hong Kongs rail system were a close match because they were both excellent systems and a pleasure to use. Venkatraman, however, stated that Hong Kongs MTR was better than that of Singapore for a few reasons:1. Hong Kongs MTR has higher frequency and has longer operating hours than the MRT.2. Taking photos and videos were allowed in the MTR. 3. Bicycles that were either folded or with the front wheel taken off were permitted onboard the MTR during off-peak hours. 4. The MTR has slightly better connections to nearby systems, while Singapore's MRT connects to neither the Causeway towards Johor Bahru nor the KTM station in Singapore.5. The MTR has a special airport express train with fewer stops and a downtown check-in facility. 6. Hong Kong has a slightly better thought-out user experience. For example, exchange stations come in pairs, and passengers can walk over to the other side of the platform to transfer to the other line. Interchanges and methods of transferring trains were also clearly marked out on the MTRs maps. Singapore also has the same pair setup at City Hall and Raffles Place interchanges, but they were not marked clearly on the map.PK Shiu, on the other hand, stated that it was not fair to compare the MTR with Singapores MRT because the MTR covers a much larger area. The netizen, however, mentioned that s/he was always impressed with Hong Kongs MTR and its network of subways, buses, mini-buses, light rails and rails. The netizen provided the following notable highlights of the MTR:1. Platform interchanges were designed to allow commuters to change lines easily by walking across platforms. 2. Staff were deployed to help direct passenger flow in and out of the stations during rush hours. Entrances were split into entry and exit only.3. Rush hour trains arrive every 60 seconds on the dot.4. Staff members could be seen at every section of the stations to assist commuters passing through the gates.
Singapore's public transport system would undergo a thorough assessment, through research studies, surveys and focus groups as the Public Transport Council (PTC) takes on its new role as advisor to the Government on public transport issues. Aside from its primary role of regulating fares, the PTC would also be tasked with making recommendations on how to improve public transportation. Richard Magnus, PTC chairman, said that this would be the first time that an independent body has assessed Singapore's public transport system. Issues would be studied from commuters' perspective, and would make study visits, commission research and conduct surveys, to help assess the current state of the public transport system and determine where it needs to be. He added that the council would take an unbiased position.The PTC has also sought an in-principle agreement from a Tokyo transport institute to collaborate on a study.The current fare review mechanism and formula would be valid until 2017 but a review would take place before then, where the transition to the bus contracting model and changes in costs and operating structures would be taken into account.Several netizens wondered why the PTC was assigned as advisor to the Government on transport issues when its role was to make sure public transport was affordable. Some stated that the public transport system should be working properly without the need to compare with other countries transport system. Francis Chong said that there was no need to compare with other countries because each country has its own unique circumstances, needs and situations.Dennis J Tan stated that the PTC would now bear the effect of all faults in public transport. The netizen added that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan has found a scapegoat for all breakdowns.Richard Tan mentioned that the PTC should start by learning from the New York subway system on how it remained reliable despite the ageing system.
The Ministry of Transport released the written reply of Transport minister Khaw Boon was to Member of Parliament Melvin Yong Yik Chye regarding the number of female bus captains currently employed. MP Yong also asked LTAs plans to work with the public bus operators to recruit more women to join the bus captain profession especially those seeking to re-enter the workforce.Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan replied that 575 female bus captains were currently employed by the four public bus operators, which made up about 6% of the total number of bus captains.The LTA has also been working with the operators to recruit more local bus captains, including women. Tower Transit Singapore and Go-Ahead Singapore already offered female employees up to 26 weeks of paid maternity leave. Tower Transit Singapore also offers female employees an enhanced maternity benefit of S$300 to 700 annually, as well as additional childcare leave.
?Tommy Ong? asked SMRT to look into the bus schedule of service 307. The netizen mentioned that three 307 services departed from Choa Chu Kang Interchange at the same time.The netizen also suggested deploying bendy buses to ease high demand for said service.
Gilbert Goh, President of transitioning.org, said that there were things that SMRT could improve on its handling of the fatal accidental death of its two maintenance workers. 1. Apologise first and hold off all immediate official press conference.2. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should not have boasted about a milestone before condoling with the family of the two workers killed in the SMRT accident.3. Improve on the safety protocol for its maintenance crew.4. Have a transparent and comprehensive investigation.5. Safety should be the priority over efficiency.6. Hire experienced workers that speak and understand basic English.7. Nationalise the public transport system.8. Cater to the funeral needs of the families and provide a justified compensation to the two families of the two victims.9. Administer the right punishment to the police who deliberately posted on social media the private pictures of one of the victims. Gilbert Goh, however, appreciated and applauded SMRT for changing the official red and white SMRT logo to black and white almost immediately after the tragic incident. PAP's 2nd big mistake stated that the second big mistake by the Peoples Action Party was privatising public transport William C wondered why 15 workers were on the track. The netizen stated that if the accident happened in Hong Kongs MTR, a daily press conference might have been held to update the public to show full accountability and transparency. The netizen assumed that in Singapore, however, SMRT CEO and his team were having closed door discussions on what story to tell the public. Desmond Kuek not revealing all mentioned that SMRT has yet to admit the breach of two safety protocols. The netizen claimed that an SMRT staff informed him that only a maximum of seven workers were allowed to walk on the tracks at one time and that a maintenance team was supposed to block off the tracks before anyone could be allowed to step onto the track, in the event of a runaway train.
?Joe Winther Tan? stated that the train (3507) travelling from Eunos to Boon Lay was very warm and stuffy. The netizen hoped that the thermostat could be lowered to provide commuters a better environment during the hot weather.
?Sharon Goh Rui Ting reported the bus captain of service 187 for driving recklessly from Woodlands to? Boon Lay. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it.
It was reported that the story about the SMRT taxi driver who purportedly returned S$235,000 to a passenger who left it in his cab which was initially shared on Beh Chia Lor Facebook page, might have been a hoax.Soong Hoongji wrote a detailed blogpost highlighting a few points of contention about the said incident. The argument could be boiled down to two main points:1. Lee and Khammat have actually been Facebook friends since 20102. The picture of the cash that accompanied the article on Ben Chia Lor was found to be from a Twitter account back in 2014.In the midst of the scandal, the taxi driver has spoken up against the accusations. He argued that there were inconsistencies, and Beh Chia Lor got the name of his passenger wrong. On his Facebook post, Lee, the taxi driver, did not deny knowing Khammat. But he insisted that the Thai businessman he picked up was in fact named P Phen. Beh Chia Lor, however, implied that they had already met, or at the very least, interacted with an individual named Chukamon Khammat who provided them with a photo of Lees SMRT ID.SMRT is currently investigating the situation. Several netizens were waiting for the outcome of SMRTs investigation regarding the matter. Romeo Casanova wondered who would carry such a big amount of money.
On Facebook, 938LIVE asked netizens what it would take to get people to use their cars less or give them up altogether. Some netizens suggested measures to make driving inconvenient such as reducing the number of parking lots and road lanes or increasing CBD parking charges. Tun Tan-Sri Dato Tang said that if inconvenience and frustration was to be used to encourage people not to use their cars, COEs and ERPs should be removed. The resulting traffic jams would be frustrating and inconvenient that more drivers would opt out and turn to trains and buses as traffic get worse. Samuel Ykw mentioned that if the public transport system was more reliable and should get everyone to their destination at a shorter time with a more direct route, more people would opt for public transport given the scarcity of parking lots and the peak hour traffic jams. Lim Guan Seng said that the age limit for drivers should be raised. Leon Boyd said that there was no direct public transport between his home in Bedok and his workplace in Sembawang. A journey would either consist of changing trains twice or taking a bus or train to Tampines and then taking another bus from there. The netizen stated that he would only give up his car if there was a faster and better way to get to work and back home each day. Jeffrey Yeo mentioned that the public transport network still has a long way to go before it could be considered extensive enough for people to give up their cars. The netizen added that Singapores temperatures and weather were not conducive for walking or cycling. Paul Antony Fernandez said that the only way to discourage car usage was by ensuring the public transport network was maintained regularly and that professional engineers were engaged on a quarterly basis to pre-empt any problems that would affect the smooth operations.
?Sonia Alex? reported that the bus captain of service 979M drove off even though there were three commuters flagging for the bus at the Ten Mile Junction bus stop even before it reached the said stop. The netizen hoped SMRT would train their bus captains.
?Naoffi Lolphes? reported that a bus captain of service 75 (SMB329M) refused to allow passengers to board his bus and motioned the commuters to take the service 75 bus (SMB1507J) in front which was already packed with passengers.The netizen shared some general information found on SBS Transits website regarding similar instances: "Sometimes, Bus Captains refuse to open the door for me despite seeing me trying to catch the bus. Why?All our Bus Captains are required to stop for passengers to board the bus before moving off if they can see the commuters approaching the bus and the bus is still in the bus stop bay. However, if the bus is partially out of the bus stop bay even though it is still within the bus lane, the Bus Captains have been advised not to stop for alighting or boarding activities for safety reasons."The netizen clarified that the second bus was still at the bus bay and had not attempted to leave the bus bay so the driver should have allowed commuters to board his bus.
Police announced that the 37-year-old man suspected of molesting female passengers on board the MRT had been arrested. A female victim had come across a post on a social media site on Jan 2 about a man allegedly touching an unknown female passenger on board a train from Sembawang MRT station towards Bishan MRT station.Acting on the post, the female victim lodged a report with the police on the same day, alleging that she had been molested by the same suspect. If convicted, the suspect faces a jail term of up to two years or a fine and would also be liable to caning. Several netizens praised the police for promptly arresting the alleged molester. Some mentioned that those who encountered similar crimes should confront the person and report the incident immediately to authorities instead of just taking photos and posting it online. NiuGe advised female commuters not to be too engrossed with smart phones and mobile devices and not to doze off when seated to avoid being a victim of molestation on trains. James Ng wondered why the CCTV in the train did not expose the crime committed.
The Land Transport Authority shared a video on Facebook featuring the new Bus Contracting Model. Apart from a different bus livery colour, logo and bus captains uniform, the fares, routes and bus stops remain unchanged for the new Bus Contracting Model. Richmond Lim considered the logo ugly saying that it looked like it was designed by a primary 1 student. Alvin Yap agreed that the logo was ugly and it spoiled the image of the bus. YK Jackie Lee said that the buses should still carry the operators livery even if the buses are owned by the Government.
?Caleb Lee asked SMRT to deploy more wheelchair accessible double-deckers for service 854. The netizen said that there were occasions when several non-wheelchair accessible bus services would arrive consecutively, sometimes four in a row, resulting in longer wait for passengers in wheelchairs.
On Facebook, The Online Citizen republished an article first published in 2015 of a former SMRT Assistant Engineers (AE) resignation letter containing reasons why he resigned from the company.In the collection of documents which the former SMRT engineer had compiled, it could be seen from email conversations how AEs were being asked, for example, to "downscale" the status of incidents from "incident" to "routine maintenance" in records and also the sharp increase of escalator breakdowns in the year 2003 in comparison to 2001 and 2002. The former AE also mentioned that there was an apparent lack of interest in resolving problems even after s/he had raised issues and offered concrete suggestions. The former AE shared how his colleagues had thoughts of leaving the company given the lack of regards to maintenance by the company and how double standards were practiced on matters such as disciplining staff. Stephen Tan considered the allegations against SMRT very serious and asked SMRT to respond accordingly. Terry from The Online Citizen replied that the article was published in 2015 and did not receive any rebuttals from SMRT then.
SMRT announced that from Jun 5 to Dec 18, train services at 13 stations along the North-South and East-West Lines would be starting an hour later on all Sundays except public holidays. The affected stations would be from Joo Koon to Queenstown on the East-West Line and from Bukit Gombak to Jurong East on the North-South Line. According to SMRT, the later starting times would enable project, track patrol and maintenance teams to gain the equivalent of 29 additional maintenance nights over the six-month period. Lee Ling Wee, Managing Director of SMRT Trains, said that the company's priority was to ensure rail renewal works were carried out "safely and in the shortest time possible to improve rail reliability". SMRT also seeks the understanding and patience of commuters and the general public as they do their very best to complete the various renewal programmes with minimal impact to its train services. Commuters were encouraged to plan their travel to start after 7 a.m. on Sunday mornings where possible. For those that have to travel before 7 a.m., it was recommended that they use existing bus services to get to other train stations, or use the Circle Line and Downtown Line to get to the city. The company added that it had arranged for a new parallel bus service to ply the route from Joo Koon to Bukit Gombak in both directions, and would release more information on the new service and its fares within the next few weeks. Several netizens disapproved of the late start of train revenue service saying that shift workers would be most affected by the change. Some suggested closing the North-South and East-West Lines the whole day on Sundays so the tracks would be fixed at a shorter period. Others stated that there should be more parallel bus services to avoid inconveniencing commuters. Annabelle Neo said that employers should take note of the new Sunday train schedule and change the working hours on Sundays as well. Danny Kok hoped that SMRT could assure commuters that services would improve and there would be fewer disruptions after the renewal works. Some netizens commented that nurses will be affected by the SLO, especially when most of them start their shift at 7am.
Kitaro9202 stated that an SMRT staff asked him/her to exit the station to finish his/her drink. Most netizens praised the SMRT staff for doing his/her job in imposing the rule against drinking and eating on MRT stations and trains.Some mentioned that the staff should be given an award by SMRT.Others said that the netizen should be glad that the staff did not fine him/her right away.Some mentioned seeing other commuters drinking and eating inside stations and trains but were never apprehended.Techno Pride wondered why SMRT was renting out retail spaces to eateries outside the gantry area if food and drinks were not allowed inside stations and trains.
In a blog post on May 26, Executive Secretary of the National Transport Workers' Union Melvin Yong urged LTA and public transport operators to look into improving the work environment of rail maintenance workers.Mr Yong highlighted the importance of rail maintenance workers in helping the public rail transportation run smoothly. He added that rail maintenance workers face many challenges, including time constraints and poor air conditions. He also stressed the importance of workplace safety, citing the incident which happened at Pasir Ris MRT station on Mar 22 where two maintenance workers were killed. In his post, Mr Yong touched on the need to improve work productivity. He said he observed the use of a modified track trolley in train tunnels to reduce physical labour when conducting maintenance work, as well as a vending machine at the worksite to draw commonly-used tools and parts, reducing the need and time to travel to and from the store. However, he added that certain work practices could be more "age-friendly". Given the ageing workforce, more could be done to make such work easier for the more elderly workers through automation and mechanisation.Mr Yong also mentioned his recent visit to Hong Kong MTR, where he learned and understood their significant investments in technology and innovation, and added that Singapore could definitely learn from the Hong Kong MTR. Sp Fairley said that despite the MRT, LRT and bus being in operation for many years, it was astonishing that the working conditions of maintenance staff were not previously noticed by the NTUC, MOM and LTA. Sorensen Lkh asked what safety improvements were implemented by public transport operators over the past few decades. Hazette AK stated that any costs involved in improving work environment might be passed on to commuters.
On Facebook, the People's Action Party shared Member of Parliament Melvin Yongs experience driving a bus at the SMRT Training School (Singapore BTEC).MP Yong said that it was not easy driving a bus and that he met an accident upon making his first turn using the simulator. He has come to understand that being a bus captain encompasses much more than just operating a huge vehicle. A bus captain also has to manage more advanced systems in the bus as well as commuters today, who often have higher expectations. They also face abuse in their daily duty.MP Yong also met and spoke with many female bus captains, which comprises less than 10% of the bus captains. He hoped to attract more females to become bus drivers in the future. He also urged the public to show respect and appreciate the work of the bus captains. Netizens thanked the bus captains for their service.
SMRT and the Football Association of Singapore announced on Friday that the local transport operator would promote the S.League across its commercial and retail network. The estimated cost of the deal over three years is S$1M.The two parties kicked off their deal by launching an S.League-themed train at Marina South Pier MRT station.The train, which would be in operation on the East-West Line until Apr 7, featured posters of S.League stars like Jermaine Pennant, Ken Ilso and Madhu Mohana. Specially designed hangers promoting the Great Eastern Community Shield match between Albirex Niigata and Brunei DPMM also hang from the handrails.The match highlights would also be shown on TV screens on MRT platforms, while posters of stars would be put up at train stations closest to their "home" stadiums.Dawn Low, SMRT Commercial Managing Director, said the tie-up would help make commuting a more enjoyable experience. She added that the company would want to promote local sports, as part of their corporate social responsibility efforts.Several netizens stated that SMRT should have used the S$1M funds to improve their service and maintain its train and tracks.Some mentioned that nobody watches the league and regardless of how much the league was promoted, attendance would still be poor.Others asked whether the themed trains would help reduce the number of train breakdowns and delays.markyII said that it was an Interesting method to reduce the crowd on the trains.
?Perrine Ban-mian Pang? reported the bus captain of service 187 for not stopping at the bus stop despite him pressing the bell about 300m before the bus stop. The netizen said that the bus captain even accused them of not pressing the bell earlier.
On SMRTs Facebook page, SMRT shared that the company provides excuse chits, as proof that commuters were affected by train services delays. SMRT said that the slips are available at the Passenger Service Centres. Commuters can approach station staff in the event that they need one. SMRTs post was in response to a commuters suggestion in The Straits Times article yesterday (September 21) regarding the Circle Line delays on September 20. The commuter said that SMRT should provide breakdown slips so that they could show their employers in cases of train service delays and disruptions. Lee Zhi Da suggested implementing an online breakdown slip for mobile apps users.
SBS Transit announced that its train and bus services would be extended by about two hours on the eve of the Chinese New Year. Train services on the North-East and Downtown Lines would be extended by about two hours, while services on the Punggol and Sengkang LRT systems would also be extended to coincide with the last train arrivals on the North-East Line. A total of 35 bus services would also be extended at their respective bus interchanges and terminals to complement the extension of train operating hours. Meanwhile, 15 bus services would skip eight bus stops in the vicinity of Chinatown from 5 p.m. on Feb 7 to 3 a.m. on Feb 8, due to road closures for the Chinese New Year Countdown Celebration. Panzerf said that train and bus services should be available for 24 hours and that the two-hour extension of services would not be enough. Ken Ho stated that many people would be overseas during the CNY. ashieru asked how the CEOs salary was calculated.
Jasper Lee shared a photo of a cracked windscreen on service 67A22 bus with license plate 1482X.
SMRT and the LTA have reduced the evening peak fleet on the North-South and East-West lines (NSEWL) in the aftermath of the Apr 25 power incident that crippled the western half of four lines. Maximum number of trains on the NSEWL has been reduced from 118 trains to 116 trains. The two trains were taken from the East-West Line.The train reduction was implemented to reduce the electrical load on the system, until a full investigation into the unprecedented incident has been completed. Commuters did not seem to notice the difference. Meanwhile, the LTA said that the new intake station on the Tuas West Extension would help the Buona Vista intake station support the power load in the western region.
steven jialat mentioned that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans latest Facebook post regarding his visit to Pasir Panjang container terminal suggested that he did not care about the recent MRT breakdowns. BHills pointed out that being busy with other important aspects of Singapore transport did not necessarily suggest that Minister Khaw did not care about the MRT breakdowns. The netizen thanked the thread starter for letting others know that the Minister was also busy with other transportation matters. Some netizens mentioned that Minister Khaw should not have posted about the improvements in the port system as it might break down like the MRT. SotongLove mentioned that former Transport Minister Lui Tuck Yew would have addressed the issue on disruptions before attending to events.
?Nicholas Lim? asked SMRT for clarification regarding taking of photos within SMRT premises.The netizen mentioned that he was stopped by two CISCO officers from photographing the new berths at the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen, however, wondered why many people were allowed to take photos during the opening of the temporary interchange. He also asked about the new WhatsApp service, SMRT SnapRep, where passengers were encouraged to snap photos of defects and send it to SMRT. Several netizens mentioned that they were asked to delete the photos taken inside the temporary bus interchange and also wanted some clarification from SMRT regarding the matter.
Home Affairs and Law Minister K Shanmugam asked the police to get to the bottom" of the alleged attacks on three Madrasah students at Paya Lebar MRT.On Facebook, Nisha Mohd Hussein, a purported teacher from Madrasah Al-Maarif Al-Islamiah, stated the victims description of the assailant, adding that one student was kicked on the left thigh, another hit by a heavy item contained in a plastic bag, and the last was hit in the same manner on one of her eyes.The students described the attacker as a middle-aged man wearing a red T-shirt, light brown shorts with black boots and carrying a green backpack and white plastic bag. Several netizens hoped that SMRT would assist in the investigation by providing footages from the security cameras at Paya Lebar Station. Some hoped that witnesses would come forward to provide details of the incident as Paya Lebar MRT station was usually crowded.
(buses[IN]gapore!) reported an accident between an SMRT bus and two SBST buses which occurred after the bus captain of service 969 tried to squeeze the bus in between two SBST buses at Tampines interchange.The SMRT bus captain had likely misjudged the turning radius of the bendy while exiting which led to the accident. SBST staff were on site to assist the passengers.(buses[IN]gapore!) tagged SMRT to the post to inform them of the accident.Several netizens assumed that the SMRT bus driver might be in a hurry and was already late for his timings. Hui Jniguhi said that service 969 has the tightest schedule s/he had ever seen. The bus captains typically rest less than five minutes before starting a new trip again .
?Wang Kang Rong? stated that the air-conditioner at train car number 3328 was blowing hot air.
Eunice Goh? thanked the staff members at Orchard Station for assisting her domestic helper after the latters bag was caught in between the train doors. The helper had to let go of her bag when the train doors closed. She approached the passenger service crew who immediately tracked her bag and contacted the person who found it.
A blog post on the satirical site, States Times Review, mentioned that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan mischievously misled Singaporeans about the reliability of Singapores public railway system by calling the 100-day major disruption-free on the NSL a success. It was also mentioned in the blog post that Minister Khaw cherry-picked the NSL and left out the recent results on rail reliability released by the Land Transport Authority on 5 April, which highlighted a rise in major train breakdowns from 2014. James Ng wondered if the media had received instructions not to report on train breakdowns. halsey02 said that the Government failed to factor in the open door policy which resulted in the influx of foreigners to the country, causing overcrowding on trains and buses.
?Loh Mel Ken? heard some noises coming out from the engine bay of SMB77R which seemed to indicate a loose washer or bearing. The netizen added that the rear window has its gaskets hanging out as well.SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Yuehong Song mentioned alighting at bus stop 44259 near Bukit Panjang Plaza hoping to catch service 979 for the first time as the new service stops near his/her home. To the netizens disappointment, no service 979 stopped at said bus stop despite 979 being listed on a sign pole as among the buses servicing the bus stop. The netizen eventually found an inconspicuous sign indicating that service 979 does not serve bus stop 44259.The netizen said that SMRT should take immediate action to remove all the other erroneous signs that states 979 serves the said bus stop. Andrew Loy said that the netizen should send his/her feedback to the LTA as it was responsible in maintaining bus stops. Wan Wei Jian explained that service 979 serves the said bus stop but as a terminating stop.
On SMRTs Facebook Page, ?YiLing Goh? reported an SBS Transit bus captain who sat beside her at Hougang Bus Interchange while another took a picture of them sitting together. The netizen reported the issue to the police but was informed to report the incident to the operators of the bus interchange. She said that the bus captains action was a clear case of harassment. SMRT replied that they understood the netizens concern and referred her to SBS Transit, who manages the interchange.
?Lau Siong Eng? reported that the lights at the staircase towards platform 2 of the Bukit Panjang Segar LRT station were faulty since a month ago and have yet to be replaced. The netizen said that it was very dangerous to use the staircase at night as it is very dark and accidents could occur.
?Rui Hang Mei? shared a video showing a Dynamic Route Map Display which he hoped SMRT would introduce on its new trains.
Donald Kuok stated that commuters had to wait for four service 858 buses after the Punggol stop before being able to board during peak hours. The netizen claimed that SMRT was taking their own sweet time to resolve the issue as it would increase their profit margin to have many passengers in a bus. In a later post, the netizen stated that the external factor affecting the service was that too many people were trying to board the bus and the bus captain could not close the door delaying the said service. ?? stated that at 6:55 a.m. on Jan 19, three 858 buses arrived at the same time at the Yishun Central bus stop. The netizen mentioned waiting for 15 minutes before the three buses arrived. Tan Soo Hock said that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should take the bus every day for a year to really understand the issues. Elvis Quek stated that the said bus service was packed like sardines almost every day and that SMRT had to take action.
?John Goh thanked the hardworking and polite staff of SMRT. The netizen mentioned that he and his children have enjoyed the smooth and cool rides so far.
kevinlegend started a thread asking rail engineers, train enthusiasts and SMRT employees the common reasons why MRT trains were so slow. The netizen mentioned that s/he wrote the thread while onboard the slow train at the East-West Line. Several netizens explained that trains at the East-West Lines were moving slow because of speed restrictions implemented while sleeper replacement works were ongoing. Some stated that trains also stop longer at some stations causing delays to the trains behind them. pkismeyea said that the improvements being done by SMRT nowadays could have been done years ago. The netizen said that everything started to go downhill when former SMRT CEO Saw Phaik Hwa decided that it would be better to add more retail stalls at the stations rather than maintaining the rail system.
A week after a panel of experts had called for a sweeping reform of the MRT power system, SMRT experienced power faults for two consecutive days. Experts also recommended certain components like switches and power tripping devices be replaced with more reliable models. Some asked who would pay for the upgrade of the power system, with some suggesting that SMRT should offer free rides on Sundays and public holidays, should LTA fund the upgrade. DeadandBuried noted that most of the senior engineers with the most experience retired after SMRT was privatised.
Netizens continued to discuss LTAs plan to install an electromagnetic shield on MRT trains after a mysterious signal interference disrupted service on the Circle Line three weeks ago. Electromagnetic shields are used in secured facilities, high-tech laboratories or on sensitive electronic equipment to protect them from possible outside interference. In a joint statement with SMRT on September 21, LTA said that it would soon start feasibility studies on ways "to strengthen the existing signalling communications network", including the possibility of changing the signal frequency of the network. The transport authority would also look at modifying the system "to provide redundancy in the event of signal interference". It was noted that the signalling systems on newer lines and other lines were already equipped with new features that provide redundancy in the event of signal interference except for the Circle and North-East Lines. The five-year-old Circle Line and the 13-year-old North-East Line, however, do not have these features. In the interim, spectrum analysers would be installed in the Circle Line tunnels and later to be extended to the North-East Line to detect stray transmissions. Sharp Lam said that LTA should study the High Speed Rail in Korea that supported 4G network and have seamless streaming while in high speed mode to have better insights on how it could work cohesively while Singapore trains could not. Mustapha Kamal asked whether SMRT had considered the possibility of a portable interference device that might have been brought inside the trains. SK Toh mentioned that the first principle in engineering was to know and understand the root cause to be able to solve a problem. Yan Zibit said that the money would be better spent on having actual train captains and create jobs in the process, instead of having automated trains.
euko82 stated that the underpass between Waterway Point mall and Punggol MRT station had no lift and downwards escalator. The netizen was concerned for the elderly and those with difficulty in walking. Singkaporlang mentioned that there was another exit from Punggol MRT that leads directly to Waterway Point. UptheToon stated that the developers of the mall had not foreseen the issue during the construction of Waterway Point.
?Wang Kang Rong? said that it was very confusing for commuters when the platform display monitor showed Service A at Choa Chu Kang LRT station but the announcement and staff informed commuters that they could not board the train. The netizen asked SMRT to inform commuters the correct status of service at Bukit Panjang LRT.
?Nicholas Yan? stated that the driver of train 3313 travelling from Jurong East to Bukit Batok closed the doors only after five minutes and even after the other train at Platform A had arrived and started boarding passengers. Upon arrival at Bukit Batok, the train driver took a long time figuring out how to open the train doors. The netizen mentioned that such lapses by train drivers might cause people to miss their transfers to buses and also cause others to wait longer than expected along the line.
The LTA announced the rolling out of the second tranche of the Bulim bus package for six bus services at Jurong East Bus Interchange.The transport authority also sought the understanding of commuters as they iron out the teething issues during the transition period. Goh Poh Guan asked Tower Transits bus captains to speed up a little. Pang Soon Tan reported that there was bunching of bus service 143 and that the town map for Jurong East did not include the HDB block numbers.
On August 29, Jacy Ho? mentioned waiting patiently for passengers to alight the train before boarding but was surprised to hear the alarm indicating the closing of train doors soon after. The netizen mentioned that the doors closed right after the alarm had been set off.Jacy Ho? said that a male passenger was caught between the doors. When the next train arrived, commuters in the queue did not bother to wait for the passengers to alight and everyone rushed into the train in fear of being unable to board or caught between the train doors.The netizen suggests to increase the waiting time for commuters to alight and board the train before the doors close during peak hours. The SMRT Facebook administrator acknowledged the netizens feedback and conveyed his/her suggestion to the relevant team for consideration.
Kean Cham? informed SMRT that Shortworking Trip (SWT) service 882A had not been included in its bus guide from Sembawang to Sembawang Road loop.
Netizens continued to discuss the Apr 25 rail breakdown, and the statement issued by LTA on Apr 26, which stated that the disruptions were due to a power fault. Several netizens were concerned with the vulnerability of the MRT on possible terror attacks during breakdowns. Some suggested bringing back the bus routes that were discontinued after the MRT was built. Tony Loke stated that internal sabotage should not be ruled out because the coincidence of the occurrences were highly suspicious. Bobby Tan said that SMRTs reputation was getting worse. He suggested building up a great maintenance team to maintain the whole SMRT train system. Goh Poh Guan mentioned that it was time to change the rail operator.
Sean Goh? asked why no high capacity buses were deployed for services 975 and 975B.
Netizens reposted an article regarding a claim of a former Land Transport Authority (LTA) engineer that poor maintenance could be the reason for the train disruption due to lightning. MGSeow explained that a well maintained lightning protection system or building could still be struck by lightning and cause equipment failures during severe lightning strikes. The netizen added that normal lightning protection was designed to protect humans or occupants of the vehicle and not equipment.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) has become the first to use a rectangular tunnel-boring machine in Singapore, which excavates rectangular instead of circular tunnels. The machine was deployed on May 11 for an underpass at the MRT Thomson-East Coast Line's Havelock MRT station. Henry Foo, LTA Project Director, said that although the construction method was more expensive than the cut-and-cover method, it saves time, manpower and was far less disruptive. With the new method, the underpass would be completed in "six to eight months", instead of "three to four years". Several netizens were concerned with the safety of rectangular tunnels, saying that the rectangular tunnel was not a good concept in terms of holding up stress compared to a tubular tunnel. A few approved of the new method if it would be structurally safer and more efficient than the old tunnel-boring machine. Bun Long stated that the LTA should not continue using the new method if it was costly and ineffective.
The independent advisory panel, which was appointed by the Land Transport Authority (LTA) last December, has completed its assessment of the MRT power supply system. The panel found that the power supply system has "achieved a high availability", but recommended to improve the resilience of the power supply system in the near term. In the longer term, the design of the rail system should provide for a maximum downtime of five minutes during faults and system recovery within 20 minutes.The LTA announced that it is working with operators to replace the existing voltage protection system on the MRT network with Voltage-Limiting Devices (VLD), which would trip and isolate only specific stretches of the system where faults occur. Among the recommendations, the panel recognised the need to anticipate, prevent and mitigate problems before they occur. Chew Men Leong, Chief Executive of LTA, said that the authority has already implemented some of the panels recommendations, including the installation of VLDs on new lines from the Downtown Line onwards. Several netizens wondered why the LTA had to engage an independent international panel to review the whole system. !Mike stated that a good management anticipates problems and not just solve them. Richard Cheah said that the public should expect a fare hike, claiming the findings of the independent panel was a pre-marketing campaign to justify the fare increase.
?Yih Chyuan Neo? observed that when the Marina South Pier station first opened, all southbound trains on the North-South Line terminated at Marina South Pier occasionally. A few months after the stations opening, SMRT alternates trains for a full day, then one out of three trains, and currently, only one out of four southbound trains terminate at Marina South Pier, with the rest of them terminating at Marina Bay. The netizen mentioned that those taking the train to Marina South Pier would have to wait for up to 15 minutes during off-peak hours. If SMRT continues to do that, very few people would eventually take the train to Marina South Pier in the future to get to the pier and cruise centre at Marina South. Marina South Pier might turn into a white elephant and it might result in losses just to operate the station. It would also cause confusion to commuters taking the North-South Line to and from Marina Bay MRT Station. The netizen felt that it would be easier for SMRT to arrange for all their trains to terminate at Marina South Pier instead of Marina Bay Station, so that special arrangements to the train operating schedule would not be required.
?Jean Lee? reported the bus captain of service 188 for not stopping at the bus stop although she did press the bell before the bus reached the bus stop. The netizen stated that the bus captain had ample time to stop but he did not attempt to do so, filter into the bus lane or even slow down. She claimed that the bus captain merely looked at her through the rear view mirror then looked away. The netizen said that she did not make it in time for her appointment because of the incident. She asked SMRT to update her on what actions would be taken or how the matter would be handled. [SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen for her contact details so that our CR team can follow-up.]
An SMRT bus captain had been sentenced to three weeks in jail and a five-year driving ban for causing death to a pedestrian in November 2015. Sp Fairley said that the sentence seemed fair since the couple were not using the traffic light crossing. Schiffon Winnie Chan stated that the bus driver continued driving despite seeing the couple.
?Hao Wei? reported the bus captain of service 169 (SME1612) for cutting into his/her lane without signalling. The netizen mentioned that it could have caused an accident.The netizen stated that bus captains should be aware of their surroundings and provide early signals whenever possible. The netizen hoped SMRT would look into the issue as it was not the first time the netizen had encountered such a bus captain on the road. SMRT has reached out to the netizen and also reassured its priority in the safety of passengers and other road users.
DAVID YAP PENG KHOON was surprised to hear that S$1.34M and S$504,000 were given to SBS Transit and SMRT, respectively, for improvements in bus waiting times and less crowding between June and November 2015.The writer wondered why the Government had to reward the transport operators considering that it had already spent S$1.1B providing buses under the Bus Service Enhancement Programme. He said that the Governments action was similar to rewarding a teacher every time students perform very well in their examinations.The writer stated that it would be easier to accept this giving of incentives to the operators for improving waiting time if the bus operators had purchased the buses on their own. Tan Kwong Moh stated that waiting times for many bus services have yet to improve. The netizen said that the waiting times for services 188 and 985 are still about 25-30 minutes, and that rewards should be given when there are improvements on all routes, not just a few select routes. Jonathan Chee Fook Heng mentioned waiting for the only bus from Far East Plaza to River Valley for more than 50 minutes.
Ayumu Beh? thanked SMRT bus captain Zhu Ming Hui for returning his mobile phone Xperia Z1.
?Sher Lyn Gan? reported that bus captain Mazli of service 67 travelling from Choa Chu Kang interchange verbally harassed and insulted her friend and her by calling them "cheapo", and accused her friend of not paying the full bus fare. The netizen mentioned that her friend was unsure of the bus fare, and it was unnecessary for the bus captain to raise his voice and insult them. The netizen said that it was a complete abuse of power and definitely a very poor reflection of SMRT's service standards. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
Gan Kok Tiong mentioned that a report showed an increase in the proportion of working residents going to work by bus or trains, or a combination of both. The contributor, however, observed that there was hardly no improvement in the percentage of those who were satisfied with the public transport services. He said that reliability would be the main factor to be considered by car owners in deciding to switch to taking trains and buses to work.
lolita_5 reported that the train travelling between Clementi and Jurong East had stopped four times but no information was provided about the issue. Wishdom mentioned that the train s/he was on also stopped two or three times jazzman80 assumed that the thread starter was also on the same train as s/he was because they had similar experiences.
Jared Ang stated that there was a build-up of crowd at Bedok MRT station at the East-West Line because the trains were coming at an interval of up to five minutes. The netizen could just imagine the crowd at the next stations and were concerned that many would not be able to board the train.
Simon Huang? wondered if there was an issue with bus service 167 as he waited for almost an hour for the bus at the International Plaza.
The LTA announced the rolling out of the third and final Bulim bus package on June 26.Bus services 41, 49, 98/98M, 183, 333, 334 and 335 from Jurong East Bus Interchange, and bus services 96, 282, 284 and 285 from Clementi Bus Interchange would be transitioning to the Bus Contracting Model.The LTA said that they would continue to work closely with the various public transport operators during the transition, and strive to improve the services with the roll-out of each tranche.
Premier, the fourth biggest cab operator, had increased the base fare for three of its taxi models by 40 cents to S$3.60, which took effect on Feb 1.With the said increase, ComfortDelGro, which runs the Comfort and CityCab fleets, now has the cheapest taxis - its Hyundai Sonata models were the only ones with the S$3.20 flagdown rate. For the other three cab companies - Prime, SMRT and TransCab - the lowest flagdown charge among their fleets was S$3.60. Peter Tan said that having the cheapest fare did not mean that everyone would choose to flag down Premier. The netizen mentioned that it was still cheaper to travel by bus and train. AL Amin wondered why Premier increased its base fare.
Seven rail engineers, all from SMRT, became the first in Singapore to receive an engineering accreditation recognising their skills and experience in their professions. The accreditation was awarded by The Institution of Engineers Singapore, and candidates have to be successfully assessed by a panel of rail industry experts to earn the title of Chartered Engineers in Railway and Transport Engineering (CEng).One of the Chartered Engineers, Edelene Ee, a Senior Manager of Power and Building Services at SMRT, said that the chartership helps recognise that railway engineering is a professional career, and it will help to raise the profile of the job and attract more talent into the industry."SMRT stated that they have invested significantly in training its engineers so that each could maximise his or her potential and raise professional competencies. Many netizens congratulated Chartered Engineer Azizah Sapari, which she then acknowledged.
EE TECK SIEW, who had lived in Hong Kong for the past year, experienced seamless and efficient public commuting in Hong Kong where trains arrive punctually most of the time and seldom break down.The writer stated that Hong Kongs public bus system was unique and efficient. S/he was most impressed with the red and green mini buses plying the roads, carrying passengers within routes of a 10 to 15 minutes radius. The mini buses, which carry up to 16 passengers, cover areas not serviced by the bigger buses. During peak hours, many mini buses could be dispatched to meet passenger demand.The writer noted that the incumbent public transport operators use large buses, where they have to consider load factors in route and time scheduling, resulting in a long wait for commuters especially during peak hours. The writer suggested introducing mini bus feeder services and have SMRT and SBS Transit operate only the MRT and long-distance buses. S/he stated that taking feeder services away from the transport operators would introduce robust competition in the public transport business while providing seamless and efficient commuting to the public.
On September 14, various channels reported that SMRT has dismissed the train captain who was involved in a fatal track accident that killed two of his colleagues in March 2016.Train Captain Rahmat Mohd, 49, was dismissed on September 14 after an internal disciplinary inquiry. After the accident, he was assigned to a non-driving job. It was reported in ST yesterday (September 14) that sources said an operations control centre staff member had also left earlier on account of the incident.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President, for Corporate Information and Communications said that the company does not comment on staff disciplinary measures.National Transport Workers' Union Executive Secretary Melvin Yong said that "NTWU understands that SMRT has taken action to dismiss two workers related to the incident on March 22. NTWU has previously written to SMRT to withhold any actions against the affected workers until completion of official investigations so as to not prejudice the outcome of the official investigations. We will now review the situation, study the grounds for SMRT dismissal, and work with the affected staff on the next steps." Most netizens disapproved of SMRTs decision to dismiss the train captain involved in the train accident that killed two trainees, with many saying that the Operations Control Centre staff was also responsible for allowing the train to ply on automatic mode and not deploying watchmen for any approaching train. Several said that SMRT should make public the result of the investigation. Some stated that if the train captain was really at fault, he should have been charged for the death of the two trainees other than being fired. Some pointed out that the train driver was at fault as he could have stopped the train if he was paying attention to his job. Others hoped that the dismissal of the train captain was not an attempt by SMRT to find a scapegoat. Yong Fang suggested that SMRT shareholders could rally together to ask for the internal investigation report and question the Board on its decision. Hai Van Der Zam offered the fired train captain a job as part of the delivery riders team at Foodpanda so that he could earn a living to support his family while looking for his next fulltime job.
Brainless Dumbass stated that the East-West Line train was running at a slow speed and was stopping every minute. The netizen added that s/he was stuck at Buona Vista MRT. kmkimlo said that the platform and train at Buona Vista was crowded but no trains had stalled at the station. eclipsemints noted that the trains at the East-West Line were travelling at a slower speed because of the sleeper replacement works.
Additional comments were observed on a forum thread initiated by 8898108 on Jun 13 regarding the 30-minute wait for Tower Transit bus services at Jurong East. Several netizens observed that most Tower Transit buses were always late and slow. ParkJinYoung asked whether Tower Transit gives their drivers incentives for driving as slow as possible. The netizen mentioned that bus service 97 was literally crawling and that walking to the next bus stop was even faster. S/he stated that the bus captains seemed uninterested in driving. Tuckie assumed that Tower Transit buses have a scheduled timing in reaching each bus stop. tatsit claimed that most employees of Tower Transit have already quit because they were not happy with how the foreign employer worked. The netizen also claimed that most employees who shifted from incumbent operators were inexperienced. Several other netizens commented that Tower Transit was understaffed and overpromised before they started services.
Ronnie Lim Ah Bee stated in a forum letter that there seemed to be no solution to frequent train breakdowns despite advanced technological developments. He wondered whether trains could run on hybrid engines similar to those used in motor vehicles. The writer suggested looking into developing train engines with backup batteries that could supply power to trains should the external electrical energy fail, just like in hybrid cars. Transport authorities could work with specialists to come up with a suitable model for the MRT trains.Such an innovation, according to the writer, could put the country on the world map and create new business opportunities for Singapore. Xian Lian Zeng pointed out that the MRT system works on 750 and 1,500 voltage direct current, hence the alternative battery needed would be the size of a train cabin. Nicole Wong Jingxuan believed that trains drawing power from a grid rather than being self-powered is a lighter and more efficient system than a hybrid engine system.
Randy Sia asked SMRT to look at most of the escalator landing plates at the Circle Line. He particularly pointed out the one at Ang Mo Kio Station towards Ang Mo Kio Hub, at the underpass leading towards Ang Mo Kio interchange, as well as that in Bedok, Paya Lebar and Bishan stations. The netizen observed that most of the landings were unsturdy. He added that the landing plates seemed to sink in when stepped on.
BusAnalayzer stated that new residential and commercial developments affect the loading and operation of bus services. The netizen mentioned that there were five major developments in Buangkok West but there was only bus service 101, operated by SBS Transit, serving Buangkok Link. He stated that the route of service 101 should be extended in the future to loop at Buangkok Crescent. He also suggested that a new service should be introduced in the area, starting from the Bidadari bus interchange. SMB5007J hoped that the loading for 308 and 983 bus services would be better by next year.
SMRT stated that the maintenance team did not follow safety procedures that led to the train track tragedy in which two young Singaporean technicians were killed.
A train fault that affected the Circle Line on Apr 8 forced many commuters to endure crowded train platforms and travelling delays.SMRT informed commuters to expect 15 minutes of additional travel time between Dhoby Ghaut and Bishan MRT stations via its Twitter account at about 7:27 a.m. Those affected by the delays vented their frustrations on Twitter, with @mengc tweeting a photo of a large crowd at an unidentified train platform. Others complained about being stuck at stations and being late for work and appointments. Several netizens stated with sarcasm that the rail system was indeed more reliable reliably consistent to break down. Boon Huat Tan said that it should be obvious by now that MRT issues were not due to the ageing lines since the Circle and Downtown Lines are very new. The netizen believed that lack of maintenance and other management issues were the cause of breakdowns. Loh Wai Poon suggested re-instating the bus services withdrawn when the MRT was introduced to prevent duplication of public transport services to the same destination along the MRT routes. As the MRT was deemed to be unreliable nowadays, re-instating the old bus routes would help supplement MRT to ferry commuters to work during breakdowns. Peter Goh mentioned that most Circle Line trains had faulty air-conditioners. Fang Fang Lo asked SMRT to improve bus service 969 as commuters struggled every day to to get a space on the bus.
?Elaine Chen? reported that the staff at Ang Mo Kio MRT station were unhelpful and unfriendly. The netizen mentioned that there were instances when she was pushed out of the train during peak hours and had to queue for the next train. Hence, she decided to head to the priority zone for help. However, the netizen said that despite her raising the issue to the staff and being in the priority zone, no assistance was provided by the staff especially in asking other passengers to give up seats to pregnant passengers. She claimed that the staff also pretended not to notice her and simply asked passengers to move to the middle of the cabin. SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Netizens continued to discuss the new LED panels and route map display system on SMRT trains. Several netizens stated that SMRT should focus on higher train efficiency rather than enhancing the display system. Some said they could simply use their smartphones for updates on train arrival timings. tree trunk said that the innovations would be a good initiative to raise fares. FourteenOhFive thought that there was too much information on the new display screens and that the inclusion of the places of interest was a bit much. AmazingRW preferred larger fonts and more strong colours. The netizen hoped that the photos shown online were not the final version. garpew said that the new display system would be introduced to keep passengers entertained when they were stuck in slow moving trains or during breakdowns.
Several comments were observed on SMRT Facebook page about faulty air-conditioning in trains. Lynda Xie? wondered whether SMRT was trying to suffocate people by packing the trains but not checking if the air-conditioning system was working fine.The netizen asked SMRT to have their staff check the air-conditioning system by riding the trains themselves during peak hours. ???? reported that the air-conditioning of train number 2314 was not working. Adrian Lim? wondered why many trains have been operating without air-conditioning recently.
A train fault in the evening of Jun 13 between Caldecott and Farrer Road MRT stations on the Circle Line resulted in wait times of up to 20 minutes at affected stations. SMRT tweeted at 6.23pm that there was additional five minutes travelling time due to a train fault between Farrer Road station and Caldecott station.The fault was cleared and train services resumed at around 6:31 p.m. SMRT added that there would be "additional travelling time" due to the earlier fault. While usual complaints from commuters were observed on several social media channels, Jeff submitted a story to Stomp about his experience at Bishan MRT station during the train delay. The article was also picked up by All Singapore Stuff. Jeff said he was impressed by the swift action and the crowd control measures of the staff at the Bishan MRT station, and praised them for the job well done.Jeff said that during a train fault, the public often blame SMRT. He added that not many people praise the good job of the staff and patrolling crews when they put in effort to control such a large crowd, especially during peak hours when many are rushing back home. Several netizens however mentioned that SMRT staff should have learned how to manage the crowd during disruptions after experiencing several breakdowns already. Some mentioned that the delay lasted longer at each station. Derrick Lim stated that if SMRT had paid more attention and invested more into maintenance and upgrading of tracks, their service staff would not need to be doing crowd control or face disgruntled commuters' frustrations. Andrew Lim said that frustrations came in when the staff were as clueless as the passengers during disruptions. Peter Ryan found it funny that people continued to berate the rail system for a 20-minute disruption. The netizen was uncertain whether those who criticise Singapores rail system, which was among the most effective, efficient, cleanest and respected public transport in the world, could survive living outside of Singapore.
?Glenc Soh? reported that the bus captain of service 960 (TIB1229J) had been cruising at 30kph all the way from Bukit Panjang to Marsiling, causing the netizen to miss the last bus service 169 departing from Woodlands at 11:45 p.m.
?Calvin Tan? hoped that SMRT would secure the third bus package. The netizen said that SMRT should offer better employee packages to retain its bus captains.
Train services on the Punggol and Sengkang Light Rail Transit (LRT) systems were disrupted for more than two hours on Jun 1 evening due to repeated power trips. SBS Transit mentioned that based on initial assessment, a suspected cable fault could have caused the power trips. Passengers had to detrain and walk to the nearest platform after a train car stalled in the middle of the tracks. Ho Samuel stated that the breakdowns was a cycle that never seemed to end. Jeffrey Koh mentioned that last week, the Sengkang West LRT Line train came to a halt in the middle of the track. Two technicians came over to the train and activated the emergency power and moved the train back to the main station. Alice Mei Yee mentioned that she was trapped in the lift of the LRT station. She added that the staff who had spotted her did not bother to do anything.
?Raymond Lai? observed that traveling on SMRT buses was getting from bad to worse. The issues would either be the attitude of the driver or inexperience in handling of the bus. The netizen mentioned boarding bus service 855 (SMB29G) from Jalan Bukit Merah and alighting at Khatib. He said that the driver would accelerate and would suddenly brake. He asked why authorities allow such drivers to jeopardize the commuters safety. Eric Weidenfeller said that the commenter might be referring to the bus with licence plate number SMB28G instead of SMB29G.
Ellen Chan Lover asked the Government to resolve the issue of overpopulation in Jurong West. The netizen mentioned that during peak hours, Lakeside, Boon Lay and Pioneer MRT stations were always packed. Some netizens stated that the thread starter should expect the population to continue to increase. Others suggested that the thread starter transfer to a location that was not yet overpopulated. _Xiphos_ mentioned that during peak hours, all stations were always packed.
In a news release on May 16, the National Trades Union Congress (NTUC) said that a total of 16 organisations and individuals have been recognised for their efforts and commitment to workplace safety and health through the U SAFE Award.One of the recipients was SBS Transit, for its strong level of commitment towards enhancing the health of its employees. NTUC said SBS Transit implemented a nine-month pilot health programme for bus captains, benefitting more than 800 bus captains through health screenings, health coaching sessions and a workplace health risk assessment.According to NTUC, the U SAFE Award was created to encourage more organisations to proactively build stronger workplace safety and health practices that safeguard their employees, and encourage them to do the same by equipping them with the relevant skills and knowledge to initiate good practices in their areas of work.
SBS Transit has announced that it will extend the operating hours of its train and bus services on the eve of Good Friday (March 24). Train services on the North East (NEL) and Downtown Lines would be extended by about 30 minutes, while the Punggol and Sengkang LRT systems would similarly be extended to coincide with the last train arrival on the NEL. The last bus timings of 26 bus services wold also be extended at their respective bus interchanges.
Tay Kai Boon? thanked the SMRT workers who keep the trains and tracks well-maintained. The netizen also noticed the good progress on the East-West Line sleeper replacement works.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) shared Roads.sgs Facebook post about a female passenger who was sitting on the bus with her legs stretched across another seat. Some netizens found nothing wrong with the passengers action because the bus was not crowded. Thomas Lee Qing Wei said that passengers could relax their legs across another seat, but should be considerate enough to put their feet down when the bus becomes crowded to allow others to use the seat.
LTA released the third instalment of its annual Taxi Customer Satisfaction Survey on Mar 14 which found that fewer people were satisfied with taxi services in 2015 compared with the previous year. The survey polled 1,200 regular taxi commuters aged 15 years and above from Aug 17 to Sep 4 last year on eight service attributes, including ease of taxi booking, waiting time, safety, information on taxi services and drivers knowledge of routes. According to the survey results, taxi waiting times remained the most in need of improvement. A total of 86.2% of those polled were satisfied with taxi waiting times, unchanged from the previous year, and 96.1% were satisfied with safety. Ease of taxi booking showed the most improvement, with 91.3% of those surveyed satisfied, compared to 88.6 per cent the previous year. This could be due to the entry of third-party taxi booking services and efforts by taxi companies to improve their apps and call booking services. The authority was also finalising the review of private hire car services such as Uber and GrabCar after a series of engagements with key stakeholders. Several netizens did not agree with the survey results, with some saying that most cabbies choose their passengers and destination. Kasim Hansia was uncertain that 97.3% commuters were satisfied with the taxi services and said that the sample data was either too small or too selective. The netizen suggested running a focus group poll or general public poll on Facebook to get a more accurate read on the real situation. S/he mentioned that taxi drivers were getting lazier and were selectively of destinations, only answer calls where cash was concerned, and run by taxi stands or people flagging them on the road. Tan Han Yong also did not agree with the percentage result of the poll because he had experienced having to wait for more than 30 minutes for a cab and eventually ended up taking a bus. Andrew Singh said that the LTA should come out with policies to standardize taxi fares and increase the minimum clocking hours per day. The netizen mentioned seeing Comfort taxis parked at the Orchid country club in the late morning where most cabbies were playing jackpot. Cabbies could also be seen at SAFRA clubhouses, just before lunch, but the netizen was not sure what they were doing there. Ng KiatKuan stated that the LTA shold thank Uber and GrabCar for solving the usual taxi "shortage" issue. Commuters now have more choices and do not waste so much time finding a cab during peak hours or on rainy days. Vanity Plates SG wondered why the taxi industry had not invested on basic things like customer satisfaction.
The LTA would exhibit the past, present and future of the Singapore public bus industry through an inaugural Bus Carnival over three weekends starting Mar 11. The Bus Carnival would give the public "a glimpse into the illustrious past of the industry and a peek into whats to come" and would feature vintage artefacts and a bus simulator where visitors could try their hands at driving the vehicle. Visitors could also chat with representatives from the public transport operators to find out the challenges and perks of their jobs. The new colour of public buses would also be unveiled during the LTAs first Bus Carnival. Trina Liu was looking forward to attend the Bus Carnival.
?Lee Yong Wan? shared a video featuring Bukit Batok Bus Interchange on its last day before it was handed over to Tower Transit on May 29. The netizen wondered why SMRT security officers allowed bus enthusiasts to film inside the bus interchange even though it was prohibited to take photos or videos. Lee Kai Jie, who claimed to be a bus enthusiast, stated that there was nothing wrong with them filming at the bus interchange because there were security officers already ensuring the safety of Singaporeans.
SMRT is working with authorities to see how it could speed up upgrading works for the power capacity on its main rail lines.Until then, the project would only be completed by 2019. SMRT President and Group Chief Executive Officer Desmond Kuek stated that the North-South and East-West rail systems would be "virtually new" after all upgrading works have been completed by 2019.The last to be completed of the multi-year projects was expected to be the upgrading of the power system. Eng Lee hoped that the upgrading of the rail system would truly minimise constant breakdowns and faults. The netizen thanked the ground staff for their hard work. Kc Mark stated that SMRT should maintain the rail system properly because ad-hoc repairs could cause major problems in the future.
?Eugene Sng? boarded the train from Raffles Place and was disappointed to have been greeted by a gush of warm air when the train door opened, The netizen mentioned that it was not the first time he boarded a train with faulty air-conditioner. The netizen also observed an SMRT staff walking through the cabins who should have reported the issue if she was vigilant enough.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a video which showed the gathering of the SMRT buses team at Bukit Batok Bus Interchange on 28 May to thank all residents, commuters and staff for their support over the past 15 years, as they hand over the interchange to Tower Transit.More than 100 staff received a certificate of appreciation for their hard work and efforts. As a token of appreciation, 5,000 limited edition SMRT magnets were distributed to the residents and commuters. (buses[IN]gapore!) said it was ironic that Certis CISCO officers prohibited taking photographs and videos of the interchange but suddenly allowed everyone to take photographs despite the interchange being still in operation the next day. Danish Mohamed noted that some SMRT buses were still at Bukit Batok Bus Interchange alongside Tower Transit's majority of buses. Ze Yu Jia said that s/he would miss SMRT at Bukit Batok.
cheowyonglee was disappointed that a bus captain did not bother to open the door to let him/her board even though there was still some space at the back of the bus. The netizen had to wait for the next bus which took a while to arrive, causing him/her to be late for work.The netizen stated that Singapore has a Stone Age transport system with train disruptions, inaccurate arrival timings and irregular frequencies. Alan Lee disagreed with cheowyonglee, saying that Singapore has one of the best transport systems in the world. Md Ali asked the contributor to try riding public buses in Malaysia and see if they have a better service than Singapore. Roslan Rabian suggested waking up earlier since bus timings were inaccurate nowadays. Justin Chen believed that overpopulation was taking a heavy toll on a small country like Singapore.
Netizens continued to discuss Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement that those responsible for the recent MRT accident which killed two SMRT maintenance crew would be held accountable should the investigation reveal human errors. Several netizens believed that the staff would be made accountable for the accident while the top officials would stay in their comfortable offices. maxmixmox stated that the court should look at a wider angle and that the prosecutor should also question the SMRT management.
?Pei Pei Tee? asked SMRT to explain the incident at Bukit Gombak MRT station at around 12:05 p.m where train cabins of the North-South Line train were filled with smoke. The netizen said that there was no immediate instruction from SMRT staff to evacuate the cabins. Some passengers at the end cabins were unaware of the situation and other passengers that got out first had to call them out.
?Raelyn Ow? was at Paya Lebar MRT station on the East-West Line when she noticed that no staff was monitoring commuters getting in and out of the trains. The netizen said that a female commuter was hit by the train door as it closed and many passengers were unable to alight and had to take the next train back. The netizen asked if there was a way for the train driver or other staff members to monitor and control when the door closes especially during peak periods.
?Dionte Lee? posted photos of defective air-conditioner vents seen on two separate buses with licence plate numbers TIB982Z and SMB300U.
Kavin Ong asked SMRT to look into the air-conditioning system of its trains at the North-South Line because most air-conditioners blow only warm air.
On Facebook, Minister for Communications and Information Yaacob Ibrahim shared photos of his visit at Jurong East on Jun 10 for a progress update on the Heterogeneous Network (HetNet) trials by Infocomm Development Authority of Singapore (IDA) and industry players. He mentioned that the HetNet trials were part of ongoing industry efforts to improve mobile connectivity for a smoother and faster internet surfing experience for the public. Learning points from the trials would help industry players look into future deployment on a wider scale. During the progress update, Minister Yaacob Ibrahim also boarded SMRT service 176 to experience using the WiFi-On-The-Go service provided by M1. He also made a stop at Jurong East MRT station, where wireless internet is available at station platforms. Steve Papa thanked the IDA for leading the way to provide connectivity and improve the capacity of the global cellular network.
?Mabel Ho ? asked SMRT to look into the bus conductor at Woodlands checkpoint for his unacceptable behaviour. The netizen mentioned that the conductor had been shouting at the passengers. She said that the raising of voice and being rude were two different issues. Jovin Lse stated that SMRT should consider investing in loud speakers or megaphones for announcements since they were already aware of the high human traffic flow at the Woodlands checkpoint.
Beck Tyler thanked SMRT with sarcasm for having to wait 35 minutes for bus service 188 at bus stop 43329.
In a news release on Apr 28, SMRT said that its net profit for FY2016 increased 20.1% to S$109.3M from the full-year net profit of S$91M a year ago. Group revenue increased 4.9% to S$1.3B in FY2016, while operating profit improved 14.6% to S$138.5M.Despite the overall rise in profits, SMRT said the current rail operating landscape continues to be challenging as fare adjustments have not kept pace with rising operating costs. The operating profit from SMRT's non-rail business increased 22.6% to S$133.3M in FY2016. Its bus operations posted an operating profit of S$5.9M. Rental operating profit also increased 4.7% to S$83.4M on the back of higher rental revenue contributions from train stations and bus interchanges, while taxi operating profit rose 24% to S$17M. SMRT President and Group Chief Executive Officer Desmond Kuek said the company remains focused on improving rail safety, reliability and service quality. "We have been increasing headcount and maintenance-related expenditures to drive higher performance standards, and will continue to work closely with the authorities to strengthen the robustness and resilience of the rail network," he added. Several netizens considered it absurd that SMRT continued to earn high profits while commuters continue to suffer from high transport fares and frequent delays and disruptions. Some hoped that SMRT would compensate the commuters for the inconveniences during delays and disruptions. Others congratulated the staff of SMRT who had sincerely and diligently performed their duties. Some mentioned that it would be good if part of the profits would be used to improve the performance of the MRT. Collin Tan asserted that SMRT has provided seamless transportation to Singaporeans and ought to be financially rewarded. The company, however, should not stop maintaining and upgrading the system. Jiamin Cheng remarked that with more profits, SMRT should regularly maintain the rail system to reduce train breakdowns and reduce the waiting time during peak hours.
?Glenc Soh? reported that bus service 851 (SMB1590S) skipped Opp Yio Chu Kang MRT bus stop despite a group of people flagging it and the bus was only half full.
The contract to build the station was awarded to China State Construction Engineering (Singapore) for S$90M.
coolmyth posted about what s/he claimed to be one of the worst SMRT breakdowns which occurred on Jul 7, 2015. Train services on the North-South and East-West Lines were disrupted due to a power fault. Several netizens shared their experiences about the July 7 major MRT disruption last year. ankgunner was glad that there had been no major disruptions after the said incident.
?Aaron Tan? reported that the air-conditioner on bus service 171 (SMB1326S) was blowing hot air Wang Xurui and Eric Weidenfeller said that the netizen must be referring to SMB1326P and not SMB1325S.
BenBen Rong? asked whether the Bus Parallel Service (BPS1) was operational because she had been waiting for 25 minutes at bus stop 44699 from 7.45 to 8.15am on 18 July. The netizen mentioned that her husband already took a cab to camp.The netizen asked SMRT to provide timing for the said service so as not to inconvenience commuters.
Rusydi Omar? praised the bus captain of service 913 (TIB987K) for taking a couple of seconds to look out for trailing passengers before driving off. The netizen said that it would be great to have such etiquette across all of SMRTs bus captains.
The journeys of the morning rush-hour commuters were disrupted when a west-bound train on the East-West line encountered a fault on Jan 28.In a tweet at 8:03 a.m., SMRT informed commuters to expect an additional travelling time of 15 minutes from Outram Park to Jurong East stations, in the direction of Joo Koon. In its subsequent tweets, longer travelling times were announced.Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, stated that passengers aboard an East-West line train towards Joo Koon were detrained at Commonwealth due to a signaling fault affecting the train. He apologized for the inconvenience caused to passengers due to the additional travelling time.The incident caused a tailback effect, with the peak period crowd rapidly increasing by the minute at several stations. To prevent people from entering the already overflowing platforms, some fare gates were closed.Commuters posted their frustrations online about the delay, the lack of announcements and the congestion at stations. Some claimed that a train fault had occurred at Kembangan station and that there was no east-bound train because of the fault. Many netizens were frustrated about the disruption which caused them to be late for work and appointments. Several stated that commuters should not be surprised by train disruptions anymore since it was already the norm. Others mentioned that no alternative transport were provided by SMRT during the disruption. Jimmy UtdbyUtd Oh asked what Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan had done so far to improve the train system. The netizen mentioned that the entire system requires immediate repairs and replacements but no concrete action had been taken. Richard Tan mentioned that the New York subway system was more than 100 years old but its trains were still reliable. Munira N Rashid asserted that the reliability of the rail system was a big contributing factor to productivity. The netizen stated with sarcasm that the rail operators had so far done very well in helping to keep Singapores productivity very low.
During the inaugural SMRT Customer Experience Innovation Conference, new innovations for new SMRT trains on the North-South and East-West Lines were presented, including the new SMRT Active Route Map Information System 2.0 (STARis). It was an upgraded version of existing train maps that showed the progression of trains along the route. The new system would display information such as the location of escalators or lifts in stations, as well as landmarks in the vicinity and provide passenger service updates. Also during the conference, SMRT's CEO Desmond Kuek spoke of its past troubles, such as train disruptions and the illegal bus strike, which have "severely hurt" the company's reputation. The CEO, however, added that these challenges resulted in a shift in focus for service excellence, to regain the trust of stakeholders. CEO Kuek also said that SMRT would like to foster a climate where people could feel empowered to initiate and innovate in their service excellence efforts towards positive customer experience. Most netizens believed that the innovations were a waste of money and that the train operator should focus on making train service more reliable and efficient, with fewer train breakdowns. Others assumed that the innovations would be used to justify another fare increase. Budi Mummy Shrestha noticed that SMRT was getting more flamboyant with too many aesthetics, instead of focusing on maintenance. Hong Koon was uncertain if the train door timer would be accurate most of the time. Antonio Law said that the timer would likely get more people to rush into the train. Lim Yan Seng approved of having more interactive display boards at MRT stations. The netizen also encouraged the Government to keep improving the rail network.
Mario Gotze Prithikvel reported that an LRT door malfunctioned. Despite the incident, the netizen thanked SMRT for sending a staff and resolving the issue promptly at the next stop.
SMRT announced that a new feeder bus service would be available for residents of Yishun starting Feb 14. Service 805 would ply between Yishun Bus Interchange and Yishun Avenue 1, and serve upcoming developments along Yishun Avenue 1 and 4. The loop service would also enhance connection to Yishun MRT station and amenities such as Khoo Teck Puat Hospital and Yishun Community Hospital. Several netizens were glad that there would be another option for Yishun residents. Alice Goh said that there should be a feeder bus from Yishun MRT to the polyclinic because the old interchange link to block 925 and the clinic would be closed. It would be inconvenient for the elderly to walk around to reach the polyclinic. Tracy Carrington mentioned that there should be another bus that goes from Tampines interchange towards Sembawang interchange. Currently, only service 969 served the said route but was always packed during peak hours.
?JC SP thanked SMRT staff at Newton MRT station, especially Madam Halimah, for their assistance. The netizen said that she almost fainted while exiting Newton Station and could have ended up lying on the floor if not for the assistance from the staff.
GOH KIAN HUAT observed that the reliability of rail services had deteriorated after the unprecedented disruption on four MRT lines on Apr 25. S/he mentioned that such disruptions were unacceptable as they inconvenienced commuters and cost more. S/he cited that his/her daughter had to take the taxi to school in order not to be late and ended up paying S$26, while her monthly train concession costs S$25. The writer mentioned that in January 2013 the Land Transport Authority (LTA) tightened the regulatory framework in four key areas to enhance rail reliability on the Committee of Inquiry findings into the disruption of train services in December 2011. These were: maintenance of rail assets; incident management; operating performance standards; and penalty framework. The writer noted that the enhanced framework, which has been in place for more than two years now, was ineffective as service reliability has not improved. S/he stated that the LTA should also consider a change by reviewing the regulatory framework and injecting new ideas into the oversight of rail operations. Puibao Bao stated that the LTA itself needs a total revamp of its top management. The netizen stated that the top management should be deserving of their titles by leading by example, having the heart of the commuters in their core, having the courage, determination and conviction to do what was right for the people and having the understanding and ability to anticipate problems. Mich Chan suggested sending a team to Japan for six months for training and observation.
On Facebook, Minister of State for Health Lam Pin Min shared photos of the launch of the Downtown Line train with cabins designed with messages on mental wellness and publicity on The Make A Difference (M.A.D.) Race scheduled on 8 October 2016.The Minister mentioned that the M.A.D Race was organised by Touch Community Services to raise awareness on mental health and tackle social stigma and misconception about mental conditions.
Foong Swee Kong suggested linking the Downtown Line to Marsiling or Kranji Station on the North-South Line (NSL) since the distance was no more than five kilometres from Bukit Panjang to Woodlands. The netizen stated that the NSL was one of the most used MRT lines and was always packed during peak hours. Linking the two lines could ease the congestion on the NSL while the Thomson Line has yet to be completed.
On Facebook, SMRT posted infographics of the four main types of 12m buses that run on the roads. Several netizens were glad with the use of 12m buses. Aw Yong Jack and Tse Mun Hoi mentioned that they miss the DAF SB220 buses. Yiu Ka Ming wished there could be more ADL E500MMC models.
(buses[IN]gapore!) shared Syed M Daniel's video that was posted on March 5 showing a rail grinding unit at Pasir Ris MRT tracks. The video was taken at 3:37 a.m. Lim Ming Quan stated that people complain when the trains were not maintained but also complain about the noise from maintenance works. Wei Ming Wong suggested that the netizen should go out of the country or stay at a hotel to sleep if s/he was bothered by the noise.
?Bin Hao? mentioned that it was normal for bus captains to drive off even before all passengers were able to find a seat. The netizen, however, stated that the bus captain of service 904 (SMB1480B) suddenly accelerated while the netizen was still standing which almost caused him/her to fall.
Khairil Azar? asked SMRT to remind the bus driver of service 965 (SMB1332X) to be considerate and safe on the road.The netizen mentioned that the bus travelling on Gambas Avenue towards Woodlands almost ran him over when it filtered to the middle lane from the left without checking for traffic. The bus driver proceeded to filter to the rightmost lane but swerved back to the middle lane at the traffic junction, causing him and another motorist to step on their brakes.The netizen said that such irresponsible driving could cause serious accidents if not curbed. He hoped that SMRT would look into the issue.
In response to LTAs announcement last Thursday (23 June) that free pre-peak train rides before 7:45 a.m. on weekdays would be extended for another year, many commuters stated that sacrificing one hour of sleep was not worth saving S$1.50 on their fares.It was reported in Straits Times that many said it was pointless to go to work earlier as there would be no work to do, or they were afraid of appearing to outdo their colleagues by getting in early.Some commuters, however, agreed to take the pre-peak rides if their employers encouraged and recognised the effort to come into office early and also allow them to leave early, or if they felt it would serve a good cause. Several netizens believed that the real issue is Singapores overpopulation. Some approved of the scheme saying that they would rather arrive to work early than be late. Shahidah Mahadir mentioned that the cause of overcrowding were commuters taking the train to its final stop just to get seats. The netizen suggested that all commuters should be required to alight once the train reaches the last station, and join in the queue to enter the train again, before it continues its journey in the other direction. Paul Tay stated that LTA and SMRT should look at ways to relieve the congestion in the trains since the trains were not able to accommodate the crowds. Stewart Chu hoped that the scheme would be implemented to all MRT stations and that students would be given free rides.
Netizens continued to discuss the cat that was frequently seen at Bukit Gombak MRT station. Many netizens found the cat adorable. Shi Fa Yuan said that there was also a cat in one of the train stations in Japan. Tay Yak Hong mentioned that the cat was the Stations new Goodwill Ambassador. Zhang Xiao was concerned that health and safety would be compromised with a cat roaming around in public.
On Facebook, Go-Ahead Singapore posted a photo of the refurbished canteen at Loyang Bus Depot where food and drinks will be available for purchase during the bus carnival on Jun 19. Syed M Daniel asked if the depot was air-conditioned. Avinash Bala asked whether the London Routemaster bus would be coming to the carnival.
?Kimberly Kurek ?observed that the attitude of SMRT staff members she had encountered on two occasions seemed to be the opposite of what was being promoted on SMRT posters about providing safe rides and quality customer service. The netizen questioned why the staff seemed so disgruntled and unmotivated to serve, and displayed a care-less and haughty attitude.On the first occasion, when the netizens son was unable to tap in at Labrador Park station and was brought by a security staff to the passenger service centre, the station staff treated the security staff curtly and appeared to be full of displeasure. The same day, on their return trip, the netizens son could not tap out again. The same staff, whose body language expressed total unwillingness to get up to attend to the netizen and her son, remarked to the netizen show me how you tap. On the second occasion, the netizens son left his wallet at Newton station, which was no longer there by the time they had realised. When approached by them at the passenger service centre, the netizen noted that the staff gave her a superior and unenthusiastic service attitude, and lacked empathy. The netizen expressed major disappointment with the staffs attitude, and wondered what kind of service quality training the staff went through, or if something went wrong during the staff recruitment selection process.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a video interview with two of its Bus Captains, Tay Chiang Hin and Lim Yew Poon, who were recently promoted to Master Bus Captains. They are the first Bus Captains who attained the position in the entire bus industry and had benefitted from SMRTs Bus Career Scheme.
The Workers Party filed questions regarding the defective SMRT trains among other things which they hope would be discussed in Parliament on July 11.The issue, however, was not scheduled to be asked because questions had to be filed seven clear days before the Parliament sits.The questions asked to the Ministry of Transport during the July 11 Parliament sitting were about regulations on private-hire car companies, safety measures during MRT breakdowns, delayed commencement of MRT trains affecting 13 train stations on Sundays, free pre-peak travel, noise barriers at MRT stations, female bus captains and the current design of wheelchair-accessible buses. AngCherLing said that if the issue of defective trains would not be discussed during this months Parliamentary meeting, the dateline for awarding tenders to CSR manufacturer for the high-speed rail should be held off until more evidence have shown to support their decisions.
Netizens continued to discuss the tender for the third Government bus contract, called the Seletar package, which would start operating in 2018. Various sentiments were observed with some hoping that SMRT would win the package while others hoped that the package would be awarded to Tower Transit or a new operator. Jing Hui would like a Japanese bus company to win the bid because of their punctuality and safety. (buses[IN]gapore!) said that is does not make a difference who wins the bid, as LTA will be regulating the timings of the buses. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut hoped that the route of services 852 and 860 would be amended if a new operator won the third bus package. Simon Seow Han Lye said that there was no point in having new bus packages if the daily congestion would not be resolved.
With Singapore opening up its public bus industry to two more new operators, the competition for drivers is growing. To attract local bus drivers to join their fleet, the four bus operators have been engaging in a pay war over the past few months.Last week, UK-based bus operator Go-Ahead announced that it would be raising its minimum monthly starting salary for Singaporeans and PRs to S$1,950. This was an increase from the S$1,865 that was announced in February. It also matches SBS Transit's recent 15% pay hike announced last month.In May, London-based Tower Transit, said that the starting basic pay of their bus captains would be S$1,930.As for SMRT, it announced in February that its basic salaries for bus captains would be "adjusted upwards to be at least on par with the market". SMRT has not announced details of its new pay package yet and previous reports stated that its bus captains have a basic salary of S$1,625. Muhammad Azmi said that public bus operators should keep up their effort to improve bus service and wages. Allan Tan hoped that fares would not also increase with the increased salaries of bus captains.
In connection with the signing of the memorandum of understanding for the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur high-speed rail project, Toh Cheng Seong asked the Government to first ensure that the tender process of the complex deal would be fair, transparent and objective.S/he stated that all proposals must be assessed according to a clear set of criteria, based on the high-speed rail's project requirements, independent of all other commercial activities and exogenous factors. Their main priority should be to serve the diverse needs of the respective countries and communities.The writer also suggested that additional safeguards should be considered to give the people greater peace of mind amid growing concerns about terrorist attacks in the region.S/he added that cheap and fast are not always synonymous with high quality. Tan Kok Tim considered 10 years of construction to be a long time. The netizen hoped that the two countries would consider building all the HSR stations and the two terminus simultaneously by awarding various parts of the construction to more contractors.
On Facebook, Parliamentary Secretary of the Ministry of Home Affairs Amrin Amin provided an update on the feedback regarding the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange as discussed with SMRT and the LTA. o Feedback on poor ventilation - mobile air coolers have been placed at certain parts of the interchange to regulate the air ventilation while LTA arranged for more fans.o Feedback on the long distance between alighting berths at Woodlands MRT and Causeway Point - a free priority-assistance buggy service has been provided for commuters with difficulties walking to and from the berths. o Congested alighting berth areas and long queue lines at 900-series bus services service ambassadors were deployed at boarding berths to manage the queue and facilitate rear door boarding on high demand services during peak hours. o Request for more parking space for bicycles - an additional 40 single-tier bicycle racks have been installed.The Minister, however, stated that there were a couple of suggestions that could not be implemented including escalators, and an open-air bus park. Zhen Wei Lee suggested that bus drivers should park the bus to the closest available area towards the MRT to minimize the walking distance.
?Yong Jin Chen? asked SMRT to fix the ventilation system on North-South Line trains. The netizen mentioned that s/he had been down with a flu after taking the North-South line trains for two weeks. S/he added that the trains ventilation seemed weak as it was always hot and stuffy inside the train which might have caused viruses to spread as there were passengers coughing and sneezing.
?Lim Hui Ling? thanked the staff at Promenade MRT station for assisting him/her in finding an iPad that was left inside the train. The staff at Mountbatten Station also called the netizen promptly when they found the iPad.
In Parliament, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan replied to a question by Nee Soon Member of Parliament Lee Bee Wah about the transport ministrys stance on electric vehicles. He said that the ministry encouraged the use of vehicles that were more environmentally-friendly, including electric cars. The Minister, however, insisted that public transport was the most environmentally-friendly option in the country.He used the analogy of being a vegetarian in an attempt to urge people to take public transport more often. Minister Khaw said that those who could not take public transport 100% of the time should at least attempt to use it some of the time like he does, calling it the greenest form of transport. The Minister stated that the public should at least (be a) part-time public transport user. Its a little bit like being vegetarian, if you cannot do 100% vegetarian like me even twice a month is good. He mentioned that he takes public transport throughout the day at least once a week. Several netizens stated that Minister Khaw and other ministers should set an example by using public transport more often in order to encourage more car users to take public transport. Others said that if the public transport was fast and efficient, many people would opt for public transport without being asked.
M Nooramin praised SMRT taxi driver (SHF169F) who picked him up after several others had refused to take him because he was carrying a mountain bike. Several netizens praised the taxi driver for his good deed. Lee Choon Hoe David asked if the commuter gave the taxi driver a token amount as a sign of appreciation.
?Mohd Vinz? was disappointed that the escalator at Paya Lebar MRT Station was always out of order. The netizen said that it was troublesome for passengers given that Paya Lebar was a very busy station.The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the issue.
?Kenny Goh Wei Xiang? shared in detail about his terrifying experience with a staff at Bishan MRT Station. The netizen mentioned boarding the train with a foldable bike at Bishan Station on the Circle Line. He claimed that he was questioned by a staff who had raised his voice on where he was headed. He mentioned that he was alighting at Lorong Chuan Station to meet his friend. After he boarded the train, he received an SMS notification from his friend to meet at Serangoon Station, which was a station away from Lorong Chuan.When the train reached Lorong Chuan Station and he did not alight, he was surprised that someone suddenly shouted at him. The netizen claimed that it was the SMRT staff who had questioned him earlier at Bishan. The netizen also claimed that the staff had accused him of lying as he did not alight at Lorong Chuan. The netizen said that the staff escorted him out of the train at Serangoon Station. After meeting his friend, the netizen went back to the Circle Line to ask for the name of the staff. He was initially informed by another staff that the person he was looking for already went home. After insisting on getting the name of the staff, the person in question suddenly appeared from the back of the room and asked why the netizen wanted to get his name and whether he would report him to SMRT.The netizen felt that the staff should not have treated him that way and warned other commuters that such incidents happen. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen to leave details of the incident via the Contact SMRT online feedback channel, so that it can be investigated.
Jervin Mason shared her unfavourable experience riding an SMRT taxi. The netizen said she took an SMRT taxi from The Centrepoint in Orchard towards Clarke Quay taxi stand in front of Novotel. The driver asked her which particular taxi stand she wanted as there were a number of taxi stands in the area. She guided the taxi towards her destination and again mentioned that she would be alighting at the taxi stand in front of Novotel. The driver, however, seemed not to understand her. Upon reaching the place, the netizen gave the driver S$10 for the S$9.25 fare but the driver continued to nag regarding the misunderstanding and also raised his voice at the netizen. Jervin Mason told the driver not to raise his voice or she would call the police. The driver dared her to call the police and accused her of trying to have a free ride. She reminded the cabby that she already gave him S$10 for the fare and was just waiting for her change. Seraphina Chin suggested reporting the incident to SMRT and complain about how terrible the driver treated her.
Speaking to current affairs programme Talking Point, Chew Men Leong, LTA CEO, stated that the Cross Island Line (CRL) that would stretch from Jurong to Changi could save commuters up to 40 minutes of travel time. He added that the CRL would create more travel options for commuters as half of the 30-over stations have connections to other lines. During disruptions, commuters also have alternative travel options, enhancing the resilience of the entire network. Several netizens believed that the existing MRT lines were more than sufficient for a small island like Singapore and that the Government should focus on improving the reliability and efficiency of the existing lines. Edmond Phon said that it was probably true that the flora and fauna would not be drastically affected as the Government has enough confidence. The netizen added that for someone living in the west, six minutes of delay was a pretty big deal. Dennis LH Cheong asked what was the possibility of needing a new MRT line skirting the nature reserve in the future. Jayson Chong asked what the difference was between the planned Cross Island Line and the current East-West Line which also runs from Jurong East to Changi. PE Goh asked the ministers to focus on the quality of the existing lines that were met with breakdowns quite often. The netizen said that the number of train lines would not save 40 minutes of travel time but the reduction of breakdowns would save commuters more hours.
It was reported that Tower Transit had a smooth start and helped improve bus services on most routes with shorter waiting time.An LTA study examined the reliability of 24 bus services, including Tower Transit's performance for 12 days from June 27 when the new school semester started. This was compared with the performances of SMRT and SBS Transit in May, before they started handing over the routes.Twenty of the 24 services showed fewer instances of "bus bunching and reductions in instances of prolonged waits.Four bus services, however, showed drops in reliability, which was most pronounced in Clementi feeder service route 282.Mr Andrew Bujtor, Tower Transit Singapore's Managing Director, said that the firm has rolled out an incentive scheme to reward bus captains based on how well they could keep to the schedule. Extra training would also be provided so that they could work closely with service controllers, who monitor bus routes live from a remote location. Several netizens stated that there might be shorter waiting times for Tower Transit buses but travelling times were longer as buses were slower. Others explained that Tower Transit bus captains have timetables to follow that were set out by LTA and that they could not arrive earlier than the stated time. Schiffon Winnie Chan said that Tower Transit offered better services and their bus captains were kind too.
Matthew Tay commended the bus captain of service 805 (SMB188C) for her cheerful personality and service attitude which brought many smiles to passengers faces. The netizen said that being a bus captain was not easy, having long driving hours, short breaks and danger on the road.
LTA announced on May 9 that there have been more regular wait times and less crowding for public buses under the Bus Service Reliability Framework (BSRF), which assesses the regularity of a bus service using the concept of Excess Wait Time (EWT) the difference between actual and scheduled wait times. For improving bus waiting times under BSRF, transport operators SBS Transit and SMRT have received S$1.34M and S$504,000, respectively.In a statement, LTA said that 27 out of the 34 services assessed achieved excess wait times that were better than the baselines, indicating that bus arrivals were more regularly spread out for the June 2015 to November 2015 period. LTA stated that overall, both operators have sustained improvements in reliability since the implementation of the BSRF trial through enhanced management of the bus fleet and the hiring of more service controllers.Meanwhile, under the Bus Service Enhancement Programme (BSEP), a total of 800 Government-funded buses have been added as of Mar 31. Nine new bus services were introduced in the first quarter of this year, bringing the total number of new or amended services under the BSEP to 63. The transport authority said that 15 additional buses were deployed to 13 existing services in the first quarter of this year, adding a total of 185 weekly peak-hour bus trips to reduce crowding and shorten wait times.LTA added that "SBS Transit and SMRT have also improved seven bus services by deploying higher capacity buses and/or adding more bus trips along sectors that experience heavy ridership. This provided another 35 weekly peak-hour trips. Many netizens disapproved of the reward given to the two transport operators, saying that they had not seen any improvements in waiting times of buses. Several mentioned that the transport operators should not be rewarded because it was their basic service to ensure that buses arrive on time. Reginald Ashton said that bus captains who go the extra mile for their passengers should be rewarded instead. Dennis J Tan sarcastically praised LTA for its good job in rewarding the operators for meeting expectations using taxpayers money. ??? understood that SBS Transit was rewarded as their buses had been quite reliable so far. The netizen, however, questioned the reward given to SMRT, saying that LTA might have failed to look into the bus timings for service 858. S/he added that it was difficult to board the said service at TPE Punggol Road exit bus stop from 6:30 to 7:30 a.m. EmPtYsOuLz mentioned that the bus operators should be penalised for lateness rather than rewarded for punctuality.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan asked whether Singapore could achieve Taipeis reliability charts, as Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan had set a lofty target for Singapore rail operators to achieve Taipei Metro's 2015 reliability standard of 800,000 train-km between disruptions.The writer noted that Taipei's system was nationalised and that there was only one operator: the Government. Tan believed that as long as the local rail companies remain listed entities with shareholders to answer to, they would continue to have to juggle opposing objectives.The writer, however, said that it was disturbing that Taipei does not disclose how many major disruptions it has, while Hong Kong's MTR has been able to admirably reduce the major disruptions. The writer went on to say that while Taipei's mean distance between failures was an excellent target to aim for, Hong Kong's achievements were also great as it has a low number of major disruptions.The writer believed that having Taiwan's reliability standards, and Hong Kong's low number of major disruptions should be the way to go for Singapores rail operators. Several netizens stated that Singapore should first match Hong Kongs MTR reliability before Taipeis. Robert Lim was uncertain that Singapore could match Taipeis reliability in four years time, even if local train operations were nationalised. Pauline Tan believed that Taipei and Hong Kongs rail reliability could be achieved if the people running the system have sufficient knowledge and training. Sangha Vandana said that SMRT and ComfortDelGro should first delist from Singapore Exchange to give them more leeway on their financial management for trains without the need to worry over dividend payment to shareholders.
A Comfort taxi crashed into a street lamp along Braddell Road in the morning of Mar 3. Simon Kiang, a security guard who was in the nearby News Centre's guardhouse, heard a loud "bang" at around 6:55 a.m. and ventured out to investigate. He said that the front left part of the taxi was badly mangled, while a damaged part of the lamp was seen dangling on a single wire. The taxi driver claimed that he had been distracted by the street lamp, which he claimed was not working at the time of the accident.
?Joanne Ang? suggested that buses should have a feature which announces that an elderly was on board and passengers should give up their seats. The netizen said that the feature was needed for passengers who were either sleeping or on their mobile phones.
Illusionist_85 shared an article about a unique seating mechanism that could be found on the 5000 series trains run by rail operator Keihan Railways, which services the Osaka, Kyoto, and Shiga regions in Japan. The seat slowly descends from the ceiling to rest in front of one of the train doors and slots perfectly in place with other seats on the side of the carriage. The seats are only used during off peak periods. Some of the train doors will be deactivated so that the seats can descend from the ceiling to provide extra seating.This 5000 series train has been in operation since 1971, and is the only one in all of Japan to be equipped with the special overhead seating storage. The netizen wondered whether such technology could be implemented in Singapore. Several netizens stated that the technology might not work in Singapore since the passengers using the seat had to stand up whenever the train doors open. peaceheart said that such technology would only cause more problems. Wonder84 said that the idea is not feasible as the trains in Singapore stop at every station.
Organisers of the Singapore Airshow announced that on-call taxis would not be allowed on the show site to manage traffic congestion and reduce waiting times for those queuing for taxis. Leck Chet Lam, Managing Director of air show organiser Experia Events, said that taxis that turn up with the on-call sign would have to join the normal queue or turn back. Passengers would have to queue for taxis and pay a $10 taxi surcharge or hop into shuttle buses. Meanwhile, only private vehicles with the air show car label would be given access to the venue. This also means there would be no entry for Uber and Grab taxis and vehicles. Leck also stated that the organisers were working with local companies to conduct briefings and on-site orientation sessions for their drivers to educate them about the traffic arrangements. Gerald Chan, National Taxi Association President, confirmed that they had been briefed and informed of the new traffic guidelines and the taxi drivers had been advised not to accept bookings for the air show. Some netizens disagreed with the new regulation, saying that it would be inconvenient for the air show visitors. Others said that the S$10 surcharge for taxis that would join the taxi queue was too expensive. A few thought that the idea was great and that it was about time for Singaporeans to learn to be less pampered and learn to queue and wait. Neo Wee Wu said that the new regulation imposed by the air show organisers was an example of the extra perks of being licenced taxi drivers. An Dee said that there should also be a designated area for on-call taxis away from the regular taxi queue to enable everyone to leave quickly. Adrian Chua mentioned that there would be no congestion inside the venue compound but the congestion would be by the roadside where most private vehicles would park.
The LTA announced that the Woodlands Regional Bus Interchange would be refurbished and an underpass would be built linking the upgraded bus interchange with the North-South Line Woodlands station and the future Thomson-East Coast Line Woodlands station.The upgraded bus interchange would be equipped with "more commuter-centric and barrier-free facilities" to serve residents and the amenities would be enhanced for bus captains.To make way for the construction of the underpass, the existing bus interchange would be temporarily relocated starting Mar 12 to an adjacent site along Woodlands Square. Bus stops along the existing service routes from the interchange would remain unchanged. Sheltered linkways would connect the temporary interchange with the MRT station and Causeway Point shopping centre. Several netizens hoped that the new interchange would have air conditioners, with one saying that the humidity and the exhaust fumes from buses could cause discomfort for waiting commuters. Ge Song Liang pointed out that the Woodlands Regional Interchange was one of the busiest bus interchanges in Singapore, so it was timely to upgrade the interchange to better serve the public. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox hoped that the refurbished interchange would be bigger, with wider roads, more parking slots and alighting berths for buses.
The Online Citizen (TOC) claimed to have discovered that more members of the Sports Hubs senior management team had left or were in the process of leaving the project. Rob Abernethy, Deputy Managing Director of Global Spectrum, one of the consortiums key partners would be leaving while acting Managing Director Jason Hrick had left the project.Other top officials who has left the project were Communications Manager Sam Eatwell, Sports Hub's Director of Marketing Eugene Lee, Director of Facility Management Sports Hub consortium partner Cushman and Wakefield Daniel Teo, Sports Hub's Design Director Hendra Chong, and Social Media and Marketing Manager Daphne Chew.According to a Sport Hub insider and current staffer who spoke on the condition of anonymity, the departures reflect the continued state of unhappiness within the project and the current leadership. The insider claimed that there is no vision for the project and no one seems to know where the project is headed. There is no event strategy, community engagement strategy or any kind of strategy. When there is no vision from the management, it will be hard for staff to feel motivated.Due to a lack of events at the National Stadium, sponsors of the project also wanted to question if they were getting their moneys worth by investing in the project. Several netizens wondered why the original Kallang Stadium was even demolished and replaced with the Sports Hub. RandomNexus believed that the problem exists with the project model: privatisation of an institution yet requiring it to serve national objectives. The netizen stated that the Government was unable to distinguish the contradictions of a privatised enterprise and a national institution with the private company assuming the costs but at the same time, requiring it to do national service like rent the stadium for National Day events at a "lower" cost and host football matches at "discounts". Stephen Tan stated that the marketing strategy was all wrong and it has high rental rate. Samantha Tan wondered why it was difficult to attract international events to the Sports Hub. jessie asked how the service fee of S$193.7M a year was computed, if there were penalty clauses for non-performance and whether the contract could be terminated.
Speaking at a rail engineering forum yesterday (May 30), Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan lauded the Taipei metro system for its reliability as observed during his latest study trip to Taipei two weeks ago. The trip was led by LTA CE Chew Men Leong, together with SBS Transit and SMRT. Rather than employ their own data on maintenance regime, Mr Khaw said SBS Transit and SMRT should "copy" the Taipei Rapid Transit Corporation's (TRTC) first and not re-invent the wheel, given that both countries' trains and rail system are similar.Mr Khaw cited the TRTCs strong ownership of service reliability at all levels of the organisation, its timely maintenance and replacement of assets, as well as fast response to rail network problems as qualities to follow.Mr Khaw considered it an outstanding performance for TRTC to clock a mean distance of 800,000 train kilometres between delays exceeding five minutes in 2015. He challenged SBS Transit and SMRT to aim for 400,000 train-km between delays by 2018 and double it to 800,000 train-km by 2020.In hard-hitting remarks about the state of Singapores rail reliability, Mr Khaw said that complacency and certainly distracted management led to the current state of affairs, as he outlined areas the rail operators need to shape up in.On Facebook, Member of Parliament and National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) Executive Secretary Melvin Yong stated that the NTWU fully agrees that Singapore needs to learn from the best and to set targets for better and more consistent train reliability. He said that it was also important that our rail operators continue to motivate and rally the workers toward a common goal. Several netizens believed that the Singapore rail system should go back to its previous world-class performance instead of emulating Hong Kong and Taiwans performance. davteo5 stated that after studying Hong Kong and Taiwans rail system, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was getting closer to resolving the MRTs efficiency problem. MyWill found it ironic that Singapore was now learning from Taiwan when Singapore started running its rail system decades ahead of Taiwan. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox cited that in Taipei, train timings are counted by minutes and seconds, and their train captains step out of the train to check for clearance before closing the doors. The netizen also said that Taipei metro previously exhibited advertisements about SMRT trains, and there are cleaners at the last station cleaning the train while waiting for it to depart. Conrad Li said that Singapore should also use more meaningful statistics to measure performance like the HK MTR.
?Rin Krakens? reported that service 983 buses travel at an extremely slow speed of 5km/hr. The netizen said that the bus captain would also open the door for a minute at empty bus stops or would stop at bus stops for a while before moving very slowly to the next stop. ?Safarina Rina? stated that service 962 was the slowest bus in Singapore. The netizen claimed that bus captains purposely drove at very slow speeds when approaching traffic lights so that they could stop. The netizen also asked SMRT to deploy more bendy buses during peak hours.
?Clarence Ng ? stated that the air-conditioning system on trains on the North-South Line were not functioning again.
On Facebook, Nirmal Kunasegaran posted about an early morning accident involving a van, an SMRT bus and a motorcyclist along Seletar Expressway. The netizen observed that no vehicles along the expressway stopped to assist the injured motorcyclist, including the bus captain and passengers. Nirmal Kunasegaran said that he immediately stopped and assisted the rider who was lying at the side of the road. Another rider who was present to assist the injured motorcyclist left shortly after he arrived. He expressed his disappointment with the bus captain for his lack of knowledge on what to do during such situations and for being more concerned about the bus than attending to the injured motorcyclist. He added that the bus doors were closed and passengers were still in the bus, and said that someone could have rendered medical attention to the victim. Subsequently when the replacement bus came, the netizen said that it was very unsightly that none of the passengers went to ask the motorcyclist if he was alright. Some were more interested in taking pictures and videos than offering help. The netizen also mentioned that he was the one who took the motorcyclists particulars. Several netizens stated that it would cause additional jam on the road if all vehicles were to stop and assist the injured rider. Some praised the contributor for offering assistance to the injured. Liu Xinyu said that closing the bus door was much safer for the passengers than allowing them to alight along the expressway while they wait for the replacement bus to arrive. Darren Ang said that SMRT should clarify the standard procedures during road accidents.
LTA launched the National Day Parade (NDP) themed trains in collaboration with SMRT and SBST which would run until mid-August. Four trains one each on the North-South East West Line, Northeast Line, Circle Line and Downtown line are specially decorated based on the NDP theme Building our Singapore of Tomorrow. Ljc Lim wondered whether only first generation trains were decorated. ??? asked whether there were other events organized by SMRT to celebrate NDP 2016 or whether there would be free rides on August 9.
WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? suggested removing the new bus stop (BS44909) at Block 184 allocated for services 171 and 970. The netizen stated that many commuters were still unaware of the new bus stop and that buses apparently still use the old bus stop (BS 44259) to pick up passengers. Aaron Tan said that SMRT should consider the suggestion because the buses were not using the new bus stop. WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox mentioned that the terminating service like 972 could stop at Block 184. The netizen added that several service 970 passengers were also seen waiting for the bus at this old stop. Boon Kiat Teo said that the issue had been reported many times already but SMRT had yet to take action.
On Facebook, photos of a cat lying on top of a gantry at Bukit Gombak Station were shared. Several netizens were amused by the cat which seemed to be enjoying itself watching commuters enter the platform. Some asked in jest whether the cat was a newly-hired station security office.
?Xinying Tan? reported that the bus captain of service 963 (SMB1523L) did not open the bus door to let passengers board at bus stop 42311 at around 6:45 p.m on June 8.The netizen said that SMRT should check the CCTV to review the incident.
On SMRT Facebook Page, Jiajun Lin reported multiple train delays on the same day and on the same trip. The netizen said that the train stopped four times from Pasir Ris to Tanah Merah and up to Raffles Place. ?Another netizen, Venkatakrishnan Kambarajan? also asked why the trains had been stopping for five minutes during a busy morning. Jiajun Lin said that five minutes was beyond the range of passenger loading.
On Redwire Singapore, it was mentioned that it took two foreign bus companies to show that the National Trades Union Congress (NTUC) failed as a labour union and that their recommendations and collaborative relationship with private firms were all nonsensical.Both foreign bus companies, Tower Transit and Go-Ahead offered a starting salary of S$1,865 for bus drivers while SBS Transits starting pay for a Singaporean driver was S$1,775, and S$1,625 for SMRT bus drivers.It was surmised that SBS and SMRT either have not adjusted, or refused to adjust their salary scales to match anything that the foreigners were offering.SBS and SMRT stated that their bus drivers could potentially earn as much as drivers working for Tower Transit or Go-Ahead if they worked harder and longer.NTUC has to play a greater role as a union to seek the best benefits for its workers. Several netizens were glad that the foreign bus companies were offering higher wages and better working conditions to the bus drivers. Ong Tee Heng believed that the foreign companies were only offering higher wages to lure drivers, considering their limited number in Singapore. David Loh pointed out the Transport Union that was affiliated with NTUC had been consulted by the foreign operators regarding the terms of the pay packages. Ben Tiong wondered if NTUC had ever been a labour union.
Shandy Goh? was grateful to Bus Captain Mohd Tuffille Farhan Bin Zaine for helping her mother retrieve her handbag which was left in the bus on Jun 28 at around 9:30 p.m. The netizen mentioned that the bag contained many sentimental items which were very valuable to her mother. She added that the bus captain refused to accept the monetary gift offered by her mother.
Go-Ahead Singapore, rolled out its first 13 bus services on September 4.Among those taking the firm's first-ever local bus service were a few commuters, senior staff from Go-Ahead, and National Transport Workers' Union Executive Secretary Melvin Yong.Mr Melvin Yong has been working closely with Go-Ahead since it was awarded the Loyang bus package in November last year. He noted that Go-Ahead has put much effort into learning and appreciating local culture. He stated that authorities would continue to work closely with Go-Ahead to ensure a smooth transition for the worker and commuters. Several netizens hoped that they would see improvements in frequency of buses under Go-Ahead. Jaxon Lee observed that the buses under Go-Ahead were cleaner. Siva Rajoo mentioned that there was a 20-minute wait for Go-Ahead buses.
Ice showers coming from the air-conditioner vents of some China-made trains plying the Circle Line was reported on August 10. There were at least two incidents last month: one on a train travelling from Bartley to Kent Ridge where ice shards, some the size of a little finger, fell from an air-conditioning vent. The train was evacuated mid-journey. The second incident took place on a train from Bras Basah to Serangoon, when ice particles fell from above.The trains were designed by French manufacturer Alstom and assembled in China. Their air-conditioning system was jointly designed by Alstom and Chinese equipment supplier King.The Land Transport Authority (LTA) told The Straits Times that it was aware of the flaw, and was taking steps to rectify it.LTA also said that such problems were not specific to trains, and could happen to home air-conditioning systems and refrigerators.Professor Choo Fook Hoong of the Energy Research Institute at Nanyang Technological University said that while the phenomenon does arise, "it is not common". Prof Choo said the flaw could be easily fixed by replacing the faulty sensor.ComfortDelGro Corp said that it has also encountered ice forming on the air-con vents of its Downtown Line trains. Several netizens stated that poor maintenance was the cause of the issues with the trains air-conditioning system. Others suggested that SMRT should stop buying trains that were manufactured or assembled in China. Loh Wai Poon explained that the ice formation was an indication of blockage in the air conditioning ducts. The netizen also asked whether the air-conditioning system was maintained properly. Mathew Ng said that it was unfair to blame the manufacturer unless the issues were caused by train build quality. Tony Ang stated that the people who procured the train must be held accountable for the purchase. Prithpal Singh asked whether others have seen the oxidation on the roofs of the trains. The netizen was concerned that there could be leaks on the roof or the roof could fall if the issues were left unrectified.
?Kelly Lim? shared a photo of Bedok Station with its gates closed at 6:05 a.m. on Apr 24.The netizen said that here was no explanation why the gates were closed. Commuters were also stopped from using the lift. The netizen mentioned that there was no inconvenience caused but hoped that there would be more communications with the passengers "stranded" outside the station.
On Jul 8, five Members of Parliament from The Workers Party filed parliamentary questions to the Minister of Transport Khaw Boon Wan regarding the issue of defective trains. The questions, however, would only be answered in the August Parliamentary sitting as parliamentary procedure dictates that seven clear days are required for all questions.Some of the questions asked by the Members of Parliament were about the total number of MRT trains deployed for operations, whether SMRT board members and the management of LTA and Temasek Holdings knew about the defects on the trains, whether the Ministry of Transport and LTA were aware of the problems with the MRT trains delivered in 2013, the safety of the defective trains, and whether current guidelines require information about the defects to be made public. Several netizens were uncertain that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan would respond to the questions truthfully. Others stated that LTA should have announced the defects after they had been discovered and assured the public that there was no reason to panic as the trains were sent back for repair. Some mentioned that the trains should not have been sent back if it was really not safety-critical. Isaac Thang asked why SMRT did not terminate the contract and ask for a refund after the hairline cracks were discovered instead of just sending the trains back for repair. Arthur Koo said that the members of the Workers Party should focus on other more significant issues than the defective trains.
Dexter shared photos of a young woman s/he saw spraying graffiti on a pillar of an MRT track near Simei MRT station on Mar 17. The woman together with two companions were in clear view of the public. Several netizens stated that the group should be charged with vandalism and be made to clean up the vandalised pillar. Some said the photo-taker should have approached the vandals to warn them that they were committing an illegal act. Others stated that the incident should have been reported to the police. Hamzah Osman mentioned that the youngsters might have forgotten about Michael Fay, the first person who got caned for vandalising SMRT property. GOD_WILL said that the photo should be published on newspapers to let everyone know about vandals.
?Jayden Yap? reported a defective grab pole inside the East-West Line train car 3008 travelling to Joo Koon.
Passengers on two specially-equipped public buses could now surf the web for free by connecting to public Wi-Fi service Wireless@SG during their commute.The two SMRT service 176 buses, which ply between Bukit Panjang and Bukit Merah, were offering the service. They could be identified by a blue livery wrapped around the exterior, along with relevant signage on-board. The buses were linked to M1s 4G+ network through an in-vehicle unit that boosts the bandwidth available to the on-board wireless network. Tan Kian Heong, SMRT Buses Vice President, said that the service may be expanded to the entire SMRT fleet of buses in the future if the trial was successful. Among the transport operators, Go-Ahead Singapore expressed interest to support the Government's plan to ramp up Wireless@SG coverage around the country. Several netizens were looking forward to seeing the free Wi-Fi service on more SMRT buses. Others hoped that the connection onboard buses would be stable. Some stated that Wireless@SG was not quite user friendly. The Singapore Way said that the free service was a good reason to justify an increase in fares. Bradley Reuben Jacob said that the free Wi-Fi service should be introduced in all buses.
Ride-hailing company Grab and taxi operator Trans-cab announced a partnership to bring all Trans-cab drivers onto the Grab platform.The partnership would see about 7,000 Trans-cab drivers exclusively using the Grab mobile application to accept bookings.Trans-cab drivers would be introduced to the Grab platform and would receive training on how to use the app, as well as subsidised smartphones. Some netizens considered the partnership a good move. Others wondered why Grab agreed to the partnership since Trans-Cab drivers were known for their poor service. A few mentioned that the partnership would reduce Trans-Cabs costs in maintaining a call centre.
In a press release, the Ministry of Transport (MOT) announced that Singapore Press Holdings' (SPH) chief executive officer Alan Chan would succeed Michael Lim Choo San as chairman of the LTA on Apr 1. The MOT thanked outgoing Chairman Lim for his contributions to LTA, and said that many key land transport strategies were launched and implemented under his stewardship. They include the launch of the Land Transport Master Plan in 2008, rail projects that expanded Singapore's rail network to cover more than 200km island-wide, as well as the launch of the Bus Service Enhancement Programme that increased bus capacity and bus service levels.The ministry also said that Chan's extensive leadership experience would offer LTA invaluable guidance in the future development of land transport in Singapore." Brightkid speculated that Alan Chan was posted at the LTA to tell his former subordinates in SPH what to report in mainstream media whenever the transportation fails, which was so frequent. Pang Soon Tan said that he still misses the era when Fock Siew Wah was chairman of LTA. NoNewsGood said that Alan Chan has as much experience as a retrenched duty free shop manager running SMRT.
Grampa disapproved of SMRTs playing of audio advertisements on trains, saying it was too much to force everyone to take irrelevant information throughout the day. Some netizens mentioned that the Downtown Line has audio and visual advertisements, which were under SBS Transit and not SMRT. redsugar said that the advertisements were generating revenue for SMRT. KenwhyKen stated that the audio advertisements from SMRT was too much. ashieru mentioned that the SMRT display panels should be for safety purposes and not for advertisements.
?Odelia Tan? stated that the London Underground had started a 24-hour service on Fridays and Saturdays and asked whether Singapore would also introduce the same to boost the economy. Timothy TwoWave said that it is best to wait for sleeper replacement works to complete. The netizen also mentioned that there were night bus routes in Singapore which passengers staying out late could take.
Yong Jian Ming? wondered why it was extremely crowded at Yew Tee at 8.15am on June 29 such that even the escalators were blocked by the crowd.
Nur Khairah, together with a group of recently-graduated students from Ngee Ann Polytechnics School of Film and Media Studies, produced and co-wrote a short film about her father, who is a staff with SMRT one of the many silent heroes who work hard to keep Singapore moving and humming. The short film, titled Ayah (Malay for father), was inspired by the real-life experience of the films producer. She said that her father puts in extra hours in times of breakdowns and emergency scenarios, ending up missing dinner time with the family.The July 7 disruption in 2015, for instance, led to her father working past midnight even after the train faults were resolved, and Nur Khairah said she feels sad that most commuters complain without realising what was happening behind the scenes. Many netizens stated that the short film was a good reminder for the public to be more understanding and to show respect to the unsung heroes who are very responsible and competent in performing their job. Mohd Isbandi said that it is quite sad to see that most Singaporeans do not smile, acknowledge or show gratitude to ground staff who sacrifice their time, off days, break and family time to keep the transport system going. Some hoped that the engineers, technicians and other ground staff were compensated well. Many netizens expressed their gratitude to the technicians and engineers for their hard work.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRTs refurbishment of its escalators at 42 MRT stations along the North-South and East-West Lines. Some netizens were glad that SMRT was finally refurbishing its escalators. Others asked who would pay for the refurbishment and whether fares would also increase. Konnichiwa said that LRT stations should also have escalators since it was troublesome to climb up and down the stairs. Omar Bin Ahmad hoped that SMRT would not buy China-made escalators. RelaxMaster mentioned that SMRT was being proactive in refurbishing its escalators to safeguard the lives of commuters.
Two days after Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan praised the North-South Line (NSL) for having achieved 100 days without any major incident on his blogpost, services on the NSL and SBSTs North-East Line (NEL) were disrupted by separate faults on Apr 21. The train operators were still investigating the causes. Despite the challenges, rail reliability has been improving over the past few years as trains were now travelling further before breaking down: 133,000km last year compared to 93,000km in 2014. The improvement, however, was still well below Hong Kongs 300,000km. Minister Khaw said the game plan was to slowly catch up, setting a target of 200,000km. The question, however, is when Singapore would catch up. Several netizens stated with sarcasm that Singapores rail system reached a new milestone: having two breakdowns on the same day. Yani June stated that commuters were now immune to train breakdowns. foxtrotbravo21 stated that Singapore has one of the "shortest" MRT systems and one of the "newest" in the world but yet the breakdowns by ratio in Singapore were higher than the London Tube and the New York subway which were older.
The LTA stated that it has started speaking to people likely to be affected by the construction of the proposed route for the Cross Island Line set to run from Jurong, past Clementi, before ending in Changi.Chua Chong Kheng, LTA Deputy Chief Executive of Infrastructure and Development said that the Government has yet to make a decision on which option to pursue. If the direct alignment is chosen, construction of the MRT tunnel will be via underground tunnelling methods, and will be done from outside the nature reserve.Meanwhile, nature groups were hoping that increased awareness about Singapore's biodiversity would get the authorities to rethink the route for the Cross Island Line. The groups also hoped that the proposed rail line could be rerouted south near Lornie Road to avoid the nature reserve entirely.Professor Lee Der-Horng from the National University of Singapores Civil and Environmental Engineering Department, however, said that the suggestion might not be feasible due to the curvature of the road. He instead proposed going further out through Bukit Brown, since Bukit Brown would be developed into a major population or residential area.He added that if the future Cross Island Line would negotiate the curves along Lornie Road, it is going to cause some negative impact on track maintenance and even the tunnel construction. Several netizens asked the LTA not to build the Cross Island Line through the nature reserve. Others said that the LTA should go ahead with its original plan. Andrew Loh mentioned that the Central Nature Reserve was not the only nature reserve in Singapore but also Pulau Ubin and the Western Water Catchment. The netizen urged others that rather than opposing the MRT line cut across the central nature reserve, it would be better to focus on minimising the impact. Susan Kateri Tan suggested asking another expert to analyse the ground foundation, soil, and water before making a concrete decision. Irene Soh said that Singapore already has many rail lines and that Singapore does not need another line. The Government only has to ensure that the rail services are reliable.
On his self-titled blog, Tan Kin Lian mentioned about the fare table at the bus stop which showed a Workfare Travel Concession Scheme (WTCS) aside from the usual adult, senior citizen and student fare. Tan wondered why the special fare structure was needed, saying that it was a waste of funds to create many fare schemes. He suggested that higher benefits should be given to Workfare recipients and make them pay ordinary adult fare.Tan noted that the Government spend large sums of money that were unnecessary and could be avoided.
Netizens continued to discuss the pay rise of 3.5% that Tower Transit staff could expect starting this month. Some netizens pointed out that to achieve a higher pay, the bus captains need to work extra hours. Others claimed that SMRT and SBS Transit were paying their staff less than Tower Transit Eric Loke stated that Tower Transit should increase the base pay to attract more people to work for them. Peter Tan said that to work extra overtime hours would be more tiring for the bus captains. James Wang said that SMRT and SBS Transit have to match the salary structure of Tower Transit or risk losing more bus captains.
Tan Kin Lian asked on his Facebook page if netizens would shut down the entire North-South Line for six months to carry out essential repairs if they were the Transport Minister or an expert suggests it. Jeffrey Lim suggested shutting down the line in stages so as to avoid disrupting all train services. Bus services should also be sufficient to cope with the increased passenger load. Andrew Teo asked how Singapore would be able to cope with the millions of commuters each day if the line was to be shut down for six months. Constantine Giam suggested shutting down the line only in the afternoon after most people had already travelled to work.
On May 31, SMRT Corp would be transferring 175 buses to the LTA in preparation for Singapore's new public bus contracting regime. The buses were bought using loan facilities provided by the LTA under the government's Bus Service Enhancement Programme (BSEP), The consideration for the buses would be equivalent to their net book value, estimated to be about S$66.3M, including all liabilities owed to LTA stemming from the loan facilities, so there would not be any impact on SMRT's net assets or earnings. Joseph Lee wondered why the LTA had to buy back the buses given to SMRT using Governments money. Lau Yiwei explained that the money spent earlier was for the BSEP to increase the number of buses on the roads. The netizen said that under the arrangement, the brand new buses would be owned by LTA but operated by SMRT. He claimed that the money being spent now was to buy older buses from SMRT so that LTA would eventually own all the buses in Singapore. Darren Tay stated that the price of the used buses should be discounted and not equivalent to the net book value.
According to data shared by the LTA, the average waiting times at a dozen major cab stands in the city have fallen compared with two years ago. The authority said that this could be due to more taxis plying the roads and ride-hailing apps helping to ease customer demand.While it is easier to get a cab at some taxi stands in the city, commuters are waiting a bit longer at five places: Tanglin Shopping Centre, Suntec Tower 3 and 4, Funan Digita- Life Mall, Havelock Square and Parklane Shopping Mall. ooolong stated that there were lesser passengers because times were bad. blackestvoid believed that the statistics have been skewed as usual.
A commentary was observed on Singapore Daily regarding the NRFF. Three points which stood out in the whole deal were mentioned:1. The deal was not a bailout since negotiations between the LTA and SMRT had been ongoing since four years ago. 2. It would be great for commuters because the LTA would be able to plan and expand capacity ahead of demand. The transport authority would also be able to ensure that operating assets would be replaced, and upgraded in a timely manner. 3. SMRT is expected to improve its performance now that it has become asset-light. The LTA could shorten their licence tenure to 15 years from 30 to 40 years under the previous framework, making the industry more contestable. Calvin Koh agreed that public transport should be operated by the Government and that capable and responsible leaders should be appointed to run its operations.
?Janet I. Tan? said that she was a happy resident of Yishun because of the great bus captain of service 812 (SG1691L). The netizen mentioned that the bus captain was patient, friendly, loving and has a passion to serve. The netizen stated that even her daughter spoke well of the bus captain as he would patiently wait for her to cross the road to board the bus on many rainy days. Janet I. Tan added that the bus captain also waited for an elderly passenger to find a seat before driving off. The netizen said that she was very grateful, and even boarded the bus to personally express her appreciation to him and to experience his good service. She added that the bus captain has gone the extra mile which was not left unnoticed.
In a written reply to Member of Parliament Desmond Choos question on how the Land Transport Authority (LTA) could better cater to the needs of families with young children on board public buses, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the public transport system must be inclusive and cater to the needs of different commuters, including families with young children.He added that ways to safely secure strollers on board public buses were being studied so that parents or caregivers would not have to fold them and carry the child in their arms during commutes. For now, bus captains and MRT station staff were trained to assist passengers with strollers while there were priority seats for young children and their caregivers. Some netizens approved of the plan to allow open strollers and have designated spaces for parking of strollers inside the bus because it was troublesome to have to fold and secure the stroller while holding a child. Others stated that commuters with young children and strollers should avoid commuting during rush hours. Some urged other commuters to be more patient and helpful towards those travelling with young children and the elderly. Teryn Lee asked about space for wheelchairs and strollers on double-decker buses. Joo Fong See said that commuters with babies should consider using baby carriers instead of strollers. The netizen also observed that most strollers ended up being used as shopping trolleys.
Stomper Steven was surprised to experience a downpour in Outram Park MRT station. The netizen was making his way to Bugis via the East West Line at 6:15 a.m. on Jun 12 when he noticed water leaking from the ceiling near the escalators and buckets placed around the station were almost filled to the brim. UFOSG was concerned on the safety of commuters as the escalators might get short-circuited because of the water leak. Soh Wee Meng mentioned that Outram Park station was not the only MRT station that have water leaks from ceilings. S/he added that the signs were simply put up to warn commuters about the leaks but nothing has been done to resolve them. Bruce Lee asked SMRT to look into the issue as the ceiling might collapse because of the water leak.
On Facebook, National Transport Workers Union (NTWU) Executive Secretary Melvin Yong posted about the Memorandum of Understanding (MoU) which was signed last evening (September 7) which finalised the details of the revised employment terms covering both salary and workplace benefit items. Mr Yong said that NTWU is pleased that SMRT made considerable effort to match the employment packages offered by the PTOs. He added that NTWU will be working together with SMRT to communicate the revised employment package to the workers over the next few weeks.
Go-Ahead Singapore Managing Director Nigel Wood stated that the company would look to give its bus captains more say in their schedules including which shift hours they prefer to work to the duration of their meal breaks. The company would match bus captains with routes that fit their requests.Mr Wood believed that by doing so, its bus captains would be more motivated and more likely to stay with the company.National Transport Workers' Union executive secretary Melvin Yong said that it was good that Go-Ahead took into account its employees' preferences. Mr Yong stated, however, that expectations of workers would have to be carefully managed with good communication between both parties.
SBS Transit reported S$1.02B in group revenue for 2015, 7.7% more than the S$951M the year before.The transport operator said that the revenue from SBS' bus segment for 2015 was S$810.5M, which was 7.5% higher than the S$754M in 2014, due mainly to the increases in average daily ridership and average fare and higher other operating income.As for its rail business, revenue for 2015 was 8.3% higher than the year before at S$213.4M due mainly to the increase in average daily ridership and average fare. Its operating profit for the rail segment, however, dropped 61.9% on-year to S$3.2 due primarily to "higher staff costs from the build-up of staff for Downtown Line (DTL) Stage 2, higher premises costs and higher other operating costs, offset by higher revenue and lower electricity costs". Several netizens wondered whether SBS Transit would reduce the fares since it reported high revenue for 2015. Some said that the increase in SBS Transits revenue was good news to its shareholders. Others speculated that SBST would still apply for a fare increase citing challenging outlook. Onar mentioned that the Kranji MRT Station bus stop was the most crowded with a long queue waiting for bus 170X. The netizen suggested that the newly introduced service 170A ply between Yew Tee MRT Station bus stop to Woodland train checkpoint bus stop as a loop service. Syed Fadil said that SBST should thank every Singaporean that had contributed to the companys growth. Wang Mong Hao stated that it was time for SBST to return S$1B subsidised by the Government to buy buses. Lim George mentioned in jest that SBST should not report their profit if too high because SMRT might get jealous.
Netizens continued to discuss SBS Transits announcement of the increase in monthly basic salary for bus captains. Many believed that LTA allowed the two new bus operators to operate in Singapore for its own benefits. The netizen also doubted that LTA would prioritise the interest of commuters and bus drivers. lifeafter41 stated that the bus fares would surely increase soon. GoldenDragon mentioned that Tower Transits recruitment strategy was very impressive and that both SMRT and SBS Transit failed to develop similar ideas to attract more local bus captains.
dennismados observed that most MRT train air-conditioners were not working nowadays. The netizen asked if commuters did not deserve any proper service at all from train operators. maxmike claimed that the air-conditioners were working but were shut down at certain stations. Sg_Stone said that shutting down the air-conditioners was one way to reduce expenses as fares had been reduced. eyesawz mentioned that the trains at the Downtown Line were quite cool but it felt like being inside an oven when s/he transferred to the East-West Line train at Bugis. septumking stated that the air-conditioners on trains travelling towards Somerset and Orchard were working properly. neo_aw said that not all trains have faulty air-conditioners and that commuters had to report those with faulty ones to the train operators.
LTA announced that it would extend the operating hours of Full-Day Bus Lanes by three hours starting on Mar 21. The lanes would operate from 7:30 a.m. to 11 p.m. to shorten travel times during late evening periods.The agency also mentioned the implementation of the Bus Priority Box, also known as the Mandatory Give Way to Buses scheme, at two bus stops along Orchard Road, to evaluate its usefulness at bus stops without bus bays. Several netizens stated that LTA should educate bus drivers to stay on the dedicated bus lanes, saying that many bus drivers had been cutting in and out of regular traffic lanes. Some mentioned that the extension of bus lane operating hours was good news for commuters taking public buses, but was bad news for drivers of private vehicles and cabbies. Jun Yuan Lim said that private vehicles should be obligated to give way to buses especially when buses were about to exit the bus stops. Allen Chua suggested installing flashing lights to warn or remind drivers of the dedicated bus lanes as they often get very confused with the yellow and red lines on the roads. skai_11 wondered why private vehicle owners still pay the same road tax when the Government had been giving priority to public transport by implementing such policies, giving less travel space for private vehicles.
?Colvis Tan? stated that during delays in train service, the timing on the passengers travel card should be extended and passengers should not be charged the extended fares.
?Faith Wong Yee Teng? praised the SMRT staff at Raffles Place MRT station who was deployed near the escalator for always greeting every passenger who had alighted from the train.The netizen said that the staffs dedication and commitment to his work was admirable and that he should be recognised by SMRT.
Lim Guan Heng Bahamut stated that SMRTs MAN A95 buses were comfortable to ride on. The netizen hoped that SMRT could import more such buses to cope with increasing ridership, particularly for services 167, 180, 851, 854, 855, 961 and 980.
SMRT Corp will face lower business risks when the new rail financing framework kicks in next month, but chief executive Desmond Kuek said the rail operator will still face challenges. "Clearly, it will be a lower risk environment compared with the current arrangement, SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek said in a media interview last Thursday (September 15). "There are risk-sharing mechanisms that are not in existence under the current financial framework," he said. Mr Kuek added that "No business is risk-free. Risks, he said, included uncertainty over ridership numbers and fare adjustments. With the Government taking ownership of all assets in the new financing framework, Mr Kuek said the company will be spared hefty capital expenditures. SMRT Trains incurred a capital expenditure of $1.2 billion in the last five financial years, and Mr Kuek said it would face a $2.8 billion commitment in the next five years, under the current financial framework. If the current framework continued, he said, the rail business would be "unsustainable".On majority shareholder Temasek Holdings' offer to buy over all the shares it does not own, Mr Kuek said he "feels positive" that shareholders will accept it. He also pointed out that minority shareholders who bought shares at SMRT's initial public offering 16 years ago would have had an 11 per cent annualised return on investment if Temasek's offer was accepted. Several netizens wondered how SMRT could be losing money when they report millions of earnings every year and high ridership. Some wondered why Temasek Holdings would want to acquire SMRT if the company was not profitable.
The Singapore Land Authority (SLA) is initiating proceedings to take possession of a walk-up building along Tanjong Katong Road which needs to be demolished so that one of the stations on the Thomson-East Coast Line can be built. Two owners of five of the units, Sim Chiang Lee, his family and company, and Cheng Quek Hin, have refused to hand them over unless the SLA agrees to more compensation. The SLA stated that the owners were compensated between S$1.44M and S$1.62M for each unit, which equates to S$1,009-S$1,082 per square foot. The amounts were "market value", as determined by independent private valuers. To avoid further delay to the construction of the Amber Station, SLA said it would take over legal ownership on Apr 29 after paying the compensation amount. Several netizens stated that the valuation was quite low for a freehold property. KarHoe Ng wondered whether the SLA was using the right valuation chart. The netizen also pointed out that the surroundings would be enjoying an appreciation in property prices after the MRT station was built. Yue Sern Mok suggested that the MRT be built underground so there would be no need to relocate the residents.
SMRT posted on Twitter on 23 June that train services between Woodlands and Sembawang along the North-South Line were disrupted due to a power fault. Several netizens asked when SMRT would be able to rectify the issues to minimise train breakdowns. wallstreetraider believed that the power lines were already too old and should be upgraded. Khaizuran Khaled observed that most trains break down in the early evenings.
?Kelvin Ozaki? reported that service 975 buses were overcrowded particularly during weekends where most passengers were mostly NSFs, civil servants and foreign workers travelling to the Home Team Academy, Keat Hong camp, Lim Chu Kang farms and cemetery area, and up to Sungei Gedong camp. The netizen hoped that SMRT could come up with a solution soon, such as a short-working trip that would travel from Choa Chu Kang to Sungei Gedong camp, at least on weekends when the demand for 975 was slightly higher. Shaun Kong stated that SMRTs efficiency plays a huge part on whether servicemen could reach Sungei Gedong in time to report for their NS activities. Izzul Haziq mentioned that the problem had existed for several years already. Santhosh Kumar suggested including down routes starting at Choa Chu Kang.
BO_KO_LENG stated that the air-conditioner at the Downtown Line was faulty. A few netizens stated that the netizen should be grateful that the train was moving and anything extra was already a privilege. AS1 suggested moving to another carriage with a better air-conditioning system.
?Jia Jun ?asked SMRT to increase the frequency of bus services 187 and 188 at bus stop 44151 opposite Bukit Batok fire station during the afternoon period and to deploy double-decker buses during peak periods.
The issue on the concept that people were entitled to publicly shame those who do not give up the priority seats, as stated by a writer on TODAY Online Voices on Apr 23, was discussed on Talkbalk with Bharati and Keith radio programme. Several netizens believed that labelling of reserved seats was unnecessary because every seat should be a reserved seat for those who need them more. Others stated that anyone could occupy the reserved seats on public transport as long as they were willing to give it up to someone who needs the seat more. Some said that the priority seat scheme should be reviewed and to educate everyone to be gracious. Woon Heng Yip suggested having dedicated cabins where seats would always be reserved.
Authorities have launched a new centre to develop testing requirements for autonomous vehicles (AV) which would be on trial by 2018.The Centre of Excellence for Test and Research of AVs NTU, or Cetran, a joint project with Nanyang Technological University and government industrial developer JTC Corporation, is set to open in the next three months. The centre will craft standards and test methodologies for self-driving vehicles to ensure their safe operations on the roads.The centre and test circuit would put Singapore at the global forefront of developing these standards which would integrate self-driving vehicles safely into the transport network, according to Senior Minister of State for Transport Josephine Teo. Kenneth Wee stated that authorities were planning to introduce autonomous vehicles but have not resolved the current MRT issues. Syed Alwi Ahmad asked how many jobs would be created for locals with this new system.
Writer Dr Thomas Lee Hock Seng stated that 26 out of 35 China-made MRT trains that had to be sent back for repair was not a small number for trains that had been running only for over three years.He mentioned that the cracks were tell-tale signs of inferior materials being used in the train construction, which could not withstand repeated strong vibrations from a heavily loaded rail system in constant use.While the LTA has assured the public that the hairline cracks were not "safety-critical", the writer said that it should also disclose whether the affected cars had been used as usual and when it would deem that the margin of safety has been exceeded, and if there were more critical structural engineering problems involved that caused the material failures. Several netizens wondered why authorities did not inform the public about the defects which had been found three years ago. Joseph Low stated that fatigue failure starts with a hairline crack and that a whole beam could snap overtime even with a 12cm fracture.
?Yohannis Kasmani? reported the SMRT bus captain of service 911 with plate number SMB3085X for being rude.The netizen mentioned that while on board the bus, s/he noticed an old man chasing for the bus. The netizen informed the Chinese bus captain to stop the bus but was ignored. Thinking that the bus captain could not understand English, s/he then tapped the bus captains shoulder to motion him to stop. The bus captain, however, continued to ignore him/her and drove off despite the old man being just a few steps from the bus door.
The high court had upheld the S$5,000 fine for a 'provoked' cyclist who punched an SMRT bus driver during a road-rage altercation between the cyclist and the bus captain, which left about 20 passengers having to find alternative means of transport to get home.The prosecution had appealed for the cyclist, Ngan Swee Choon, to be given a jail term for punching bus captain Subramaniam Rajoo, in the face. But Judicial Commissioner See Kee Oon found the original sentence handed down by a district judge last September 2015 to be sufficient. Some netizens stated that many bus captains were speeding even when near the crossings before hitting the brakes. Others said that there was no justification to beat up the bus captain and instead to raise the incident to the authorities. Koh Nam thought it was another dubious judgement call from the judiciary.
Dave Zi Yang? hoped that the frequency of bus service 860 and 860A that departs from Yishun bus interchange could be further increased during weekday morning and evening peak hours. The buses were normally packed with students from the various schools in the vicinity when it reached the bus stop between Blocks 445 and 449 Yishun Ring Rd, preventing people at said bus stop and the subsequent bus stops from boarding the bus.
addict951 reported that the travel at the North-South Line was severely slowed by drizzle. S/he mentioned boarding the train at 8:33 and the train left Yishun at 8:46. The netizen also mentioned that the train had been jerking non-stop and halting every 10 minutes or so.?Liza Horvejkul? also posted about the slow train ride at the North-South Line. She said that the train was supposed to have reached Toa Payoh in 20 minutes. skai_11 said that 10 years ago, the train still travelled normally regardless of the weather. wadsad mentioned that it was better to have slow trains than a breakdown.
Gavin Moey Kok Khung found it ironic for Ang Hin Kee, National Taxi Association (NTA) Executive Adviser, to comment about "checks and balances" in the private-hire car market and the possibility that such firms would charge commuters a premium once they had dominated the industry. The netizen stated that his fear of domination and charging premiums was precisely what commuters faced before the likes of Uber and Grab entered the market. Taxi companies were increasing flag down fares and commuters had to deal with a complex structure of surcharges.As a result, drivers have no one to blame but themselves for being dominated by private-hire cars. Yet, taxi companies and the NTA tried to shut down this alternative to taxis. He stated that taxi companies would need to innovate to bring commuters back. There were still, however, many taxi drivers who refused to pick up passengers, citing shift change, inconvenient locations, and so on, and would just wait for booking calls. trendy mentioned that daily rental rate for taxis range from S$120 for a Sonata to S$190 for a Mercedes Benz excluding fuel cost, while rental rate for Grab and Uber was only S$59 a day. reformer said that taxi drivers liked to pick and choose passengers. Nova sympathised with passengers in wheelchair who were trying to flag down a taxi because most drivers would just ignore them and pretend not to notice.
On Facebook, Non-Constituency Member of Parliament Dennis Tan stated that the target set by Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan for SMRT and SBS Transit to emulate Taipei metros reliability record of 800,000 train-kilometres between delays of more than five minutes was by no means an easy target. He would want to see what the Government would do to assist or ensure that the operators achieve the target. Mr Tan said that everyone should hope that the target would be achieved. He also urged the public not to forget to thank the technicians, engineers and other MRT workers who were tirelessly keeping the trains moving, despite the challenges. Derrick Chua stated that the Government should have considered the increase in population and ridership when they planned the infrastructure.
Cee Kanake stated that the noise level during maintenance and repair of tracks at non-operating hours should be kept minimal, especially at 3 a.m.The netizen shared a video taken from a condo right next to the track between Simei and Tanah Merah. The netizen said that her unit was about 200m from the track and the loud sound of machineries could be heard like in the video. Wang Kang Rong said that it was disappointing that SMRT has absolutely no respect for people whose houses are near the tracks.SMRT Facebook administrator is contacting the complainant to find out more about the incident.
Phillip Ang mentioned in his blogpost that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan still praised SMRT despite its failures, referring to an article published on 31 May, where Minister Khaw said that both rail operators are using Taipei's metro reliability record as a benchmark and also shared lessons from a study trip to Taipei.The blogger mentioned that Minister Khaw Boon Wan claimed that SMRT was then an exemplary MRT player that staff from the Taipei Rapid Transit Corporation had in its early years visited Singapore to study the MRT. The Minister, however, did not mention whether Taiwan benefitted anything at all from their visit to Singapore. He also believed that the issues faced by SMRT were caused by lack of maintenance and planning to accommodate more than 4 million commuters. Lawrence Yen stated that Singapores rail system should not be compared with other countries rail systems but the Government should do their best to prevent failure. Wee Guan suggested outsourcing the rail network to Taiwan which would probably save taxpayers money and lower fares by 90%.
Analysts stated that the push to enable more commuters to pay transport fares with their mobile phones using Near Field Communication (NFC) technology has potential for mass adoption, given that all they need is a new SIM card and minimal infrastructure. It was also noted that the possibilities for NFC payment would be greater if more people would be willing to make the switch.Right now, the NFC technology for transport payment is available only on 19 models of Android phones, and all telcos in Singapore would start making the NFC SIM cards available in the coming weeks.Clement Teo, senior analyst at Forrester, observed that credit card companies seemed not to be part of the discussion in the NFC initiative. Commuters would lose out if they want to switch to NFC-compatible phones because they would not be able to use an NFC-linked credit card to pay for public transport or at retail outlets as they do now. Several netizens stated that authorities should get their priorities right and improve efficiency and reliability of public transport services before spending time, effort and money on these extra projects. Some wondered why the Samsung Galaxy Note S4 and S5 were not among the list of Android phone models that the technology would be available to. Others believed that the use of NFC-enabled phones would be inconvenient once the phone was lost or stolen. Iris Tay doubted that the adoption of the new technology would be high. Aaron Koh said that the cost of getting the NFC SIM card would be a barrier to using the technology.
?Xiaobai Lydia ? reported that bus service 857 did not stop at Yishun Sports Hall bus stop despite her flagging for the bus.As a result of the incident, the netizen had to wait another seven minutes before the next bus arrive. The netizen hoped that bus captains could be more considerate so that commuters would not be late for work or appointments.
WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox stated that the back and sides of the rear seats of bus service 187 (SMB237U) were dirty. Photos of the back and sides of the bus were also shared.The netizen said it was time for SMRT to clean the interior of the bus. SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
On SMRT Facebook, SMRT sought the understanding of all commuters to channel feedback about any of its Bus Captains by speaking to staff at SMRTs Passenger Service Centres or through the online feedback channel Contact SMRT. This is in relation to the video taken by a commuter which showed the Bus Captain of service 804 having an argument with the commuter. SMRT also appealed to all commuters to not distract its Bus Captains while they are driving, as it could endanger the safety of commuters onboard the bus. SMRT also stressed the safety of commuters, and hoped to seek the cooperation of commuters as its Bus Captains do their best to ensure a safe and smooth journey for all. Several netizens approved of SMRTs support for the bus captain who had followed the organisations rules and regulations. Some commended SMRT for standing up for its staff publicly. Most believed that the bus captain was not at fault but should be trained on how to deal with such commuters. A few netizens said that the commuter who filmed the video was causing trouble and had taunted the bus captain. Patrick Ang T K stated that bus enthusiasts should also be prohibited from standing next to the bus captain. Lynette Enoch mentioned that most bus captains like to engage in conversations with passengers.
News stories and discussions reading the interim safety measures ordered on SMRT by the Ministry of Manpower (MOM) and the LTA continued to be observed. Observers familiar with MRT operations said that most of the recommendations were indeed already in place, except the one calling for the work section to be isolated.Transport expert Gopinath Menon, an adjunct professor at Nanyang Technological University, said it was similar to work on highways, where the affected area was isolated by truck-mounted attenuators, traffic cones and diversion signs. The professor added that on a railway, such measures would invariably affect passenger service and it would be better to confine maintenance works to after revenue service hours when trains are not running.On the Goody Feed, it was mentioned that although the public wanted answers on the cause of the accident, making more unfounded allegations and posting online just to vent anger would invade the privacy of the family members or compromise the investigations. Investigators should be allowed to do their jobs and the public should wait patiently for answers. Most importantly, the public should allow the families of the victims to grieve and heal properly. Several netizens were disappointed that something tragic had to happen before safety measures were implemented. Nasrulhaq Ramli recalled that around 2007-2009, a small group of technicians worked on the track during daytime. The netizen remembered that there was already the watchman holding a bright flag firmly towards the oncoming train driver to slow down the train until the train left that particular area. Ian Goh Can asked that a neutral safety auditor or auditing firm should be appointed to investigate the accident. Lucas Low mentioned that SMRT's utmost priority for safety falls short by something quite basic and fundamental.
Experts explained that the steel frame of an MRT train keeps commuters inside safe from lightning strikes, similar to the protection offered when one is inside a car or an airplane. Hence, the lightning strike, which was suspected to have crippled an SMRT train during a heavy thunderstorm on May 11, would not be dangerous to passengers inside the train.SMRT did not confirm if the train was hit and said only that lightning struck in a location between Yio Chu Kang and Khatib stations along the North-South Line. Andrew Fann said that the clarification was good and reassures the public on the safety of the MRT system during a thunderstorm. Georg Lim stated that the MRT should have a critical facilities protection risk assessment and equipment in place. Tan Seng Hoo asked whether it would be possible to install short lightning conductors on the rooftop of train cabins.Note: With the assistance of Trains colleagues, the SMRT Blog posted an article last Thursday on lightning protection for NSEWL train commuters, a day after the lightning incident near YCK.
?Rose Anggun Katon? mentioned having the most enjoyable and comfortable bus ride from Changi Airport Terminal 1 at around 4:15 p.m. on Mar 7 onboard bus service 858 (SBM1309B). The netizen praised the bus captain for greeting every passenger and announcing every approaching stop, despite most passengers having their eyes glued on their mobile devices or listening to music.
A plot of state land next to Blair Road once owned by Malaysian Railways will be cleared for the building of a carpark and bus interchange.The new bus interchange, expected to be ready by the end of 2017, would take the place of the existing bus terminal at Singapore General Hospital (SGH). Jimmy Chua suggested building a tram and LRT system connecting the CBD, Marina Bay Sands, Marina Bay and Bugis Junction. Sp Fairley considered the area as a good location for the bus interchange. The netizen also hoped there would be an underground link to SGH and the community hospital. Xu Zhi Cong presumed that the project would inconvenience commuters as the walking distance between the bus terminal and MRT station would be doubled. Siah Jin Kim said that there should be new bus services to the CBD with the construction of a new bus terminal.
In another Facebook post, Tan Kin Lian mentioned riding the Shinkansen bullet train to Kyoto. He stated that the train arrived at Odawara Station at exactly 2:08 p.m. and departed three minutes later.Tan Kin Lian said that SMRT could learn from Japan on how to keep train schedules and keep the trains from breaking down. Timothy Tan mentioned experiencing more delayed train arrivals lately. Constantine Giam said that the Ministry of Transport in Japan might offer a solution to SMRT and the Government for Singapores rail problems.
SMRT will be introducing the new bus service 308 on May 15 to serve new and upcoming residential developments along Choa Chu Kang Avenue 7, Choa Chu Kang Grove and Keat Hong Link. Chang Yih Toh suggested introducing more trunk services for Jurong West residents for connection to Sengkang, Hougang and Punggol. Shawn Ong asked for more trunk services for Choa Chu Kang residents which would connect them to the northeast, central and east areas.
Shawn Ong shared a photo of a water leakage at Buona Vista on the Circle Line towards the East-West Line walkway which had been there for more than three months. The netizen hopes SMRT would look into the issue as it would be dangerous for the elderly and children.
An article was observed on The Straits Times about the new places for travellers to explore when the planned high-speed rail (HSR) between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur had been completed by 2026.Seven stops in Malaysia were proposed with each location offering something distinctive to travellers such as the Hello Kitty theme park, sky bar, Legoland, temples, monument and resorts among others. Most netizens wondered why Straits Times were promoting the places to see in Malaysia when construction of the project has yet to start. Several wondered whether the project would be completed by 2026. Others hoped that crime in Singapore would not increase. Siah Jin Kim pointed out that travellers need not wait for the completion of the HSR to visit the places mentioned in the article since they could also be reached by driving.
doggieluver who would be coming to Singapore soon, asked if there were audio or visual announcements of an upcoming stop on public buses. The netizen mentioned that s/he would be using the MRT and public buses to travel around. Several netizens stated that there were no audio or visual announcements on public buses. Others suggested using bus apps that would show the netizen where s/he is and inform him/her when approaching a bus stop. SingaporeNancy mentioned that there were visual announcements on the newer SMRT buses.
rilo stated that there was an early-morning accident at the junction of Bedok Swimming Complex involving a public bus. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that the bus was supposed to turn right but went straight instead. Some netizens said that the driver might still be sleepy. pooopy assumed that the driver might be tired because the journey from Choa Chu Kang to Tampines was about two hours. tamago_ mentioned that the bus involved was SMRT service 67. 70niner suggested that buses with super long journeys such as services 51, 61, 66 and 67 should be replaced by long express and shorter routes. asd78 observed that bus drivers everywhere were driving dangerously.
?Mei Rui Hang? reported that the Bukit Panjang LRT train set has only four sets of lights working and all the passenger information displays were switched off.
The police sought assistance from the public for any information about a man allegedly involved in a case of outrage of modesty at Yio Chu Kang MRT station on May 26. Damien Tay wondered if there were security cameras at Yio Chu Kang Station that could have captured the incident. Others mentioned that it was difficult to identify the man as the photo posted online was unclear. May Ong said that the public must be united and alert to incidents involving outrage of modesty.
A 75-year-old cleaner found a body of a new-born baby inside the sanitary pad bin in the women's toilet at Tampines MRT station on Friday (3 June 2016) . She alerted the MRT staff, who called the police.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRTs failure to follow safety measures before allowing a work team onto train tracks, which had "directly" caused an accident killing two of its employees last month.Netizens said that SMRT, however, did not state why the work crew did not seem to notice the oncoming train, why did the train driver not see the men earlier, or why the train changed tracks at the site.Meanwhile, the eldest brother of the victim Nasrulhudin said that "since SMRT has acknowledged the mistakes and given us full support from day one until now, we don't think we will be taking further action at the moment."Some also said SMRT had not singled out anyone for disciplinary action yet. Johnny Tan stated that it was obvious that SMRT was covering up a lot of human errors.
Raymond Anthony Fernando stated that although he was among the many people shocked and saddened by the accident near Pasir Ris MRT station, where two young SMRT technicians lost their lives, the public must accept that train services would be disrupted time and again.The writer said that trains need a break, just as humans do. The public must be willing to sacrifice a little to be able to improve the system and must be willing to test out bold new ideas in the public transport system.The writer suggested that LTA and bus operators introduce bus services that run parallel to MRT lines at late hours, to lessen the pressure on trains as well as on MRT staff, and maintenance work could be done smoothly. Joachim Low stated that the issue was not about trains taking a break but taking timely breaks that were planned for, and having an error-free system and good protocol that ensures safety and reliability. Steven Chan observed that Hong Kong, London and Japan which have older trains, did not have so many problems like in Singapore. Sie Chiang HO opined that the problems faced by the rail system for the past few years were due to the lack of management of the infrastructure and the lack of expert oversight when new infrastructure was being built. Chua Lay Kwan wondered if Singapores hot, humid and rainy weather could be a contributing factor to the faster wear and tear of equipment.
LTA announced that it was working with Shenzhen-based automaker Build Your Dreams (BYD) and bus operator Go-Ahead Singapore on a six-month trial to assess the suitability of electric buses for public transport. The single-deck K9 bus model from BYD, which can carry a total of 80 passengers, would be used in the trial. An LTA spokesman also said that the electric bus would operate trips on top of those scheduled, and hence there would not be any adverse impact on service levels. Is Ming felt that electric buses would not work in Singapore. Charles Lau mentioned that in Hangzhou, China, many electric buses ply the streets despite the weather being hotter than Singapore.
A Comfort taxi trying to reverse into a parking space suddenly mounted the kerb at high speed and rammed into an elderly who was collecting cardboard behind a coffee shop at Block 123 next to an open-air carpark at Bedok North Street 2. A witness told The New Paper that the elderly died at the scene despite attempts to save her by doctors from a nearby clinic.
It was reported earlier that SBS Transit, which operates the North-East and Downtown lines, had put up signs at the Beauty World station warning commuters against conducting over-the-barrier transactions between the paid and unpaid areas.Although the rule against transactions across train fare gates has been a long-standing one, most people continue to meet up at fare gates to close deals. Some, however, have made an effort to be more careful.When TODAY visited Beauty World, Raffles Place and City Hall stations over two days last week, 11 of the 19 transactions observed were conducted over the barrier.Those who were closing deals at the stations questioned the basis for the rule and cited the inconvenience of tapping in and out for transactions that usually conclude within a minute.Enforcement standards also differed between stations. SBST staff made one commuter who sold bicycle accessories tap out before selling his goods to his buyer. On the other hand, Raffles Place and City Hall stations, operated by SMRT, did not have signs warning commuters or station staff about fare gate transactions. When queried by TODAY, Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that SMRT works with authorities to enforce the public transport regulations to safeguard the network and commuters. He added that SMRT takes steps to remind commuters and raise awareness of rules that, for example, disallow over-the-barrier transactions at MRT stations. Several netizens stated that transport operators should allow transactions over the fare gates. Some suggested that LTA, SMRT and SBS Transit should provide a small section in MRT stations for such simple and quick transactions. Some stated that train operators should focus on reducing the number of breakdowns instead. Philip Philip mentioned that in Hong Kong, commuters could deliver flowers and gifts, send and pick up goods, and exchange items over the MTR gates. Choon Lee Liew believed that the rule should be reviewed since many only earn very little from such transactions at the fare gates. The netizen mentioned that tapping out and in again would cost the seller the money they earned from the transaction. Voni Wen believed that any increase in the number of transactions over the gantry would add to congestion and inconvenience to other commuters. However, the netizen felt that the rule might not be fair to those who want to pass things out of convenience and not for business or transaction purposes. Joe Kool Neo pointed out that terrorists could choose to pass things either within the paid area, outside the paid area, or across both areas. The netizen doubted that security personnel would know the difference.
Train service along the Bukit Panjang LRT line was disrupted for five hours in one direction on Jan 22. SMRT warned commuters to expect additional travel time as Train Service B towards Choa Chu Kang via Petir was down at 5:54 a.m. The line had been suffering disruptions for many years but the Government had yet to effectively resolve the problem much to the inconvenience of its residents.The latest breakdown came one day after Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted a blog regarding the Governments plan towards achieving a "car-lite" Singapore.Commuters posted on social media channels to comment on the way the train disruption was communicated. Syahir Syazwan wrote that the train service's status was still listed as "normal", while a user with the name "The Dead Cockroach" said that the announcement of the disruption was only made in English, and was concerned that there were elderly passengers who were unaware of the situation. Several netizens stated that there were no prompt announcements or alerts regarding the disruption. Some mentioned that regular bus services were delayed because of the activation of free shuttle service. Margaret Pringle assumed that the same electrical problem at the same station had not been fixed. The netizen mentioned that trains were overused and air-conditioners were faulty especially on cabins 106, 107, 113, 114, 116 and 117. Ken Ho mentioned being caught in Bangkok BTS Skytrain breakdown and noticed that service was prompt and all the staff knew what to do. The driver made numerous announcements of the delay and there were also recorded announcements at stations. Commuters were also informed that they would not be charged regardless where they boarded the train. Akiko Tricia Thian stated that Government and public transport officials would not know the sufferings of public transport commuters especially during breakdowns because the former drive their cars to work.
forum456 shared the letter written by Eric Tan Thian Huat published Jan 5 on The Straits Times - Forum Letters regarding opening the crew toilets for train drivers at MRT platforms to commuters in urgent need. The writer mentioned that the toilets at MRT stations were usually located at the far end of the concourse level, which was very inconvenient for elderly people who have difficulty walking. Some netizens suggested having toilets inside the trains. Billionaire claimed that toilets at MRT stations were located outside the fare gates so that the operators would make more money because commuters would have to tap out to use the toilet and tap in again to ride the train. lvlrsSTI said that there should be more cubicles at MRT station toilets and that a cleaner should be assigned to keep the toilets neat and dry, pinoytrader stated that authorities should plan ahead when building new facilities such as bus and train stations to cater for the elderly. efreet mentioned that the toilet was a basic necessity that should be made easily available to train commuters.
An SBS Transit bus inspector allegedly accused 17-year-old ITE student Ms Tan of being a fare cheat and issued her a S$50 summon.Ms Tan boarded bus service 87 from Punggol Road and was heading home to Compassvale. She thought she was eligible for student fare and paid S$0.70 to cover for the S$0.65 student fare. Unfortunately, a bus inspector boarded the bus and checked her ticket. The inspector accused her of being a fare cheat. Ms Tan mentioned that it was a genuine mistake.Ms Tan complained to her father who confronted the bus inspector. The inspector refused to waive the summon and insisted he was just doing his job. Some netizens stated that the bus inspector could have asked the student to top up the fare or issue a warning instead of a S$50 fine. Others said that the bus inspector was just doing his job. Some mentioned that many passengers had been cheating with their fares.
?Glenc Soh? reported that bus service 265P (PC2327P) did not stop at block 555 bus stop along Ang Mo Kio Ave 10 despite passengers flagging for the bus at the bus stop. The netizen mentioned that the bus was not even full and there were at least 10 more vacant seats.
The Straits Times Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that the LTA announced that there were 14 major breakdowns on the MRT network last year, a 40% increase from the previous year. On the LRT system, the number of such breakdowns, each lasting more than 30 minutes, nearly quadrupled to 15. For the MRT, only the newest line - the Downtown Line - posted a drop in the number of major disruptions. All others saw an increase, with the oldest - North-South and East-West lines - accounting for half the total of 14. Despite the big breakdowns, the rail system was more reliable than it has been since 2011. Last year, a train clocked an average of 133,000km before a delay of more than five minutes occurred. This was up from 93,000km in 2014 and 58,000km in 2011. Of the various lines, the North-East Line was the most reliable, averaging 213,000km between delays. Many netizens disapproved of the report that that the rail system was getting more reliable. Amos Ong stated that an overwhelming increase in breakdown meant that the rail system was not reliable. The netizen said that it was so unethical to use selective data points to boost or recover the rail systems image rather than to acknowledge and admit that the MRT was not as reliable as it was years ago. Bert Bc considered the new story as another rubbish report by LTA. Elizabeth Tan asked what the basis of the report was and how travelling longer distances had been equated to increased reliability. The netizen added that relevant authorities should focus on solving the issue by improving the infrastructure and stopping immigration from overloading and overcrowding the country, and to not resort to propaganda. Dominic Goh mentioned that the Circle Line was so new and yet there were increasing number of delays and stoppages. James Yeo stated that the LTAs interpretation of 40% MRT breakdowns as reliable transportation was not the public perspective. He said that it was better for the LTA not to announce the statistics until they improve within the reasonable margin of more than 10%. White dawn wondered how the rail system could be reliable yet still have major breakdowns.
Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure and Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan appointed three new members to the Public Transport Council (PTC) on Apr 28.The three new members, Chua Tsen Leong Adrian, Fang Chin Poh, and Kwoh Chee Keong, would take over the members who would be stepping down. instinct wondered how the members would uphold PTCs mission to keep fares affordable if they do not use public transport and feel the pain of commuters during train breakdowns.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian mentioned taking a bus on his way home late in the evening on Jun 14. He mentioned that the bus was travelling in a different direction from his usual route and it was difficult to see the landmarks.He mentioned that he alighted from the bus a stop earlier because of the lack of display or announcement of the bus stops. Tan said that his experience reinforced his poor impression of the Transport Minister, LTA, and the Government. Mohamed Ismail Ismail asked if Tan Kin Lian had tried using the Moovit app which was very useful when taking public transport. The netizen mentioned that the app shows MRT stations and bus stops.
In connection with the proposed alignment of the new Circle Line, which could run through the Central Catchment Nature Reserve, Christopher Tan, The Straits Times Senior Transport Correspondent, stated that building an MRT line under Singapore's largest nature reserve was not necessary. He said that it was counter-productive to have a mass rapid transit line traversing an unpopulated, forested area.Tan pointed out that although the principle of building the transport infrastructure was to serve the masses, by going through a tract of primary and secondary forests, the LTA would not only do irreparable damage to a pristine habitat nestling around the reservoirs, but it would also be rendering up to 4km of the 50km rail project void of patronage and revenue.The writer added that the Nature Society's suggestion of an alternative route was sound. The route calls for the line to loop around the southern edges of the nature reserve. The route would allow it to serve residents in Thomson, Lornie and Adam roads, including the massive development planned for Bukit Brown. If the route would be aligned a little farther south, it could even serve Balestier, a bustling hub that does not have any MRT planned as yet.The LTA said that the alternative route would entail longer travelling time, higher cost, more land acquisition, and possibly bigger engineering challenges. The writer asserted that the diversion might cost more than going straight through the forest but the larger benefit would be higher ridership and revenue that would come with the line that serves populated areas instead of an uninhabited nature reserve. Several netizens found the writers argument for routing the Cross Island Line thru residential areas reasonable. Some, however, approved of running the rail line through the Central Catchment area to maximise land space and reduce travel time. Han Ming Guang said that moving the rail line down south could serve a population centre that was underserved by the MRT, unless the Government was planning to convert the nature reserve into a residential area. Kenneth Soh mentioned that people all over the world were trying to preserve their last remaining wilderness and forests while the Singapore Government was debating whether to cut the last few remaining nature in half. The netizen said that any form of disturbance would disrupt the natural environment. Vincent Chua stated that the Founding Father of Singapore, Lee Kuan Yew, tried very hard to preserve nature, grow more trees and let Singapore be a country of greenery. Eric Chng believed that NParks and the Ministry of Environment and Water Resources could do more to prevent the destruction from happening.
New comments were observed on the Facebook post by Peshhalaa Devendran? on August 14 regarding a racist SMRT taxi driver. Many netizens asked SMRT to take the necessary disciplinary action against the taxi driver involved. A few suggested that the incident should have been reported to the police since such behaviour should not be tolerated. Das Empire urged others not to judge the whole taxi industry by the inappropriate behaviour of one taxi driver. Travis Tiong mentioned that taxi drivers should not comment about race or religion to their passengers. Taxis have conducted internal investigations and our CR team will be responding to the passenger.
gallyban stated that the MRT train travelling towards Novena at the North-South Line stopped abruptly causing standing passengers to fall down like dominoes. Some netizens stated that the thread starter should stop complaining and be grateful that the MRT was still working. Twisty said that either the train was faulty or the emergency brake was engaged. fox1 mentioned that Japan has an effective system to prevent falling because of sudden brake called LOOP or Lean On Other Passengers. It is automatically activated during morning and evening peak hours.
Commuters on the North-South Line experienced delays on August 3. Netizen Richard Jang tweeted photos of the crowd at Yishun MRT station in the morning. The netizen also mentioned that the escalator had to be stopped as the platform was too crowded. Several netizens were frustrated that delays and disruptions have been a daily occurrence. Shah Ashburne said that the rail infrastructure should have been upgraded before allowing foreign talents and workers into Singapore. Edwardo Lee believed that it was time for transport authorities to appoint a qualified team to check and make recommendations on escalators to ensure they are able to withstand the load of passengers. ChengHuat Lim suggested that the station gates should be closed to stop more people from entering the station.
Singapores third public transport operator, Tower Transit, took over nine bus services on May 29, marking the start of operations of the new bus contracting model aimed at injecting more competition into the industry.Service 945 was the first bus to be rolled out of Bukit Batok interchange at about 5:30 a.m. Bus enthusiasts were present, some of whom began their vigil from 3 p.m. on May 28.Andrew Bujtor, Tower Transit Singapore Managing Director, called it a very, very exciting and extraordinary day for the company. Bujtor was also confident of meeting service reliability standards since Tower Transit was using the common fleet management system initiated by the LTA to track the location of every bus and know the exact distance between buses. This allows staff at its operations control centre to regulate the gaps between buses, to ensure theres a consistent ride for all our passengers. Several netizens were excited to ride the buses operated by Tower Transit. Others said that there were nothing special about the buses as they were the same old buses previously used on the routes. Wilkie Ong Keng Soon mentioned that Tower Transit should have brought in the London-designed double-decker buses to differentiate itself from the incumbents. Mohd Azlimi Bin Yaakop welcomed the competition and hoped that more bus companies would operate in Singapore. Cha Cha Pereira was not interested with the number of bus companies to operate in Singapore as long as the drivers practice safe driving, fares were affordable and bus captains understand and speak English.
On Facebook, 938LIVE asked netizens to share their views on whether the free pre-peak travel scheme should apply to all MRT stations and not just the selected 18 stations in and around the CBD, as what Goh Kian Huat suggested in his post on Today Online - Voices published on July 1. Several netizens disapproved of the free pre-peak travel scheme, citing that it costs the Government more money to implement and monitor the scheme. Others felt that there should not be discrimination against commuters who work outside of the CBD, as the present travel free perks only cater to those working in the CBD. Danny Mak believed that the scheme might lower productivity of some companies as the staff would come to work at different times.
Kam Chak-pui, Hong Kong MTR Corporations Managing Director defended the HK$6B contract made last year with CSR Qingdao Sifang for 93 urban trains. In a news conference in Hong Kong on Wednesday (July 13), he emphasised that the design of Hong Kongs trains were completely different from those in Singapore. The trains they ordered were made of stainless steel and they have conducted metallurgical analysis of the materials for the trains to ensure that the materials used were in line with international standards. He added that the problems with the trains delivered to Singapore were caused by defective aluminium alloys, and it was a batch problem rather than a systematic one. Several netizens wondered whether the trains ordered by the LTA were of international standards.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRTs response to the issue of the racist taxi driver. Many netizens were disappointed that only a stern warning was given to the taxi driver involved. Several mentioned that the driver should have been fired.
Aaron Tan reported that an air-conditioning vent ball at the rear of service 853 (SMB 2530R) bus was loose. The netizen hoped SMRT would repair it soon.
Clear Channel would manage the bus-wrap advertising operations of Tower Transit Singapore starting May 16.The company won the exclusive 5-year contract in January and the partnership with Tower Transit would invigorate the bus industry and push the boundaries of Out-of-Home advertising.Alvetor Chromium asked if Tower Transit Singapore buses would receive commercial advertisements similar to those seen on other buses.(buses[IN]gapore!) was looking forward for the creative advertisement ideas
The National Taxi Association (NTA) has criticised the recent price cuts by Grab and Uber, saying that they not only hit their drivers' earnings but, if left unchecked, could also hurt the taxi industry and, ultimately, commuters. Ang Hin Kee, NTA Executive Adviser, said that "it's an unhealthy and unsustainable business strategy". He mentioned that taxi companies were now under pressure to offer comparable fares. The price war, however, would mean both private-hire car drivers and cabbies having to do more trips and driving longer to earn the same amount.Ang was worried that private-hire car firms could start raising prices and charge a premium if they end up dominating the market. He believed that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) should impose similar standards on the private-hire car and taxi business to level the playing field.Although Lim Kell Jay, Head of Grab Singapore, stated that the fare cuts have led to a "tremendous growth" in passenger demand, some private-hire car drivers said that that their earnings have been hit by around 20% since the price cuts.Dr Walter Theseira, an economist at SIM University, said traditional cab operators have a key advantage as they were the only ones allowed to get flag downs. The cab operators, however, still face a tough battle because App companies were willing to lose some money to gain market share. Several netizens stated that taxi companies should reduce their rental rates and provide better incentives to offset the cabbies losses. Some pointed out that taxi companies have monopolised the industry for too long, particularly ComfortDelGro. Others said that the competition benefits the commuters. Goh Fredrick, who claimed to be a full-time taxi driver, acknowledged that intense competition has its advantages, but believed that taxi drivers were short-changed and had been imposed with unfair regulations and rules. Maruko Chan remarked that taxis should concentrate on flag downs instead of always having an on call sign and waiting for passengers to call so that they could charge booking fees. Ghostleader5 wondered why it was fine for ComfortDelGro to monopolise and raise taxi fares.
?Seah Liang Chiang? thanked Mr Png, the Station Manager at Stadium MRT Station for giving him and his friend a complimentary one way ride from Stadium to Promenade MRT Station. The netizen mentioned the he and his friend had a 10km run from Esplanade. He was on medication and in pain when he asked SM Png to allow them to take the train to Suntec City. The netizens friend, who is a tourist, was impressed with the great help and service provided by SMRT staff.
On Facebook, SMRT posted that both the safety of both commuters and staff were important to them. SMRT mentioned that their staff deserved to work in a safe environment without being physically or verbally abused. They are there to provide a safe and reliable journey and hoped that all commuters could show more care and concern to them.SMRT also sought the help of the public to inform the Police should they witness any abusive behaviour against their staff. (buses[IN]gapore!) observed that new stickers were put up near the front entrance of buses and they were in a friendlier tone than the usual "No Assault On Bus Captains". Walter Tan said that he would be willing to assist SMRT but also hoped that SMRT would take action on the frequent train disruptions.
Limerencee wondered what the SMRT staff members carrying clipboards were doing while at the platform. happyh0rse stated that the staff were recording the train arrival timings, joeyfjj said that similar staff could also be seen at bus stops taking note of the wait times and the number of passengers that were unable to board the bus.
A relative of one of the deceased SMRT maintenance workers who died in the recent SMRT tragedy has written an open letter to SMRT. The letter was posted on Kent Ridge Common News.The supposed relative of the deceased stated that despite SMRTs apology and expression of sympathy to the victims relatives, SMRT would not fully understand their grief of losing a family member.S/he claimed that to SMRT, the two young workers were just a statistic and would soon be forgotten. To the victims families, however, they were beloved sons, brothers, cousins, nephews, friends. Brilliant human beings who had promising futures ahead of them. They followed their superiors orders only to be betrayed.The writer stated that they resent the companys negligence. They resent the attempts to clear the company of any fault, insisting that all the standard operating procedures have been observed. The writer added that instead of being so quick to protect SMRTs interests, the company should seek the humanity deep within themselves to acknowledge the mistakes and learn from them to ensure that this tragedy would not happen to anyone elses son again. S/he stated that currently, the families were grieving at the loss of a beloved, but the grief would soon turn into anger. Several netizens stated that the letter was a bit premature since investigation of the accident was still ongoing. Some asked SMRT to enlighten the public of the safety procedures and what really transpired at the accident. Some mentioned that SMRT should review their safety procedures. aso kah stated that safety procedure is a very basic requirement that should be fool proof.
Justin Tan mentioned taking a photo of an SMRT bus at a bus stop but was informed by the bus captain that taking photos of buses was not allowed. The netizen asked SMRT for clarification since according to the FAQ section of SMRTs corporate website, taking pictures or videos for personal use was allowed.
At least five companies and consortiums expressed interest in the third and latest Government bus tender called in June for Seletar.They were Australia's Busways, Singapore's Woodlands Transport, Britain's National Express and two consortiums, Kumho Buslines-Tian San Shipping, and Travel GSH- Jiaoyun Group.The potential bidders, with the exception of National Express, have taken part in previous tenders, making this their second or third tries. They were up against SBS Transit, SMRT, Tower Transit and Go- Ahead, which have expressed interest in competing for the Seletar tender package, comprising 26 routes. Samuel Lee hoped that Woodlands Transport would win the tender. Amir Hamzah noted that the bus contracting model had not improved the frequency of buses. Kelvin Tham wondered whether the foreign companies were familiar with the roads in Singapore.
A new start-up private-hire car booking app named Rush would be launched in October. Jordi Yap, founder of Rush, said that the new booking app would give commuters more options such as keying in multiple destinations and allowing women commuters to choose only women drivers. He added that the fares for Rush would be comparable with those of its rivals, with a base fare of S$3 and a rate of S$0.80 per kilometre. Moreover, surcharges on fares would be imposed during fixed times similar to taxis instead of surge pricing as used by Uber and Grab.Rush would also allow drivers to keep more of their earnings as they need to pay only a fixed monthly subscription fee of S$150. Several netizens welcomed the idea of a new player in the car booking app business as long as fares remain affordable and there would be more vehicles on the road to take commuters around. A few believed that the new app was a good idea but was concerned whether Rush would be able to sustain its business.
Ben E mentioned that food and drinks were prohibited onboard the trains in Singapore. Although the netizen found the rule strange, he said that it was for everyone's benefit because the trains were very, very clean.
A netizen started a thread about the announcement at MRT stations being irritating. Yamato agreed that announcements at MRT stations and trains were irritating compared with that in Japan. debono said that the announcements at some MRT stations were very loud.
?Konrad Eliezer Haedicke? asked SMRT to make sure that its bus drivers spoke and understood English because it was not helpful if a bus driver could not answer a simple question.
Desmond Lee, Senior Minister of State for National Development, told Parliament that site investigation works needed to determine how a train tunnel could be built under Singapore's largest nature reserve would have a "small" impact on the area, even though the reserve is deemed highly sensitive. This is because stringent mitigating measures would be adopted and the drilling machines used to create boreholes to collect rock and soil samples have been modified to reduce noise levels.The geophysical survey has been limited to a 100-meter wide corridor, and would not be carried out at streams, swamps and dense vegetation. The investigators would also be supervised by the National Park Board to make sure they adhere to the measures. Alex Chew said that the Government seemed to have already made up their minds to cut through the reserve. Elvin Ong mentioned that relative government agencies have to really look into the risk management, possibility of technical fault and maintenance difficulties, especially when the underground tunnel of the CRL would cut through the natural reserve. Sorensen Lkh stated that the impact to the nature reserve should be eliminated and not just reduced.
ComfortDelGros advertising arm Moove Media has partnered Network For Electronic Transfers (Singapore) (NETS) to introduce access to unlimited Wi-Fi inside ComfortDelGro taxis. 100 ComfortDelGro taxis would be installed with a palm-sized Wi-Fi dongle to provide passengers with Wi-Fi access starting on Jul 4 until the end of January 2017. With free Wi-Fi, passengers would not incur any mobile data charges while surfing the Internet or checking their apps. Jayne Kwek, CEO of Moove Media, said that they were excited to partner with NETS to provide free Wi-Fi on board 100 ComfortDelGro taxis for the first time. This would be one of the ways to help their clients enhance their advertising or branding campaigns, so as to make it more interesting for consumers to remember a brand. Ang Sok Hong, Head of Sales and Marketing of NETS, was pleased to partner with Moove Media and ComfortDelGro on the campaign to remind commuters on the ease and convenience of making payments with NETS and NETS FlashPay in taxis.
A 29-year-old woman died after being struck by an SBS Transit bus at Toh Tuck Avenue on Mar 10. The accident happened at about 12:30 p.m. when the victim, Winny Pratiwi, was believed to be out for lunch and had been waiting to cross the road at a traffic junction when she was hit by an SBS Transit bus making a right turn from Toh Tuck Link into Toh Tuck Avenue. The bus driver was arrested for causing death by rash act. Several netizens observed that many SBS Transit drivers were reckless. Some noticed that the bus driver seemed to look older than 50 years old. Others asked if there were any age limit for bus drivers because a drivers job requires alertness and agility. William Tan said that many drivers had committed an offence when waiting to turn. The netizen suggested that drivers should wait behind the white line. Allan Tan suggested that the path for pedestrians crossing should be about two to three meters away from where the turning vehicles need to stop and wait to allow more time for both drivers and pedestrians to react to unforeseen circumstances. Nicholas Toh stated that SBS Transit should educate its drivers to be more responsible. Andrew Singh mentioned that there were also many courteous and careful local and foreign bus captains. Wu Zhen Zhou said that SBS Transit bus drivers should not be totally blamed for accidents because they work almost seven days a week which could be stressful and tiring.
1,000 cabbies and their families participated in a mass exercise to keep fit at the Bukit Gombak Stadium, an event organised by ComfortDelGro in partnership with ActiveSG. The event was intended to encourage taxi drivers to lead a healthier lifestyle since their job required them to sit in their vehicles most of the day.Ms Josephine Teo, Senior Minister of State for Transport, who joined in the event was glad that such activities have been put in place to encourage taxi drivers into adopting an active lifestyle.In 2014, ComfortDelGro and the Health Promotion Board launched a health-screening and coaching programme called Check Car, Check Body to help cabbies better manage their health. Under the programme, cabbies go for health screenings when they send their vehicles in for monthly servicing.
On Facebook, LTA featured Elizabeth Lim, a mother of two and SBS Transits first female Chief Bus Captain. Lim is a dedicated bus captain, with 35 years of bus driving experience and also provides commuters with good service. She also acts as a mentor to new drivers. LTA also thanked all mothers, sisters and daughters who keep the public transport industry going, during International Womens Day on Mar 8. ???? said that she knew the featured bus captain and agreed that Lim was a good chief bus captain from the west district. Ian Ian Ni wondered why LTA featured someone from SBS Transit and asked if there were no female employees at LTA.
?Jarain Ng? mentioned being on board a packed bus service 169 (SMB1439Y) heading from Yishun to Sembawang. The netizen mentioned standing very near the front door and was caught by the door when it opened on the next stop. She moved off to the middle of the bus after that but saw another passenger being caught again by the door. The netizen was disappointed that the bus captain did not even offer help or advise the passengers to shift slightly as he opens the door to avoid being caught.
The Online Citizen published an article which questioned the S$4B strategy for the Singapore Sports Hub. In the article, it was said that the public and many in the sports and entertainment industry have nothing but negative things to say about the Singapore Sports Hub, two years after its opening. When the Singapore government decided to adopt a Public-Private-Partnership model for the construction and operation of the sports and commercial complex, expectations were high. The project has been said to be valued at S$1.33B but the Government was paying the consortium S$193.7M a year. The amount which taxpayers would be paying the consortium over 25 years would exceed S$4B.A substandard pitch, leaky roof, wanting to charge the organisers of the National Day parade an exorbitant amount of added fees, and wanting to charge the Singapore Government almost a million dollars for a damaged pitch for the Opening Ceremony were just a few of the issues the public had to tolerate.The writer said that the project operator needs to address the concerns of the public since the public deserves to know what was the strategy for the project which taxpayers would be paying more than S$4B for. Several netizens believed that the Sports Hub and Gardens by the Bay were just some Government-linked companies business schemes, profitable to certain organisations but borne by taxpayers. Others preferred the old stadium which they said should have been refurbished instead of building the expensive Sports Hub.
Tan Kin Lian wondered if the LTA or bus companies monitor the movement of each bus to check their punctuality. He had noticed on few occasions during the past year that a certain bus was not being shown in the MyTransport.SG mobile app. On Mar 16, Tan Kin Lian checked the app for the arrival time of bus 163 and was surprised that the next bus would arrive in 14 minutes and the one after that in 24 minutes. He then decided to take bus 86 which was expected to arrive in four minutes, but he was surprised to see bus 163 arriving.He suspected that the GPS tracker on service 163 bus might not be working and its existence was not captured in the app. He also believed that nobody was monitoring the GPS locations, as reflected by the low standard that exists in many parts of the Singapore system in recent years.Tan Kin Lian said that if a bus is not transmitting its signal, it should have been noticed and the fault in the GPS tracker should be fixed right away. Mat Alamak believed that it would be difficult to take corrective actions on all the buses that are not punctual on a daily or hourly basis, if there were many of them. The netizen said that technology could help track bus punctuality efficiently, but the bus companies would still have to deal with the bus captains in order to solve the punctuality problem. Tan Kin Lian replied that an intelligent person could run a script on the database to identify the buses that were frequently off-schedule. A detailed study could be made on the cause of delay so that corrective action could be taken.
Jamie Tan? asked SMRT to upgrade the air-conditioning system on the North-South and East-West Lines. The netizen mentioned that it seemed that commuters were inside a sauna when taking trains from Buona Vista to Tampines and from Toa Payoh to City Hall and Raffles Place to Tampines. Whereas the Circle Line and Downtown Line has super cold air-conditioners even on very hot days.
?Ratri Maria?, who was 36 weeks pregnant, was very impressed with Hameed Sultan, the bus captain of service 190, for showing his care for her. The netizen mentioned that she was standing onboard the bus since no seats were available. She asked SMRT to convey her big thank you to the bus captain and that the driver should keep up his good and sensible work.
Veteran journalist PN Balji stated that the MRT story exposed the local medias inability and/or unwillingness to investigate Government scandals and thus help play its rightful role in society.He mentioned that the revelation that cracks were found in China-made SMRT trains has shown that the Government could not control the flow of information and command the conversation the way they have done for so long.The story caused a sensation in Singapore with the Government and media caught totally off guard and scrambling to respond to a story that was stolen right under their noses.PN Balji asked whether the media practices of two generations ago were still relevant in this age of instant information. He added that the Government had forgot that the MRT story could break elsewhere and flow into Singapore via the Internet. PN Balji felt that the Government could have given the news to the local media to cover it in a manner that was responsible and credible. Several netizens stated that with new technology, gone were the days when news could be covered up and kept as state secrets. Others mentioned that the issue should focus on why the LTA kept quiet about the defective trains despite knowing about the issue a couple of years ago. Some netizens said they have lost interest in local media as it has become unreliable and most turn to other sources for more credible news. Pui assumed that after the news have died down, the Government would announce that the public still has faith in the transport system. gottaname believed that the SMRT defective trains saga taught the Government that they could not hide secrets from the public anymore. He stated that the people were not angry about the train defects, but the act of covering it up, especially when it concerns equipment and assets belonging to the taxpayer and the country.
Connie Tan LiPin was onboard a not so crowded bus service 985 travelling along Bukit Batok Ave 2 when she witnessed a commotion between the PRC driver and a Malay family. The Malay family, who was with a wheelchair-bound member, was not allowed by the bus captain to board the bus because there was already a wheelchair-bound passenger on board. The bus captain informed the family that only one wheelchair user at a time was allowed, although there were two wheelchair spaces inside the bus.The netizen stated that according to SMRTs website, each Wheelchair Accessible Bus (WAB) service could accommodate two passengers-in-wheelchair. Connie Tan LiPin said that SMRT should inform the public of any change in rules and remove the extra wheelchair decal inside the bus to avoid unnecessary commotion. If the rules had not been changed, the netizen suggested reminding the bus drivers that two passengers-in-wheelchair were allowed on WAB services.The netizen also posted a screenshot of the WAB rules.
In connection with the mitigating measures for site investigation work for the future Cross Island MRT Line announced by the LTA on Feb 5, the potential impact on wildlife mentioned on the Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) report was not revealed to the public. The impact on MacRitchie fauna would be large if mitigation measures were not adopted. According to Environmental Resources Management, a large impact means an entire habitat, or a significant proportion of it, would be affected and long-term viability would be threatened. It could also mean that entire populations of species or those species listed as critically endangered, endangered or vulnerable in the Singapore Red Data Book would be affected. Meanwhile, other nature enthusiasts banding together under the Love Our MacRitchie Forest movement renewed their call for the Cross Island Line to be rerouted south near Lornie Road to avoid the nature reserve entirely. The group mentioned that lapses in safety and vigilance could still occur despite mitigation measures since the EIA report forecasts major impacts if mitigation measures were to fail. The nature enthusiasts added that the only acceptable impact would be zero impact. Peter Wee suggested stopping the work and re-planning the Cross Island Line. K Zixian Lu believed that the plan goes against the nation's commitment and Lee Kuan Yew's wishes to preserve our local environment. The netizen said that the Government should not use the economy or convenience to destroy the nature reserve.
LTA would be calling tenders for the construction of Singapores first integrated transport corridor, the 21.5km North-South Corridor (NSC). The NSC would include express bus lanes and cycling trunk routes to connect towns in the northern region to the city centre.LTA said that several tenders would be called in the coming months and major construction works would commence in 2017.Preparatory works have already been carried out along the entire 21.5km corridor, such as setting back the boundaries of affected properties. A few netizens hoped that bicycle rental would be available within the CBD and along the NSC. Valen Chen Tany also hoped that safety records of the construction firms would be factored in as a key criteria besides price and expertise when awarding the contracts. Qian Zhe Goh considered the NSC a great idea as it would also help to complement the North South Line. Vincent Tan said that the project was a waste of money. The funds could be used to assist old and poor people. The netizen also asked how many would be willing to cycle such a long distance.
dark_aLLeY shared a photo of a Transport for London poster with a tagline TfL doesnt make a profit because we reinvest all our income to run and improve your services. Ohayo! mentioned that in Singapore, SMRT reported losses in its train business. herzberg said that in Singapore, SMRT and ComfortDelGro distributed their profits to shareholders and used Government funds to invest. karagiselle asserted that the computation of income and expenses were broken down on the Transport for London website.
Secretary-General of the National Trades Union Congress (NTUC) Mr Chan Chun Sing stated on September 16 that the two SMRT staff who lost their jobs over the fatal accident at Pasir Ris MRT station on March 22 would get help from the National Transport Workers Union (NTWU) in appealing their dismissal. Speaking on the sidelines of a HR forum, Mr Chan said last Friday (September 16) that SMRT has given the workers until next week to submit an appeal. The Land Transport Authority (LTA) and the Ministry of Manpower (MOM) earlier said in a joint statement that it was an "internal decision" by SMRT to dismiss the staff. Several suggested that the two dismissed employees should file a case against SMRT instead of filing an appeal. Wak Lu believed that SMRT had taken the correct action by dismissing the two employees for not following safety protocol. Chng Choon Ming Haikel asked SMRT to publish the incident report.Kangtangman was uncertain that the two dismissed employees would still get their jobs back. Qiao Zhi claimed that the transport union was toothless, saying that if the union leaders were doing their job, they should have given SMRT an ultimatum.
Chelsey Chow was thankful that her laptop was found and returned by SMRT bus captain Ramasamy K. According to the bus captain, he had been monitoring the laptop for a while, when he allegedly saw a middle-aged male passenger trying to take the laptop and alight the bus. Ramasamy recalled asking the man if the laptop was his but the man could not provide the brand of the laptop. The bus captain did not let the man alight with the laptop.The netizen described Ramasamy as the sweetest and most genuine stranger she had met in a long while. She added that she now trusts when SMRT says "We Care", because of the incident. Many netizens hoped that SMRT would recognize the good deed done by bus captain Ramasamy. Several congratulated the bus captain for doing a good job.Note: Buses team is aware of the good deed. CIC Internal Comms will post the story on our intranet and SMRT Blog. The story was shared on SMRT Facebook yesterday afternoon by the New Media team.
?Tan Guan Ming? reported the bus captain of bus with plate number SMB1335M for driving too slow on the expressway and along Lentor Road. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian stated that while onboard a train in Japan, he heard that the next stop was being announced in Japanese and English, and which side the door would open. He said that the transport planners in Singapore should learn from the Japanese and not assume that the passengers would keep track of all the stations that have passed. Tan Kin Lian wondered whether the transport planners were waiting for the Ministers to send them to Japan for another study trip. Tan Albert said that the local transport planners were not as hard working and efficient as the Japanese. Lelenski Wang suggested that those involved in the decision making should take public transport to and from work for at least a month. The netizen believed that his suggestion was more cost effective than sending them to Japan. Mat Alamak asked if the trains in Japan were as crowded as Singapores, citing that the East-West Line was very crowded even during non-peak hours. Timothy Tan mentioned that SMRT announces the next stop but did not announce which side the door would open.
Tower Transit unveiled on Mar 2 the design of a double-decker bus which would be used for driver training between Jurong Point and Bulim Bus Depot within the month. The winning design turned into a bus wrap was made by nine-year-old Variel Ng, after she won an art competition held at the new transport companys carnival last year.Andrew Bujtor, Tower Transit Singapores Managing Director, said that Variels entry stood out because it was bright, colourful and represents all the good things about Singapore.Jeanie Huo stated that Tower Transit was doing all the right things so far in trying to distinguish itself from SMRT and SBS Transit. Zoe H.Yang found the contest by Tower Transit inspiring and hoped that there would be more similar contests for children.
On SMRTs Facebook page, photos of Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan were shared on his visit to the Woodlands Regional Bus Interchange and Woodlands Depot. He visited the interchange and depot to show his appreciation to the staff who would be working through the upcoming Chinese New Year (CNY) holidays.He met up with Bus Captains and many other bus operations support staff to wish them good health and prosperity for the coming year. He also visited the Bus Operations Control Centre, a Taxi Drivers Vocational License class session, and proceeded to visit the taxis auto services bay and Customer Service Centre to meet and greet with SMRT Taxi partners.He urged the public to show warm appreciation to the staff when they see them over the CNY weekend.
A video showing an SBS Transit bus driver being brutally assaulted by a 24-year-old passenger was shared online. The bus driver apparently skipped a bus stop at Lengkok Bahru where the passenger was supposed to get off. When the assailant realised he was being filmed by another commuter, he punched the commuter as well. The bus driver was sent to the hospital because of a lesion on his head. Several netizens shared similar experiences when bus drivers failed to stop even after the stopping bell was pressed. Some stated that the passenger should be jailed. Danjel Lim speculated that the bus driver did not know the route well. Benjamin Fong said that many people were blaming the bus companies for bringing in foreign bus drivers but had not wondered how many Singaporeans were actually signing up to be bus drivers. Ang Poon Heng Ang said that the passenger should have pressed the bell to signal the bus captain to stop the bus.
SBS Transit announced that the direct bus services between Chinatown and the heartlands would be extended starting Jan 16 up to the Chinese New Year.There would also be a special service, CT28, which would ply between Clementi and Chinatown, joining the two daily year-round services - CT8, which operates from Ang Mo Kio and CT18, from Bedok.Bus service CT28, which usually operates only during the Chinese New Year festive period, would be in operation from Jan 16 to Feb 7. There would be no Chinatown Direct Services on Feb 8 and 9, and normal operating hours would resume from Feb 10. Jimmy UtdbyUtd Oh was hoping that there would be free rides for all public trains and buses on the eve of the Chinese New Year. Andrew Singh wondered why bus services from Ang Mo Kio, Bedok and Clementi were extended.
On the Independent Singapore (TISG) blog, it was posted that a reliable source with inside information on train operations had raised concerns about the latest detection of another SMRT worker with tuberculosis (TB). The source wondered whether there was a broader health issue, and if SMRT has been doing its due diligence in conducting checks on its train captains.The source also related to TISG that more than 300 train drivers from the three crew rooms (in Tanah Merah, Ang Mo Kio and Jurong) are sharing the same driving cabs in the trains which meant that there was a risk of cross infection. He pointed out that the air conditioning in the train is shared by other saloon cars which meant that it also carries the risk of infection to train commuters.The source claimed that SMRT had discontinued the annual medical check-up for train captains, which could have been why TB cases might not have been picked up until a case had been discovered. Lauschke Amy assumed that SMRT discontinued the annual medical check-up to cut on costs. Anne Maes Mary feared that TB was already an epidemic in Singapore without the public noticing it.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian mentioned boarding a bus to Yio Chu Kang Interchange so that he could transfer to bus service 162. As his mobile app showed that the next bus would arrive within 13 minutes, he went to the MRT station first to top up his fare card. Upon his return, he was surprised to see his mobile app show that the next bus would arrive in 19 minutes. Tan said that it was unlikely that bus service 162 had arrived and left while he was away as there were still several passengers waiting for the bus. Tan mentioned that bus service 162 arrived a few minutes later, which further proved that the tracking was inaccurate. He said that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan and LTA officials did not care if things were not working properly. Several netizens stated that bus timings from apps might not be accurate because of external factors affecting traffic. ??? observed that bus timings apps had been inaccurate since LTA took over that system.
?Suna Chew? was disappointed that there were no shuttle bus services towards Sembawang from Woodlands bus interchange, and only one free shuttle bus towards Kranji. The netizen added that people were confused on where to wait for the bus. There were also no sign boards and officers to guide the commuters affected by the train disruption. The netizen also said that even the bus drivers were confused about their destination and where to let passengers alight.
enterprise2 posted about SMRT CEO Desmond Kueks upcoming live interview on May 17 at the HR Summit 2016 at Suntec regarding SMRTs transformation and culture change. jw5 asked if CEO Desmond Kuek would also update the public on the milestones that SMRT have achieved. GoldenDragon believed that there would be enhanced security at the event following the recent SMRT accident.
In connection to Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement to Chinese daily Lianhe Zaobao that service standards of public buses could not be improved without increasing the fares, Chua Chin Leng with username redbean wrote that Singaporeans have been told many times that fares hikes would lead to better transport services.The blogger said that if the statement was true, Singapores transport services would be the best in the world after so many years of fare hikes. He stated that the truth was simply the opposite: All the fare hikes led to lower quality of services. The blogger also mentioned that train faults and breakdowns were the new norm. He said that rail issues could not be resolved by simply wishing for it and by raising fares. Instead, experts with real knowledge on transportation should be brought in to resolve the issues. Some netizens observed that every time the Transport Minister issues a statement, a train breakdown would occur on the following day. b stated that fares had increased so many times but services had declined. The netizen mentioned that the root cause of the issues should be determined. Samsuri Amat said that the Government would still increase fares despite public disapproval.
A video showing a yellow CityCab taxi reversing at considerable speed into a stationary car at a Redhill carpark was first uploaded by Facebook user Evon Lim on Apr 4. In a statement to The Straits Times on Apr 5, Tammy Tan, ComfortDelGro's Group Corporate Communications Officer said that they had terminated the hiring agreement of the taxi driver involved for driving recklessly. Tammy Tan clarified that the cabby stopped his taxi further down the road before returning to the scene of the incident to pass his particulars to a shop owner who knew the car's owner. In the video, the impact of the crash was seen lifting the parked car partially off the ground, badly denting its left door in the process. The taxi then drove off immediately. Several netizens stated that aside from terminating the taxi driver, the LTA should also revoke his licence and ban him from driving. Some wondered if there was anything wrong with the taxis reverse gear, similar to other reverse accidents reported previously. SG Subbuteo believed that terminating the driver would not solve the issue. The netizen asked if the driver of the car would be compensated.
?Mohd Rizal? stated that SMRT should screen for drunk passengers and prohibit them from boarding the trains because they are a nuisance to other passengers.
SBS Transit bus driver Meng Chong was sentenced to one week's jail and banned from driving for three years after admitting to causing the death of 66-year-old Tan Ah Tit through his negligence. On Aug 29, 2015, the bus driver braked suddenly to avoid hitting a bus in front causing Tan to lose her balance and fall backward, breaking her skull. The passenger died after being in a coma for five days.
Under the SMRT's Adopt-a-Station initiative, which began in September 2014 and currently has 21 schools taking part in it, students can serve the community near their schools and learn how to be gracious commuters themselves. The programme was incorporated into the schools' Values in Action activities, a requirement by the Education Ministry to get students to work on community projects.Dave Ong, SMRT's Head of Passenger Services Department, said that the schools decide on the activities, which include ambassador duties, musical or martial arts performances and art murals or exhibitions.Teachers said the Adopt-a-Station scheme has benefited their students as they learn soft skills such as communication and collaboration. As Adopt-a-Station is new, commuters have sometimes misunderstood what the pupils are doing. Several netizens disapproved of having the students work at the train stations, with some saying that it was slavery and child labour. A netizen lamented that the children were doing free collaborative industry projects (CIP) for SMRT. TC Chua pointed out that the initiative was a civic effort by SMRT for the children to learn how to behave and interact with the community. The netizen asked others to stop spreading hate and anger over good things. KM Lim mentioned seeing the students at Toa Payoh MRT station standing and looking idle. The netizen said that it was just a waste of time and it would be better if they could do more meaningful work than working for SMRT. Jon Tan expressed concern on the safety of the children should an emergency situation, such as a fire, break out at the station.
Cynthia Loh reported a faulty air-conditioner on a train at the North-South Line travelling towards Choa Chu Kang.
A wheelchair user highlighted the abuse of disabled parking spaces in Singapore after a ComfortDelGro taxi driver broke the rules and parked his taxi between two parking spaces for the disabled at a mall.Cai Zhenquan, who has Becker's muscular dystrophy, said in a complaint letter to ComfortDelGro that the incident caused "quite a bit of delay" as he was in a rush to get home to use a cough assist machine. Tammy Tan, ComfortDelGro's Group Corporate Communications Officer, said that their cabbies were fully aware that they were not allowed to park in handicap slots. The cabby involved had been severely warned and the company had also apologised to Cai for the inconvenience caused.Cai wrote back to ComfortDelGro saying he was "definitely not satisfied with the 'official apology'". He hoped that the company understood the deeper issue of infringing the rights of persons with disabilities.Chew Hock Chye, IMM Building's General Manager, said that a shopper alerted staff to the incident and that they tried to page for the driver.After three unsuccessful attempts, they wheel-clamped the cab. The driver appeared pnly at around 5 p.m. to pay the S$100 fine.Cai told The Straits Times over e-mail that the monetary value of the fine was insignificant compared with the driver's disrespect for persons with disabilities. A public apology was being called for the incident.Nicholas Aw, Disabled People's Association President, said incidents of motorists abusing parking spaces for people with disabilities were "very prevalent", especially in crowded places such as malls and hotels. He stated that there should be legislation in place to provide for stricter enforcement action. Several netizens stated that drivers should review the parking rules because many motorists had been abusing the disabled parking spaces. Some said that there should be people employed to oversee the parking areas to ensure that able-bodied people would not park at disabled parking spaces. Leo Ong asked if there were any new law to penalise inconsiderate drivers. Arshan Hussain wondered why the taxi was parked inside a mall car park and was not on the road to pick up passengers. Khai Marcio said that the LTA should handle such cases directly by towing the offending vehicle and issuing demerit points or a compound fine to the driver.
Sausage Super stated that it was crowded at Bishan MRT because the escalator was not working and three train doors closed on commuters. Some netizens said that there was a train fault at the Circle Line. snap99 stated that Bishan Station was the worst MRT station. Mancunian2 believed that Jurong East was the worst station. amazingone explained that Bishan is an interchange station along the North-South Line and Circle Line that was why it was overcrowded during peak hours.
On Mothership.sg, the Facebook post of Othniel Liew regarding the bus captain who had offered free candies to passengers alighting from the bus was reposted. Othniel Liew mentioned that the bus captain of service 972 (SMB3587P) not only greeted every passenger but also provided candies in a small rack near the exit. Other service-oriented SMRT staff had also been praised numerous times for taking the initiative and enhancing commuter experience.
Roger Ng wondered why most buses used for service 806 were wheelchair accessible buses (WAB) when the particular service was not a wheelchair friendly service.On the other hand, service 812 which was supposed to be a WAB service but most of the buses deployed were old articulated buses.The netizen asked whether wheelchair passengers were supposed to be waiting for multiple buses, and to only hope that a WAB would arrive before their wheelchairs collect rust. Bujang Teruna suggested lodging a report to LTA as they were now managing the public buses.
The news story about Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans comments to Lianhe Zaobao in an e-mail interview was reposted in forum threads. The Transport Minister said that the Government bus contracting model would raise service standards of bus services. The Minister, however, stated that the improvements cannot be sustained without raising fares. Nevertheless, he assured the public that if fares were to rise, the Public Transport Council will ensure that the fares remain affordable. Several netizens stated that they would like to see improvements in bus services before fares are increased. cute_togepi assumed that the fares would be increased because LTA would now be responsible for overall bus operations. jdepaul2 said that commuters only want reliable public transportation with fewer delays. Alpaca said that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was hinting that fares would be increased soon.
?TrAcy Yap? reported the unfavourable behaviour of Nor Fizam, Assistant Manager at Paya Lebar MRT station on the Circle Line.The netizen claimed that AM Nor was behind her queuing at Burger King when AM Nor suddenly started to argue with her. The netizen reported and recounted the incident to Station Manager Zaini Bin Kassim who talked to AM Nor right after. After about five minutes, AM Nor came out of the room and apologised but asked the netizen why she interrupted his conversation while they were queuing at Burger King. The netizen said that AM Nor also asked her to go follow him for a security check. The netizen was disappointed with AM Nors insincere apology and with how the Station Manager sided with AM Nor. SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen asking for details as follow up.
After successful negotiations between SMRT and the National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU), SMRT bus captains would be getting a basic starting salary on par with the rest in the industry.A Memorandum of Understanding on the new terms was signed between NTWU and SMRT to finalise the new terms. The bus captains would receive "team-based incentives" under the new terms, which are monthly cash rewards given to teams that meet performance targets, to encourage working closely as a team to achieve performance targets.Mr Melvin Yong, Member of Parliament and Executive Secretary of NTWU said the union was pleased that SMRT has made "considerable effort" to match the employment packages offered by other public transport operators. Several netizens believed that bus captains should be paid more taking in consideration the deduction for the Central Provident Fund, and other personal expenses such as food and rent. Others favoured the increase in bus captains basic salary. Some assumed that increase in basic salary would be one of the justifications for the need to increase bus fares.
Muhsin Man? hoped that SMRT would organize another bus carnival at one of the interchanges soon.
?Tee Lxv? wondered how a foreigner was able to acquire a Singapore vocational drivers licence for bus captains if he could not speak and read English.The netizen recounted boarding bus service 854 (SMB27J) from Ubi and asking the Chinese bus captain how much the fare to Seletar was as s/he did not bring his/her EZ-Link card. The bus captain just shrugged his shoulders, implying that he did not know. The netizen got a little confused and asked again by pointing at the route map on his/her phone. The bus captain indicated that he did not know, then pointed to the cash box and signalled the passenger to put in money. The netizen wondered how it could be that the bus captain not know his bus stops.
In connection with the Governments plan to allow foldable bikes and personal mobility devices (PMDs) all day on public transport, 938LIVE asked on its Facebook page whether commuters were willing to make space. It was also asked whether users of foldable bikes or PMDs were confident they would be able to squeeze onto buses and trains during the peak hours. Several netizens approved of the trial to allow foldable bikes and PMDs on public transport all day. Ng Yee Tat stated that a Park and Ride scheme should be created to encourage abled-body PMD riders and cyclists to park their rides at MRT station and take MRT to their destinations. Kevin Lim believed that the trial would benefit PMD users from Bishan to Woodlands, or Bugis to Expo. Jason Tan suggested having designated train cabins for people with PMDs and foldable bikes. Hermann Seet liked the idea but was concerned with its implementation during peak hours when trains are overcrowded.
Lush green would be the unified colour of Singapore buses expected to be on the roads from the middle of this year, with Tower Transit buses being the first to don the new livery. The LTA described the result of the voting as a "close call", with green edging out red by 144 votes. Ng Chee Meng, Senior Minister of State for Transport, unveiled the chosen bus colour on the side lines of the inaugural Bus Carnival held on Mar 11. Prototypes of two new concept buses were also exhibited during the Bus Carnival. The buses had three doors and two staircases, with new features like USB charging ports and a Passenger Information Display that would give real-time information on the next bus-stop along its route. The LTA would call a tender for the manufacturing of the new buses later this year. One of the prototype buses has a staircase leading to a dedicated second exit for upper deck passengers. The other has an additional exit door at the rear of the bus, so those sitting at the back of the bus would not have to squeeze past other passengers to alight. The LTA is collecting feedback on the new features at three bus carnivals it has scheduled. The next bus carnival would be held at VivoCity Outdoor Plaza from Mar 25 to 27, and the third would be held at Toa Payoh HDB Hub, from Apr 1 to 3. Several netizens stated that it was just a waste of money changing the colours of the bus and that the money should have been used to improve bus services. Others said that they were more concerned about the frequency of buses and the number of buses rolled out for each route. Joestoys JD Roy mentioned that in another two months the new bus colour could not be seen anymore after the buses were covered with advertisements. Several netizens were excited to see the new bus concepts on the road but many thought that the buses could do away with the USB charging points. Some believed that the bus fare would again increase after the introduction of the new bus models. Others wondered whether open baby strollers would be allowed inside the bus with the new models, with Harald Illeditsch saying that it was difficult to carry a baby in one hand while folding the stroller and carrying it on the bus with the other hand. Orion Ang believed that installing USB charging ports might not be a great idea because the bus might consume more fuel, passengers would be hogging the window seats where the USB ports were located, and a fire could start from using third-party charging cables. Vergrassi Sous said that it was about time to have exit doors at the back.
SMRT announced that seven bus services would be diverted on Feb 6 for the Pedestrian Night event along Orchard Road.Bus services 77, 106, 167, 171, 190, 700A and 972 would be diverted from 6 to 11 p.m., and would skip bus stops at Tang Plaza and Lucky Plaza along Orchard Road. Thomas Daniel said that the diversion would inconvenience passengers and bus captains as well.
Anntonii praised the bus captain of service 67 for allowing an elderly who only had a S$10 note for her bus fare to ride free of charge. The netizen said that s/he was also trying to look for coins to pay for the elderlys fare but the driver also stopped her from doing so. Several netizens commended the bus captain for his kindness. Some, however, expressed concern that the bus company might reprimand the bus captain for allowing a passenger to board the bus without paying the fare. Others mentioned that some bus captains would not allow passengers with insufficient travel card load or coins to board the bus. Martin Loh stated that senior citizens should be allowed to travel on public transport free of charge.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about SMRT Taxis being the first to introduce fourth-generation Prius Hybrid taxis. SMRT stated that apart from having better fuel efficiency, the new Prius, which would be introduced in August, would offer commuters a safer and more comfortable ride because of its roomier passenger cabin and improved sound absorption. Several netizens who are potential taxi partners have asked about the rental rate for the new Prius. Justin Lim stated that aside from rental rate, excess and daily peak mileage required were other important points to consider before renting the new Prius.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) mentioned that commuters were confused to see an SBS Transit bus being used by SMRT. It was stated that many ignored the bus thinking it was an SBS Transit service. Norman Abdullah wondered why most commuters simply looked at the bus colours and not the service number shown on the electronic display system. The netizen also stated that larger company stickers should be placed so commuters could easily identify the correct bus. Ryan Chng mentioned that his friends did not take notice of the bus with purple-coloured livery at the bus stop and then wondered why their bus had yet to arrive.
Adam took photos of an accident involving a taxi and an SBS Transit bus at Tampines Street 34 on Apr 7. He reported hearing a loud bang but was unsure about what happened. Some netizens observed that buses and taxis were always involved in road accidents. Others said that taxi drivers act like gangsters on the road and never seemed to care for others.
On Facebook, Parliamentary Secretary, Ministry of Culture, Community and Youth and Member of Parliament Baey Yam Keng shared photos of his ride onboard the SBS Transits Hari Raya-themed bus service 28. Several netizens thanked MP Baey Yam Keng for the updates. Muhd Iszaki mentioned that the themed bus was a small gesture from SBS Transit to acknowledge about 1.6 billion Muslims across the world awaiting the celebration.
Blogger Philip Ang stated that the MRT system is broken and that no medicine can help fix it. He mentioned that Singaporeans should not continue hoping for a miracle from the Government, whom the blogger believes to be the culprit who created the mess.The blogger stated that the MRT system which was designed in 1972, failed to anticipate the population growth for the next two decades. With the rail system continuing to run at maximum speed and increasing daily ridership, commuters should expect major glitches as the population surges. The blogger added that all SMRT could do was to keep its fingers crossed because there was really no room for error.
?Jacqueline Chong? was extremely thankful and grateful to bus captain Suhaimi of bus service 851 for finding her laptop. The netizen said she would have to rework her notes and important essay if the bus captain was unable to find her laptop.
?Chen Li Ying? suggested having a new signage to fine those riding their scooters within MRT stations and platforms for S$1,000. The netizen mentioned that such behaviour could cause inconvenience to the public.
The Health Promotion Board, in partnership with Tower Transit, launched a new workplace health programme called "Starting Right" to encourage and inculcate healthy living practices among Tower Transit bus captains.The programme was one of more than 70 initiatives under the S$3B Action Plan for Successful Ageing by the Ministry of Health. The programme hopes to reach out to 120,000 mature workers aged 40 and above in seven sectors.Dr Amy Khor, Senior Minister of State for Health praised the initiative and said that the programme hopes to empower workers to take care of their health.At the Bulim Depot, close to 60 bus captains took part in a mass exercise session that was customised to address the physical demands of long hours of driving. They were also taught to read nutritional labels, and choose and prepare healthier foods like wholemeal sandwiches. Chan Lai Sun stated that Tower Transit has set a very good example not only for the bus companies but for all companies and organisations in Singapore to follow. James B Wright-Brown thought it was a great idea and hoped that the initiative could encourage other organisations to implement the same. Some netizens wondered why the participants were made to wear safety vests while exercising.
?Aaron Tan? stated that the bus frequency interval for service 966 was getting from bad to worse. The netizen mentioned that the previous bus intervals were between eight to 12 minutes during off-peak hours and five to nine minutes during peak periods. Recently, however, the interval was between 13 to 16 minutes during off-peak and seven to 11 minutes during peak periods. The netizen asked SMRT to maintain the previous timing and hoped that more buses could be deployed to ease overcrowding.
?Richard D Tan? wondered why the WINK+ QR codes on SMRT trains were located on the reserved seats, making it difficult to scan the code when the seat was occupied. The netizen suggested placing the QR code between the two advertisement panels in the middle of the cabin. It would also encourage passengers to move towards the centre of the cabin.
Tan Ke Wei reported that bus service 983 was packed up to the door and service 301 was nowhere in sight. The netizen said that although service 983 was quite frequent, service 301 should have additional buses to cope with the demand.Glenc Soh Aiya said that similar issues were observed for services 920, 922 and 972. Chang Yih Toh mentioned that service 109 (under SBST) also needs to improve its timing, while service 301 needs more buses and service 171 needs double-decker buses.
?Shahanan Izan praised the train captain of train 537/538 on the East West Line. The netizen mentioned in a post on August 25 that the train captain announced when train doors were closing at crowded stations such as Clementi and Jurong East. The train captain also announced about track renewal works where trains have to slow down at certain sectors.
HDT Singapore Taxi, which intends to become the sixth taxi operator, would be introducing a new business model to attract and retain drivers. The company who would run a fleet of 100 made-in-China battery-operated cabs could be the first to pay cabbies a salary between S$1,800 and S$3,800.The drivers would, however, have to meet a target amount of fare revenue, which the firm would keep. Anything beyond this target would be shared with the driver. Drivers would also get Central Provident Fund (CPF) contributions, annual leave, medical leave and a six-day work week. Currently, cabbies who take a day off still have to pay rental, or find a relief driver to cover for them. Several netizens approved of taxi drivers having monthly salaries. Others said they would wait and see until HDT Singapore was already operational. Ysa Ric Rod suggested that HDT Singapore should also consider the total working hours set by the Ministry of Manpower. Joseph Yuan Weijie said that there were already enough cabs on the road and that many were jeopardising the lives of other motorists.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about the National Transport Workers Union dialogue session he joined last week. He mentioned discussing how to improve working conditions with the Union members. The Minister hoped that commuters would continue to acknowledge and appreciate the good work of the ground staff. Julie Chin praised Minister Khaw for his great work. Joanne Chow appreciated the Ministers commitment to wanting to engage with and motivate the ground staff. ??? wondered if having several display boards on MRT stations and platform were necessary since most display boards were merely used for advertising. The said that display boards should only show simple information which were important to commuters.
All Singapore Stuff reposted the Facebook post on SGTrains regarding its disapproval on LTAs decision to put on hold the refurbishment works and upgrading of old trains.SGTrains believed that the projects should still proceed as they were already underway and that it would help solve the reliability problem faster than purchasing replacement trains. It added that the PMSM motors used in the upgrading of C151 works by Toshiba are widely used in Japan and are reputable for their high reliability, energy efficiency and low noise. It was also mentioned that the C151A trains should be refurbished since the C151 car bodies were in very good condition. SGTrains added that it will not be cost effective for LTA to replace the C151 trains as it has already spent on upgrading the signalling system on C151 trains, and two of 66 trains have been upgraded with the new PMSM motors. SGTrains appealed to LTA to reconsider allowing the projects to continue. Clayton Goh stated that there was no accountability for train reliability issues. The netizen mentioned that fares had increased but reliability has yet to improve. Mohd Nor Mahad said that putting the refurbishment on hold would bring the system back to square one.
innumerabilis stated in HardwareZone forum that there was an announcement that train service towards Dhoby Ghaut at the Circle Line would be delayed because of a train fault. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that the train stopped for about two minutes longer at each station but would still move on after each stop. 4pxCSO mentioned that the train that s/he was on was delayed at Marymount Station. oration37 thanked the thread starter for the information and mentioned that s/he would take a bus instead. CMC has verified with CCL OCC that there was a fault on a train before Bartley Station. Announcements were made in trains and at stations to alert commuters that train services will be delayed due to a train fault.
?Billie Teo ? posted on Singapore General Hospital Facebook Page about the incident at the hospitals shuttle bus stop involving four SMRT bus drivers. The netizen claimed that the bus drivers described her as ayam or chicken as she walked past them. The netizen said that she was certain, and that the CCTV could prove her claim, that the bus drivers were referring to her as they were staring at her.She reported the incident to the hospitals information counter and requested for information regarding the drivers. The netizen also asked the assistance of the hospitals security officer. The driver had apologised to the netizen but was still reprimanded not to use the term ayam again to refer to any female.
On Member of Parliament Halimah Yacobs Facebook page, Tham Wen Long? shared about the long waiting time for bus service 903. He mentioned that the queue had extended from berth 2 to berth 5 at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange.The netizen stated that there were no other alternative buses for residents as the service was the only one serving the community. He also noticed that there were only peak period service buses (903P) which arrived over the course of the 45 minutes and wondered why none of the original SMRT feeder bus came.The netizen asked Member of Parliament Halimah Yacob to look into the issue.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that his engineer friends from the Land Transport Authority have often accused him that he hardly writes anything positive about Singapore's transit system. Tan said that recent events have made it difficult for him to be happy with the public transport system. An opportunity arose for Tan to ride the train again and conduct a quick survey of the rail network when he was out checking reports of a leak at the Hillview station at the Downtown Line 2. He observed that the train at the Downtown Line was squeaky clean and brightly lit and the air-conditioning was also crisper. The ride was also smoother, quieter and more comfortable. On his journey back, he decide to take the North-South Line from Choa Chu Kang. He stated that his train ride was nearly as comfortable as the one on the Downtown Line. Tan mentioned that the rail renewal works thus far have worked. He was also satisfied with the air-con system. The train, however, looked its age. He suggested that increasing the intensity of lighting and cleaning the trains more regularly would improve his impression on the North-South Line trains. Tan, however, had a not-so-good experience with the Bukit Panjang LRT. The ride was bumpy, jerky and slow and it stopped for at least three minutes at Ten Mile Junction. The writer stated that on a per-kilometre basis, the Bukit Panjang LRT as well as the Sengkang-Punggol LRT were far less reliable than the MRT lines. He went on to suggest that scrapping the LRT system for a feeder bus system could be better for residents in Bukit Panjang, and would improve rail reliability statistics as well.
?Zantet Heng? shared a photo of the train window (car 3203) with hard water spots. The netizen wondered how SMRT could allow their trains to be in such a state. Pek Ariel said that she had also noticed the water spots but wondered what SMRTs priority should be: getting commuters to their destinations on time or cleaning the windows.
On HardwareZone Forum, threads initiated by needsomecash and appleyum about a child that got stuck in between the platform and train gap at Farrer Road MRT were observed. The netizens said that the domestic servant might have forcefully pushed the pram causing it to overturn, and that many people rushed to pull the child out of the gap. Some wondered why people tried to squeeze the prams in during peak periods. Others asked how the baby was stuck in between the platform gap. needsomecash said that the train was stalled for a while at the station because of the incident but the child had been pulled out of the gap safely.
?Kenneth Typ? reported an SMRT staff onboard service 169 who was seen sitting by the bus captains cabin and talking to the bus captain while the bus was moving. The netizen mentioned that the staff was also blocking the right side of the EZ-Link scanner.
midnightpapa stated that a train fault was announced at Novena towards Sembawang on the North-South Line yesterday evening (27 June). The netizen said that the service would be delayed due to a door and signal problem. Some netizens said that there were fewer delays recently. Others said that the public were used to train disruptions and delays. julia_eyes suggested taking another line, a bus or cab than wait until normal train service resumed. julia_eyes asked the thread starter to hop on to another line, and pointed out that Newton station is a station interchange.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) stated on July 6 that the hairline cracks on 26 China-made MRT trains were caused by localised impurities in the aluminium car- body material, which occurred during the manufacturing process.Addressing other points raised by online news portal FactWire, the LTA said there was an incident on one train where its battery cover "flew open" due to a build-up of gases during testing. The manufacturer changed its supplier and improved the battery housing design for all affected trains.Separately, the authority said it found cracks on glass panels in five MRT trains. In May 2012, part of the glass panel next to a row of seats shattered. The cracks were caused by errors during installation, and were unrelated to the hairline cracks on the train structure. The LTA added that it was not unusual to detect some defects on new trains.In response to queries why the 26 trains, which are still under warranty, were sent back to Chinese manufacturer CSR Sifang for repair works, the LTA cited the "lack of facilities and space for repair works of this nature" at MRT depots in Singapore. After the cracks were found, LTA engineers, CSR Sifang and an independent third-party assessor TUV Rheinland had assessed the 26 trains and found that they were safe to operate. Thus, they did not send the trains back at once.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications, said on July 6 that the affected trains were the newest in the fleet serving the NSEWL and that the defects were not safety-critical. He added that "any train that is assessed to be defective or unfit for passenger service is not put into service". Most netizens still questioned why the LTA and SMRT tried to conceal material information from the public. Many stated that SMRTs inadequate maintenance had cost billions in tax dollars. Several wondered why subsequent contracts were still awarded to the same company even after the defects were found. Others said that the SMRT engineering team have to prepare clear specific machinery purchase specifications. The netizen mentioned that SMRT engineers and CSR Sifang quality teams did not do a good job. A few suggested full investigation by the Commercial Affairs Department and Corrupt Practices Investigation Bureau. Lewis Poon suggested buying Siemens-manufactured trains for the MRT like the old days. The netizen said that they were more expensive but very reliable. Chun Chew Lam mentioned that Singapore was not responsible for the defects. The responsibility solely lies with the manufacturer of the trains and they have to take all necessary steps to rectify the defects caused by them. Daniel Ng deemed that Kawasaki was just as liable as CSR Sifang. David Aw said that authorities should be more vigilant in selecting suppliers. Soonsiang Teo suggested that Singapore should set up a factory for the production of train cars. S/he said that the Government could ask Kawasaki to invest in the factory. Randy Yap insinuated that netizens are overreacting, and said that netizens online want all the information, whether relevant or not, and are creating unnecessary trouble.
On Facebook, Goody Feed and Singapore Matters shared SMRTs short film regarding appreciation of the hard work by the ground staff in making sure the trains run smoothly. The posts also mentioned that 50 lucky subscribers to SMRTs YouTube channel would have a chance to win SMRT EZLink Card stickers until Feb 14.
?Dave Trueo? asked SMRT to request its train drivers to turn up the air-conditioning during hot weather and peak hours. The netizen mentioned that the air-conditioning on the train travelling from Jurong East to Yishun was quite low.
Aloysius Teo Xian Yao posted on TODAY Online - Voices that the Government might have overlooked the transport woes of residents living along the western end of the East-West Line, especially the severe overcrowding on the East-West Line, since there remains no alternative direct rail connection to the CBD. The netizen mentioned that with the completion of the third phase of the Downtown Line and the Thomson-East Coast Line, residents living in the eastern part of Singapore would be served by three lines with direct connections to the CBD. Thus, he urged the Government to plan for and construct parallel lines to serve the western region. The netizen believed that the planned Jurong Region Line would magnify the bottleneck situation at the Jurong East MRT station and strain the capacity of the East-West Line.The Jurong East Station would likely be stressed beyond its capacity when the high-speed rail terminus opens. Aloysius Teo Xian Yao mentioned that by building new lines where they are needed, Singapore could progress towards its goal of having 80% of households within a 10-minute walk from an MRT station, and would encourage motorists to take public transport. Duraiarasan Sundaramoorthy expressed support to Aloysius Teo Xian Yaos recommendation, saying that since the lines were extended from Boon Lay to Pioneer and Tuas, it became extremely overcrowded and underserved. Leung Chung Hong asked if more buses could ply on new routes that run on expressways to increase connectivity and decrease travel time. Liu Xinyu disagreed with the writers suggestion, saying that the new Cross Island line, which was intended to improve the reliability of the East, would act as a parallel line to the East-West Line and West rail corridor. The line was expected to end in Tuas, hence giving workers in the Jurong and Tuas Industrial Estates increased access and reduced usage of the East-West Line from their workplace to their homes.
?Reddish Red? reported the bus captain of service 853 on July 21 for ignoring him/her and his/her children despite waving at the bus captain to signal him to wait for them. When the bus stopped at a traffic light, s/he waved again at the bus captain to let them inside the bus. The bus captain, however refused to open the bus door and was making some gestures s/he could not understand.
Veteran Singapore journalist P N Balji wrote that the Sports Hub was claiming that it had attracted 3.5M people to visit the S$1.33B infrastructure wonder last year. Lim Teck Yin, Sport Singapores CEO even claims this as encouraging and bodes well for future developments.The future of the Sports Hub, however, seemed unattractive, with key staff leaving, the calendar of big events looking dismal, and disagreements surfacing with event organisers who find the management trying to take advantage of them for better deals.The Sports Hub was plagued by issues of leadership and a business model that was unsustainable.The writer also noted that the Sports Hub was repeating the mistakes of the past, similar to what happened to SMRT where neither the Government nor the Board of Directors intervene in resolving the issues.The writer believed that the bigger problem was whether the Sports Hub was pricing itself out of the market. The issues clearly showed that there was a need to rethink its pricing structure. P N Balji believed that only a political intervention would be able to stop the Sports Hub from falling off the rails. Some netizens believed that the Sports Hub and everything else in Singapore was about making profits, with one citing that the MRT system lost sight of its maintenance regime because it was focused on making more money. Azathoth believed that poor management was the main reason for the issues faced by the Sports Hub. Kok stated that the Sports Hub was a waste of taxpayers money because it did not solve the capacity issue of the old stadium and the grass and ceiling required high maintenance cost. ??? mentioned SMRT, HDB, COE/ERP/LTA, SP Services as similar nightmares. ricky l pointed out that taxpayers money was not used to build the Sports Hub and that foreign investors funded the construction. Edmund said that the Sports Hub has priced itself out of the market because it only had 25 years to recover its cost and earn profits.
?Fauzie Husni? commended Sarojini, a route controller, for assisting commuters in boarding the free shuttle buses during the recent train disruption. Saronji also assisted an elderly in waiting for a less crowded shuttle bus.
Nandini Torrance Radha? reported that SMRT bus service 854 (TB1134Z) has a faulty air-conditioner. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue when the bus reaches Yishun interchange.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that SMRT had completed its internal investigations into the cause of the track accident that claimed the lives of two of its young employees on Mar 22.The transport company announced on Apr 8 that it had appointed experts from Keppel Corporation and Transport for London, as well as a former executive of Hong Kong's Mass Transit Railway Corporation to review its findings. The review would be carried out with SMRT board members, before a report is handed over to the Ministry of Manpower (MOM) and the police for their statutory investigations.The Straits Times understands it is likely that there were multiple lapses of safety protocol, although SMRT would not say what its investigations had uncovered. Several netizens asked SMRT to come clean and make public the result of its investigation regarding the fatal track accident. Others believed that there had been a cover up of the real cause of the accident. Luke Wong wondered how there could be multiple lapses in the safety protocol. Tay Chang Mong said that it was a bit unusual for statutory investigation to await SMRT report without collecting onsite evidence as soon as possible and complete its investigation. Grace Tan asked the SMRT CEO to explain why the investigations could not be made public yet.
Soff Se shared about his experience where the bus he was on board moved very slowly. He then approached the bus captain to ask whether the bus was experiencing any technical difficulties. The netizen had also shared a photo of SMRT bus service 302. The netizen said that he was disappointed that the bus captain simply handed him a laminated document which looked like a bus schedule. He wondered if it was standard protocol to hand over the bus schedule to passengers or that the bus captain could not speak and understand English.The netizen considered it very rude for the bus captain to hand over the bus schedule instead of replying verbally to his query.
On Facebook, The Alternative View mentioned that many bouquets of flowers had been presented to the two SMRT trainees killed in the track accident at a pillar in Pasir Ris MRT station, but claimed that SMRT staff removed the flowers offered. Several netizens were disappointed that the flowers offered to show respect for the deceased had been thrown away as fast as they were placed, giving the impression that SMRT treated them and the public sentiments as rubbish. John Loh said that flowers and posters were still at the Street 51 pillar where the actual accident took place. Ng Fark Yew asked if netizens were certain that SMRT staff removed the flowers.
Tan Kin Lian boarded SBS Transit bus service 163 after 7 p.m. and noticed that it was difficult to see the landmarks outside since it was dark.He stated that the LTA chose to ignore his suggestion that buses should have a digital display or voice announcement of the next bus stop. He mentioned that the Transport Minister should try taking the bus at night without his entourage of assistants to guide him, and see for himself how difficult it was to see the landmarks for each stop. Yong Choon Lieh assumed that fares would increase once the bus displays were installed.
?Philip Leong offered two suggestions to SMRT regarding public transport: 1. Install racks in buses and trains for backpacks and haversacks to free up standing space during peak hours.2. Consider offering shared cab services where people going in the same direction could get a ride together. The netizen suggested charging each passenger S$10 so the taxi driver could earn more while each passenger pays less. Shawn Lee commented on the netizens suggestions, asking how the racks will be installed, as space on trains and buses are fixed. The netizen added that space has to be freed up in order to accommodate the racks, and questioned Phillip Leong if this was going to be done by decreasing the number of seats or maximum passenger capacity.
ST Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that the plans to rejuvenate the North-South and East-West MRT lines - which involve sleeper replacements, re-signalling, train upgrades, additional trains and third-rail replacement would be of no effect if the power system is not upgraded first. Since operators started ramping up train services in 2011 to cope with soaring demand, power-related faults have climbed. As additional trains were gradually being injected into the system, more warning signs have surfaced and there was no satisfactory explanation for any of the power failure incidents. Operator SMRT and its regulator, LTA, have merely issued statements of fact. He highlighted three incidents Bukit Panjang LRT in March last year, the July 7 incident and the power trip at an intake station on April 25 this year. The writer stated that the root causes of the power faults should be determined and a more holistic remedy is needed so that the safety of commuters will not be compromised. The writer added that the LTA and SMRT should get the power system back in shape before all else, and soon. Kihon Go said that the power supply could not meet the demand and there was no redundancy power supply in such an important public transport system, unlike the ERP and MRT gates. Dai Wong stated that the writer seemed to know more than all the professionals running the whole train system for years. Justin Lim stated that management of SMRTs train services seemed to need the media and public to guide and advise them on the corrective action needed to perform the maintenance. Wong Choon feels that the problem needs to be looked at holistically and not piecemeal. The netizen said that the proposals by the expert panel convened to review the whole system should be reviewed by a separate panel of experts from other operators before implementation.
In a written response to a question in Parliament, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that changing commuter behaviour on public transport takes time, but there were encouraging signs at this stage.The Minister said that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) survey on perceptions showed that more commuters have noticed that people were giving up seats, rising from 42% in 2012 to 63% in 2014.The Transport Minister pointed out that the LTA and the Public Transport Council conduct an annual Graciousness Campaign with the public transport operators and one key message of the campaign was to encourage commuters to give up their seats to those who need them more, such as the elderly and pregnant women. Minister Khaw claimed that the recall rate of the current campaign which features cartoon characters such as Stand-Up Stacey was "very high" at 95%.
Wong Boon Hong disagreed with Ronald Chan that flat rates and fare caps for public transport would overcome Singaporeans obsession with cars.The netizen stated that those travelling short distances would be paying more to subsidise long distance commuters. Passengers might also travel further than necessary to make the journey worthwhile.To achieve a car-lite society, the netizen suggested that driving must be made inconvenient or even a frustrating experience. The netizen believed that this would be more effective than making cars unaffordable or public transport more affordable. Many netizens stated that the efficiency and reliability of public transport should first be improved to encourage more people not to drive their cars. Several mentioned that families with small children and elderly people would need to have cars. Joachim Low stated that efficiency of public transport should be encouraged instead of inconvenience. Claire Chung mentioned that there was no point talking about a car-lite society when our public transport could not cope with the demand. Edwin Ang suggested limiting the number of cars per family.
In a joint press release on June 30, SMRT International and Abu Dhabi based United Technical Services (UTS), announced their investment in automated vehicle (AV) firm 2 Getthere Holding BV (2getthere).SMRT International, a wholly owned subsidiary of SMRT Corp, acquired 20% stake worth S$6M in the Dutch company, while UTS increased its holding in 2getthere to 11% against the same valuation. Goh Eng Kiat, SMRT International Managing Director, stated that they had been working with 2getthere since 2010 and they were confident in 2gettheres technology and the potential growing demand for AVs in Asia. Several netizens stated that instead of maintaining trains, SMRT was spending money on shares of stocks. Klytin Lim believed that there was a good reason why SMRT acquired stakes with 2getthere. The netizen assumed that SMRT was trying to know and learn more from how other countries work with their transport system. Bennie Tey asked why did SMRT not use the money to reduce the cost of transportation in the country.
In The Straits Times, Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote about Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement in Parliament that Singaporeans should "keep an open mind" on the Cross Island Line's alignment. Minister Khaw said that the decision would take into account the "potential impact on the nature reserve, the travelling distance and time for commuters, the cost to taxpayers, and the potential acquisition of homes and businesses". He believes that it is sound advice, one which both proponents and opponents of the original alignment of the new MRT line should heed.Several netizens disapproved of having the Cross Island Line go through the nature reserve. Ng Jun Yan believed that running the line via the skirting alignment might have even worse environmental impacts than running it straight under the Central Catchment Nature Reserve because of carbon dioxide emissions.Agreas Keesaid that Minister Khaw should also keep his mind open to those who disagree with the new line. Kok Shui Hong wondered why one of the arguments against skirting the MRT line at the boundary of the natural reserve was that residents in Thomson area would be adversely affected by the construction works but when the LTA decided to build the North-South Expressway, the residents in Rochor Centre were so easily displaced from their homes. Lapsang Souchong stated that sustainable development should not mean the meeting of our transport needs by damaging our nature reserve through site investigation when there were obvious alternatives.Jeff Lim asked what was six minutes of additional travel time compared to the hours of delay due to train breakdown and the S$2B compared to the investment cost. The netizen stated that the Government should get their priorities right and resolve current issues before making more problems. Cla NG wondered how much performance bonus the Ministry of Transport would receive if they could save S$2B in additional construction cost.
The Securities Investors Association of Singapore (SIAS) stated that SMRT shareholders have expressed concerns about the S$1.18B buyout offer by Temasek Holdings to SMRT, one week after it was announced.In a news release, SIAS said the privatisation offer "came as a surprise" to the shareholders as there was no indication at the company's recent Annual General Meeting. SMRT shareholders raised concerns as to why Temasek was pursuing the privatisation deal through a scheme of arrangements rather than a general offer. Long-term shareholders also asked why there were no special dividends from the sale of assets of S$991M under the proposed New Rail Financing Framework (NRFF). SIAS added that shareholders have asked whether the offer price of S$1.68 per share was fair.SIAS said it would meet with SMRT directors and Temasek officials separately to raise the concerns of shareholders and also hold a dialogue session with shareholders and SMRT. Meanwhile, in a joint statement, SMRT and Temasek said that they welcome the opportunity to engage with SIAS and SMRT shareholders to discuss the proposed acquisition. Several netizens observed that while commuters were looking for better train services, SMRT shareholders expressed concerns about their dividends. Peter Tan believed there would only be minor changes in SMRT whether or not the deal would push through. ChanPeew Wan wondered whether SMRT would be listed again in the future. Tan Chye Meng surmised that everything was already well planned from the beginning: when shareholders had to stay out and when to step in. The netizen stated that it was like passing a ball around but in reality, only one person was playing the game, passing the ball from his left hand to right hand.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about the information packs Paving the Way for Better Journeys distributed to homes located along the East-West Line (EWL) as part of its efforts to update commuters of rail renewal projects on the line. The packs contained four collectible fridge magnets and information about SMRTs rail renewal projects. Commuters who have received the pack also have a chance to win a limited-edition EZ-Link card with a stored value of S$20 by providing feedback through a survey, accessible via the QR code printed on the pamphlet found in the pack. Sin Hcmc asked if those not staying near the EWL could also get the info packs.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? stated that most of the old trains on the Bukit Panjang LRT Line were hot and stuffy and requested for SMRT to improve the air-conditioning system. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more information so that the team can follow up.
After organisers stepped up the frequency of shuttle buses and worked with the authorities to encourage taxi drivers to head to the venue, visitors to the Singapore Airshow experienced far shorter waiting times for transport out of the event venue on Feb 17. A steady stream of taxis were seen entering the event venue from 2 to 6 p.m. Cab companies said they have been encouraging more drivers to go to the event venue, through internal communication systems.The visitors interviewed by TODAY on Feb 17 expressed relief with the improvements.Some of the taxi drivers interviewed were unsure if they would return for the rest of the show, saying that it takes quite a while to come in and get out of the venue. Firdaus Hashim claimed that s/he had personally witnessed the improvements and was able to board a taxi at 7:04 p.m. Kelvin Ozaki said that despite the number of commuters at the airshow, taxi drivers were still unhappy because of the long queue, congestion and distance of the venue.
BillyBoy commended the SBS Transit bus captain of service 104 (SBS6853S) for offering a free ride to avoid heavy downpour. The netizen was surprised for the kind gesture but still paid S$2 for the ride. Many netizens stated that the contributor had caused trouble to the bus captain as he might get a warning from SBS Transit for offering a free ride. Others praised the bus captain for the kind gesture. Some hoped that the bus driver would not be terminated by SBS Transit.
?Audrey Chng? thanked SMRT for the loopbus service 979, which offers residents of Yew Tee another option to commute to work via the Downtown Line. The netizen, however, mentioned that many commuters were unable to board the bus because single-decker buses with lesser capacity was being deployed. The netizen said that service 979 was supposed to be an alternative to service 302 to get to Yew Tee MRT station. Additional buses for feeder service 302 have already been added to cater to the crowd during peak hours, which the netizen believed was more than sufficient to serve those heading to Yew Tee MRT station and there was no need for service 979 to stop at Yew Tee MRT station bus stop during peak hours.
According to Member of Parliament (MP) Dr Lee Bee Wah, in a span of three years, over 130 complaints had been received by SMRT and SBS Transit with regard to commuters who had refused to give up their seats.In a written reply, Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure and Minister for Transport, Khaw Boon Wan informed that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and Public Transport Council were working towards creating awareness on graciousness, with emphasis on giving up seats to the pregnant, needy or elderly. Some netizens stated that removing the reserved seats might solve the graciousness issue since everyone would be compelled to offer their seats to those who need them. Heli Hob believed it was time for relevant authorities to remind the public about graciousness. Violet Pang said that some passengers that were offered a seat declined the offer.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan announced at the Walk Cycle Ride SG Symposium on 20 July the six-month pilot trial to allow foldable bikes and personal mobility devices (PMDs) on public transport all day. Currently, foldable bikes are only allowed on trains and buses during off-peak hours.Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that the trial was part of Singapore's efforts to move towards a car-lite society by making alternative transport options more attractive and convenient.The Minister asked public transport commuters and those who bring their bicycles and PMDs onto the buses and trains to be considerate to one another for the trial to be a success. He added that cyclists and users of PMDs should exercise common sense and consideration when they bring their devices up onto trains and buses, and for the rest of the commuters to be prepared to share the space on public transport. Several netizens disapproved of allowing foldable bikes and PMDs during peak hours as it would only add to the congestion. Others mentioned that authorities should be improving the frequency and capacity of trains rather than implementing the said trial. Peter Teo warned commuters to be prepared for some ungracious people and ugly incidents inside public transport.
Artliner15Aug77 started a thread asking SMRT to have more seats on MRT trains particularly for the elderly as it was difficult for them to be standing for long periods. Some netizens said that the elderly should take a taxi if they did not want to stand onboard MRT trains. A few suggested bringing their own chairs inside trains. onegoal stated that SMRT removed the seats so more passengers could board, which resulted in overcrowding. cran87 preferred taking the bus because it has more available seats most of the time.
?Alexander Dennis Fong? asked SMRT to deploy double-deckers for service 985 and more buses for service 190 during morning peak hours.
Netizens continued to discuss the Sports Hub which had been plagued by issues of leadership and a business model that was unsustainable. Spring stated that the National Stadium should have social responsibilities to the general public on accessibility but said that the stadium also needs to recover the cost of expenses. Yewheng believed that incompetent management was the cause of issues faced by the Sports Hub. Darryn noted that not many "mega-stadiums" in cities with a population of about 5 million were profitable. Wt_know wondered how much the Ministry of Defence would pay the Sports Hub for the National Day Parade. In another post, the netizen stated that the Sports Hub was privatised similar to SMRT, SBST, and Singapore Power to generate profit and be sustainable. Picnic06 also wondered why the old stadium, which had become a national icon, was demolished. Roh96 asked why the national stadium was being run like a private entity to generate profit.
Netizens continued to discuss the shorter waiting times during morning and evening peak hours at the Sengkang LRT loop as extra carriages were added. Namdrol Jangsem noticed that not all trains came with the extra carriage. The netizen added that there were more people at the platform waiting for the train compared to a similar time in 2015. Chun Chew Lam said that the LRT should keep on searching for better solutions to public transport woes, until the general public was reasonably satisfied with its performance.
treeskull wondered why the air-conditioning on trains were switched on during the first half of the journey and switched off for the rest of the journey. OmegaSupreme mentioned that the air-conditioner seems to get weaker as the train becomes crowded. In response, the thread starter pointed out that the air-conditioning was literally switched off. Crooni believed that at a certain point the power had to be regulated and reduced in order to prevent power trips and track faults. CloudJames stated that after the MRT system was privatised, the interest of the shareholders became more important than the people who use public transport daily.
?Jay Low? reported SMRT taxi driver Lim Lian Chin (SHD6222X) for being rude and driving recklessly. The netizen also mentioned that the driver did not provide help in carrying the luggage to the cars boot.The netizen stated that the driver had been tailgating other cars and braking suddenly. The driver also did not use the route shown on the GPS. The taxi driver also ignored the netizens request to slow down because there was a child in the car. The netizen asked to be dropped off even before reaching the destination as he feared the way the taxi was being driven.The netizen asked SMRT and LTA to review the driving quality of its drivers and assist in the investigation of the incident. Several netizens noted that the netizen did not clearly state his correct address to the taxi driver. Alex The claimed that the taxi driver had helped an old lady carry her groceries while crossing the road previously. June Hi mentioned that there were a number of rude taxi and bus drivers from SMRT. The netizen hoped SMRT would continue to educate its drivers and staff about safety. SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen to assure him that passenger safety is priority and requested for the netizens contact details so that the team can look into the issue.
Netizens continued to discuss the commuter satisfaction survey which showed that both bus and train reliability had improved, and that commuters grew more satisfied with public transport services in 2015, despite headline-grabbing service breakdowns which occurred during the year. Most netizens wondered how the survey was conducted and who were the participants. Paul Antony Fernandez was interested to know which period the survey was conducted in and which segment of commuters participated. He said that he disapproved of the survey results as he uses the MRT during morning and evening peak hours and commuters who travelled off peak hours were more likely to be satisfied. Gabby Morritt who was visually impaired and often visits Singapore, said that she loved the MRT because it was very easy to navigate compared with that of other countries. The netizen also found the MRT staff members to be helpful when their assistance was needed. Ng Poh Chuan said that s/he was born in the 1960s and had witnessed the transformation of the public transport system. The netizen said that compared to the drivers attitude, crawling bus journey, rude bus conductors, and humid bus interiors in the early days, the current system was now heaven. The netizen also pointed out that transport operators would not gain anything if their services were delayed. Jackson Tan stated that the survey results meant that the public was satisfied with having more breakdowns. Tan Kok Tim posted several comments regarding the lack of ramps at SMRT stations.
Minister of Defence Dr Ng Eng Hen stated in Parliament that the National Day Parade 2016 to be held at the National Stadium was expected to cost S$39.4M, compared to S$40.5M when it was held at the Padang in 2015. James Lim believed that the costly stadium rental was due to the high frequency of the rehearsals held at the stadium. The netizen said that the organising committee should review their rehearsal plan and only hold critical rehearsals at the stadium. Bryen Yap wondered why the Government had to rent the National Stadium for the National Day Parade. Hamzah Osman suggested using less fireworks and more army display.
?Patricia Alandrea Fen? mentioned that a transaction error occurred while she was topping up her EZ-Link card using NETS. The netizen, however, noticed that S$10 had already been deducted on her card, and wondered how to refund the said amount. This was the first time she had encountered such an issue.
As signalling problems continue to plague the Circle Line for the fourth day in a row, the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and SMRT advised commuters to plan for longer travelling time in a joint statement on September 1.LTA and SMRT said that they had narrowed the problem to signal interference that had caused intermittent loss of signal between trains and stations. They were also working with a team of experts from train manufacturer Alstom to resolve the issue.A senior SMRT engineer described the glitch as a "phenomenon" that could be related to a software issue or caused by interference from telecommunication equipment.Experts say the four-day-long glitch causing delays on the Circle Line was a "serious" issue, even as the operator and the authorities say they are working "round the clock" to resolve the fault.Dr Park Byung Joon, SIM University Senior Lecturer, warned that the intermittent loss of communication could "proliferate and lead to a total shutdown".Dr Park also mentioned that although the emergency braking system would ensure safety when the signalling system failed, it was also possible that the braking system would fail as well. Many netizens stated that it was unacceptable and unbelievable that SMRT engineers have yet to determine the cause of the signalling issues and rectify the issue after four days of service delays. MuSo Lee pointed out that technically, SMRT train services were not down and trains were merely moving slower. The netizen also said that passengers should factor in longer journey times by leaving their homes earlier. Others asked how SMRT would compensate the public for the inconvenience caused to them. Some mentioned that fares should not be increased until transport services have improved. Others suggested for the Transport Minister and Members of Parliament to try taking the trains during times of disruption to experience why commuters were frustrated with the transport system. Some thanked the maintenance team who were working round the clock to solve the issues and the ground staff for listening to every passenger enquiry and complaint. Other netizens reported that train doors closed too quickly, causing some children and elderly to be caught in between the doors. Bernadette Png suggested that SMRT charter buses to ease the crowds.
Nigel Wood, Managing Director of UK-based bus operator Go-Ahead, stated that it would bid for the latest bus package of bus routes in Seletar as the company plans on expanding its business in Singapore. He expected the price to be an important factor in the bid for the Seletar package, as there were a number of quality bidders in the previous tender. Mr Wood mentioned that bus services in Singapore were really good but there was room for improvement in reliability, citing problems like bus bunching and long waiting times. Mr Wood believes that bus captains would be an important source of feedback for operations at Go-Ahead, being a former bus captain himself. He said that if a certain route has a problem and passengers were complaining, he would talk to the bus captain because they drive the route and know best. He also intends to convert his drivers licence and drive buses himself when Go-Ahead buses start plying the roads, just as he did in London, to understand the issues facing bus captains.
Speaking to the media on 6 July, Hong Kong's Transport Secretary Anthony Cheung Bing-Leung claimed that the Government was not aware of quality issues with SMRTs C151A trains. However, contrary to Mr Cheungs statement, several emails sent to the Hong Kong Government complaining of the "underframe cracking problem" in Singapore's C151A SMRT trains show that the Bureau had been aware of quality issues with C151A trains since early last year.In a news report, it was mentioned that the MTR, Hong Kong's rapid transit railway system, would question China's CSR Qingdao Sifang company about the quality of the 102 trains being manufactured for its use following revelation that Singapore's SMRT had shipped 26 faulty subway trains back to the train maker for repairs. Some netizens doubted that the Hong Kong Government was not aware of the issue. Edwin Kwan was proud of Singapore for returning defective trains, but mentioned that the Government needs to uphold the highest standards of public administration and accountability.
?Lionel Ckh? said that SMRT should be more organised and stop asking commuters to get off the train midway during the journey and board the next train. The netizen mentioned that the experience happened at Yishun in the evening of Mar 11, and every morning at Ang Mo Kio.
Facebook user Ian De Cotta shared the picture of a faulty display at the Punggol station of the North-East Line which was supposed to show a quote by Winston Churchill, but instead displayed a reminder If you see something suspicious, inform our staff or call 999. The post by Ian De Cotta was also shared on The Independent website. The writer also pointed out that commuters who take and share pictures have to be careful, pointing to an SMRT advisory as an example. The advisory states that commuters may take photographs or videos within SMRT premises only if it is for personal use. Sharing of such photographs and videos taken publicly was prohibited. In 2010, a letter writer to Straits Times Forum page, Raymond Chong, was stopped by an SMRT staff for taking a picture of the public transport operators faulty display panel. The SMRT staff quoted a Prevention of Terrorism Act as the reason for his booking.SMRT replied to the writer to explain that photography and filming were not allowed in trains and stations but Chong cited that such policy was not displayed prominently in stations and trains. He added that SMRT has held photography competitions in its stations, where winning entries were displayed prominently. Some netizens explained that the message If you see something suspicious, inform our staff or call 999 is situated permanently on the lower part of the display board at the NEL station. The quote was a scrolling message that alternates between the quote and person the quote is attributed to. Some wondered why there were no police reports made against Stompers for taking photos of commuters sitting in the reserved seats. Others said that nothing would stop commuters from sharing pictures of overcrowded trains and platforms.
During a visit to Ulu Pandan Depot on Jan 8, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan noted that there is a need to expand the crew in order to meet expansion in capacity, and to raise maintenance standards. Rene Lim commented that it was very good that Minister Khaw took time to chat with the staff and show care to them.
?Shian Er? reported that a male cleaner was seen inside the female toilet at Tanjong Pagar MRT station. The netizen said that there were still other females going in and out of the toilet and no cleaning sign was put up at the entrance of the toilet to warn users that a male cleaner was inside the toilet.
Despite the Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) that works on preliminary soil tests reporting that the Cross Island Line would have "moderate" impact on the Central Catchment Nature Reserve, several green groups, including the Love Our MacRitchie Forest volunteer group and the Herpetological Society of Singapore, were banding together to raise awareness about the issue through a "March for MacRitchie" campaign.The green groups were renewing calls for the Government to rethink possible plans to build an MRT tunnel under Singapores largest nature reserve. The groups insisted that there should be zero impact on the reserve, highlighting the importance of the area.The month-long series of events, which includes free guided walks to the reserve, school talks and an exhibition at the National Library, aims to inspire Singaporeans to speak up for the forest and support calls for the Cross Island Line to go around, instead of through, the Central Catchment Nature Reserve.An alternative route around the reserve which would have minor impact on the nature reserve was suggested by the green groups. Joey Gan, a business owner and former NParks conservation manager, said that transportation may be a key issue for the country but there is an alternative for the Cross Island Line which if not taken could have irreversible damage to the national natural heritage.Laura Liong said that there was already an alternative route identified where the impact would be minimal, would go around the reserve and would serve more residents and passengers. Matthew Lee mentioned that the public should allow all parties to provide all their evidence to support their claims. He added that nature groups should present better scientific facts and studies to argue their case. Samuel Lee stated that the route skirting outside the nature reserve would heavily duplicate the Thomson-East Coast Line between Bright Hill to mid-point before Caldecott.Elaine Giam believed that the LTA was being utterly hypocritical because they were clamping down on and punishing bikers and hikers for using "illegal" trails through the Central Catchment Area but it was fine to drill through it to build an MRT.Loh Wai Poon said that building the line around the reserve was the most reasonable option since Singapore was now richer and could become more eco-friendly. The netizen mentioned that the Government should avoid the risk of destroying the nature reserve for the future generations sake.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? shared a photo of three SMRT staff that did not bother to inform waiting passengers that there was a service 969 behind another bus. The staff allowed the 969 bus to depart despite several passengers still in queue.
Meng Elaine? reported that carriage 120 at Bukit Panjang LRT station had faulty air-conditioning and asked SMRT to look into the issue.
Netizens reported being stuck in Hillview Station on the Downtown Line (DTL) due to a track fault on Apr 5. Leon said that he was stuck in Hillview Station for at least 15 minutes from 8:40 a.m. onwards. He stated that the announcement was that the train would be delayed because of a train fault. Sahil, on the other hand, mentioned being stuck for over 25 minutes at the same station. He sent videos of the train fault to STOMP. Several netizens were frustrated that the train was stuck due to an unknown cause. Some stated with sarcasm that the DTL had reached a new milestone. Ian Tan wondered where the CEOs of the respective transport companies were, as the Transport Minister had to keep coming out to make the statements for them.
Train service between Joo Koon and Boon Lay stations on the East-West Line in both directions were disrupted on for about 50 minutes on May 2. Free regular bus services were provided. David Wong observed that the MRT always has issues between Boon Lay and Jurong East. Grace Goh stated with sarcasm that disruptions happen when SMRT has a profit of 20% which meant that with more profits, there would be more breakdowns.
?Edmund Tay? reported that the NightRider bus (NR3) arrived only after two and a half hours of waiting at Somerset Station bus stop despite the display board stating that the bus has 30 minute intervals. The netizen also reported that the bus captain drove past the bus stop where the netizen was supposed to alight. The SMRT Facebook administrator has acknowledged the netizens feedback and has reached out to him for his contact details for further follow-up.
On Mar 11, the SMRT Buses team at Woodlands Regional Interchange (WRI) would gear up for a big move before serving commuters from Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange on Mar 12. SMRT invited the public to catch bus service 900, the last bus that would be departing from WRI. Commuters on the last bus would receive a special SMRT certificate during the journey to commemorate the milestone. Siew Yen asked if there would be a new bus to service the Woodlands Avenue 5 area.Raymond Lee wondered if there would be activities similar to the Journey with Us at Bukit Batok Interchange.
A man was arrested for possessing an "offensive weapon" and resisting arrest near Yio Chu Kang MRT station Mar 24. A spokesman from the Singapore Police Force said that despite repeated warnings by the officers, the man put up a violent struggle and assaulted officers to evade arrest. SG Subbuteo stated that the police officers had the right to subdue and arrest anyone who poses a threat to safety and security, whether armed or unarmed. Michael Goh said that the public should not complain but appreciate the police officers for doing their job in keeping the public safe. Terence Wee asked what could be considered as "offensive weapon". The netizen said that authorities should just spell it out instead of being so vague.
reiko shared the tweet by SBS Transit regarding the delay in train services towards Punggol and HarbourFront because of a system fault close to midnight on Feb 14.
qcubesg wondered why were there no direct bus services from Punggol to Changi North. The netizen mentioned that s/he had to transfer buses twice to reach his/her workplace and thrice when going back home. Two netizens mentioned that SBS Transit bus service 118 travels from Punggol to Changi. Soulhacker stated that many locations are no longer served by long distance bus services because many prefer taking short distance buses and making transfers along the way than to take a long distance bus all the way to get to their destinations. The thread starter pointed out that bus service 118 only goes to Changi South and not Changi North.
Residents of private homes near Upper Thomson Road, such as Windsor Park and Yew Lian Park were worried about the impact of the Cross Island Line (CRL) despite the green groups lobby for the line to be built around Singapore's largest nature reserve instead of cutting through it.A third alignment option was also being considered for the CRL to go beneath MacRitchie Reservoir. While the route would avoid the Central Catchment Nature Reserve, it had to be ruled out because it was located along a geological fault line.Most residents stated that there was a need for more clarity on the degree of land acquisition and disturbance as authorities have not been specific about how much more time the alignment around the reserve would add to travel time, how much more it would cost to build, and how many houses and their location in the area might be acquired. Several netizens stated that the Cross Island Line should not be built at all, saying that nature reserves in Singapore were already limited. Others said that those residents under-served by existing public transportation would be resolved by building the CRL. Some wondered why Singapore had to build so many rail lines. Others said that the preservation of the natural forest should be the primary concern. James Wang remarked that one party has to sacrifice for the sake of connectivity. Either sacrifice the heritage nature reserves or the residents and their properties. The netizen, however, pointed out that nature reserves could not be duplicated but fancy houses and buildings could be rebuilt.
SMRT stated that the company was working with authorities to explore future alternatives for the Bukit Panjang LRT (BPLRT) network as it was nearly at the end of its design life. The transport company mentioned that residents could look forward to a better travel experience when the system renewal is completed.In a blog post titled It is time to renew the Bukit Panjang LRT, SMRT said that the system continues to age with components that have been declared obsolete by their manufacturer.While the alternatives to the system were being explored, SMRT said that its engineers have been implementing interim measures to improve the power distribution, signalling system, trains and track. Raymond Loke said that the system renewal of the BPLRT was long overdue. Ian Tay Ke Yang suggested refurbishing first generation LRT trains, upgrading the system and replacing the Bombardier Innova trains with more advanced ones. Samuel Lee said that the BPLRT should be scrapped and the Jurong Region Line should be extended to Bukit Panjang. Pang Soon Tan suggested integrating both feeder bus and LRT with an autonomous bus system.
Chiew Joven ?praised SMRT Customer Relations Officer Ang Siew Tee and the staff of Choa Chu Kang MRT station for their assistance in helping the netizens daughter retrieve her stuffed toy that dropped into the platform gap.
The LTA announced the introduction of five new City Direct Services (CDS) that would serve residents in Clementi, Dover, Ang Mo Kio, Bedok and Yishun. The bus services were numbered 666 to 670. Bus service 666, however, gained traction on Facebook. According to the last book in the Bible, 666 was the number or mark of the Beast, considered as the devil. The numbers 666 were also sung in the chorus of Iron Maidens 1982 single Number Of The Beast. Netizens mocked the bus services number making references to the song.Some netizens were critical of LTAs decision to remain numbering the bus service 666, while others downplayed 666s significance. They pointed out that there are existing CDS buses on various routes, with service numbers in running order starting from 651. The numbers were rolled out in sequence, and there was no special reason why 666 was chosen for the route from Punggol.Bus services 666 to 670 are part of LTAs Bus Service Enhancement Programme that will operate on weekday mornings and evening peak periods, excluding public holidays to complement 10 current buses on the CDS program.Most netizens did not see anything wrong with the bus service being numbered 666.Some stated that they were more concerned on the frequency of public buses rather than the superstitions and beliefs behind the number.Alvetor Chromium: said that the public should just appreciate the initiatives by the LTA. Gena Yeo noted that currently there was no city direct service from Clementi Avenue 6.
Andrea Won? asked how to communicate to the train operator that the train air-conditioner was down.
The police stated that a photograph of the body of one of the two workers killed in the SMRT accident that went viral was leaked by a full-time police national serviceman. The picture, which showed a close up of Mr Muhammad Asyraf Ahmad Buharis body lying on the MRT track, was circulated on social media websites, forums and messaging app WhatsApp earlier this week. It was even seen by some of Asyrafs family members before they received news about the accident. The police were already investigating the officer for an offence under the Official Secrets Act. Most netizens were disappointed with the police for compromising the system even for a non-national security issue by leaking the photo of one of the victims. Some stated that SMRT should not sidetrack by covering up the investigations. RasulJamin Kunjang suggested banning the police from bringing cameras or mobile devices with cameras during working hours at the work place and other sensitive areas.
Alex Ong ? reported that the bus captain of service 811 did not switch on the air-conditioning system on the bus. When the netizen requested for it to be switched on, the bus captain did not understand his request in English.The netizen asked SMRT why they hired bus captains who could not understand the English language and why the air-conditioning was not switched on.
Syllabus stated that the new SMRT bendy buses seemed to have tyre problems as the ride was not smooth. The netizen said that the tyre issue was previously observed on double-decker buses. 70niner said that all bendy buses should be changed to double-deckers to solve the issue. Syllabus assumed that the issue was due to very poor maintenance.
A netizen reported that an LRT train was stuck for about 20 minutes in the middle of the track between Segar and Fajar LRT stations on Apr 11. A new double-carriage LRT train had to push the old single-carriage train forward. Some netizens stated that train breakdowns were a never-ending problem. Abi Nawfal noted that same excuses were given by transport operators.
?Mei Rui Hang? stated that during evening peak hours, the double-decker buses deployed for service 965 were packed with passengers. The netizen hoped that SMRT could also deploy MAN A24 buses to ease the human congestion. Some netizens stated that Sengkang could not accommodate bendy buses on its roads. Stewart Yuen stated that even if the road conditions permit the usage of MAN A24 buses, there would not be enough buses considering the demand of some feeder services.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan revealed that authorities were studying the possibility of extending the Thomson-East Coast Line (TEL) and the Cross Island Line (CRL), taking commuters island-wide to the airport with no more than one transfer. The extension would be linked to the existing Changi Airport MRT station for Terminals 1 to 4, and also to the upcoming Terminal 5. Commuters would be directly connected from the airport to the city via the line, which cuts through Orchard and Shenton Way located in the Central Business District.Meanwhile, studies would also look into linking the proposed 50km CRL with Terminal 5 and the new industrial zone serving the airport.Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that this would complement the future high-speed rail (HSR) link between Kuala Lumpur and Singapore, as the CRL would be linked to the HSR's Jurong East terminus. A traveller could travel from Kuala Lumpur Sentral all the way to Changi Airport using the HSR and MRT, and vice versa. Several netizens stated that the plan of having a direct rail link to the airport was long overdue. Dennis Lee said that there should be a space to store luggages inside the train cabins. Fiona Csl wondered why take the HSR from Kuala Lumpur Sentral to Changi Airport when people could just take the plane directly to Changi Airport. ??? asked the Government not to rush the construction of the rail links to the airport so as not to compromise safety.
A blogpost by Philip Ang regarding SMRTs lack of maintenance and lack of planning to accommodate more that four million commuters was reposted on TR Emeritus. Singapore Fooled Again n Again stated that Singapores transport system was built with profits as the main focus while Taiwans way of building infrastructure was people-focused. Sing Khaw Po suggested that experienced rail engineers should be hired back into the company, trains should be maintained regularly, and Hong Kongs MTR system should be studied thoroughly so that counter measures can be implemented in cases of rail breakdowns.
Operating hours of train services and selected bus services operated by SBS Transit will be extended on the eve of Labour Day.In a press release, SBS Transit said train services on the North-East and Downtown Lines, as well as on the Sengkang and Punggol LRT systems would be extended by about 30 minutes on 30 April.The last bus timings of 26 selected bus services will also be extended at their respective bus interchanges.
?Pang Soon Tan? reported the bus captain of service 176 for being reckless and beating the red light. The netizen stated that the driving behaviour could be dangerous to the safety of passengers particularly those who were standing onboard the bus.The netizen suggested tuning up the gears of the MAN buses, similar to SBST's Scania K230UB.
Suzanna Sunari? was disappointed with SMRT bus captain A. Krishnan, driver of the bus with the licence plate SMB1452H, for scolding a passenger whose bag accidentally came into contact with the bus stopping bell. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain purposely stopped at the next bus stop and forced the passenger to alight.
?Radhakrishnan? noticed that dirty train glass windows and doors were not being cleaned properly. Even the mops used were dirty and have an unpleasant smell.The netizen also mentioned having previously reported the same issue to SMRT.
LTAs video celebrating the milestones of the Singapore Bus Industry was reposted by netizens on HardwareZone Forum. FT PRIDE said that the video brought back memories, while netbookcraze stated that only bus enthusiasts might have been touched by the video and asked the LTA to put additional effort next time. Some netizens asked others to support the video. radish stated that instead of wasting taxpayers money making chicken soup advertisements to boost its image, the LTA should make the transport system work, starting with the congestion on roads, overcrowding on MRT trains and buses. xtemujin said it would be better if the LTA had used the money to buy more double decker buses for express bus service 502. eclipsemints mentioned that the LTA was trying too hard to copy the Thailand commercials.
?Titus Tan? was onboard bus service 857 with plate number TIB1048P when he noticed that there was no air-conditioning at the back of the bus. The netizen asked SMRT to check its buses as passengers had to travel 40 minutes or more with no air-conditioning or ventilation.The netizen also asked if a passenger could request to change buses and transfer to the next bus of the same service number without having to pay more.?Wang Kang Rong? disapproved of the incessant sounding of horns by buggy drivers at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen stated that it was unnecessary to sound the horn at people in an enclosed area.?Chynta Ryndu? complained about a SMRT bus captain who could not speak English, drove like a race-car driver and frequently applied the brakes at the very last minute.
In the Customer Satisfaction Index of Singapore (CSISG) survey, private-hire car service providers Uber and Grab have edged out ComfortDelGro in terms of customer satisfaction when it comes to booking a ride on their apps.The apps were rated on factors such as information provided on the booking app, user experience, ease of getting a ride and drivers road knowledge.The CSISG also showed that customers continued to rate MRT train services favourably, despite a number of high-profile service disruptions.SMRT Trains saw a bigger improvement than SBS Transit trains, registering a nearly 8% increase in customer satisfaction, compared to about 4% from last year. Several netizens stated that it was not surprising that Uber and Grab received high customer satisfaction rate because of its fast service and courteous drivers. Weiwen Loh said that Grab and Uber drivers were more polite and do not drive like F1 racers. Mervyn Jui Meng Tan mentoned that price and simplicity was the reason why customers preferred Grab and Uber over taxis.
Commuters expressed their frustration on social media after SMRT was hit by three train delays in one day with two track faults occurring on the North-South Line and another on the East-West Line yesterday (August 2). SMRT first alerted commuters in a tweet at about 8:55 a.m., saying there was no train service between Boon Lay and Joo Koon stations on the East-West Line due to a track fault. Three minutes later, SMRT sent out another tweet informing commuters to factor in an additional 10 minutes of travelling time between Yishun and Woodlands stations on the North-South Line due to another track fault. Free bus services between the two stations were activated. At around 11:40 a.m., the North-South Line was again hit by another disruption with a train travelling on the line moving intermittently, according to a Channel NewsAsia reporter who was on board the train. The announcement on the train stated that there was a track fault near Admiralty station. Many netizens were disappointed with SMRT for not announcing the accurate waiting time, which had given commuters false expectations of a five-minute and 10-minute waits. Netizens stated that inaccurate estimation of additional waiting time created confusion as commuters chose to wait it out rather than seek alternative transport. Several wondered why train faults always occurred during peak hours. Others mentioned that more people would not give up their cars over public transport because of such incidents. Loh Wai Poon said that SMRT should be penalised for disrupting train service at peak hours as it affected the economy. The fund collected could be used in improving maintenance, training of maintenance staff and replacement of parts. Daniel C.W. Tan believed that breakdowns should be a factor when reviewing fare increases. dingster claimed that SMRT will always state that there would be a delay of 10 minutes only so that the incident would not fall into a severe category. ?Don Milano said that SMRT staff had knowledge of train backlogs but were still allowing passengers to enter the platform instead of advising them to take alternative transportation. Myung-Hwa Ki mentioned that trains in Hong Kong continued to run properly despite experiencing typhoon level nine. Henry Ace was worried that things would get worse when the population reached 6.9 million. Marc Wong said that SMRT should stop buying trains from China. The netizen added that the trains from Japan that were bought in the 1980s did not have such issues.
Andrew Long Deng Sun stated that the lack of reliability of bus services was mostly blamed on the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and bus operators. The writer, however, believed that commuters should also do its part to improve reliability.The writer observed that commuter behaviour also adds to bus travelling time, including those who refuse to move towards the rear of the bus to allow more passengers to board, and those who would hail the bus to make a second stop at their location instead of walking towards the bus that had stopped in the second or third bay.The writer said that Singapore might need better management of bus services, but there should also be more considerate commuters.
Train services broke down for the first time this year on 9 Jan, affecting a four-station stretch on the North-South Line from Kranji to Admiralty Station. According to SMRT, the disruption, which lasted for over an hour, was due to a traction power fault. A train travelling in the direction of Marina South was stuck between Kranji and Marsiling stations. Commuters were forced to get off the train and walk towards Marsiling Station.SMRTs Crisis Support Teams were deployed to assist commuters at bus boarding points and with crowd management duty, as well as to provide travel advice.Undergraduate Vanessa Chia who was among the affected commuters told The Sunday Times that the train had stopped for about 20 minutes, with the air-conditioning failing during that time.Chia added that the usual 20-second train ride from Kranji to Marsiling took 15 minutes on foot. She mentioned seeing an SMRT staff member giving an elderly man a piggyback ride. Some commuters were already quite agitated and were shouting. Chia, however, took the incident in her stride and snapped selfies and took videos while walking on the tracks. Many netizens who were affected by the breakdown used the social media to reveal their frustrations. Several stated that many commuters were getting dissatisfied with the frequent breakdowns, with one saying that SMRTs service was getting from terrible to horrible. Others said with sarcasm that many commuters had the chance to walk on the tracks. Darren Tay said that SMRT was famous for breakdowns but the person responsible still happily enjoys the money she pockets. The netizen was probably referring to former SMRT CEO Saw Phaik Hwa. Zulkarnain Hassan mentioned that buying new trains were useless when the framework and track system were not well managed. Nicholas Huang Yongjie said that Members of Parliament always talked on how to resolve the issues but no action had been seen from them. Rob claimed to be one of the affected passengers and mentioned that the staff did not know how to guide and control commuters. There was also no proper guide on what bus to take. ?Bernard Ting? asked what the contingency plan is for those who were wheelchair bound in the event of a train breakdown in between stations such as the recent one near Kranji.
?Lim Pei Yi? commended service 188 (SMB1501Z) bus captain for waiting for her as she tried to catch the bus on a rainy day. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain reminded her to walk slowly as she was pregnant and waited for her to tap her card and settle down before moving off.
Regarding the incentives given to SBS Transit and SMRT for improved service reliability, Tan Khee Shian asked whether the improvement of 27 bus services accurately reflected the overall improvement of bus service reliability.The writer said that it was the basic obligation of bus operators to ensure timely bus arrival and asked authorities to clarify whether the amount awarded simply becomes revenue for the bus companies or whether there was criteria in place to ensure the sum is used to further improve service reliability.The writer mentioned that financial resources should also be devoted to improving all bus services, such as setting up a feedback channel for commuters to highlight services that still experience inconsistent arrival frequencies, to ensure the real improvement of service reliability for buses.
Toh Han Shih suggested allowing Hong Kongs Mass Transit Railway (MTR) Corporation to enter Singapores rail market given the continued breakdowns of the MRT network.The writer mentioned that the MTR Corporation, which has an excellent operation record, operates and owns railways in cities worldwide, including Beijing, Shenzhen and Hangzhou, Melbourne, London and Stockholm. S/he added that MTR trains arrive on schedule 99.9% of the time, according to the companys annual report for the past year. Its high performance rate could be attributed to over S$1.2B spent on maintaining, renewing and upgrading its Hong Kong network last year.The writer stated that MTR Company could at least advise Singapore on how to improve rail reliability. Several netizens agreed with the netizens suggestion. Puibao Bao was uncertain that existing rail operators would let go of their contract with LTA. Neo Alan mentioned that profit margins in Singapore were too low for the MTR to come in. Terence Tan pointed out that the MTR also breaks down often.
Zhi Hao complimented the bus captain of service 858, Rickee Ng (SMB1304C), for his outstanding dedication to his job. Aside from greeting every passenger, he also announces the approaching bus stops and landmarks. The netizen also mentioned that Rickee Ng drove with great caution, slowing down at entrance ramps and humps, ensuring that the passengers have a safe ride.The netizen said that such an exceptional employee should be recognised by the company. Commenters also praised bus captain Rickee Ng for his good service.
Netizens continued to discuss Singapores pilot Smart Bus Stop currently located at the bus-stop along Jurong Gateway Road at Jurong East Central just behind JCube. The new bus stop concept, named Project Bus Stop, has features such as free Wi-Fi, charging points, interactive smart boards, bicycle parking, and a swing, to make waiting buses fun for commuters. Several netizens assumed that the Smart Bus Stop was introduced so commuters would not notice the long waiting times for buses. Others disapproved of the new concept, saying that the bus stop would be congested with people who want to charge their phones. Guan Sim asked whether taxpayers money was used for the new bus stop concept.
Meilin Wong ?asked SMRT to express her appreciation to the bus captain of service 75 (SMB232H) for greeting her and offering free sweets to his passengers.
David Quek? mentioned that the train car 1565 has the best air conditioning system and wished that all train cars would have similar air-conditioners.
Passenger first suggested that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) should also reform the existing taxi industry to optimize the customer experience for all commuters.The netizen said that :1. There should be a rule requiring taxi drivers to display a busy sign if they were on their way to change shift.2. Action should be taken against taxi drivers who refuse to take passengers on certain destinations and those taxis parked in car parks during peak hours.3. Taxis should be able to produce receipts by default and the ride should be free if they were not be able to produce a receipt.Ke Yi Yong said that the LTA should ban private-hire and revamp the taxi industry.Claude Generoxhea BochupSiao mentioned that Grab and Uber were easily available when taxis were nowhere to be found. Christopher Bong stated that the LTA has made a mess out of the taxi industry and the fares were very confusing. William Lim believed that the problem with the taxi industry was the fare structure. The netizen mentioned that in Hong Kong there were no peak hour rates or surcharges and only a standard rate.
The LTA and MasterCard released a joint statement on 25 July announcing that MasterCard cardholders in Singapore would be able to enjoy the convenience of tapping their contactless credit and debit cards to pay for train and bus journeys in a pilot programme targeted for launch this year-end. This would eliminate the need for a separate transit card and fare top-ups.LTA is also working on enabling mobile phones for contactless use on public transit. This new system would allow commuters to track their journey and fare history via a mobile app or web portal. Several netizens asked if there would be any administrative fee charged when they use their MasterCard on public transport. Others were concerned about security, citing electronic fraud. Some wondered whether Apple Pay could also be used. Lawrence Tan warned card users to regularly check their credit card history as they could be double charged.
?Chew Jian Xiong? boarded bus service 854 (TIB1021R) on June 22 at 8:09 a.m. and noticed that the bus stopping button on the grab pole located near the middle door of the bus was missing. The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the issue.
serryna reported that the southbound MRT train towards Marina Bay had no air-conditioning. Sarcastically, the netizen said that SMRT was really helping to save the environment by turning off the air-conditioner in the train. dxdx999 said that the train s/he was on also had no air-conditioning and the train frequency was also lowered. ramlee mentioned that it was better to have a train with no air-conditioning than having no trains at all.
?Susu Tan? asked SMRT to take action against a passenger with a huge black dog onboard train number 2515 on the East-West Line.
?Esme Lim congratulated SMRT for the improvements on the East-West Line. The netizen ? said that the trains were now fast and reliable compared with the same time last year when trains were so slow and kept on stopping in the middle of the tracks, particularly between the Dover-Jurong East sector. The netizen also suggested adding Tamil announcements on the display screens aside from English and Mandarin.
Hisashiburi asked if s/he would still pay the midnight surcharge if s/he boarded the taxi before midnight but reached his/her destination after midnight.Several netizens stated that the netizen would pay for the surcharge even if s/he boarded the taxi before midnight. Some mentioned that it would be difficult to find a taxi before midnight because the drivers were all hiding and would only show up when the surcharge was already in effect.A few suggested using Uber or GrabCar because they have no midnight surcharges.matrix05 hoped that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan could resolve the 2330H vanishing cabs mystery.zul99z said that it would be much cheaper to buy a car than ride the taxi every day.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan believes that Singapores MRT system still has a long way to go to be able to match up to Hong Kongs MTR system, a target that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan is hoping to achieve.Tan cited that the Transport Minister target is for Singapore's rail system to reduce the number of disruptions by about 50% to one delay per every 200,000 train-km, and later hopes to catch up with Hong Kong MTRs 300,000 train-km per delay. Hong Kong MTR, however, has registered about 360,000 train-km per delay in 2015 and 520,000 train-km per delay in the first quarter of 2016. Singapore's Land Transport Authority, on the other hand, has yet to release the first-quarter rail system reliability figures. Tan said that it could be assumed that the MRT reliability figures would still be less than half of Hong Kongs even if it had achieved the goal of 200,000 train-km before a delay. Furthermore, figures cited for comparison defined disruptions as delays of more than 5 minutes. For more serious breakdowns lasting longer than half an hour, the MRT is way behind the reliability of the MTR.Tan also mentioned that there were other things Singapore can learn from MTR, such as compensating commuters who have been inconvenienced by a breakdown. During major breakdowns, MTR does not charge affected commuters and also offers a 10% discount on fares to all commuters on that day.In March 2014, Hong Kongs Secretary for Transport and Housing, Professor Anthony Cheung Bing-leung, said they would consider tying the salary of top management at MTR to the number of breakdowns. Tan wondered if SMRT would consider doing the same.Tan, however, pointed out that Singapore had a 10% higher ridership growth than Hong Kong. The MTR would probably have difficulty maintaining its reliability record if it had to cope with Singapore's ridership growth surge.Tan stated that authorities should keep a closer watch on population growth, and ensure that infrastructural and systemic expansion would not fall behind. He added that Singapore should not focus on becoming "car-lite" until its rail woes are fixed, so as to not further strain the current rail system. Several netizens believed that the rail issues were the result of long-term negligence. Some noted that the writer failed to mention about the difference in financial model between the MRT and MTR, saying that the MTR revenue does not rely as heavily on trains as it runs a number of properties and shopping malls. KeythKatz stated that MTR's transport operations segment was not subsidised by its other business activities. The netizen added that the MTR was self-sufficient with a 7.2% profit margin even with the maintenance cost. Mustafa Zubair mentioned that the Transport Minister kept on saying that Singapore would catch up with Hong Kong but had yet to share his plans or ideas to achieve his goal. The netizen pointed out that Hong Kong's rail system was not only more efficient, its fare was much cheaper as well. Willy Wong stated that Singapores transport system was already very good.
Jian Jie Yap? stated that SMRT should allow ample time for commuters to board and alight from the train before closing the train doors. The netizen mentioned that the door of a train bound for Boon Lay abruptly closed on commuters while waiting for passengers to alight.
?SHoenl Yum? praised the bus captain of bus plate number SMB1615E for his efforts in ensuring that alighting passengers have exited the bus safely before closing the doors and moving off. The bus captain also made an effort to inform the passengers standing near the front door before opening or closing the bus door. The netizen also observed that the bus captain parked the bus close to the kerb at every bus stop.
Ng Sun Yu wrote about the long waiting time for bus service 950 at the Checkpoint.The netizen mentioned waiting for almost an hour for the bus to arrive, during which he noted that 14 buses have arrived for SBS Transits services 160 and 170 as well as seven Causeway Link buses.The netizen considered the long wait unacceptable as it was during peak hours. S/he hoped that SMRT and the LTA would investigate the matter.The netizen mentioned that if SMRT could not ensure reasonable waiting times for the said service, then another bus operator should be providing the service instead. Duci Merie assumed that the writers grievance was about the loss of transfer rebate while waiting for the bus. ?On Facebook, Loh Joo Yong? shared a similar experience having to wait for service 950 for almost 45 minutes at Woodlands Checkpoint to Woodlands.
?Aaron Tan? reported that the new driver of bus service 966 with licence plate number SMB313H was driving badly by stepping on the accelerator and then suddenly stepping on the brakes. The netizen hoped that the driver would undergo training again.
At a closed-door session with top United Kingdom fund managers, Prime Minister Datuk Seri Najib Razak mentioned that a memorandum of understanding (MOU) on the high-speed rail (HSR) project was expected to be signed by Malaysia and Singapore in July.Prime Minister Najib cited the HSR project as one of the many projects that were taking place in Malaysia to improve the countrys infrastructure and boost the economy.The MOU would pave the way for detailed negotiation of the main agreement on the planning, development, execution and the operations of the high-speed rail linking the two countries. Many netizens were apprehensive of Singapores involvement with the high-speed rail project, saying that the Malaysian Government had no transparency and was known for corruption. Others believed that the HSR would have a similar fate as the 1Malaysia Development Bhd (1MDB) state investment fund scandal where money came in and disappeared into thin air. Ricohflex said that it would be a huge mistake for Singapore to sign the agreement and share the cost for the HSR since the rail track within Singapore would only be 0.1% of the total length of the rail track. mee tai mak wondered why all the previous pronouncements had been made only by Malaysia while Singapore kept silent about the project. Passo said that Malaysia would be controlling the project so Singapore should not be investing more than 10% of the cost. seasand123 mentioned that Singapore was already well connected to Malaysia by air, road and rail. Amazing126 stated that the project would be good for both Malaysia and Singapore. Pict said that the HSR should be built all the way to Penang, instead of building so many stations along the way.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian mentioned flagging an approaching taxi which indicated that it was available. However, when he waved to the taxi, the taxi changed its sign to Busy.Tan thanked the Government with sarcasm for the world class taxi service. He said that taxi service in Singapore was expensive and frustrating to the public. Ky Ang observed that it was a very common problem in Singapore and has been around for many years but is still unresolved. Tan Chuan Hin claimed that taxi drivers prefer to pick up Grab or Uber customers rather than passengers on the road. Bg Su stated that people prefer to own cars because taxi services are expensive and unreliable. AK Tan mentioned that LTA was not able to solve taxi availability problems despite a long list of surcharges. William Sam stated that the people who complain so much about taxi drivers should work as one to experience the life of a taxi driver. The netizen said that taxi drivers are working under the system set up by LTA, so the LTA should be blamed and not the drivers. Kit Wong asked Tan Kin Lian why the Government should be blamed when it was the driver who had a poor attitude. Tan Kin Lian pointed out that the issue came about because of the poor system set up by the Government.
Sean Oh? shared a video showing a train passing through 296E Choa Chu Kang Avenue 2 to show how loud the noise coming from the train was. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue of noise. Syed M Daniel explained that it was normal for trains to generate noise when the trains wheels hit the metal rail joints. Sean Oh said that the noise was not normal because it was particularly loud when the train passes at an isolated joint. The netizen believed that there was some misalignment on the rail.SMRT thanked the netizen for the feedback and has asked for more details.
?Gan Veronica? posted on the Facebook page of Parliamentary Secretary for Ministry of Culture, Community and Youth Baey Yam Keng regarding the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen praised the design and spaciousness of the interchange but noticed the lack of lifts towards Causeway Point Shopping Centre. The only route was the stairs which was inconvenient to the elderly and the handicapped.
Bronson Neo Boon Hawk ?reported waiting for the train for 30 minutes. The netizen mentioned experiencing this for the third time. Yapz Kiam Yin suggested for the netizen to take a taxi instead of waiting for the train.
?Brunce Lovetosleep? found the new green SMRT double-decker bus service 983 very comfortable, has good air-conditioning system and was not jerky. The seats of the bus were also not cramped and the walkway was spacious. The netizen said that SMRT should continue buying buses of the same model. Jit Sin Lee pointed out that the lush green Wrights buses were bought by LTA. Hong Koon mentioned that SBS Transit bought the Volvo B9TL but LTA decided to let SMRT use it after it bought over most of the public bus assets in the recent months.
?Aikawa Nakamura? mentioned helping a person on a wheelchair to get up after the wheelchair overturned due to a big pot hole outside the SMRT vicinity along Stamford Road.The netizen mentioned that there has been at least four pot holes in the area for years. The netizen wondered why SMRT has yet to repair the pot holes which could be a danger to people. Jon Ong asked the netizen to report the issue to LTA or the Building & Construction Authority.
Ms Helen Lim, Group Director of Corporate Communications Group at the Land Transport Authority (LTA), responded to reader Goh Kian Huats letter posted at Today Online on August 20 regarding the report that the Government would pay SMRT and SBS Transit S$7B to run bus routes.Goh Kian Huat asked how the amount paid to each operator was determined. He also asked how LTA would ensure the public that it did not overpay the two bus operators to run the bus routes.Ms Lim stated that the contract sums for SBS Transit and SMRT Buses were determined through negotiations with the operators, based on similar performance standards and operational requirements. LTA also took into account circumstances unique to the operators and their packages such as differences in age profile of buses, and geographical and route profiles.It was also stated that under the old model, bus operators were either losing money or earning very low returns. With the new contracting model, public subsidy might be higher initially but greater competition should yield cost efficiencies over time. The degree of public subsidy also depends on whether fares were set appropriately. Regular fare adjustments therefore, would still be required for general cost increases and for improvements in service and capacity. LTA mentioned that they would work with the Public Transport Council (PTC) to ensure that fares would remain fair and affordable. Many believed that the Government would try to recover the fees paid to the two transport operators through a bus fare hike. Some observed that the Government seemed sure that the bus contracting model would be successful. Bok Chek Yang stated that the bus contracting model implemented by LTA went against the trend in the business world where companies acquire other companies or merge with others to become even bigger.
?Rainy CuiXia ?praised bus captain Muhammed Zulkhairi of service 975 for stopping and waiting for her and her family at the bus stop. The netizen mentioned that it was raining heavily and they were still a couple of steps to the bus stop when the bus arrived. She was surprised that the bus captain waited for them to reach the bus stop.
Howard Lee wrote that SMRTs advertising campaign Were working on it which featured various SMRT staff members at work, was depicted as doing their utmost to keep the train system running. The netizen however, believed that SMRT was exploiting its staff for a cheap shot at public sympathy.He stated that the campaign was an attempt to appeal to commuters softheartedness, to solicit an emotional response following a long string of train breakdowns and systemic failures.According to branding and marketing expert Seshan Ramaswami from SMU, showing behind-the-scenes photos of hard-working men and women working under difficult conditions can help to soothe negative emotions. These ads may help boost the morale of SMRT operations staff as they get criticised when trains break down, but never applauded when everything works well for most parts of the year, said Dr Ramaswami.However, the writer mentioned that the email to staff following the dismissal of the two employees involved in the fatal accident in March effectively flushed hundreds of thousands of dollars worth of advertising down the drain. The writer said that SMRT has yet to resolve all its performance problems, and it has to depend on its people to make it work. He believed that it would take a while before the level of confidence between workers and the faceless corporation could ever be established. Soo Tommy Leong suggested that the two dismissed staff should look for pro bono legal advice. Michael Senior Sim wondered why 10 technicians had to go down to the tracks to check on the reported issue.
?Desmond Koh? asked SMRT to display accurate train arrival times on the display boards because delays in train arrivals would affect the travel journey planned by commuters.
?Shakeen Kaur? reported that bus service 859 has long waiting times. The netizen said that she had to wait for at least 15 minutes every morning for the bus when all other buses would have already arrived at least twice. The netizen hoped SMRT would improve the frequency of service 859.
Wong Katherine? stated that while her daughter was travelling on the train last Sunday and was leaning on the intersection of the train, the stainless water bottle inside the childs bag had been dented after the metal part of the train closed. The netizen wondered what would have happened if her daughter was not wearing a backpack when the metal part closed. She hoped that SMRT would be proactive and remind passengers to hold on the poles provided.
?Azizi Ratna Yulis? reported that train number 1233 on the East-West Line from Pasir Ris had no air-conditioning and the cabin felt like a sauna.
The cabby who filmed an upskirt video of a sleeping woman passenger was imposed a four-month jail term. The judge noted that the cabby got away with the same crime against two other victims in the two previous months.Cabby Tan Swee Pheng admitted filming the woman using his mobile phone on Sept 28 last year, and pleaded for the court to fine instead of jail him. District Judge Ronald Gwee rejected the fine stating that a fine was "simply inappropriate and inadequate and that "any like-minded taxi driver and other like-minded driver conveying passengers for a fee had to be deterred". Several netizens stated that the cabby should be banned from driving taxi and have his licence revoked aside from serving jail term.
Three years after the Transport Ministry removed taxis from the certificate of entitlement (COE) bidding process to take some heat off car bidders, Uber-owned Lion City Rental submitted more than 800 COE bids. Rival company Grab was also expected to do the same. As most of the taxi companies were also starting up private-hire subsidiaries to compete with Uber, Grab and other small players, the competition for COEs would only intensify. Several netizens wondered why Uber was even allowed to bid. Some stated that there should be a separate COE category for taxis and private-hire cars. Others said that the taxi operators and Uber would drive up COE premiums beyond the reach of ordinary citizens. Some mentioned that the COEs and ERP were supposed to curb car ownership and regulate road usage.
LTA stated that in two weeks time, the first tranche of the ?Loyang bus package to be operated by Go-Ahead Singapore would be rolling out. LTA reminded netizens that there would be same fares, same routes, same buses and interchanges but bus captains would be wearing different uniforms. Patrick 'Chelski' Cheong said that Loyang Avenue would be congested.
TR Emeritus reposted the blogpost by Philip Ang regarding SMRTs increase in its FY2016 net profits. The blogger mentioned that despite making more money, SMRT has hinted that fares need to be adjusted because fares are not keeping up with costs.The blogger said that SMRT should focus on improving safety and reliability, however, its priority seemed to be in rewarding its major shareholders. SMRT only highlighted rail operations related costs while ignoring the massive profit from rental of retail space and advertisements.Philip Ang stated that commuters were the ones paying the price for SMRTs lack of responsibility and a management lacking in relevant experience. The Government allowed huge profits to be made from the provision of a public good. Breakdown King said that the train system should be improved first before SMRT asks to raise fares. Dr XYZ wondered when trains and buses would be reliable so s/he could confidently say that s/he would no longer be late for appointments when taking public transport.
MrSinkie95 wondered why Tower Transit removed only the company logo on SMRT buses and had not repainted them as they did with SBS Transit buses. Some netizens said that those buses with Tower Transit logos that still have the SBS Transit and SMRT liveries might confuse commuters. Others mentioned that the changing of bus colours were done in batches. 70niner stated that it would take a few days to change the colour of the bus and that the entire fleet could not be accommodated at the same time. Mr.Chibaboom said that some SBS Transit buses that had been turned over to Tower Transit are still in SBS Transits colours.
?Suharti Surani? wondered why bus service 811 was always late in arriving at Yishun Bus Interchange. The netizen mentioned that the bus was frequently late for more than 10 minutes. The netizen said that if there were traffic conditions that affect the bus timings, the display boards should reflect the newly changed timing and not the original timing.
SMRT revealed in its annual report on Jun 3 that Desmond Kuek, SMRT CEO, has received a pay cut of 20%. CEO Kueks total remuneration of S$1,871,714 in FY2016 was marked down from the S$2,311,023 he received last financial year. His basic salary however, has increased from S$793,170 in 2015 to S$830,955 this year. Although SMRT has not revealed a reason for CEO Kuek's pay cut, the report showed that his variable performance pay was reduced from S$1,517,853 last year to S$1,040,759 this year. On Facebook, Workers Party Member Foo Seck Guan Kenneth stated that in a Corporate world, the CEO would have been sacked for such major breakdowns in 2015 and the frequent breakdowns recently. Many netizens believed that the 20% pay cut would be given back to CEO Kuek in yearly bonus. Several stated that CEO Kuek should share more of his salary to the ground staff who had been working hard. Some questioned the reason for the increase in CEO Kueks basic salary. Johnny Tan wondered why the media only focused on the CEO of SMRT but excluded SBS Transit CEOs salary and bonuses, saying that both train operators were equally guilty in terms of train breakdowns or disruptions. Patrick Tan said that SMRT should sue former CEO Saw Phaik Hwa for negligence of duty during her tenure. Joe Leh stated that a good CEO would have declined pay until the system functions properly.
Ng Shien said that in light of the recent rail breakdowns where darkness engulfed train stations, there was also a need for a concerted effort by various ministries to draw up action plans for ground staff to assist passengers in the event of a breakdown potentially caused by terrorists.The writer stated that the ground staff should be trained to make clear announcements to assist passengers during a crisis.She observed that ground staff were often confused or unable to clearly articulate the problem.
In response to a question from Member of Parliament Yee Chia Hsing on whether the Land Transport Authority (LTA) should have been more transparent on the issue of the 26 defective SMRT trains, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan acknowledged that the authorities could have been more open to the public on the issue. He stated that more information is better than less information when it comes to public communication. He added, As my colleagues who have worked with me for over 40 years know, I always prescribe over provide rather than under provide. That is always a better strategy than to keep the information to your chest. In responding to eight parliamentary questions on the defective trains issue, Minister Khaw Boon Wan also mentioned that the LTA had not initially informed the public about the defective trains as it would have caused undue panic. He noted that the trains did not pose any safety risk to commuters, and that the manufacturer took immediate and full responsibility for the defects. Several netizens asked why the trains were secretly sent back to the manufacturer if the defects were not safety-critical. Others wondered how the return of the defective trains would affect train services. A few mentioned that authorities would not know the real issue since they had not taken public transport. Japheth Job was glad that the Transport Minister had admitted that there were shortcomings.
Netizens continued to discuss the Chinese New Year-themed train at the North-East Line which would be running until Feb 22. Several netizens stated that the themed trains were unnecessary and were just a waste of resources and funds, saying that the funds should be spent into building faster and more efficient trains. snap99 said that it would be ironic if the themed train would break down on CNY. shawntyq said that the operator had the money to spend on decorating the train but none to improve it.
Nadia Oneonethreefive asked SMRT if taking pictures of buses would be allowed at the temporary bus interchange.
On Facebook, the Ministry of Transport shared Member of Parliament Melvin Yongs Facebook post about his visit to the North-East Line (NEL) tunnel. MP Melvin Yong mentioned spending the night with the SBS Transit P-Way team as they did the rail replacement work inside the NEL tunnel. He was amazed by the amount of maintenance and inspection works that were carried out during the limited engineering hours each night when the rail system was shut down. MP Yong observed that it was not easy working inside the tunnel due to the air pressure, humidity and poor ventilation. He implored commuters to spare a thought for the many workers who worked hard through every night in difficult conditions to ensure safe and smooth rides for commuters.
A traffic accident occurred near the Bukit Batok Driving Centre involving two cars, including an SMRT taxi, and an ambulance. Six people were injured in the accident, four of whom were medical personnel.
Photos of the New Routemaster referred to as the New Bus for London, taken by some bus enthusiast, had been posted online. The bus would be used by Go-Ahead Singapore for display and promotional purposes. Many netizens hoped that the Routemaster could be used in Singapore. Others suggested writing to LTA to consider the use of Routemaster in Singapore. Some said that bus operators should consider the Routemaster when selecting bus designs.
Kean Cham? hoped that SMRT could rectify the error on the bus guide for service 178 because the said service does not ply along Ang Mo Kio. The netizen also mentioned that the bus guide for service 961 also has an error in the bus timing boxes. Jared Ho pointed out that the left page was the bus guide for service 169.
On Facebook, Shin Min Daily News shared photos of taxi drivers touting for passengers at S$35 per trip in Orchard Road. Jenny Lim said that touting was illegal and that the taxis licence plate should be noted. Sam Wong noticed that the drivers were only wearing t-shirts while on-duty. William K W Huang believed that Uber services were better than taxi services. Allan Choong said that the issue should be reported to the LTA.
Seon Starlet? asked how to apply for an EZ-Link card for her parents aged 74 and 72 and have their picture taken, since her mother was wheelchair bound and her father was a stroke patient.
Daphne Ligo? thanked SMRT staff members Mark Sing and Aishah from Lavender MRT and Nicole Highway MRT stations, respectively, for their quick response in locating and returning her bag that was left on the train.In her post, the netizen mentioned that the bag contained important items such as her 28th SEA Games sweater, full NDP 2016 costume set and her house keys.
An SBS Transit bus captain accused of negligent driving, which resulted in 23 passengers getting hurt, failed to appear at his hearing in court. A warrant of arrest was issued for Ahmad Jamalulail Abdul Rashid, a Malaysian national.Jamalulail was charged with one count of causing grievous hurt to two passengers by a negligent act and one count of endangering the lives of the other 21 passengers by a negligent act. He was granted S$5,000 bail and was supposed to turn up at the State Courts on May 9.Jamalulails defence lawyer Amarick Gill told the court he had been unable to contact Jamalulail since March and later discharged himself. Meanwhile, the bailor was ordered to attend a show-cause hearing next month. She informed the court she has since filed a police report.If convicted, Jamalulail faces up to two years' jail and a fine of up to S$5,000 for causing grievous hurt by a negligent act. For endangering human life by a negligent act, he could be jailed up to six months and fined up to S$2,500. Several netizens believed that the bus captain had already left the country. Others mentioned that the bail amount should be higher than S$5,000 to deter people from jumping bail. Angeline Lee wondered why the bus captains passport was not confiscated. Yas Yashito said that the bus schedules should be blamed for accidents involving buses, as bus captains are supposed to conform to bus arrival timings.
Andy Goh was disappointed with ComfortDelGro for offering to pay (through United Legal Alliance) his family S$10,000 in exchange for a rapid closure of his fathers case.The netizen mentioned that his father was hit by a Comfort taxi and passed away while at the hospital. ComfortDelGro claimed that Andy Gohs father was at fault for failing to exercise diligence while crossing the road. Andy Goh mentioned that his father had dementia. The netizen said that ComfortDelGro rejected his familys request to view the footage from the taxi camera. He suspected that the injuries on his late father were linked to reckless speeding of a taxi on the small lane. Most netizens advised Andy Goh to hire a lawyer and file a case against ComfortDelGro. Others said that the family should reject the offer. Some mentioned that the family must ascertain who was at fault. Others asked if ComfortDelGro had offered to pay for the hospital and funeral expenses.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) announced that it has reached an agreement with SBS Transit and SMRT Buses to move their bus services under the new Government bus contracting model (BCM) starting September 1 to complete the transition of the public bus industry to the BCM.LTA would pay SBS Transit S$5.3B and S$1.87B to SMRT Buses to run the remaining bus routes that has yet to be put up for competitive tendering.There would be 11 bus packages under the model. Eight of the packages with 196 bus services would be operated by SBS Transit while SMRT would operate three packages with 77 bus services.Under this model, LTA would own all operating assets including buses and lease them to the operators.LTA also stated that the gradual, phased approach to competitive tendering would minimise risk of service disruption and that it would allow LTA to refine the management of contracts, tendering and handover processes.SMRT Buses welcomed the move. Managing Director Mr Tan Kian Heong said in a statement that the model would allow the operator to have "a stronger focus" on "operational reliability, safety and service". SMRT also noted that it would continue to increase its headcount and ramp up its operational resources to meet the new performance and service standards such as excess waiting time, on-time adherence and first and last bus punctuality. Many netizens wondered why the Government would pay SMRT and SBS Transit to operate the bus packages instead of having the operators going through the bidding process and paying for the bus routes. Several stated that since the money came from the taxpayers, commuters should not pay for fares anymore. Sangha Vandana said that commuter expectations would be higher and that they would have zero tolerance for delays. Laura Oh hoped that bus services would improve under the new scheme. virus wondered why LTA would pay for buses which they purchased in the first place. Peter Tan mentioned that under the new bus contracting model, there would be little or no difference in the services quality. The netizen stated that commuters were more interested in having reliable and efficient services.
TImothy Tan, who claimed to be diagnosed with Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) in 2013, stated that a few SMRT policies did not make sense and had created more problems for people with IBS like him. The netizen mentioned that toilets in SMRT stations were all located outside the gantry as opposed to having two sets of toilets like in Taiwan or Japan. As such, commuters who have bowel problems have to tap out and tap in just to use the toilet when their IBS problems strikes. He also disapproved of having a shared toilet paper dispenser outside of the cubicles. The netizen mentioned seeing embarrassed men coming out of the cubicle to take the toilet paper because of the senseless policy. The netizen disapproved of trains stopping in between stations as this increases the anxiety level of commuters with IBS, and suggested that trains stop at the previous station if there was a delay with the other trains ahead. He urged SMRT to look into the issue and their policies. Tan Richard mentioned that Bugis Station has only one toilet. If passengers approach the station officers for help, they would tell them to go to the shopping centre. Philip Tan stated that SMRT was more concerned on revenues so they save on toilet paper.
?Dylan Ng? reported the bus captain of service 913 (SMB214K) for driving recklessly from Woodlands Interchange to Woodlands Circle. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
Helen Lim, LTAs Group Director, Corporate Communications Group, responded to Goh Kian Huats letter on Today Online Voices published on July 1 suggesting that the free pre-peak train travel should be implemented in all MRT stations.Ms Lim stated that the Free Pre-Peak Travel scheme has a Travel Smart Rewards programme for commuters who exit at stations outside the city centre, during off-peak hours. Commuters could enjoy travel perks by accumulating points for cash rewards.LTA also offered incentives to organisations under the Travel Smart Network to encourage their employees to travel during off-peak hours. She added that the Off-Peak Pass works well for commuters who travel frequently during off-peak periods.These commuters enjoy unlimited travel on basic bus and rail services all day on weekends and public holidays, and on weekdays except during peak hours.
The LTA shared TheSmartLocal.coms blogpost written by Sandra Yim on Jan 8 regarding the 10 reasons why Singapores public transport was considered one of the worlds best:1. Buskers could now perform live in 15 MRT stations including busy stations like Bishan and Jurong East.2. Commuters could get home at 2 a.m. without paying exorbitant midnight charge for cabs or private-hire cars, with bus services like NightRider and Nite Owl.3. Express buses or Fast Forward bus services were now available during morning and peak hours to avoid traffic congestion.4. One the most affordable public transport fares in the world. 5. Free WiFi at 33 MRT stations.6. Free charging ports at City Hall, Orchard, Tanjong Pagar, Kent Ridge, and Ang Mo Kio MRT stations.7. Commuters could earn points and win cash rewards every time they take the train with the Travel Smart Rewards system. 8. Accessibility for the disabled and elderly. 9. Commuters could travel from one side of the island to another in about an hour. 10. Commuters only have to wait a maximum of seven minutes for a train. Goh Poh Guan asked if points would still be earned if a commuter tapped at exactly 9:45 a.m. Pang Soon Tan stated that it was no longer stage-based fare with transfer rebates but distance fares already. The netizen also mentioned that SMRT buses were seen alighting passengers in the middle of the carriageway outside the Opp RTC Bus stop.
rarenick noticed that the North-East Line was getting crowded. The netizen believed that commuters came from Punggol, Sengkang and Hougang and was expecting more commuters when Punggol becomes fully developed. cripple agreed that when the Punggol crowd comes in, the North-East line would be more crowded. beano suggested building a parallel line to cope with the congestion.
In connection with the takeover of SMRT rail assets by the Land Transport Authority (LTA) to improve service, Toh Cheng Seong wrote that authorities could consider taking a few more steps for the industry and help SMRT to become an even more asset-light company. The writer suggested additions as part of its new financing framework:1. Consolidate a pool of rail engineers under LTAs stewardship and close the loop in upholding the highest maintenance standards.2. Establish the same arrangement for rail traffic control and facilitate a universal overview and response to any issue across the entire network from a major central command hub. The writer mentioned that once expertise and excellence were built up and sustained, the various entities could consider joining hands as a consortium for overseas ventures.
Lawrence Tay reported that SMRT banned a taxi driver for accidentally pressing on the On Call button. The driver called the operator and apologised for the mistake but SMRT still suspended the driver.The netizen asked others if SMRTs action was fair. Derek Loui explained that the driver was not banned but was only suspended for two days. Andrew Koh thought that the On Call sign, at least for Comfort taxis, could only be activated when a driver accepts an actual booking. Aaron Soh said that taxi companies should not be surprised why many taxi drivers were moving to Uber because of their unfair treatment. Diny Capri, who claimed to be an SMRT taxi driver, did not know that there was an On Call button for the taxis mobile display terminal.
Wayne posted about a man seen walking on the LRT track in Punggol on Feb 14, between Oasis and Kadaloor LRT stations.It was unclear whether the man was an SBS Transit maintenance staff or not.AISTST assumed that the man was part of the maintenance team.
Responding to the Government Parliamentary Committee for Transport Chairman Mr Sitoh Yih Pin on August 16, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that based on preliminary investigations, the Freon gas leak from a train at Tanjong Pagar MRT Station on August 15 was caused by an oil leakage in the trains air-conditioning compressor. He said that the air-conditioning systems compressor overheated and caused the evaporation of Freon gas which was then released. The Minister also mentioned that the train involved was a first-generation Kawasaki train. Several netizens expressed concern on the effects of Freon gas to health. Some wondered why commuters chose to stay on the platform instead of leaving the station for their safety. Siah Jin Kim believed that the problem was due to the lack of maintenance. Andey Kurniawan said that SMRT has contributed to the depletion of the ozone layer by still using Freon gas. Redwire Singapore pointed out that the toxicity of Freon depends on the level of exposure and chemical concentration.
On The Straits Times, Dr V. Subramaniam stated that he was saddened that despite SMRT's efforts to improve its maintenance regime, equipment failure and train disruptions, workplace security and safety breaches continue to take place, the last resulting in the death of two young workers.Dr V. Subramaniam observed that regular and strict enforcement of set procedures had been neglected, which affected operational efficiency.He said that the existing rail model should be completely reviewed and revamped, and wondered why authorities have not yet seen it fit to overhaul the train system.He added that it was no use professing that Singapore is a first world country if the rail network could not be run with reliability, pride and integrity. anikin2 believed that Singapores MRT was very good but real engineering experts should be engaged to solve the issues. lvlrsSTI stated that when the MRT was built, authorities did not expect the population to double up and that more lines would be built in 30 years. marrythaigirlsg pointed out that delays and accidents were part of every engineering organization but not all were reported by the media.
Amos Tan? warned commuters of possible long waiting times because two service 980 buses broke down.
After SMRT announced that it would be increasing the basic salaries of bus captains to be at least on par with the market, SBS Transit said it is reviewing the starting salaries, benefits, allowances, incentives and entry bonuses of bus drivers, and is in talks with the National Transport Workers Union. SBS Transit plans to recruit about 250 bus captains, 80 bus technicians, and more than 500 rail operations and engineering staff members for 2016. Gold Phua said that it was good to have more competition because it might increase the demand for bus drivers and would lead to the increase in pay and benefits of public transport employees.. wwenze stated that other companies could not compete when the Government kept giving free buses to SBS Transit.
?Doris Lim praised bus captain Krishna Rao for greeting passengers and making sure they had safely alighted before driving off. The netizen mentioned having encountered bus captain Krishna on board services 911 and 913 at Woodlands interchange.
A Facebook post by Devaki Nadarajan about her encounter with a bus passenger was reposted on All Singapore Stuff.Devaki Nadarajan recounted boarding Tower Transit bus service 945 at Bukit Batok interchange and went to sit at the back towards the left aisle side. She was surprised when a man seated on the right side of the aisle shouted at her telling her to sit in front as she was black.The netizens refusal to move agitated the man who claimed that he was an Israeli. The netizen was disappointed that none of the passengers intervened, including an NS man who simply shut his eyes.The netizen approached the bus captain but was informed to report the incident to the Passenger Service Centre. The staff suggested that she also file a police report. Several netizens were disappointed with the bus passengers for not intervening in the incident. Some said that the bus captain should have called the control centre to ask for police assistance. Others suggested asking the bus operator for the CCTV footage of the incident. Lena Mustaffa said that the bus captain and the NS man should be blamed for ignoring the incident.
A tree along the junction of Corporation Road and Boon Lay Drive fell on a Comfort taxi while the cabby was waiting to make a right turn in Jurong on Mar 29.The driver was initially trapped inside the cab but the men from the vehicles behind him helped to move the branches away and forced open the door.Tammy Tan, Group Corporate Communications Officer of ComfortDelGro, said they were relieved that the cabby was unhurt and thanked the bystanders who rendered assistance to the cabby. Mike Lo asked if NParks would be responsible for the fallen tree and the repairs of the vehicles that were damaged. Ronnie Lee said that NParks should do more checking on the trees and watering them more often.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) thanked SMRT for serving Bukit Batok since the Trans Island days, as the new operator Tower Transit, takes over the bus routes in the area from May 29.
A total of S$10M has been awarded to owners of eight partial land lots being acquired for construction of the Thomson-East Coast MRT Line. The Singapore Land Authority (SLA) said the owners were paid the market value, in accordance with the Land Acquisition Act.S$45M was already awarded in April 2015 to owners of 15 houses also affected by the construction of the MRT line located at Amber Road and Tanjong Katong Road.SLA said some owners have accepted the award while others filed appeals with the Appeals Board. Mary Tan said that it was another waste of taxpayers money and damage to the environment.
Writer Lee Mei Xian shared that despite the introduction of new licensing rules for private hire car drivers to help level the playing field in the taxi industry, traditional operators like ComfortDelGro and SMRT should not get too comfortable. The writer stated that incumbents should be more flexible and agile in innovating if they wish to stay relevant. The writer cited SMRT as a good example for exemplifying the saying: "If you can't beat them, join them." SMRT has now set up its own private-hire arm, called Strides.Prime Taxi had also launched its fleet of private-hire cars in 2014 while Trans-Cab had done the same, and Premier Taxi was considering it. ComfortDelGro, is understood to be observing developments, before deciding if it should enter the private-hire market.The writer feels that it may not be a bad thing for taxi operators to become more motivated to innovate and think of ways to improve their business processes to stay competitive - just like how they improved their booking services only after third-party apps joined the fray.
?Bin Xian Tan? shared a photo of the morning crowd in bus service 969. The netizen mentioned that the bus was overcrowded when the trip was cut at least once every weekday.
?Shawn Ong? asked SMRT to deploy more double-decker buses for service 190. The netizen said that many commuters were seen standing in the regular buses as they departed from Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange.
On Facebook, 938LIVEs Talkback asked netizens about their views on the Public Transport Councils (PTC) recommendation that taxi drivers should be trained to serve wheelchair users better. Several netizens stated that many taxi drivers refused to pick up passengers in wheelchairs. Guek Hoon said that it would be useful if the training would involve how to assist the passenger in wheelchair safely. The netizen added that the companion of the wheelchair user should also do their part to assist the taxi driver. Paul Antony Fernandez said that from the perspective of a former taxi driver, only London cabs have the space for wheelchair bound passengers. Christopher Leong mentioned that taxi operators should select the right vehicles for wheelchair users.
ckmpd stated that SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek should not be blamed for SMRT's debacle because it was the Governments fault. The netizen mentioned that CEO Kuek just inherited SMRT's problems and did not cause them. ckmpd said that the public should help CEO Kuek solve SMRTs problems. The Ministry of Transport should also take back ownership of SMRTs fixed assets and let SMRT run the daily operations of MRT trains. Several netizens stated that SMRT CEO Kuek might have just inherited the problems from the previous CEO but that he still took up the challenge. Others said that SMRT should bring in the best talents from Hong Kongs MTR or even Bangkoks Skytrain.
SMRT ordered a review of the safety measures after a train pulling into Pasir Ris Station at 60kmh ran into two trainee technical staff, killing both of them on Mar 22. The Manpower Ministry (MOM) and police were also conducting their own investigations into the deaths of Nasrulhudin Najumudin and Muhammad Asyraf Ahmad Buhari, both of whom had joined SMRT just two months ago. It remains a puzzle why the pair were hit about 150m from the station, when 13 other staff who were walking single-file with them on a 0.5m-wide access walkway were unhurt. No CCTV cameras were located on the part of the track where the accident took place but SMRT said it is interviewing the other staff members who were out with the two trainees. Several netizens believed that the accident was the supervisor's fault for not ensuring safety for his two trainees. Sp Fairle found it strange for SMRT to authorise access to the track for a 15-man team. The train driver should also have seen the group on the track. anglefish asked who gave approval for the men to walk on the tracks while the trains were running and who was supposed to ensure that there was adequate safety measures. falloutgirl asked SMRT to investigate the matter and not let the accident happen again. Kat Jorine Chua speculated that SMRT would never tell the truth about what had happened.
?Imran Abdul Careem? stated that SMRT was unable to manage the crowd at the Tanah Merah Interchange because they did not have regular services during morning rush hours to transport the office crowd to Expo Station. This led to crowding on the platform as many commuters would alight at the station to change over to the train towards Changi.The netizen mentioned that the trains towards Pasir Ris Station arrived at regular intervals while those passengers going towards Changi had to squeeze inside the trains.
?Bryan Chia? reported the bus captain of service 982E (TIB 1034 D) for being reckless. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain did not stop at the bus stop despite him flagging for the bus.SMRT FB administrator has reached out to the netizen for follow up.
Jerard He asked if there was a train fault at the North-South Line at around 8:30 a.m. on Feb 26. Kelvin Choo asked SMRT to post any announcements on its Facebook account regarding service delays because not all commuters have access to Twitter.
?Richmond Kwan? asked SMRT to improve the frequency of bus service 167 during peak hours as he had waited for the bus for 45 minutes.
?Walter Loo? shared a video showing SMRT bus service 859 (SMB305G) violating traffic rule by ignoring the red light at the junction of Admiralty Drive and Sembawang Way. SMRT has reached out to him asking for his contact details as follow up. Linda Lee stated that some bus captains should take up another profession if s/he could not drive properly and safely. Y H Eric Goh observed that bus captains were getting worse. The netizen urged other motorists to always be alert and take note of oncoming and turning vehicles.
?Ivan Yap? commended the SMRT taxi driver of vehicle licence plate number SHC4052M for his kindness and generosity. The netizen recounted that he was bringing his son to school in the cab but realised that he did not have any small change, and neither did the driver. He offered to pay by credit card, but the driver informed him that the system would not work since they were in a basement carpark. The cabby generously decided to waive his fare.Since the netizen only manged to catch the taxis plate number, he decided to publicly acknowledge the driver's good deed.
Several forum discussions were observed regarding the main reasons why taxi fares in Singapore were so expensive based on the article published on Goody Feed last week. Vanathy stated that over the years, everything has become more expensive, including taxi fares, while wages remained the same. The writer believed that peak hour surcharges, high rentals and the taxi availability standards imposed by the LTA were the reasons why taxi fares in Singapore were expensive. Ang Hin Kee, executive advisor of the National Taxi Association, urged LTA to remove the obsolete taxi availability standards, stating that the unproductive cycle negatively affects taxi drivers and commuters. The article also mentioned that when taxi drivers failed to hit the key performance indicators, the LTA fines taxi operators, who would then raise the cost of taxi rentals and taxi fares to gain back the money lost from adhering to LTAs rules. Several netizens agreed that the high cost of taxi rental and surcharges were the reasons why taxi fares were expensive. hfourhappy said that the root cause of expensive taxi fares was the Government who collects taxes and the taxi companies who collect the rentals which were passed on to commuters. pacgov claimed that a taxi driver informed him/her that even when a taxi driver was on medical leave, he still had to pay rental for the days he did not drive.
?Shannon Aw Boon Chin? admired the dedication of the staff at the train stations, saying that they were one of the nicest, friendliest and most patient people around.The netizen, however, was surprised that despite being a profitable organization, SMRT seemed to have lost pride in being a premier transportation organization. She said that in countries like Japan, Germany and Switzerland, train operators were described with national pride and it showed in their people, processes and premises.The netizen was disappointed with the existing MRT stations as they were often dusty, dark, falling apart and had dust-covered sculptures. The ceiling boards were flaking and had faulty lighting. The netizen asked SMRT to spend some time and effort to present itself as a world class player.?Valiant Lee? asked SMRT to maintain the air-conditioning system on its trains on the North-South Line. The netizen said he experiences riding on trains with poor ventilation every day.
kuang89 disapproved of SMRT staff assisting a pregnant passenger to the front of the queue and evicting someone from the reserved seat to let the pregnant passenger sit. The netizen also mentioned disapproving of SMRT staff standing on the platform and at the escalators with their light sticks. S/he said that the staff were so useless. Several netizens stated that SMRT staff members should not be labelled as useless since they provide assistance to commuters in need of help. Others pointed out that there was nothing wrong with asking those in the reserved seats to give the seat up for those who were most in need of it as long as the SMRT staff asks politely. Some said that every seat should be considered reserved and should be given up for the elderly, disabled and pregnant passengers. dreant said that the person on the reserved seat was free to reject the request.
nez stated that a train fault had caused the train to move slower while travelling to the west area.
One of the key topics in the August 15 parliamentary sitting was about the defective MRT trains, supplied by Kawasaki Heavy Industries and CSR Sifang to LTA in 2013, which were sent back by SMRT to the manufacturer for repairs.The public knew about the defective trains only after FactWire News Agency released an exclusive report on the 35 train carriages being shipped back to its manufacturer. Member of Parliament Sitoh Yih Pin asked Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan the reasons for LTA or SMRT to not release public information regarding the discovery of hairline cracks on the MRT trains in July 2013 and their subsequent decision to ship the affected trains back to the manufacturer for rectification works.Five other MPs from the Workers' Party also asked questions regarding the issue. Some netizens disapproved of having parliamentary sessions where questions were pre-submitted so that responses could be prepared in advance. BlackBee mentioned that only former Transport Minister Raymond Lim was "wise" enough not to speak in parliament to answer such questions.
Abdul Hadi Abdul Sukor, an SMRT Technical Officer, was sentenced to seven months jail term for causing grievous hurt to a lorry driver in a road rage last year. Hadi was also ordered to pay S$200 compensation to Mr Seah.The victim suffered multiple fractures and was incapacitated for two months and had to use a wheelchair or a support stick to walk.Hadi pleaded guilty to punching Mr Seah in the face, stamping on his right leg, and causing him to suffer fractures around the eye and nose areas. Several netizens believed that something could have happened before the incident that provoked the SMRT Technical Officer to punch the lorry driver. Others wondered whether the S$200 compensation to the lorry driver was enough since he was incapacitated for two months. Some stated that Hadi should have restrained his actions rather than cause harm to another road user. ???? ????????? observed that lorry drivers sometimes have no road courtesy and always drove recklessly.
Benitha reported an incident involving her brother-in-law who was hit by a cab while crossing the road without a pedestrian crossing at Teck Whye Lane near Choa Chu Kang Polyclinic.The netizen mentioned that her mother- and sister-in-law were waiting for a cab on the opposite side of the road where the incident took place. The sister-in-law ran to the taxi and asked the taxi driver to come down but the cabby drove off immediately with a passenger inside.The family had reported the incident to the police and called the taxi company to look for the driver. When the cabby had been located, he explained that he did not stop to check on the boy because his passenger was rushing and had asked him to drive off. The netizen was disappointed that the taxi company and the cabby did not even ask about the condition of the victim. Several netizens stated that both the driver and the boy were at fault since the driver was speeding and the boy crossed the road without a pedestrian crossing. Others hoped that the driver would be jailed and have his licence revoked. Natural said that the protocol for such instances was for the driver to stop and ask his passenger to take another cab. Then the police must be informed as there were injuries involved. The netizen also asked Benitha to publish the name of the taxi company and the driver to get an immediate response from them. LonelyHeart called on the passenger of the taxi to step forward to clear the issue.
SMRT announced that starting Apr 24, Bus Service 975B would be introduced to complement the existing Service 975. The short trip service provides a direct connection for passengers from Choa Chu Kang to Lim Chu Kang on Sundays. Service 975B would begin its service opposite Choa Chu Kang Station and end opposite Lim Chu Kang Lane 3. (buses[IN]gapore!) hoped that the new service would ease the overcrowding situation of service 975. Thomas Lee Qing Wei hoped that more public bus services would serve that area in future. Chee Yong Tan mentioned that the overcrowding issue on service 975 had been a problem for more than a decade.
Bin Xian Tan mentioned that the engine cover on TIB1172M was not properly closed and the heat of the engine could be felt on the rear seats. SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can look into it.
SMRT announced that the internal investigations into the cause of the fatal accident that killed two of its maintenance staff on Mar 22 would be completed by next week.A panel comprised by independent safety experts and members of the SMRT Board Risk Committee would review the findings, before handing them over to the Police and MOM for their statutory investigations.Separately, a SMRT Board Safety Review Committee was set up to look into all safety-related matters in SMRT Trains, which would be headed by an SMRT Board Member and would also include independent members. Several netizens asked SMRT to find the cause of the accident and to fairly compensate the families of the two trainees who were killed in the accident. Sorensen Lkh stated that SMRT as an employer ought to bear full responsibility for the loss of the two lives. Sharingan Ismadi asked about the outcome of the police investigations.
Writer Evelyn Goh, said in a forum letter that she is a senior citizen who enjoys driving herself around. She looks forward to a reliable MRT system when she is not able to drive anymore and have to use public transport. The writer suggested having time-out periods at least once a week to carry out comprehensive maintenance on selected sections of MRT lines to improve reliability. She added that this can be done during the June school holidays, and formal alternative transport arrangements should be in place. The writer stated that taking away some routes temporarily might bolster public appreciation of train services. She said that this will allow the public to practise using alternative transport services so that there will be less unhappiness in the event of rail breakdowns. This could also ease the pressure on the maintenance workers who can use the scheduled time to do a more comprehensive job.
The National Trades Union Congress (NTUC) announced that an association was formed to champion and protect the interest of the growing number of private hire car drivers since Uber and Grab entered the market.The National Private Hire Vehicles Association seeks to help these drivers address common concerns such as safeguarding their livelihoods, ensuring workplace protection, professionalism and welfare. NTUC said the idea for the association came from a group of like-minded private hire car drivers who approached the union to form an association in November 2015. Grab Singapore said the formation of the association would support the long-term sustainability of the industry. Meanwhile, Uber said it would continue to have dialogues with its partners and the Government, to get feedback to improve its service. Andre Tan wondered who formed the association and how the officers were elected. Wei Sheng questioned the effectiveness of labour unions in protecting workers rights. Carlson Yong expected to see the first private-hire car fare hike in Singapore. Donald Liew asked whether the association was a way to get money out from private-hire car drivers in exchange for protection.
On Facebook, SMRT reminded commuters that train services at 13 MRT stations along the North-South and East-West Lines would commence at 7 a.m. instead of the regular start time to speed up rail maintenance and renewal efforts. SMRT also shared that there are bus services available, such as the parallel bus service and existing bus services, for commuters travelling before 7am. deathscthe said that it was fine for SMRT to start services late on weekends as long there would be no more delays or breakdowns in the future. demongod stated that those working on Sundays would be affected by the late start-time of train service.
In connection with the commercial partnership of S.League and SMRT to promote Singapores favourite football league via an S.League-themed train cabin, Damon Yeo enumerated similarities s/he believed SMRT and S.League has.1. Both organisations were once the pride of the land Singapore in the 1970s and early 1980s.2. SMRT and S.Leagues biggest media stories in recent years came from foreigners. 3. People blame the Members of Parliament when things go wrong with either organisation.
mrclubbie asked if it is the norm for an SMRT staff to enter the train and ask people to give up their seats to those who need them. Several netizens stated that the staff asked train passengers to give up their seats for the elderly and pregnant passengers. Some mentioned that the staff who ask were usually very nice and polite. shinkuaku asked whether it was a senseless management instruction to their station staff members.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about his visit to the North-East Line Depot and Sengkang-Punggol LRT Depot. He also used the opportunity to distribute Chinese New Year mandarin oranges and wished safety in the depot and reliability for the MRT and LRT Lines. The Minister also encouraged the public to appreciate the dedication and sacrifice of the ground staff who would be working through the Chinese New Year break.
Commuters at the East-West Line had been asked to factor an additional 15 minutes in travelling time due to a train fault at Buona Vista MRT station. Many netizens noted that the delay in travel time was more than 15 minutes and many had been late for work and appointments. Several other netizens called for more honesty in declaring how long the delays were so that they could be answerable to their bosses. Several mentioned that the first announcement was for an additional 10 minutes in travelling time but was later changed to 15 minutes. clifftan94 took an hour and a half to reach Buona Vista from Tampines. clifftan94 was scolded by his/her boss for being late due to the train fault.
elmielmosong asked why the bus arrival timings of SMRT were not as accurate and dependable as SBS Transit. Several netizens agreed that SMRTs bus arrival timings were inaccurate and changes every minute or so. Others considered the bus timings accurate except in some interchanges where bus arrivals could be delayed by five minutes. Some said that the bus timings run on a timetable which was discussed and agreed upon between the LTA and the relevant bus operators involved. Netizens pointed out that punctuality of buses were dependent on road conditions, weather, and bus driver's mood.
SMRT said it has taken action against the driver who was filmed driving against the flow of traffic. SMRT said that it treats the incident as a serious safety issue and has taken the necessary disciplinary action against the driver.The police said no one had reported the incident. Sp Fairley said that LTA should inspect the location to determine if the road signs were not obstructed and were visible to all motorists. Lim Shwu Fen hoped that the authorities would be lenient to the taxi driver who might have mistaken it as a two-way road.
?Wei Hao? reported that a train was stuck at Keat Hong LRT station along the Bukit Panjang LRT Line for nearly 20 minutes on 28 Jul. The netizen wondered why the train was not moving and why no alternative transport was activated by SMRT.
Tony shared a video showing a male passenger molesting female commuters on a crowded train at Woodlands MRT. The netizen mentioned that after the witness filmed the molester in action, he confronted the male passenger and chased him off the train at Khatib MRT station. The contributor warned female commuters to be on the lookout of alleged molester. Several netizens said that the witness should have confronted the molester instead of filming the act. Others pointed out that without the video, the netizen would not have any evidence against the male passenger.
Kai Beng Tan? praised the very courteous bus driver of service 966 (SMB5080X). The bus captain brought smiles to the passengers, delivered an excellent service and ensured a safe ride!
PTC announced the introduction of tougher measures to deter bus and train fare evasion. Commuters who do not pay or underpay their fares on public bus and train services would have to pay a higher penalty fee from the present S$20 to S$50 starting Feb 29.Additionally, PTC said that enforcement action could now be taken against commuters found attempting to travel without paying the appropriate fare, such as those tailgating at fare gates, in contrast to the current enforcement framework where action could only be taken against commuters after they have travelled a distance, it said. Many netizens found the new measures unfair and stated that there should also be penalties for train and bus operators that overcharge commuters and when train services were disrupted. Several mentioned that it would be difficult for bus drivers to check whether a passenger had underpaid or did not pay at all especially during peak hours. Others suggested deploying more bus inspectors and staff at train stations because most fare cheats take advantage of the peak periods when buses and trains were overcrowded. Some wondered why laws were always set to protect private profit making companies but do nothing to protect the general public. nathan" said that the PTC should come up with some fast solutions for commuters to reclaim overcharged train and bus fares. The netizen believed that SMRT and SBS Transit must have earned millions of dollars from unclaimed overcharged fares. oldrupert said that ticket inspectors could hardly be seen nowadays especially onboard buses. Hence, if there were no or very little enforcement actions taken by the transport companies, the increase in fine would be useless. Akai Chew asked if SMRT would also be fined on a per delay basis.
?Adrick Loh? reported that his childs hand was nearly caught by the closing bus door while alighting at bus stop 59421. The bus captain claimed that he did not see the child alighting from the bus. The netizen asked if there was something wrong with the bus design for the bus captain not being able to see the child alighting.
?Connie Tan LiPin? stated that while she understands that electronic wheelchairs are allowed on MRT trains, she asked to what extent does SMRT not allow such wheelchairs to board trains. The netizen reported a passenger on an electric wheelchair who was carrying several stuff including a number of cartons that could cause inconvenience to other passengers as the cartons blocked the view of the wheelchair user. She also said that the passenger on the wheelchair used her legs to push the wheelchair. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue because the passengers action not only pose danger to others, but also to the wheelchair passenger.
?Johnny Kwok? reported that the bus captain of the bus with plate number SMB24S suddenly stepped on the brakes at the traffic light before Ang Mo Kio Avenue 10. The netizen mentioned that some standing passengers lost their balance.
????? asked SMRT to educate the bus captain of service 962. The netizen mentioned that while carrying a child, he and his pregnant wife rushed towards the bus stop and were waving at the bus captain, who clearly saw them. The driver, however, did not wait for them. The netizen considered the drivers attitude unacceptable.
?Kok Meng Thng reported that the bus captain of service 178 did not stop at bus stop 43069 opposite Hillview Station despite the netizen waving at the bus during two separate instances.
Florence Neo? mentioned that while the display board showed that there would be a service 811 bus arriving every five minutes, she had been waiting for the bus for 25 minutes. The netizen posted another feedback as she noticed five service 811 buses were travelling to the direction of the interchange. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issues.
Five years after SMRTs Bishan Depot was broken into and an MRT carriage was spray-painted with the words Jet Setters on it in 2011, a video footage of the culprits who allegedly broke into Bishan Depot and vandalised a train has appeared.The footage was part of a twelve-part series, Probation Vacation: Lost in Asia, by a duo Utah and Ether who allegedly broke into train yards all over Asia to vandalise trains.The Singapore episode was uploaded on April 29, 2016. From the video, it was implied that at least three people entered Bishan Depot that night as footage showed two individuals accessing the depot by cutting holes in the fence line and then spray-painting Jet Setters on the train while someone else filmed them.According to Australian news reports, Harper was arrested in Melbourne in May this year on eight charges related to vandalism and assault and sentenced to six months jail. His partner remains at large.In a statement to The Straits Times, the Singapore police said it is aware of the arrest and is currently working with the Australian authorities "to facilitate investigations into the case of vandalism reported at Bishan MRT depot in August 2011. Some netizens wondered why the CCTV cameras installed to monitor activities at SMRTs depot were not able to spot the intruders. Roy Phang said that Singapore used to be known for its tough stance and zero-tolerance policies but it now appears that everything was being dismissed as harmless pranks. Several netizens hoped that the culprits will be apprehended and punished.
?Siti Mariati Amin Parjo? stated that bus service 912 in Woodlands had long intervals of up to 30 minutes compared with services 911, 903, 913 and other services. The netizen wondered if others had already raised the issue to concerned authorities. SMRT bus captain Shawn Lee replied that he also disapproved of bus bunching but waiting for some passengers to catch his bus might have caused the bus to be delayed and arrive at the same time on the next bus stop.
Spencer Seow posted a video on SMRTs Facebook page. The video showed smoke coming from an SMRT taxis exhaust pipe.
Ernest Jeannie? commended the bus captain of service 965 (SMB1554Y) for showing concern to his passengers and for his quick response to an emergency situation.The netizen mentioned that while travelling, a car suddenly stopped in front of the bus forcing the driver to immediately step on the brake to avoid collision. The driver apologised to his passengers and asked if any of the passengers were hurt or injured. The passengers assured him that they were fine and many praised the driver for showing care. The netizen said that Singapore needs more drivers like him and hoped that SMRT would recognise the bus captain.
[[ForeverAlone]] said that SMRT should get their train cleaners to learn from those in Taiwan, who could finish cleaning a cabin within 10 minutes. The netizen added that the process was very efficient and organised. RobinTeoHood mentioned that SMRT trains were cleaner than those in Taiwan. The thread starter stated that SMRT had already sent their engineers to Taiwan to study the train system and learn how to improve rail reliability.
?Philemon Foo? shared a link to an article about the trial of the 'standing only' escalator in London which showed a 30%improvement in traffic flow.The netizen hoped that SMRT would test run the same scheme to ease congestion on train stations.
Train services along the North-South Line between Yio Chu Kang and Khatib stations were disrupted for about 50 minutes yesterday (11 May). It was suspected that a train was struck by lightning in a sudden thunderstorm. The Straits Times understands that the driver of the affected train reported the incident, saying that he smelled something burning. It had to be pushed out by another train and commuters on board disembarked at Yio Chu Kang Station.Patrick Nathan, Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications said that as a precaution, their engineers also tested the trackside equipment to ensure that it was safe for trains to move over the tracks in the affected area. He added that safety is SMRTs top priority and reassured all commuters that SMRTs trains are designed to safely protect them in severe weather conditions. Many netizens stated that the lightning was another excuse by SMRT to cover up for the fault, with some saying that they did not remember seeing lightning on May 11. Some said that they have never heard of any lightning strike a train since the MRT was introduced. Others suggested that SMRT hire consultants regarding the installation of a lightning protection system. Yong Choon Lieh, who claimed to be an engineer from Land Transport Authority (LTA), mentioned that all MRT tracks were installed with lightning protection system. He also stated that he was the engineer who installed them back in 1998. The netizen said that if the lightning conductors were properly maintained with the copper conductor rooted to the ground, the lightning should not be able to do any damage. Guo Xiongwei noted that there was at least one incident of lightning strike disrupting MRT service in 2013. The netizen asked whether it was costly to install lightning arresters to ensure reliable service since Singapore was known as a lightning capital. Mohamad Syahid Bin Arif hoped that SMRT staff who handled the fault would be careful and observe all safety measures during the effort to bring the line back up and running. Liviasasjunius stated that a lightning strike could be prevented. Mohd Tan mentioned that train services on the East-West Line were also disrupted.
?Kate Liu? reported that an SMRT staff at Raffles Place rudely snatched her card holder which contained her EZ-Link and credit cards while she was waiting for her friend. The staff went to the Passenger Service Centre to check her travel card without giving her any proper explanation. After checking the card holder, the staff returned it to her and rudely informed her to tap her card properly the next time. The netizen was disappointed with the SMRT staffs action and hoped that SMRT could look into the issue.
On Facebook, Sg CafeMovies shared a video showing SBS Transit bus service 36 that has stalled on Mar 19. It was not able to move aside causing all buses and vehicles behind it to be delayed by about 30 minutes. The bus station was temporarily closed until the bus was towed away. Passengers at Changi Airport Terminal 2 were instructed to board from Terminal 1 bus station. Alex Ong stated that Changi Airport needs a new bus station that would allow buses to use the departure level deck to call at each terminal and then turn back to proceed to the next terminal after leaving without making huge detours.
?Shao Bin? shared a photo of a little bird at the corner of a reserved seat. The netizen was concerned that it might cause unnecessary commotion inside the train if the bird starts flying inside the cabin. The netizen reported the incident to staff at Paya Lebar Station but stated that it was quite difficult to reach staff in such situations while on the train. He suggested having a mini-hotline for non-emergency matters so that people could seek help without using the emergency button which causes delay to the train.
In a press release on 11 May, SMRT announced that train services at 13 stations on the East-West and North-South lines would begin about 90 minutes later than usual every Sunday from June 5 to Dec 18.The plan for a later start time on Sundays was first announced by SMRT last month to facilitate track maintenance and renewal works on the western sector of the rail network.Commuters who utilise train services before the new start time were encouraged to plan their travel after 7 a.m. or consider alternative transport arrangements.A new parallel bus service to ply the route from Joo Koon MRT station to Bukit Gombak MRT station would also be introduced. The service would operate with a 10-minute interval between 5:30 and 7 a.m. on Sundays when train services are not available. Many netizens disapproved of the late opening of the MRT lines on Sundays saying that it was unfair for those who work on Sundays. Dorothy Lai said that LTA should send announcements via local media to inform employers and encourage them to be understanding towards staff if they are late for work. Aaron David Tan wondered what would happen to National Servicemen who had to be in the camp by 7:30 a.m. on Sundays if rail lines would only start operating at 7 a.m.
Commuters on the North-South line experienced longer travelling time towards Jurong East in the morning of August 16 due of a track fault near Braddell MRT station. Some netizens considered the series of disruptions unacceptable. Jeremy Tan Yi Ye said that SMRT should learn from Hong Kong MTR which has 99.9% reliability. Rudy RR stated with sarcasm that SMRTs train service was indeed reliable: reliable in having disruptions. William Ng wondered what the cause of the next disruption would be. Richard Ng suggested outsourcing the rail operations. Bunknifer mentioned that the Jurong East platform was already overcrowded.
A Facebook post by Jennifer Lee about a Eurasian boy that had been approaching every passenger to ask for money had been reposted in two forum threads. The netizen said that the Eurasian boy claimed to have lost his wallet at Commonwealth Station and that he was supposed to make a couple of train trips to pick up and deliver some parcels for his parents before heading home to Bishan. The boy said that he needed S$7 to buy 3 single trip tickets to last the day.Another train passenger said that the boy had been seen a couple of times approaching fellow passengers at different occasions asking for money. Several netizens mentioned having seen the boy with the same story. Others suggested reporting the boy to the station master.
SMRT Taxis General Manager Tony Heng was awarded a Medal of Commendation for improving the welfare of taxi partners at the recent NTUC May Day celebrations. Mr Tony Heng introduced initiatives including long-service bonuses, free health checks, and bursaries for their school-going children. He had also helped to increase the size of the taxi fleet from 2,500 to the current 3,500, which includes introducing eco-friendly Prius Hybrid taxis in 2013, and the first fourth-generation Prius Hybrid taxi to be launched later this year.A congratulatory video from Chairman of SMRT Taxi Operators Association, Jimmy Goh, was posted on SMRT Facebook page.
?Kishure Kumar? reported that the bus captain of service 883 (SG1692J) was speeding and did not bother to slow down at bus stops to look out for people flagging the bus. The netizen added that if the bus captain manages to notice passengers flagging the bus at bus stops, the bus captain would stop abruptly at a distance after the bus stop. S/he said that there were pregnant and elderly passengers on the bus. The netizen asked SMRT to train its bus captains to be more considerate.
Ian Ho? reported that while standing near the door of an overcrowded service 969 bus, his foot was caught by the bus door when it opened at the next stop. The netizen was disappointed that the driver merely stared at his bleeding foot and even asked the netizen in an irritated tone, why he was standing so close to the door.
On (buses[IN]gapore!) Facebook page, ?? shared a photo of an accident between an SMRT bus and SBS Transit service 48 along Dunearn Road towards Newton Circus. ?? assumed that the SMRT bus had stopped abruptly after its rear door was hit by a bike or a car. The netizen claimed that the SBS Transit bus was then unable to stop in time and hence hit the back of the SMRT bus.
?Sun Hanchen? claimed that the bus captain of service 180 (TIB1153T) travelling to Boon Lay had skipped two bus stops (opposite Block 26 and Block 402).The netizen mentioned that the bus was not yet full and only a few passengers were waiting at said bus stops. He wondered why the bus captain had to skip the bus stops when he was supposed to pick up passengers and transport them. The netizen hoped that SMRT would take action against such bus captains and educate them that it was not an option to choose which passengers to pick up.
Allan Magdeline Ang? wondered why trains had to stop for long periods at each station before Marina Bay MRT station and why the next train arrives after seven minutes during peak hours. The netizen asked where the new trains were, which were supposed to make travelling more convenient. Yong Jian Ming stated that there was a train fault at Yew Tee towards Woodlands and Marina Bay which caused a 10-minute delay in train service. Zheng Shujuan mentioned that a North-East Line train had broken down and commuters were asked to alight at Potong Pasir.
In a joint statement on Thursday, July 28, Temasek Holdings and SMRT announced that they had "proactively reached out" to Securities Investors Association Singapore (Sias) to arrange meetings to discuss the proposed privatisation of the transport operator by the Singapore investment firm.Earlier in the day, SMRT shareholders had raised concerns relating to the proposed privatisation of the transport operator by Temasek Holdings.SMRT expects to convene a Scheme Meeting by October to vote on the proposal, subject to regulatory and court approvals.SMRT shareholders hoped that their comments and questions regarding the proposed privatisation of SMRT would be addressed at the scheme meeting. Some netizens considered the S$1.68 per share offer too low. CT Chew, claiming to be an SMRT shareholder, was pleased with Temasek's cash offer of S$1.68 per share. Jas Singh was concerned that the shareholders who have bought at a high price would be sitting on a loss. Lye RongFang hoped that Temasek would be transparent about the whole transaction.
Netizens continued to discuss LTAs plan to raise the taxi operators licence fees from 0.1% of gross revenue to 0.2% this year, and then 0.3% next year. Several netizens believed that taxi fares and rentals would eventually increase with the increase in taxi licence fees. Others stated that many taxi drivers would switch over to Uber and Grab if taxi rentals increase. clon33 was disappointed that the Public Transport Council allowed taxi companies to increase fares but fail to resolve any of the problems. The netizen also stated that taxi drivers still refused to take passengers to more far-flung locations despite the surcharges. Instead, they choose to only ferry passengers during peak hours and use shift changes as an excuse.
The LTA would trial a bus priority box that would allow buses to overtake the bus queue and exit the bus stops more quickly, at two stops along Orchard Road. The boxes, which would be operational at the stops opposite Mandarin Orchard and at Midpoint Orchard, would be the first stops without bus bays in the city to be in the Mandatory Give Way to Buses scheme.. Jonathan Jia said that a bus priority box should be put at the bus stop outside Concorde Hotel. Hong Koon believed that the Tang Plaza bus stop needs the priority box more than others because taxis keep blocking the first lane and form a long queue until up the main road to pick up passengers at Lucky Plaza.
?Rohit Gupta? asked whether SMRT has plans to support Apple Pay for fare payments for trains and buses. The netizen mentioned that the London public transport has already supported Apple Pay and hope Singapore will implement it too.
LTA revealed that the alternative alignment of the Cross Island Line (CRL) that would route around the Central Catchment Nature Reserve (CCNR) could add about S$2B to the rail project.The 9km-long "skirting alignment" would require longer tunnels and extra ventilation facilities compared with the 4km direct route, of which 2km would cut through Singapore's largest nature reserve.In a letter to The Straits Times Forum page, LTAs Chief Executive Chew Men Leong reiterated that the Government was studying both alignment options and had not made a decision.Since a report on the environmental impact of site investigation works for the project was released recently, green groups have been lobbying for the CRL to be built around the reserve, instead of through it. The route, however, could entail land acquisition, as the MRT tunnels would pass through homes, businesses and buildings. Residents in Upper Thomson who could potentially be affected have called for the line to go through the reserve.Green groups conceded that the extra S$2B and the impact on residents were significant, but called for deeper thought on the issue.Several netizens disapproved of the rail line going through the nature reserve, saying that skirting around the CCNR near homes, businesses and buildings also mean potentially serving more populated areas, and hence providing accessibility to more public areas.Some pointed out that the nature reserve would not be disturbed as the rail line would be underground and no construction would take place on the surface.Others said that the S$2B should not be accrued as an "extra" cost to avoid damaging the Central Catchment. The "additional" length of MRT could be turned into something useful and positive for the public.Some believed that the Government had already made a decision building the CRL through the nature reserve.Several noted that the Government had yet to resolve issues with the existing rail lines and yet they want to build another line.Bg Su said that there was more than enough traffic networking in Singapore and any additional MRT line was only for additional income to the Government.Khang Lui mentioned that the Government spent close to S$1B to build Gardens by the Bay.Ljc Lim wondered if it would be possible that some part of the CRL to run aboveground instead being entirely underground.
On Mar 15, Member of Parliament Dr Tan Wu Meng spoke in Parliament about how the journey for pedestrians, especially those with mobility needs, could be improved. He was grateful with Minister of National Development Lawrence Wong's response on behalf of Ministry of Transport and Ministry of National Development that that the LTA and SMRT would be adopting his suggestion to provide 24-hour barrier-free access at the overhead bridge connecting Block 326 to Clementi MRT. The LTA would also be looking into solutions for other towns beyond Clementi.A covered walkway from Little India MRT to KK Women's and Children's Hospital would also be constructed by the LTA starting later this year, which would help patients and their families. Several netizens thanked MP Tan Wu Meng for highlighting the concerns of Clementi residents to Parliament. Leong Kok Kin said that the next issue to focus on was how to maximize the usage of overhead bridges for commuters, to reduce the jam and crowded condition of the existing bridge.
?Catherine Koh? stated that the frequency of bus service 979 serving Choa Chu Kang and Bukit Panjang was inconsistent and that commuters had to wait for up to 30 minutes during morning peak hours. By the time it arrives at the bus stop, it was already packed with passengers as only single-deck buses were deployed.The netizen asked why double-decker buses could not be deployed for the said route or why SMRT could not deploy more single-deck buses to accommodate the high volume of passengers.
?Kishure Kumar? observed that around 6:30 a.m., bus service 169s interval time was around 15 minutes when there was a higher demand of passengers. On the other hand, at around 8 a.m., bus service 169 arrived at two to three-minute intervals and he noticed that there were two to three empty service 169 buses plying the route.
Ms Michelle Yin, spokesperson for Go-Ahead, said that the company has scaled back on its multiple-route policy after a spate of resignations arising from the unpopular practice.Dr Park Byung Joon, SIM University Senior Lecturer stated that although the said practice was not uncommon, Singapore drivers preferred to have a certain routine to their day.While Go-Aheads current bus driver shortage have not breached the terms of its contract, LTA said that it expects the London-based operator to fulfil its contractual obligations or appropriate actions would be taken against the operator. On SMRT Facebook Page, Mr Tan Kian Heong, Managing Director SMRT Buses and Road Services, explained why SMRT is stepping in to help Go-Ahead and also shed light on what interlining entails. Mr Tan stated that SMRT Buses would support Go-Ahead Singapore to ensure that commuter journeys were not affected. Mr Tan also shared that for SMRT Buses interlining services, it will ensure that all bus captains receive route familiarisation training and cater for sufficient rest so that they can carry out their duties well. Several netizens believed that interlining was not the only reason why the drivers resigned. Some stated that it was a good idea to have bus captains who are able to drive multiple routes. Others suggested installing a GPS on buses so it would be easier for drivers to learn different routes. Terence Lim believed that driving multiple routes could make driving less of a routine than driving on the same route every day. Teo Chen mentioned waiting for 30 minutes for bus service 34 at Punggol interchange. Lee Erich suggested that LTA should look into the bus captains employment contracts.
Three female commuters were asked by an SMRT taxi driver to alight at the middle of the Central Expressway (CTE) after one of the commuters asked why the journey was taking so long and whether he had taken them on a roundabout route.A short while later, the taxi driver stopped along the CTE, near the Balestier Rd exit, and demanded that the female commuters alight. Several netizens wanted to hear the other side of the story before condemning the taxi driver. Some suggested that the incident be reported to the taxi company. Rosli Shaista Lana mentioned that in the taxi course, it was prohibited to alight passengers anywhere. Some mentioned that taxi uncles would rather pick up new passengers rather than take passengers on longer routes, as they get to earn more from the $3.70 flag-down fare.
steven jialat noticed that the MRT had improved a lot under Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan as there were only short delays in services but no major breakdowns. jazz2005 said that Minister Khaw was lucky to have taken over the Transport Ministry at a time when most things required were almost done as a result of the initiatives by the former Minister Lui Tuck Yew. jacques.jiean believed that most of the improvements were from former Minister Luis term and stated that the current Transport Minister has not done much for the transport industry. xtemujin mentioned that after a breakdown, only the Transport Minister could be seen in public but not SMRTs CEO Desmond Kuek. spinning_quirK hoped that the ground staff would receive salary increases and that more local engineers would be hired. TheGoodLife30 said that more engineers were not necessary but rather people who could plan and execute well.
LTAs plan to build a subway tunnel under Singapore's largest patch of primary rainforest has drawn sharp protests from environmental groups and activists who said that it could irreversibly damage the habitats of hundreds of plant and animal species. An online petition supporting the re-routing of the line away from the nature reserve has already received over 7,790 signatures. Lahiru Wijedasa, former Senior Arborist of the Singapore Botanic Gardens, explained during a public discussion at the SingJazz Club, that the current Environmental Impact Assessment report does not fully represent the potential damage of having the Cross Island Line cut through the Central Catchment Nature Reserve. He mentioned that the report did not focus on the boring method that would be used and that no arborist was engaged during the assessment. Wijedasa pointed out that the dirt tracks on MacRitchie were not accustomed to the heavy machinery that would be passing through and that the machines would cause significant root damage. Tony O'Dempsey, Nature Society council member, said that the LTA positively received the groups own research and recommendations, including not drilling boreholes within 30 metres of wetlands and reducing the number of boreholes planned for the site. Many netizens disapproved of destroying nature just to provide convenient transportation. Loke Yu Ming asked whether Animal Concerns Research & Education Society (ACRES) founder and now Member of Parliament Louis Ng was supporting the petition. Samuel said that the existing MRT and LRT Lines should be sufficient to meet the needs of commuters with well-connected bus transportation in place. seniorcitizen speculated that someone or some scholars were planning to build high-end condominiums next to the reserve after the MRT is built. J. mentioned that tunnelling through the nature reserve may be more expensive in the long run because less stations would be built. With less stations, there would be less revenue generated from commuters.
?Janet Janet?" reported that the train captain of train number 3048 heading towards Marina South Pier must be daydreaming. The announcement for Sembawang Station was broadcasted as Woodlands Station and the light indicator above the train doors was switched off.
An accident at Yishun on Monday evening between an SMRT bus and a Grab car caused neck injuries to the Grab driver and a fractured finger to one of the bus passengers. The accident had been reported to the police and the Grab driver had hired a lawyer to handle his case against SMRT. Khew Ngen Soon stated that some bus drivers were reckless and impatient. Yo said that speeding was a major cause of many road accidents, which could be avoided.
needsomecash shared a photo of the queue line markings at Holland Village MRT station which s/he thought was ugly and useless. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that in October 2015 SMRT had implemented the queue line markings at Bishan Station at the Circle Line but it was no longer there. midnightpapa said that the netizen should see the queue markings at Novena Station. duhduhduh mentioned that the arrows were copied from Hong Kongs MTR. The netizen said that it was time to have two queue lines instead of just one. flame2000 pointed out that when the train doors open, the lines become invisible to the commuters who rush in to board the train.
feizhai started a thread on how the MRT system went from a decade (or two) of mostly incident-free operations to trains breaking down every other month.The netizen stated that SMRT was being run as a profit organisation and questioned about the esteemed foresight and advanced planning that the Government was known for. Several netizens held former SMRT CEO Saw Phaik Hwa accountable for the issues being faced by the rail system because she did not invest and increase the budget for maintenance but instead focused on constructing rental and advertising spaces at MRT stations. luaca1998 stated that the reason why everything was falling apart was due to complacency, as money was not pumped in to maintain the system when it was working properly. hatuah mentioned that transport operators were listed companies that have ultimate goals to maximise profits. AmazingRW said that there was a lack of foresight in previous SMRT and LTA leaders, who failed to anticipate things to fall apart.
?Kelly You? stated that the frequency for bus service 812 at Chong Pang loop (Opposite Blk 121) should be reviewed, particularly during morning peak hours. The netizen mentioned that the bus frequency was messed up and buses did not arrive at their scheduled timings.
RHB maintained a "buy" rating on SMRT while raising its target price to S$2.25, citing rail reforms that are likely to take place earlier than anticipated.Analyst Shekhar Jaiswal wrote in a report that "while near-term earnings may remain subdued, we believe the implementation of rail reforms is becoming more of an eventuality". Jaiswal added that this would turn SMRTs rail business into an asset-light model and would also enable the division to earn a conservative 5% operating margin. RHB estimated that the reforms will be implemented in 2019. The analyst noted that near-term earnings, however, may remain under pressure by ongoing losses in its train business and a likely financial penalty for the train breakdown in April and the fatal accident in March which resulted in the death of two SMRT employees.
PG shared a video of a taxi passenger leaning out of the vehicle's window to throw a packet of drink onto the grass patch at the side of the road. The netizen claimed that the cabby had even stopped the taxi mid-journey to let the man do so. Several netizens believed that the cabby did not stop intentionally for his passenger to throw the packet of drink but had stopped the vehicle at the zebra crossing. Nexus510ify said that the passenger should be summoned. fsng316 mentioned that the cabby should have stopped the passenger from littering.
Andrew Tay Jia Jun was on board an Alstom Metropolis C830C train yesterday (27 June) from Paya Lebar to Bishan when he noticed a water leak from the air-conditioner at the middle carriage when the train was leaving Serangoon Station. The netizen said that the carriage was near the connector to the train car with yellow seats. The netizen hoped that SMRT would repair the leak.
SMRT was looking into linking a bigger portion of its staff's bonuses to how smoothly train and bus services were run, using a team-based incentive system.Rolling stock maintenance crews would be evaluated partly by how reliable their trains were in operation, while bus captains and operation staff at depots would be evaluated as a team, and would have key performance indicators (KPIs) such as running bus services on schedule and meeting safety standards.Gerard Koh, SMRT's Vice President for Human Resources also announced that there would be a number of human-resource initiatives, such as more structured career paths and better remuneration for certain positions, as well as plans by the company to expand its headcount. Wulala said that it was a good idea and suggested going by percentage basis. The netizen mentioned that the ground staff should receive higher bonuses when the system ran smoothly
SMRT announced that it would be restructuring its Road Holdings division for better growth opportunities in Singapore and abroad as its Managing Director Benny Lim resigned "to pursue professional and personal interests". Benny Lim, who joined SMRT three years ago, would be stepping down on Aug 2. Meanwhile, managers in Buses and Taxi divisions, which were under Road Holdings, have been promoted. Tony Heng, General Manager of SMRT Taxis, would assume the role of Managing Director overseeing the group's taxi operations. He would also manage Bus-Plus Services.SMRT Buses Vice President Tan Kian Heong, on the other hand, would assume the post of SMRT Buses Managing Director.
?Lim Amy? stated that no alert was sounded when the train door was about to close on a train at Punggol MRT. The netizen said that her friend with a pram was caught in between the train doors and no one offered assistance to her friend.
GateCrasher shared the news story about the teenager who was hit by an SMRT bus while crossing the road apparently because he was using his mobile phone.Many netizens stated that they have encountered many pedestrians also using their mobile phones while walking.hfourhappy said that authorities should prohibit the use of mobile devices while walking.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated in Parliament on August 16 that there were lessons to be learnt from the defective China-made SMRT trains incident.The Minister mentioned that there should have been better public communication and more information should have been provided to the public.Minister Khaw pointed out that manufacturer Kawaksaki-Sifang took ownership of the problem, arranged for all bolsters and car bodies to be replaced, and extended the warranty period for the parts.He also reiterated reasons why the issue was not made public earlier, saying that the hairline cracks on the trains did not pose any safety risk to commuters. Some netizens said that the supplier should not be praised for taking ownership of the problem because they should have provided a defect-free product in the first place. Richard Liaw wondered why LTA and SMRT continued to purchase trains from the same manufacturer after the defects had been found. Jonus Jun said that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan seemed to contradict himself. The netizen cited that the Minister earlier stated that authorities withheld the information regarding the defective trains to prevent undue panic, but was now saying that more information should be shared to the public. Yingzhi Beth considered it peculiar that the problems had been reduced to a communication issue when the issues involved policy, culture and operations.
David Ng? reported that the bus captain of service 979 avoided the bus stop and drove at the farther lane despite being flagged. Rachel Lim stated that if the netizen was heading towards Yew Tee, he should board at the bus stop opposite Bukit Panjang Plaza because service 979 terminates at the next bus stop.
Train service on the East-West Line was delayed during the morning rush-hour on Mar 18 due to a track fault. SMRT posted a tweet about the delay at 7:09 a.m. to inform commuters travelling towards Joo Koon station to expect additional travelling time of 15 minutes from Tanah Merah to Aljunied. Half an hour later, it tweeted that commuters should expect an additional 20 minutes travelling time because of a train fault. Another tweet was posted by SMRT at 9:05 a.m. telling commuters heading from Pasir Ris station towards Aljunied station to expect additional travelling time of 25 minutes, which was later revised to 30 minutes. Train services were back to normal by 10:11 a.m. The faults have been suspected to have been triggered by a works vehicle during the usual pre-dawn maintenance shift. The fault near Paya Lebar station added up to 30 minutes of travelling time on the westbound track during the morning peak. Several commuters posted on Twitter to complain about the delay. Many netizens were frustrated that announcements about the train fault were delayed causing them to be late for work and appointments. Several affected commuters asked whether they would be compensated for the supposedly free off-peak travel but were charged full fare because of the delay. Ong Puay Chong said that the Government deserved to be complimented for the improvements as train delays were much better than last year. Sin Hcmc mentioned that with engineering, anything could fail anytime. The netizen praised the SMRT staff, engineers and technicians for solving issues with such an old system. Ruriel mentioned that the driver of the train he was on was very nice to apologise and update passengers in between stops in both English and Mandarin how long it would take until the next stop.
?Gordie Reid? wondered why trains along the East-West Line were so slow.The netizen mentioned that trains travelling between Jurong and Redhill seemed to be crawling. S/he said that an advanced country like Singapore should have trains moving at a more rapid pace. Nurafian Zulkifli explained that the sleepers along the East-West Line were being replaced, hence, speed restrictions were in place. Ze Yu Jia said that it was quite normal for trains to travel at slower speeds during peak hours.
GateCrasher was frustrated that the Bishan MRT station was overcrowded. Some netizens stated that commuters could always take alternative transportation whenever the MRT trains were overcrowded or delayed. garone said that when Lui Tuck Yew was still the Transport Minister, all breakdowns were reported to the public but under Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan, everything was being covered up. chinaexpat mentioned that there was poor planning of the MRT from the beginning. The netizen said that the smallest MRT station was made into an interchange and many platforms could not accommodate the crowd.
The blogpost on Thoughts of a Cynical Investor regarding Temasek Holdings buyout offer of S$1.68 per share to SMRTs minority shareholders was reposted on TR Emeritus. The blogger wrote that an acquirer usually pays a premium of up to 30% to gain full control of the target. The blogger wondered why Temasek Holdings would pay only a 9% premium for SMRT and asked whether Temasek intended to scam its minority shareholders. Several netizens stated that the Government would pay for SMRTs assets which it provided in the first place.
The LTA has introduced a new arrival timing board at selected bus stops using electronic paper (e-paper) technology that would be easier for commuters to read and were more environmentally friendly. The e-paper mimics the appearance of ink on paper more commonly known for its use in e-books such as Amazon's Kindle. The 32-inch e-paper displays would be more visible than their LED counterparts. The new boards would be solar powered and has small LEDs behind the glass panel to illuminate the display during low-light conditions. The LTA was also considering the use of LCDs for its display boards. Commuters welcomed the use of the e-paper saying that the new boards were as clear as, if not better than, the current LED ones. Several netizens stated that the new display board was a waste of money. Lenz Zen said that the money should be used to make the bus rides more comfortable. Joel Luo mentioned that the Government should stop wasting money on fancy display boards and instead have more accurate timings and better bus frequencies during peak hours. The netizen said that bus timings on digital boards were off by up to 40 minutes. Dan Tang stated that the LTA should have known by now how to run a fixed schedule time for buses since they already have the data regarding traffic conditions. The netizen also mentioned that the arrival boards would not be much help to the public in planning their travel ahead of time. Evaleen Tan said that commuters could simply refer to the bus@sg app for the timings. Mathew Ng wondered how the e-paper board could be seen at night.
KWAN JIN YAO wrote to TODAY Online regarding the Government considering the publication of future Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) reports especially if significant public interest was involved. The decision came after the unprecedented release online of an Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA) report by the LTA regarding the Cross Island Line.The letter writer stated that publishing such reports online should be the norm, not the exception. It would also allow the Government to better gauge sentiments, enriching discourse in the process.The netizen said that arguments that EIA reports could be too technical or too voluminous, or may not be easily understandable or interesting to the layman, were not necessarily valid. By requiring the publication of EIA reports, public agencies would be forced to improve how the findings are presented so the public could understand them.While not all Singaporeans would be able to grasp the content of the report, if access to these reports was made more convenient, more groups of professionals who have recognised skills and knowledge could share valuable feedback. It would also be useful to involve more Singaporeans in consultations at an early stage, which could strengthen the eventual justifications made.
Additional comments were observed on the Facebook post by Kelvin Ozaki suggesting the introduction of short-working trips from Choa Chu Kang to Sungei Gedong camp during weekends because of high demand. Several netizens stated that many complaints regarding service 975 were reported but there was no action from SMRT. Tan Swee Heng suggested writing to LTA and private bus associations for a Scheme B service from Choa Chu Kang to Sungei Gedong. Chang Ci suggested that the camps should provide shuttle service during peak hours between certain MRT stations and the camp to ease overcrowding.
Aside from the five-hour service disruption at the Bukit Panjang LRT line on Jan 22, a door on one of its train carriages flew open while the train was moving.Dilla Damitra, a 16-year-old student who was on her way to school, tweeted a photo of the incident. She said at about 6:45 a.m., the train, which was moving slowly from Bukit Panjang toward Senja station, jerked abruptly before coming to a stop. The train door suddenly opened after the train jerked. A fellow commuter tried to use the phone on the LRT to call for assistance but that did not seem to work. Another passenger used her mobile phone to contact SMRT to alert them of the incident. Patrick Nathan, SMRTs Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications, stated that the staff quickly boarded the affected train after being alerted of the incident to check that passengers were safe before closing the door and driving the train back to the station. SMRT added that they were currently investigating the incident.Another student on board the train, Nurul Nadhirah, said the malfunctioning door opened and closed repeatedly despite assistance from an SMRT staff. Nurul said that she was still traumatized by the incident because people could have fallen out of the train. Many netizens stated that the incident was a serious safety issue which could have caused a real disaster if the train had been crowded. Several said that all doors of the train should be properly closed before the train could move off and that additional safety lock should be installed to prevent such dangerous incidents. Some were also disappointed that the emergency phone malfunctioned during the incident. Ferlene Ho was glad that the passengers on the train were focused on getting SMRT alerted and resolving the issue rather than complaining. Micharl Michael was curious on what Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan had to say about the incident. Haziq Evan Rosli mentioned with sarcasm that the incident was another value-added service from SMRT - bringing fresh air to commuters. John Ng urged commuters to be mindful of safety at all times, because the trains could break down anytime. William Lee asserted that SMRT had previously verified that doors on trains would not open when moving, as a safety feature. cow138 said that something was seriously wrong with the system.
ToonBlue reported that there was a train fault at Bukit Panjang LRT on Feb 9 and that s/he was stuck at Phoenix LRT station. ahkrong said that there was nothing unusual with the breakdown because it was already the norm. Intrinion confirmed that there was a track fault at Pending Station and the train was stuck between Petir and Pending stations.
?Jesline Ding? stated that the bus captain of SMRT service 300 refused to let her mother-in-law, her helper and two babies onboard the bus. The netizen claimed that the driver simply shouted "??????????? ("cannot board the bus") to her mother-in-law and shut the door, without any further explanation as to why they could not board the bus.As a result, her mother-in-law and companions had to walk home from Sunshine Plaza to Choa Chu Kang Avenue 4, which was a 20-minute walk.The netizen asked SMRT how such errant behaviour would be dealt with.
?Sheena Lee? thanked the bus captain of service 187 (SMB244Z) for ensuring that she and her seven-month-old child had a seat before moving off.
Netizens continued to discuss the rail reliability of Singapore compared with that of Hong Kongs MTR. Some mentioned that transport operators should be penalised for failure to maintain reliability instead of being rewarded millions for a 0.5-second improvement on waiting time of selective bus fleets. johnnykwek said that Singapore should contract the MTR to run Singapores MRT system. hfourhappy mentioned that Singapore should not play catch up but instead concentrate on doing a good job.
?Rashid Osman? shared a video showing an SMRT bus beating a red traffic light. Shawn Lee assumed that the bus driver was in a hurry, and the bus had passed through the pedestrian traffic light crossing with caution and making sure that there were no pedestrians before proceeding.The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen to provide more details so that the relevant teams can look into it.
?Riyo Masako? asked SMRT whether they provide excuse slips or delay certificates whenever trains breakdown, similar to those issued in Japan. The netizen stated that such excuse slips could be useful to workers and students who were delayed in arriving at work and school during breakdowns.SMRT Facebook administrator has replied to the netizen that he/she can approach the Passenger Service Centre if there is a train delay.
Hong Puay? reported that for the third day in a row, there had been train delays caused by trains stalling from Bukit Gombak to Boon Lay. Trains would abruptly stop in between stations because the train ahead was still in the next station. The netizen asked whether the LTA and SMRT management have plans on improving the overall train sequencing system. Ed Rowan Lee reported that the train he was on stalled after departing from Bukit Gombak. Derek Lin Shengli mentioned missing the shuttle bus because of the delay.
?Ben Wong? reported an incident wherein the bus captain of service 960 ignored an elderly passenger and her companion who were flagging the bus just as the bus was leaving the bus stop. The netizen said that from where he was seated, he was sure that the bus captain had noticed the commuters from his angle. He added that he felt sad for being unable to act fast enough to stop the bus. The netizen hoped that SMRT would encourage better service towards passengers from the bus captains.
?Bhanu Prasad? who visited Singapore recently, praised SMRT for its efficient and convenient transport system. The netizen mentioned that the staff were also friendly.He stated that SMRT was among the best public transport systems in the world and suggested for SMRT to collaborate with other countries transport systems and so that they can work towards an enhanced transport system like SMRT.
The Traffic Police are asking the public for information on an SMRT taxi that was filmed travelling against the flow of traffic on September 12. The incident reportedly took place along Sims Avenue East and was captured on video by Facebook user George Teo. The video was posted on the road safety community page Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road.SMRT has taken disciplinary action against the driver.According to Traffic Police, they are aware of the incident and are looking into the matter. Several netizens wondered why the Traffic Police had to ask the public for information on the SMRT taxi involved when the video clearly showed what happened. Others stated that the Police should simply ask SMRT for the drivers information since SMRT had already taken disciplinary action against the driver.
?Wilfred Tan stated with sarcasm that he was impressed with how SMRT? deploys service 811 buses. He mentioned that four buses: two rigid and two bendy, arrived at the same time at Block 101 bus stop along Yishun Avenue 5. The netizen said that the bunching was so close and wondered how long commuters would have to wait for the next bus after the four buses. In a later post, Wilfred Tan mentioned that service 811 was a feeder service and not a "cross country" trunk service like 858 where bus bunching was acceptable. He said that SMRT timekeepers and ground staff were not doing their duties to deploy the buses effectively to benefit passengers. Zul Saibot suggested breaking up the service, with one going to Chong Pang side and the other to Khatib.
On Facebook, Problems Singaporeans Face wondered why SMRT hired a Chinese national to record its English in-train announcements. The netizen understood that the staff did the Mandarin announcements as well but the announcements made in English were not fluent.
SMRTs Mercedes Benz O405 (TIB 832 Z), which have served commuters since 1994, has officially "retired" on September 22. Several commuters expressed their sadness and disappointment with the retirement of the bus which served as an iconic reference to the bright and cheerful Trans-Island Bus Services. Many netizens mentioned that the Mercedes Benz O405 was the best and the commuters favourite. Noah Lim thanked SMRT for parking the bus at a good location where many could still take a glimpse of the bus.
Netizens continued to discuss the signing of the memorandum of understanding (MOU) for the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur High Speed Rail (HSR) which would reduce travel time between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur to 90 minutes. Several netizens stated that the HSR would be a great convenience for many frequent travellers to Malaysia and Singapore. Some warned the Singapore Government to be careful in dealing with Malaysia, claiming that Malaysian politicians were known to profiteer from major projects. Others believed that fares for the HSR would not be cheap and that the return fare would most probably be higher than the average daily wage of an ordinary worker. Some were concerned that the HSR would lead to increased crime rates in Singapore. Others were concerned about possible breakdowns of the trains. blankies asked why the HSR would have so many turns and twists along the route and still go as fast as 300km/hr.
?Fiona Lee? stated that her mother took a SMRT taxi (SHB3109X) near Thomson Plaza and was disappointed with the cabby for using sarcasm instead of assisting the passenger.The netizen mentioned that her mother could not locate the seatbelt and was asked by the driver if she had not sat in a car before. ?Fiona Lee? asked SMRT to provide a proper explanation to the poor service provided. She also pointed out that such attitude should not come from the company.
MrSinkie95 reported that there was a strong smell of kerosene at Telok Ayer on the Downtown Line. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that some people had already complained to the passenger service counter. Several mentioned having also noticed the strong smell of kerosene, with one stating that the smell was suffocating. Some suggested reporting the issue to the station manager. Ah-Pin-Kor mentioned that there was also an oily smell on a train at the North-South Line.
Yahoo! Singapore reposted an article published on money$mart on July 11 about the possible reasons why not many would take up the free pre-peak travel scheme and asked what it would take to get people to travel to the CBD before 7:45 a.m. every day. Many netizens preferred to sleep for one more hour than save S$1.50 on their train ride, which several said was not much savings. Others mentioned that the funds used for the scheme should instead be used to maintain the trains and improve service standards. Alfie Diego said that the scheme was not useful because those who benefit from the pre-peak travel scheme were those who were required to work early. Kim found the scheme too rigid as it was too early and not implemented at all stations. Note: The Yahoo!Finance article incorrectly attributed the free pre-peak travel scheme to SMRT. CMC has informed the editor to make the correction that the scheme is driven by LTA.
Tan Kin Lian was surprised that the train at Orchard was packed at 5 p.m. Tan thought he could escape the after-office crowd by travelling at that time. He said that the train was more packed than the Yamanote Line in Tokyo at peak hours. Yeo Tiong Lin pointed out that 5 p.m. was peak hour on trains. Kimseng Sim asked Tan Kin Lian to try taking the train at 11 p.m. which would also be packed at times.
SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek stated in a briefing that the Government and SMRT had yet to come to an agreement on the plan for the Government to assume ownership of all rail assets for almost six years now.Under the new rail financing framework, SMRT Trains would be asset-light" as all operating and fixed assets would be transferred to the Land Transport Authority (LTA). SMRT would then pay the LTA for an operating licence. After the move is complete, the transport company would focus on meeting service standards in order to re-tender for operating contracts that last for about 15 years. Research analyst Abhishek Nigam predicts that SMRT's rail cashflow margin would be about 5% which would translate to an operating profit of S$34M based on revenue for the year ended March 31. Nigam added that it would be better for SMRT to move to the new framework to help them with their cashflow. Several netizens disapproved of the Government buying back SMRTs assets using taxpayers money. Slytherine said that SMRT should not be allowed to bid for the operation of the Thomson East Coast Line until they get the current lines in proper shape. Stephen Chew mentioned that the Government should just take back all non-transit revenue, collect the fare and pay SMRT a fixed fee to run the trains similar to the buses. Wee Guan thought that the new framework would be a form of corruption because taxpayers would bear the costs while SMRT keeps the profits privately.
Train services between Marina South Pier and Newton MRT stations in the direction of Jurong East were disrupted for about an hour on Apr 21 due to a train fault along the North-South Line.Patrick Nathan, Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications at SMRT, said that a stalled engineering vehicle used for maintenance work at Raffles Place was the cause of the service disruption. He added that the cause of the fault on the locomotive was still being investigated. SMRT had just passed 100 days without any service disruption along the NSL. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan wrote on his blog that achieving 100 disruption-free days on the NSL was no mean feat as it was the oldest of Singapores five MRT lines. Some netizens were concerned that the recurring delays and disruptions would have adverse effects on the economy. Dave Trueo stated that more train faults would justify Minister Khaw's proposal of reduced operating hours. Amos Ong said that instead of bragging or hoping to garner recognition, SMRT should focus more on its day-to-day operations, stay humble and let the improved services speak for itself. CK Ng mentioned that there was also an unreported train or track fault at Tampines, which makes three breakdowns in a day. Owen Sprinter Prime stated that the public should appreciate the rail system regardless of its flaws because without SMRT and SBST, commuting around Singapore would be difficult. Mohd Tan remarked that Singapore is the only country that celebrates a 100-day disruption-free train service. Dom Yeo said that although SMRT had shown more transparency, it needs to act quickly when disruptions occur and keep the public informed. The netizen mentioned that in Hong Kong, a major disruption happens once a week on average and commuters were informed on the duration of the disruption so they could find alternative options to their destination.
On Facebook, the LTA stated that commuters could expect higher bus service levels as the Government transit to the bus contracting model and welcome two new bus operators in 2016.To celebrate this milestone, a bus carnival would be held in March to commemorate the ?#?SGBusJourney through the years. Pang Soon Tan stated that nothing would change as long as the incumbents still get to operate through lapses. The netizen claimed that the Soon Lee Bus Park (SLBP) had instructed bus captains to operate SBS Transit service 179A to run as halfway trips. All the service 179A buses proceeded into NTU without electronic display system turned on. Ralph Ooi wondered why the LTA did not preserve the vintage bus models.
SBS Transit announced that the Sam Kee Station on the West loop of the Punggol LRT system would be open to passengers on Feb 29.Sam Kee Station would provide commuters with convenient access to the Punggol Waterway Park and soon-to-be-opened SAFRA Punggol clubhouse. Gan Juay Kiat, SBS Transit CEO, said that they were delighted to commence operations of Sam Kee Station to serve the travel needs of commuters in getting to these facilities. Several netizens were happy with the opening of the new station. Edgar Wong asked for the meaning of "Sam Kee" and the significant of the name.
Netizens continued to comment on the delay in train services on the Circle Line on Jun 13. Several netizens stated that they did not blame the ground staff for train service disruptions but the lack of counter measures during emergencies. Some said that the ground staff had gained enough experience in managing disruptions from past breakdowns. Others hoped that the management would recognise the efforts of the ground staff and reward them with monetary incentives. Francis Chong said that it is no easy task running the MRT, and added that if the public take the effort and time to show their appreciation and gratitude to the staff, they will be able to step up and deliver more because of the encouragement received. Leon Lim mentioned that overcrowding at the stations was a fire-safety hazard.
On SMRT Facebook Page, ?Aikawa Nakamura? wondered why no SMRT staff stopped a PRC female passenger from eating inside the North-East Line train from HarbourFront to Punggol.The netizen said that SMRT was quick to fine Singaporean students for charging their phones at the station or drinking plain water. SMRT and several netizens pointed out that the North-East Line was operated by SBS Transit. Lee Joonmin said that nothing could be done if the passengers who committed the act have already left the scene. The netizen said that instead of taking a photo, the netizen should approach such passengers and instruct them to stop eating onboard the train. If they do not comply, s/he may contact the North-East Line staff via the onboard emergency contact system.
addict951 asked if anyone pressed the emergency button at the North-South Line because the train kept stopping Several netizens stated in jest that they were the ones who pressed the emergency button.
?Neo Cheng Wee Kenneth ?was disappointed with the lack of safety awareness of the bus captain of service 963 (SMB344T).The netizen said that the bus captain did not slow down when making turns at traffic junctions and did not keep a safe distance between the bus and the vehicle in front, be it stationary or while travelling.The netizen also mentioned that this is not a one-off incident. He said that there has been an increase in the number of SMRT bus captains who do not drive safely. He added that this poses unnecessary risks for the many passengers that SMRTs buses carry daily. He also said that safety must be the utmost concern of transport service providers and hopes that SMRT will look into the issue.
Provisional permission was granted by the Urban Redevelopment Authority in March for the LTAs proposed underground linear retail space next to the future Marine Parade station on the Thomson-East Coast Line. The underground retail space would sit above part of the tunnel connecting the Marine Parade and Marine Terrace stations.Large existing malls in the vicinity were not expected to experience significant impact from the existence of the proposed retail space since it would be providing ancillary convenience services to commuters on the go. waterdestiny said that Singapore is getting crowded with more MRT stations and now underground shopping would make the situation even worse. commie_rick said that the Government could build several shopping centres but they should ensure that there would be enough budget to rectify rail issues to reduce down times and delays. herzberg believed that the underground retail space would affect the businesses of the smaller neighbourhood shops and hawker centres in the area.
????? asked why its staff did not have to queue to board bus service 950 at the Singapore Customs. The netizen observed about four or five SMRT staff in uniform who were usually seen at the front of the queue for service 950 and were able to board before other waiting passengers. The netizen considered it unfair to other passengers who had waited in line for the bus and hoped SMRT would look into the issue. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can follow up with him.
?Donovan Whysoserious? asked if bus captains were allowed to play music while driving. The netizen said that the bus captain of service 965 (SMB5893S) was playing music while driving along the highway.
Netizens continued to discuss the selfless act by SBS Transit bus captain Jiang Hong and ComfortDelGro cabby Ong Kong Poh who both stopped their vehicles to help put out a car fire.Tammy Tan, ComfortDelGro's Group Corporate Communications Officer, said that the company found out that Jiang had immediately stopped his double-decker bus and sought his passengers' permission to suspend the bus journey so he could help put out the fire.Jiang returned to his bus and resumed service only after the Singapore Civil Defence Force (SCDF) arrived. Most netizens praised the bus captain and the cabby for helping to put out the car fire. Many noted that the bus captain was a Chinese foreign worker and had asked others to stop stereotyping foreign workers as unsatisfactory workers. Several hoped that both drivers would receive commendation from their companies and SCDF. John Prescott wondered whether the bus captain and cabby had to submit a written statement why they used the company fire extinguisher in putting out a fire in another vehicle.
On TODAY Online Voices, MICHAEL SIM said that the opening of Downtown Line 2 has brought convenience to commuters living in the Bukit Panjang area because travelling time to the town area has been reduced drastically. The netizen, however, wondered why the discrepancy in adult fare from Bukit Panjang Station to Newton (S$1.91) while the fare to Little India, which was one stop after Newton, was S$1.75. Isaac Thang explained that the difference in fares from station X to Simei vs station X to Tampines was about $0.20, which was also only one stop away.
News stories about the trial to run fully-electric taxis on Singapore roads were observed. The vehicles would be run by a new taxi company, HDT Singapore Taxi, starting with more than 10 vehicles, before progressively increasing its fleet to 100 by the first quarter of 2017.The trial is part of the Governments plans to continue testing the feasibility of electric vehicles, from individual corporate usage to fleet-based, shared-car operations. Aside from electric cars, HDT was also looking to introduce a new business model where taxi drivers become full-time employees and receive benefits under the Singapore Employment Act. Some netizens believed that the new business model would be a positive step that could provide more jobs to local taxi drivers. Some were concerned that having another taxi operator would mean more competition and lesser take-home income for the drivers. Others said that more taxis would mean more road congestion. Teck Wee Ng was apprehensive as having another taxi operator would increase the demand for Certificates of Entitlement (COE) and that taxi drivers would have to pay higher daily rentals. Ng KiatKuan said that if the cost of using electric taxis would be much lower than diesel, then it should help lower taxi fares. Jonathan Lim wondered about the safety standards for electric vehicles.
The LTA and SBS Transit announced the introduction of two new bus services - 134 and 150 - starting Mar 20, as part of the Bus Service Enhancement Programme. As a new direct link between Sims Place and Marine Parade, service 134 would link commuters to Paya Lebar MRT Station, and amenities such as Geylang Polyclinic. Service 150 would be running from Eunos Bus Interchange to Marine Terrace. The route of bus service 76 would also be amended.
A group of Singaporeans called the Singapore Bus Spotters Association, made up of 25 members who are passionate about spotting every make and model of bus on the roads, has made it a point to try all the new bus services.The group was usually among the first riders on the new routes to study the services' frequencies, areas served and passenger loads. They send feedback to the LTA, and bus operators SBS Transit and SMRT.Next month, members would display memorabilia, such as old bus tickets, model buses and destination plates at an LTA roving bus carnival celebrating the history and future of Singapore's bus industry. Chua Yong Xiang stated that there were more suitable people to be called heroes than the group featured in the article, claiming that the group was the black sheep of the community having attitude problems to theft incidents. Peter Tan asked how effective the bus spotters were. Bujang Teruna suggested that the LTA should have the mystery inspectors to study the new bus routes.
On The Independent Singapore, it was mentioned that in February 2014, a blogger claimed that CSR Sifang fabricated the test results of the train trial to meet the strict specifications laid down by Kawasaki. The blogger claimed that in November 2010, the first trial train manufactured by CSR Sifang was apparently unable to meet the strict specifications laid down by Kawasaki. The blogger alleged that a large number of CSR Sifang officials then conspired to fabricate the test results of the train trial. The results were then submitted to Kawasaki and Land Transport Authority. Several netizens suggested that the engineering and approval process should be investigated if the claims about the fake test data were true. Some stated that the Ministry of Transport should address the matter publicly. Others asked for proof that the bloggers claim was true. JivBunny suggested that the LTA should send engineers to witness the production and verification of the tests in China.
A Straits Times editorial said rail service breakdowns should never become "normalised" by citing that technical issues need time to be fully addressed. Rail operators should instead take urgent action to ensure commuters are kept moving when services are disrupted. The writer/s stated that it was proper to expect better from rail operators and asked how they would manage when the rail system becomes more complex if they were straining to keep things going now.Besides reliability of the power supply system, rail operators must ensure their other systems are also resilient. The overall objective must be to get commuters to their destinations as smoothly as possible when disruptions occur. That includes paying greater attention to alternative transport for affected commuters. LH Tan thanked the editor for speaking up for commuters. The netizen said that despite Singapore being a small city, it has so much woes in the public rail systems and taxi industry. S/he understood that SMRT needs more time to fix the problems but was flabbergasted that SMRT and public officials were trying to pass on failures as "normal". Xian Lian Zeng mentioned that there were standards for business continuity planning. In SMRTs case, their business is to provide the public a continuous transport service. When that fails, alternative transport should be provided.
?JingYi Chan? mentioned waiting for bus service 171 for over 30 minutes. The netizen mentioned that three service 980 buses had already arrived at the same bus stop but no service 171 came in the span of 30 minutes.
?Gordon Chiang? asked SMRT why bus service 972 travelled faster when heading towards Orchard Road from Bukit Panjang while it would travel along the expressway at about 20km/hr when heading back. The netizen mentioned that the bus had been overtaken by seven buses along the Pan Island and Bukit Timah Expressways.The netizen hoped that some adjustments to the bus schedule would be made.
?Matthias Ngan asked why there were only a few bendy buses deployed for bus service 811.?
?Fitra Hamzah? reported an unpleasant smell coming from the closed Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange near the escalator towards Causeway Point entrance. The netizen surmised that the smell was coming from the rubbish seen around the area near the escalator.
ILzif Liliho? boarded a bus with plate number SMB1304C from Changi Airport Terminal 3 on Feb 23 at 1:08 p.m. and stated that the driver was very rude. The netizen mentioned apologizing to the driver several times but the driver continued to shout at him/her. S/he did not mention what transpired, why the driver shouted at him/her and what s/he was apologising for. The netizen hoped that SMRT would take action on the matter and provide him/her with updates regarding the incident.
In a press release yesterday (July 4), SMRT stated that 81% have responded positively to the statement I can see that SMRT staff are working hard to improve my travel experience shown on the Travel Experience Terminals (TExT) at eight MRT stations and four bus interchanges. Commuters also offered positive responses to SMRT's efforts to serve them better and keep abreast of ongoing projects to improve the North-South and East-West Lines. Over 90% of about 7,500 respondents to date said that they understand the benefits of the upgrading works that were being carried out and over 88% feel that SMRT had been working hard on improving the travel experience for commuters. Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that the responses have encouraged SMRT and that they appreciate the support and understanding of commuters as work continues to improve their journeys. Mr Nathan added that the TExT machines will be placed at more MRT stations after the two-month trial to cover a range of topics that affect commuter travel experience, such as improvements brought about by on-going rail renewal programmes and accessibility to commuter friendly amenities within the network. SMRT also plans to extend the outreach to commuters living close to the North-South Line as part of phase two of the campaign, following the positive response from those who have received the Paving the Way for Better Journeys information packs. Some netizens speculated that there will be a fare increase. A few netizens wondered how the positive responses were derived. Others agreed that the ground staff were working hard but pointed out that what was more important was to improve reliability so that commuters will have a more pleasant experience.
Amidst debate between nature groups, residents, businesses and the planners of the Cross Island Line (CRL), netizens continued to discuss and suggest options for its alignment.On The Straits Times Forum, Jonathan Tan Yong How stated that while S$2B seemed like a huge sum of money, the figure should be put in proper context. He said that if the Government was willing to spend money on creating new nature-themed attractions, they should also spend to protect the natural heritage.In another letter, Dennis Chan Hoi Yim suggested the possible realignment of the CRL through Balestier, eastern Toa Payoh and Serangoon Gardens, which were still not reached by the MRT. The netizen added that it would benefit more commuters while averting the impact of construction on the Central Catchment Nature Reserve.Most netizens were against the plan to build the CRL through the Central Catchment Nature Reserve, saying that it would be irreversible. Several stated that destroying the nature reserve should not have been considered in the first place.Others believed that the decision has already been made and that all the discussion was just a scheme to appear that the Government was "consulting" the public.Some were concerned with the welfare of homeowners if the CRL would be rerouted.Paul Nah noted that the Government spent close to S$1B to build the National Gallery of Singapore to showcase Singapore and Asian arts and culture. The netizen said that to spend an additional S$2B to protect and preserve the unique nature reserve was a far more noble cause.Jophrey Lim remarked that rerouting CRL provides no monetary incentive to the Government as the central catchment area could not be monetized. Johnny Tang said that there was a bigger stake in the current debate since the Central Catchment Nature Reserve protects the critical natural water resource. Any indiscretion in the decision-making process would have detrimental consequences should the reservoirs be affected. Koh Wei Kiang suggested going deeper than 40m below the ground. The ventilation shafts could be built at the golf courses so that nothing needs to be built on the surface within the nature reserve.Paul Antony Fernandez said that it was more important to improve and minimise disruptions on the existing MRT lines.
Eryk praised SBS Transits bus captain William Goh of service 9 (SBS 6785 E) for greeting passengers warmly and informing his passengers of the next stop. The netizen hoped that others would share his story so that bus captain William Goh's relatives and friends would know what an awesome person he is, and to assure him that his great work is appreciated. CaseyakaHZG stated that in Shenzhen and most major cities in China, announcement of bus stops have been made through the built-in bus public address system for years already. The netizen hoped that bus companies would implement such an announcement system to provide better quality service to bus commuters.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? observed that the signage informing commuters about the new temporary Woodlands bus interchange was placed at a position where not many passengers may notice it. The netizen suggested positioning the signage facing the escalators near berth 6 or 11 instead of facing the pillar.
Zann Quek? stated that the alighting berths at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange were quite far from the boarding berths. Commuters had to walk all the way to the front of the interchange to board another bus or go to the MRT station. Aside from the long distance, commuters also had to climb a flight of stairs. The netizen pointed out that she has seen many elderly commuters struggling to climb the stairs every day. She added that even though there was a buggy service, most elderly do not have the luxury of time to wait for it to come at such a slow speed to pick them up. The netizen questioned why a touchscreen with charging points was built in the middle of nowhere, and yet no one bothered to build an escalator in the interchange. The netizen also said that even though the interchange was temporary, SMRT should put itself in the shoes of those elderly.In a later post, the netizen mentioned that a number of feedback regarding the lack of escalators at the interchange were posted online since March but SMRT has yet to act on the issue. Jared Low pointed out that the temporary bus interchange was built by the LTA and not by SMRT. Ligeok Tan mentioned that her mother was among those elderly commuters who found it difficult to walk from the end of the interchange to the berths to board another bus.
?Stewart Yuen? complimented the bus captain of SMRT service 853 (SMB9L) for greeting everyone onboard the bus, which helped the commuter forget that he had waited over 20 minutes for the bus due to bunching of two other buses.
During a recent broadcast of Battle Trip by KBS, a Korean variety show which sends celebrity teams to travel to a destination for a fixed period before coming back into the studio to share their experiences, a video of one of the teams experience while taking the MRT in Singapore was shown.The team, comprising singer Lee Sangmin and variety show star Kim Iljung, researched on the food that they must try while in Singapore and decided to have Kaya Toast for breakfast once they landed. They planned to head down from Changi Airport station to Raffles Place, where they could try the kaya toast from a Ya Kun Kaya Toast outlet.The two celebrities, however, were surprised that they kept going back and forth between Changi Airport and Tanah Merah stations, and remembered hearing Expo being mentioned over and over again. After a few loops, they realised that they were supposed to change trains at Tanah Merah, which explained why they noticed many passengers alighting at that station. Lee Wei Chia said that such mistakes could be avoided if they had asked a local in the first place.
Security experts say Singaporeans should ready themselves for inconveniences in having stricter checks at MRT stations and transport hubs, which may soon become part of everyday life in the face of increasing terror threats.Bilveer Singh, Associate Professor at the National University of Singapore, said terror attacks over recent years at Metro or train stations in London, Madrid and Brussels showed that train stations have become a target of choice for terrorists, so these key installations should be made tougher to crack.Toby Koh, Managing Director of Ademco Security Group, suggested that random checkpoints be set up as a "visual deterrence". He added that commercial building owners could do more, by enhancing their security. Law and Home Affairs Minister K. Shanmugam highlighted this concern on Mar 18, and revealed that the government would be asking developers of large projects to factor in security considerations at the design stage. Building owners could also be asked to install CCTV cameras.Paul Lim, chief executive of Secura Group, said that the designs of buildings could also mitigate the after-effects of a terror attack, such as having shatter-proof glass or pillars that withstand certain levels of explosive. Some netizens stated that checking of bags at MRT stations could cause delays. DimpleGuy stated that in other countries, big haversacks were checked before entering any malls, while Singapore was still too lax in terms of security. foxtrotbravo21 mentioned that there could be only some strong presence of security personnel to create a higher visibility and "deterent" but there was really nothing that could be done to prevent a terrorist attack which could be launched from anywhere. hfourhappy said that it would be a good idea to scan items at MRT stations similar to what Customs was doing. The netizen also suggested employing more local staff to do the job. Mmichael pointed out that there was no foolproof way of recognizing a terrorist which seemed to target civilians rather than the army in conventional warfare.
?SImon Parthiban? praised SMRT for having the worlds cleanest buses and trains.
?Dorothy Chua? mentioned having waited to for bus service 913 from 11:04 p.m. to 11:22 p.m. The electronic time board kept changing the time of arrival
LTA was investigating a phenomenon known as "sudden unintended acceleration" (SUA) in Hyundai cars which may have caused a series of accidents involving taxis.The move arises from the footage captured by car cameras showing Hyundai cabs operated by ComfortDelGro in crashes that suggest the drivers were not in control of their vehicles at the time.Cases of SUA have been well documented, although not all could be proven to be mechanical in nature. Some were attributable to drivers stepping on the accelerator instead of the brake pedal, and in panic, depressing the accelerator further.A news portal in Seoul, Korea reported that 417 accidents between 2010 and 2014 were suspected to have been caused by SUA, with cars from Hyundai and sister brand Kia accounting for nearly 60% of the cases.The South Korean authorities investigated the cases in 2012, leading Hyundai to say that it would introduce a "brake pedal throttle override" function in its cars. Some netizens believed that taxi drivers were also at fault for sudden acceleration of their vehicles. I12 claimed that ComfortDelGro car mechanics were trained by Hyundai engineers in the electronic tuning of Hyundai electronic controller for the engines. A special gadget could be used to tune the engines beyond what the default settings from the assembly plant setup were. The netizen hoped that the investigation could compare such settings to see whether there was a change made to such parameters causing the system to override some safety limits tomsss said that manual transmission in taxis should be brought back. questsohai mentioned that LTA should investigate Spark Car Care, which maintains ComfortDelGro taxis. Lim Desmond said that there are recalls of certain vehicles in Korea and the US due to SUA.
An SMRT bus was involved in an accident with a Singapore Armed Forces (SAF) heavy vehicle along Mandai Avenue where six passengers were injured. In a press release, the Ministry of Defence (Mindef) said the SAF vehicle was carrying a foldable longspan bridge. Mindef and SAF were investigating the accident.Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that they were in touch with the six injured passengers to provide assistance.It was not known if the vehicle involved in the accident was fitted with a camera. Several netizens stated that bus drivers were the biggest cause of road accidents. Tang Kok Eng believed that the incident was a case of negligence in driving and handling by both parties. Relevant authorities should investigate the incident. Haziq Evan Rosli was surprised that the SAF had no police escort. SoonKin Chew said that all bus drivers and private vehicles must learn to give way to any military vehicles.
Aaron Tan? reported the bus captain of service 966 (SMB5035C) for driving recklessly and almost crashing into a tree branch.The netizen mentioned that a window of the double-decker bus was scratched because of the branch hanging from the tree.
?Soo May? informed SMRT that they have amazing staff at Braddell MRT station such as Mr William Heng and others who s/he failed to get the names. The netizen said that the staff were warm, friendly and efficient. The netizen dropped his/her phone on the tracks and the staff were able to retrieve and return the phone within the day. The netizen also thanked the maintenance staff who helped in retrieving his/her phone.
Train service at the North-East Line was delayed on Feb 3 after a woman accidentally stepped into the gap between the train and platform at Chinatown MRT. The 45-year-old woman was wheeling her mother on a wheelchair when the accident happened. The woman appeared to be more concerned about her mother, even though her right leg was stuck in the gap.Tammy Tan, SBS Transits Senior Vice President for Group Corporate Communications, stated that the station staff tried to free the woman but failed and the Singapore Civil Defence Force had to be contacted for assistance. The woman refused to be taken to the hospital after her leg was freed from the gap.There was also a train fault following this incident and the combined delay lasted about 30 minutes. Many netizens praised the woman for putting her mothers well-being above her own despite being stuck in between the gap. Several asked authorities to narrow the gap between the platform and the train to prevent commuters from being stuck in the gap. Lee Sinwai said that paramedics could have offered to drive her and her mother together to the hospital for treatment first. Neo Sau Siong mentioned that the train floor was higher that the platform which makes it difficult to push the wheelchair or pram onboard the train.
?Mary Tan? asked SMRT if there was a fault at the North-South Line. The netizen stated that the announcement was distorted and passengers could not clearly hear where the fault was.
The Kawasaki-Sifang consortium (KSF) issued a two-page statement on July 7 at what it termed groundless allegation of wrong doing and maintained that it has resolved and will resolve all issues satisfactorily.The KSF consortium consists of Japanese train-maker Kawasaki Heavy Industries and the Qingdao-based CSR Sifang. The two firms, together with Kawasakis Singapore subsidiary, had bagged a S$368M contract in 2009 to supply 22 six-car C151A-model trains meant for the North-South and East-West Lines. SMRT subsequently ordered another 13 trains of the same model.It was reported this week that hairline cracks had been discovered on 26 of the 35 trains, and that they would have to be shipped back to China for rectification works.In its statement, KSF did not explain why or how the problem could have occurred but it confirmed that all the content in the LTA press release about the hairline cracks were accurate and that they had no other technical comments to add.It did, however, take issue with unconfirmed online media reports accusing KSF of faking test data for its trains. The consortium said the allegations were untrue, saying that KSF accords a high level of integrity when carrying out testing and commissioning works, and would not in any way cover up any non-conformity to the specifications.KSFs statement was sent to several newsrooms by Ng Choon Seng, a manager at the rolling stock division of Kawasaki Heavy Industries (Singapore) Pte Ltd. A copy of the statement was also sent to the LTA.
Stevejobless observed that there had been no updates on the investigations regarding the SMRT accident on Mar 22. The netizen wondered if the results of the investigations had been hidden from the public. AS1 stated that the internal investigation done by SMRT would be published, but the outcome of the police investigation may or may not be published. nachtsider was surprised that the thread starter was expecting any answers.
In connection with the compensation packages for bus drivers offered by Go-Ahead and Tower Transit, farhan wondered why SBS Transit and SMRT could not offer similar packages to its drivers. Ahah Chanchan stated that SBST and SMRT drivers had been short changed all these years. Kevie Syed encouraged local bus drivers to transfer to the new foreign bus operators. Nanny Lila Seeye stated that the new bus operators would do anything to stay competitive until their operations stabilises.
News stories were observed regarding the three SMRT train breakdowns on Mar 15, 18 and 19. The first breakdown on Circle Line which happened on Mar 15 was covered up by SMRT but Singaporeans posted on Twitter and Facebook photos of overcrowded stations and accounts of their experiences waiting over half an hour for a train arrival. The second breakdown on the East-West Line during the Mar 18 morning peak hours which affected about 200,000 commuters lasted four hours. Commuters frustrations were compounded with inaccurate updates on SMRTs Twitter account. The third one occurred along the Circle Line between Kent Ridge and HarbourFront stations. SMRT again under-reported the train delay by as much as 30 minutes when it announced via its Twitter account that there would only be a 15-minute delay. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan has been silent on the increasing frequency of train breakdowns. Minister Khaw no longer updates his transport blog and the last post was dated more than a month ago. There was also no comment from the Transport Ministry. Alex Wong stated with sarcasm that three breakdowns in a week showed a very good performance by SMRT as there are seven days in a week. Steve Chia mentioned that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan already admitted publicly that he was at a loss about the breakdowns, so all he could do now was to keep quiet. Kopiroti Lim said that Minister Khaw was busy with Lee Kuan Yews death anniversary celebrations which would last for weeks. The netizen stated that SMRT train breakdown was already the norm so commuters have to get used to it.
WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? stated that the queue at berth 5 for service 911 had reached the pillar at berth 6 for three consecutive days. The netizen mentioned that at around 11:02 p.m. on August 19, only a packed service 911E (TIB1032J) arrived and many commuters were still unable to board.
?Yih Chyuan Neo? hoped that SMRT could reduce the dwell time of trains on the Circle Line at interchange stations during off-peak hours. The netizen wondered why trains had to wait for a long period of time at interchange stations when nobody was boarding or alighting the train.
In the first six days of operations, more than 1.2M commuters rode the new DTL2. As Jan 4 was also the first school day of 2016, it would also be the first time for some students in the Bukit Timah area to take DTL2 and make it a part of their morning commute. It was expected that the stations would be crowded with students. On the contrary, Tan Kah Kee station, which was near several schools, was not crowded with students because many students would either start school on Jan 5 or only need to turn up for school next week,Several students interviewed by Channel NewsAsia correspondent Leong Wai Kit stated that their commute was now faster with the opening of the DTL2. Several netizens stated that most students from prestigious schools either used school buses or private cars going to and from school. Others mentioned that some schools had yet to start their classes.
Helen boarded an SBS Transit double decker bus service 50 (SBS3885U) from Punggol Interchange to Bishan Interchange and stated having a very unpleasant ride. Helen said that the Indian bus driver would forcefully step on the brakes at every bus stop, causing her to feel uncomfortable and dizzy. The netizen said that she had to alight before reaching her destination and boarded another bus because of the drivers driving behaviour.The netizen hoped that future bus drivers would be trained to drive more smoothly so passengers onboard could be more comfortable.Several netizens stated that reckless public bus drivers were common in Singapore. A few said that the netizen should have confronted the bus captain about his driving behaviour.Nanny Lila Seeye hoped that the netizen reported the issue to SBS Transit because it might be an issue with the braking system of the bus.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) expressed disfavour with the use of the lush green livery on buses under the new bus contracting model (BCM). The netizen stated that Singapore public buses have lost its vibrancy, dynamic and unique identities for a monotonous colour. S/he said that commuters used to identify the bus services by the colours used by SBS Transit and SMRT. Ming Ma said that the green bus livery might eventually be accepted in Singapore similar to the London red buses. Bok Chek Yang believed that LTA had made a number of mistakes when it implemented the BCM such as painting buses and bus stop numbers with an ugly bright green colour and assigning Citaro buses to Go-Ahead for their single-decker buses.
?Transliner Merlyo complimented bus captain Morlitharan Krishnan of service 911 (SMB3085X) for patiently waiting for an elderly to settle down before moving off. The bus captain also offered help to carry another elderly womans groceries while she alighted from the bus.
An article was published regarding suggestions to include better transport options in the plan to transform the Mandai area into a 126-hectare nature precinct by 2023. Only two daily bus services currently serve the Singapore Zoo and the surrounding Mandai area: SBS Transits service 138 from Ang Mo Kio bus interchange and SMRTs service 927 from Choa Chu Kang bus interchange, which take about one hour of travelling time to arrive at the zoo. Another service from the Marsiling and Woodlands MRT stations, SMRT service 926, operates only on weekends. An express bus service operated by Bus-Plus Services, a wholly owned subsidiary of SMRT, began a four-month trial run last Saturday and facilitates access from Bedok, Tampines and Sengkang, operates only on weekends and selected public holidays.A park visitor suggested having express buses from different areas or free shuttle buses every 15 minutes from the nearest MRT station plying the Mandai nature precinct. Several netizens disapproved of having more transport options from the city to the heartlands and such areas. They claimed that when too many people are able to visit such conservation areas, there would be more litter and vegetation might be destroyed. Others suggested having more bus services. Richard Ng stated that there should be an LRT system to link the various attractions to the nearest MRT station. Commuters travelling on the LRT could have an aerial view of the natural vegetation.
Kiwi8 shared a video showing an SMRT Taxi hitting a motorcyclist at a traffic junction. Several netizens concluded that if the taxi driver had not hit the motorcyclist and stopped at the junction, he could have run over the pedestrian who was crossing the road.
The video showing the accident at the junction of Yishun Avenue 1 and Yishun Avenue 2 on Jan 17 involving an SMRT bendy bus, a van and a lorry was shared online. Several netizens believed that the bus captain lost control of the bus and wondered what condition the bus driver was in before the accident occurred. Some assumed that a PRC was driving the bus. Kenlin Liu speculated that the road was slippery and the bus driver had suddenly stepped on the brake which caused the accident.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that train commuting hours may have to be shortened in order for operators to carry out maintenance for longer periods. The Minister hoped that commuters would allow the late opening or earlier closure of some lines. He said that an extra hour or two a day would make a lot of difference to the engineering and maintenance staff and help them perform better.The Ministry of Transport (MOT) also plans to facilitate closer cooperation between the Land Transport Authority (LTA) and train operators to improve their crisis management. Several netizens disapproved of having shorter train service hours particularly the late opening of MRT Lines because most offices and schools start early. Some mentioned that the repairs and maintenance take time and the public has to be patient and be willing to make little sacrifices in order to see improvements in the rail system. Others said that Minister Khaw should tell employers to adjust the working hours to start later and end earlier if the service hours of trains would be shortened. Chan Weigang mentioned that SMRT should just divert more of their profits and dividends to hire more competent engineers to ensure that the trains could run efficiently. Tiong Guan Chua suggested shutting down sections of MRT lines during Sundays and public holidays for the maintenance to be carried out, and increase bus services for those sectors. Tommy Ong stated that by shortening the service hours commuters would be spending more on fares for alternative travel unless bus operating hours would be extended. Alex Ong said that transport operators should consider re-organising the night-time bus routes and have them run bi-directionally.
A probe by The Straits Times on 2getthere, a Dutch company which transport operator SMRT joined hands with two weeks ago to provide automated shuttle services and its driverless freight-moving unit, Frog, revealed that it might be in financial difficulty as it applied for insolvency in April 2007. The Straits Times stated that the company has since been looking for financial backers. Colin Lim, SMRT Services Managing Director, explained that it was Frog that had financial difficulties and "2getthere was not part of it". Many transport experts stated that the driverless systems or personal rapid transit (PRT) systems were not popular at all because they were not feasible. Professor Vukan Vuchic of the University of Pennsylvania described them as a "totally unrealistic 'Buck Rogers' concept for which there are no applications where it would be operated efficiently and economically". SIM University Adjunct Associate Professor Park Byung Joon said PRTs may work in an airport but he is "less convinced whether they work as part of public transport". Meanwhile, National University of Singapore Transport Researcher Lee Der-Horng was more optimistic: "Technology-wise, I do not foresee major issues. However, the business model and administrative support require further clarifications." Several netizens asked whether the Dutch firm revealed its financial vulnerability to SMRT prior to signing of the contract and whether there was sufficient due diligence on the part of SMRT. Bauke Lowland found the article strange, and wondered if The Straits Times does random checks on all companies that appear in its newspaper, and questioned the relevancy of a piece of financial news from 2007. S/he questioned if this was done because the company involved was SMRT. Mingchuan Mervyn Xie believed that Singapore should move to a different operating model with greater oversight on the public transport operators. S/he stated that public transport solutions should ultimately be selected by the ministry, or at least by an organisation that the Government has full oversight and responsibility for. Peter Sim said that there was nothing wrong with buying an ailing company, suggesting that it would be cheaper to acquire. The key was in managing risks.
The LTA released its latest statistics on Friday (17 June) which showed that the MRT network had one disruption for every 159,000 train-km clocked compared with one every 133,000 train-km at the end of last year. This means that Singapore's rail system continued to improve on the whole in the first quarter, even if the absolute number of major breakdowns remained high.For the whole of last year, there were 29 incidents for the entire rail network, which worked out to an average of 7.25 per quarter. On this front, operator SBS Transit scored well, with no major disruption on its North-East and Downtown lines. The formula adopted by LTA, however, left out shorter delays. The North-East Line was the worst performer when shorter delays were included. The line chalked up one incident for every 93,000 train-km in the first quarter. Commuters interviewed said that they had noticed a slight improvement in the rail system. Some netizens stated that authorities should spend more time resolving the issues instead of coming up with reports in attempts to portray themselves in a better light. Remisier Thomas Tay noticed fewer incidents involving train doors that open and close several times before they finally close. Matt Kwok observed that the Transport Minister had not addressed the public on previous breakdowns. Kheng Chun deemed that the data released by the LTA was useless as it does not make sense to commuters. The netizen suggested reporting the percentage of train services which were on time. Mingchuan Mervyn Xie stated that restoring public confidence in the reliability of the public transport goes beyond putting out statistics. The netizen said that the public needed to feel the results in their everyday commute. Anthony Tan believed that the press release was another way for transport operators to justify a fare increase. Sebastian Poggel felt that Singaporeans were getting too spoiled that they could not even wait 10-15 minutes for a train once in a while. The netizen urged others to try to take a train in Germany which is hailed as one of the most efficient in the world but is known for being late and has much higher fares.
Alexleeweiqiang mentioned that on his/her way to work from Ang Mo Kio to City Hall, the train had been moving and stopping over short distances for at least 20 times. The netizen disapproved of LTAs upgrading the ERP system while it had yet to improve the rail system. ragnarok95 said that train itself was not the issue but the people managing the system.
?Bernie Wong? asked whether the air-conditioning inside train cabin 2311 could be switched on.
?Hai Woo? wrote about his experience during the train disruption on Apr 25. The netizen said that he was lucky to reach Bishan CCL station without getting stuck in the train like many others. He noted that there were only two staff members at the platform disseminating information and controlling the crowd. One of the staff who seemed unsure said the entire CCL was down. However, the staff advised others to continue their journey with the NSL or EWL, not knowing that both lines were disrupted. The netizen had to inform the staff that the NSEWL was down, as he had information from the tweets.The netizen raised a few points from his experience: He wondered why the Circle Line and Bukit Panjang LRT Line were affected by the power dip at Buona Vista power station, since it only supplies power to the NSEWL. The netizen questioned why the LTA MyTransport.sg app was not working, as he did not receive updates on train breakdowns. The netizen highlighted that there was not enough information at Bishan station. It was only after speaking to staff at the CCL platform that he found out about the CCL service disruption. The netizen asked why there were only two staff members at the CCL platform. He also said they were not fully updated with all the necessary information.?Hai Woo? said that he got more information from Facebook, Twitter, and the various news media. He added that there is a long way to go for both SMRT and LTA to get the system fixed. The netizen also said that the public transport system has to be reliable, before a car-lite society can be achieved. He also said that many commuters lack confidence in the train system.
Netizens continued to comment on SMRTs video about a bus captains act of kindness. Dom Yeo stated that the video was one of the best Singaporean company advertisements shown. The netizen stated that the advertisement was near brilliant - subtle and tasteful in its message that could be on par with that of Singapore Airlines and Tokyo Metro's, with tighter editing and shorter duration. He added that the video could have been more heartwarming if SMRT revealed that it was a re-enactment of a true story and showed the actual people involved at the end of the video. Eunice Boon Luan Tan stated that Aunty Bee Choo was the favourite bus captain of passengers of SMRT services 188, 61 and 77. The netizen mentioned that Bee Choo greets all passengers eagerly and brighten their mornings with her smiles and energetic personality. Jason Goh said that the video story line was very good, but did not agree with the company it was promoting for. Anna Didi mentioned that bus captain Bee Choo is a very helpful and cheerful driver.
?Angeline Lee? mentioned that the bus captain of service 970 suddenly came out of the bus bay and cut across three lanes to be able to turn at Holland Avenue. His action caused two cars to brake suddenly. She mentioned that the bus captain had no regard for oncoming traffic and safety of other road users. The netizen asked SMRT to review the stop for service 970 at Holland Road just before turning to Holland Avenue.
?Shahanan Izan? was onboard train set 812 (carriage 8121) on the Circle Line and mentioned that the train vibrated from the time he boarded at Buona Vista Station and even while it was idling at the station platform.
LightningStrikes shared the news story about the train fault at Sengkang LRT that forced commuters to walk on the tracks. SpinFire stated that Singapores LRT system was becoming worse than Malaysia. Ah-Pin-Kor said that the passengers did not panic when the train broke down because they were already used to it. Cloud_Evolution mentioned that it was normal for the maintenance team to arrive 20 minutes after the train stalled. The public could not expect SBS Transit to have people on standby at stations every day waiting for a breakdown. merlin12 wondered why SBS Transit did not just have the passengers wait for the train to be serviced instead of letting them walk on the tracks which was dangerous.
Valery Lee stated that the bus captain of service 77 (SMB3016X) was the only bus captain who had responded to her Thank You, informed passengers of upcoming buildings and landmarks ahead of the bus stop, assists the elderly with a walking stick in alighting from the bus, and wished all passengers a safe journey. The netizen said that she was really impressed with the bus captain for going the extra mile.
On HardwareZone Forum, chengsun stated that SMRT should learn from Shenzhen Metro which launched its subways new Line 11 with a business-class section.Photos circulating online recently showed huge disparity between the ridership for the two sections of the trains: extremely crowded regular sections and very roomy business-class sections with just a few passengers.The business-class fares, between S$1.20 and S$6.10, were three times as expensive as the standard fare. Each train has six standard train cabins and two business-class cabins. Several netizens stated that SMRT should not implement a business-class cabin until they were able to maintain its trains and track properly. Some approved of the idea saying that they would be willing to pay for the more expensive business-class cabin if it promised a more comfortable ride. cyrenic cited that the Dubai metro has introduced a similar scheme.
In an article at Five Stars and A Moon Magazine, Arthur Lee wrote that bus services would no longer be the same with the implementation of the new Government bus contracting model.The bus contracting model would affect two groups of people in a major way: commuters and workers. For commuters, they could look forward to better service levels with all bus services having scheduled headways of no more than 15 minutes during peak periods.The current employees of the incumbent bus operators, however, would be the ones to be most affected by the transition. Although Labour Member of Parliament Melvin Yong stated that the Public Transport Tripartite Committee has ensured that affected bus workers were not short-changed in the transition to the new government bus contracting model, he also showed concern that the latest retrenchment figures from the Ministry of Manpower could affect many workers.In his maiden speech in Parliament, Yong stated that there was an urgent need to optimise the workforce through continued learning to enhance employability.dingster stated that bus services would no longer be the same because the Government had nationalized costs and privatized profits. Mmichael mentioned that the Government had passed the risk of losses to the private sector, as it would now collect 100% guaranteed income in the form of infrastructure rental to the operators.patfong00 wondered how the union could be effective if they were siding with the Government instead of the workers. coldwarmhot claimed that the National Trades Union Congress only acts in the best interest of the Government. The netizen mentioned that there was only bipartism instead of tripartism in Singapore because the workers were missing from the negotiation.
Heavy rains on September 14 resulted in some commuters getting wet while on the train. Commuters on the East-West Line were surprised when train doors opened at Tanah Merah station at around 1:50 p.m.Rain fell from the top of the carriage into the gap between the carriage and the platform, soaking commuters alighting and boarding the train. Rainwater also flowed onto the cabin floors. Some commuters also said that the same situation occurred at Queenstown station. Train service continued to run normally. Some expressed disappointment that Singapore trains could not function similar to the trains in Japan and Taiwan which had almost zero breakdowns. Others mentioned in jest that SMRT has a new waterfall attraction. Jeremy Neo said that defective trains should not be used for revenue service.
A six- carriage train on the North-East Line has been specially decorated as part of the Chinese New Year festivities.The collaboration between the LTA, SBS Transit and Kreta Ayer-Kim Seng Citizens' Consultative Committee was part of the LTA's social initiatives that aim to foster positive commuter culture and improve transport experiences.Train windows had been trimmed with designs of the Monkey - the Chinese zodiac for the upcoming Lunar New Year, and the advertising panels above the seats had been replaced with Chinese horoscope predictions for the 12 zodiacs.A "Prosperity Spot" in the middle of each cabin was also installed to encourage commuters to move in. Several netizens stated that commuters preferred to have to have reliable train services rather than having decorated trains. Others said it was just a waste of money. Some stated that themed trains should not be selective of festivities and should also include Hari Raya, Deepavali, National Day themes among others. A few approved of the themed-trains. Mag Kan wondered if themed trains were supposed to appease commuters if a breakdown occurs during the festive period. millionaire394 said that someone should inform SMRT that the escalator at Buona Vista was constantly breaking down, the whole place was leaking with water, and water pail and rags "permanently" on the floor.
Sam praised two SMRT staff for going above and beyond their duty by helping a man repair his motorised wheelchair that got stuck near the lift at Telok Blangah MRT station. Sam believes that the two SMRT staff are from SMRTs engineering department. He observed that they approached the man and helped him push the wheelchair to the side of the walkway and carried on repairing it. soothsayer stated that the act of the two SMRT staff commands respect.
?Ang Desmond? was asking for witnesses or video footage of an accident that happened along Ang Mo Kio Avenue 3 on Apr 7 at 7:20 p.m.The netizen mentioned that he was not able to avoid the SMRT taxi (SHB831M) driving on the third lane that filtered suddenly to the middle lane.
Bongstar reported that the Circle Line train had a breakdown near Bishan station, towards HarbourFront MRT station. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that the train was manually driven to Bishan Station. Ah-Pin-Kor said that it was only a small hiccup. couscous stated that people should stop the blame culture because the MRT was a very complex project. chris_invent mentioned that it was only a minor disruption and not a breakdown.
In separate press releases, SMRT and SBS Transit announced that 24 of their buses would be diverted due to road closures for Thaipusam this year. 23 of SBS Transit's bus services would skip 10 bus stops along Bencoolen Street, Bras Basah Road, Clemenceau Avenue, Middle Road, Orchard Road, Penang Road and Serangoon Road from 9 p.m. on Jan 23 to 3am on Jan 25. Meanwhile, SMRT's bus service 857 would also skip bus stops along Middle Road, Bras Basah Road and Serangoon Road during the same period. Wang Kang Rong wondered why SBS Transit would skip Penang Road - Dhoby Ghaut Station while SMRT bus services would not skip the said stop.
AUNG KHAING stated that seats on public transport should be offered by anyone to those who need them, without the need of having priority seats.The netizen said that there had been numerous discussions regarding the reserved seats and of bringing about a gracious society. S/he added that kindness should not be forced, regardless of where one sits and stated that signs indicating reserved seating on public transport were unnecessary for a mature and civilised society. Some netizens agreed with the writer that reserved seating signs were unnecessary. Others stated that the reserved seating signs were placed as reminders for commuters to be gracious. Andrew Loh pointed out that there were also such signs on the trains in Japan. Nanny Lila Seeye suggested having designated cabins near the lift to be reserved for the handicapped, elderly, pregnant passengers or parents with babies. Zamuri Bin Mohamed Zain said that seats should be offered to those who need them without having to ask for it but there were, however, many inconsiderate able-bodied people who feel that they deserve to sit on the priority seats.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan mentioned visiting Tampines Bus Interchange to wish the SBST Bus Captains a Happy New Year. He encouraged commuters to remember the dedication of the transport workers who would be working round the clock to ensure that Singapore runs smoothly.The Minister also stated that Tampines would get busier as more build-to-order flats were being built at Tampines North and as the Downtown Line 3 opens next year.
MrSinkie95 stated that trains were already full at Lakeside MRT station. ramlee suggested taking the rebound train. snap99 said that having packed trains was already the norm. jason910 mentioned that the East-West Line was packed to the brim and that s/he was already waiting for the third train as s/he was not able to board the first two.
Ronald Chan wrote that while commuters were now offered more travel options with the recent opening of the Downtown Line 2 and introduction of more bus services, more could still be done to encourage Singapore towards a car-lite society.The netizen suggested having affordable flat rate for rail usage similar to Mexico and Cairo, and fare capping similar to London and Sydney.Ronald Chan mentioned that commuters should not be penalised for heavy usage of the transport network if the Government wanted to encourage more people to adopt public transport more readily. klat wondered why Singapore had not consulted Mexico and Egypt regarding the flat rate fare. Yin yang said that Egypt and Mexico had larger populations than Singapore.
Wans A Deer shared the news story from Channel 8 News regarding an accident at Toh Tuck Avenue where a 25-year old female pedestrian was hit by an SBS Transit bus. The pedestrian was declared dead on the spot and police had arrested the bus driver involved.SBS Transit had not issued any statement about the accident. Several netizens speculated that the female pedestrian was using her mobile phone while crossing the road and advised others to be more aware and not to use any mobile devices when crossing road. uncle168 said that the Infocomm Development Authority should ban all mobile phones and revert back to pagers and call zone phones where there was only signal far away from the road. matchy observed that SBS Transit buses had been involved in many road accidents lately.
white_prince wondered whether SMRT increased the fares again, claiming that the fare was back again to the rates before the December 2015 reduction. Several netizens pointed out that SMRT could not increase the fares without LTAs approval. reddevil82 asked whether the thread starter tapped in and tapped out from the same entry and exit points. m1user suggested getting a refund from SMRT.
Yi JF? hoped that SMRT could ensure that its bus captains drove safely. The netizen mentioned being on board service 184 (SMB1416M) and that the driver kept jerking the bus for no reason. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
?PTWeb Singapore? noticed that the website pages on MRT stations have recently been removed. S/he hoped that the pages could be recovered and updated. The netizen also hoped that the brochure racks at SMRT bus interchanges could be replenished because many were always almost empty and those remaining were in disarray.
Mothership.sg shared a Facebook post about the major power failure at Hong Kongs Central MTR station on Jun 7. It was mentioned that despite the power failure of more than six hours causing early closure of businesses, trains kept moving as usual and commuters could enter and exit the turnstiles.The train operator deployed extra staff to maintain order, while police officers, some wearing reflective vests, were seen patrolling the station. The South China Morning Post also reported that commuters appeared unflustered and continued their journey without difficulty.Wake Up, Singapore also shared Mothership.sgs article on its Facebook page and mentioned that in Singapore, only the MRT fare gantries would be the only thing running in case of power failure. Several netizens stated that MRT fare gantries continued to operate even though the trains were not running during power failures. Donald Lee mentioned that Hong Kongs MTR system has two power generators, one for the trains and one for manning station operations like retail and lifts. Ianni Ni stated that Singapores MRT system also has two power sources, one for the gantries and the other for everything else. Elliot Koh explained that SMRT's version of power redundancy was very different from Hong Kong. When there is one power trip, all would fail except the fare gantries. Daken Akihiro Leon said that different train systems are used in Singapore, and LTA is responsible for deciding which train system is used for the different train lines.
Sum Kam Weng agreed that regulatory requirements should be introduced for GrabCar and Uber drivers, such as having taxi drivers vocational licence, decals for easy identification and security, thorough and methodical screening of prospective drivers and a register of all vehicles operating under the GrabCar and Uber networks.The netizen also suggested that the LTA should reprimand errant GrabCar and Uber drivers similarly to registered taxi drivers, and monitor actual number of vehicles and the spillover demand for certificates of entitlement, in order to project the total number of vehicles on the road. Han Ming Guang could not see how the competition was being fair when GrabCar and Uber drivers were not allowed to pick up passengers on the road.
LTA shared a video showing what happens when trains were sent back to the depot at the end of each days train service.Sylvia and Aylna from Night Owl Cinematics (N.O.C) went to the SMRT Bishan depot for a tour of after-hours train inspection and maintenance activities. They also explored the tunnels of SBS Transits Downtown Line to see how maintenance and repair works were carried out. Bujang Teruna said that LTA should also give Tower Transit Singapore and Go-Ahead Singapore a chance to operate a new line.
A source in Beijing-based China Communications Construction Group, a major construction enterprise of transportation infrastructure and dredging projects, said that the Chinese consortium was preparing to bid for the high-speed rail project (HSR) linking Kuala Lumpur and Singapore. Consortium members were said to be discussing details on how to carry out the project.Sheng Guangzu, General Manager of the China Railway Corp, the leading company in the consortium, said it would also involve another five companies including China Harbor Engineering Company Ltd. The 350-kilometer railway line has attracted not only Chinese companies but also Japan's Kawasaki Heavy Industries, Germany's Siemens and French company Alstom, all of which said they would bid for the project.Experts said on Friday that the Chinese consortium would have an upper hand in bidding for the project especially after China Railway's acquisition of stakes in Bandar Malaysia, a transit hub, and the terminal of the proposed project, as well as in terms of technologies and project costs. Several netizens were apprehensive that the high-speed rail project would be awarded to a Chinese company. Ryo Hikaru hoped that those involved in the Kuala Lumpur-Singapore HSR project would remember how horrible the Malacca "made-in-China" monorail was. The netizen mentioned that the monorail broke down on its opening day and has been idle after it was plagued with technical problems. Sabrina LY Tan said that it would be better to ensure that safety, and not profit, would be the priority.
The plan to build a high-speed rail (HSR) line linking Singapore and Malaysia's capital of Kuala Lumpur has attracted interest from various countries with this kind of technology. Among these countries is reportedly China, which aims to build and perhaps help run the proposed 350km-long track in Malaysia and Singapore. Many netizens disapproved of the project being awarded to a Chinese company. Daniel Tran recommended visiting the construction of the metro in Hanoi, which was being built by a Chinese company, and the other in Saigon by a Japanese company, before making their decision for the Kuala Lumpur-Singapore HSR.
The North-East Line suffered two train faults on Mar 24, with a signalling fault at HarbourFront Station during the morning peak period and a train fault at Kovan Station during the evening peak period. Some netizens stated with sarcasm that a milestone had been achieved by the North-East line for having broken down twice in a day. maipenrai said that having more rail lines could be a good idea to help lessen the load and provide alternative routes to get to same destinations.
Commuters can expect a much better transport experience in 2018 with more buses and better connectivity with the introduction of 80 new routes as part of the Bus Service Enhancement Programme (BSEP).Currently, 95% of feeder services must operate at intervals of at most 10 minutes during the morning and evening peak periods. By next year, all of them would run at intervals of at most eight minutes. ??? stated that there would never be enough buses no matter how many more added to BSEP. The netizen said that it would be more convenient if buses were able to travel everywhere from anywhere and the longest journey should not exceed 60 minutes including waiting time at bus-stop or interchange. Jerry Sierra thanked LTA for doing their best efficiently. Ray Choy mentioned that currently the waiting time was still too long and that LTA should first resolve the said issue.
Blue asked in a post on All Singapore Stuffs website if everyone was aware that eating and drinking onboard the MRT in Singapore was strictly prohibited. The netizen saw a foreigner eating and drinking in the MRT when he boarded the train at City Hall despite the No Eating and Drinking sign that was directly in front of the passenger. The netizen mentioned that the passenger continued to eat in the train until Paya Lebar station.The netizen also claimed that when locals were seen eating and drinking inside the station and trains, staff at the MRT station were quick to apprehend them, whereas the staff seem to be lax when it comes to foreigner passengers. Several netizens stated that the contributor should have reminded the passenger about the rules or report the incident to the authorities instead of taking photos and posting them online.
BrightSky stated that MRT trains should have more reserved seats because many elderly passengers were not able to get a seat. Several netizens stated that there was no need to increase the number of reserved seats on trains because any seated passenger could offer their seats to those who need them. Shadow_Dancer mentioned seeing many passengers giving up their seats to elderly passengers. addict951 agreed with the thread starter that additional reserved seats were needed to cater to many elderly passengers boarding at Novena MRT station. velato2006 suggested having a designated train cabin for the elderly.
The Qingdao Sifang Locomotive and Rolling Stock Company issued a statement on Wednesday (July 8) on the issue of defects in 26 of 35 MRT trains, saying that they did not pose safety risks and that the trains could have continued to run safely.Citing its 116-year history in train manufacturing, Qingdao Sifang added that it felt deeply hurt over the saga and had taken steps to ensure a satisfactory resolution, including communicating with the clients and coming up with solutions.The company, however, has run into other troubles in recent years. Last year, China's National Railway Administration described Qingdao Sifang's management of its suppliers and outsourcing of projects as "chaotic". It also said the company lacked "clear reasons and policies for changing suppliers". Several netizens believed that the focus should not be on the cracks found on the trains but on why SMRT and LTA kept it a secret until a foreign media published the news. Others could not accept that LTA and SMRT compromised safety by using defective trains. Larry Hakuna said that LTA should have been concerned about getting the same company as supplier if China's own National Railway Administration labelled the manufacturers procurement and management as "chaotic".
Tasked to manage SMRTs Media advertising assets while expanding the companys footprint with new digital+ and out-of-home (OOH) assets, XCO Media+ has added to its line-up of media properties the OptiMaX truck.OptiMaX truck was XCO Media+s newest large format OOH advertising asset which easily transforms from a 3D advertising billboard into a travelling store or a pop-up showroom. Jeslyn Tan, Senior General Manager of XCO Media+ who oversees SMRT Media assets, XCO digital+ and OOH assets, said that their plan was to grow their offerings through acquisitions and partnerships. This would allow them to offer a one-stop, comprehensive and integrated multi-media solution.
velato2006 asked SMRT to increase the train frequency at Tanah Merah MRT station on the East-West line. The netizen stated that the waiting time for each train was about 10 minutes and that there were two do not board trains deployed during peak hours. abrams75 said that the turnaround time for trains at Tanah Merah station was too long.
zuppeur stated that the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange has no lift. The netizen mentioned seeing elderly people struggling to use the stairs. Some netizens stated that there were already similar feedback submitted to the LTA regarding the lack of lifts and escalators at the temporary interchange. Others pointed out the interchange was only temporary and would only be used for three years. gameacc said that the problem was that the temporary interchange was on a level much lower than the MRT station and Causeway Point mall entrance which requires almost all human traffic to walk up or down the stairs or long ramps. The netizen mentioned that the Government was saving the taxpayers money while forcing the elderly and disabled people to exercise to the max. plsbanthem wondered which top LTA management gave the approval of the ramp at the temporary bus interchange. The netizen said it was very tiring for disabled people to use.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? asked SMRT to provide additional rubbish bins at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen mentioned that the nearest bin could only be found at berth 3. S/he suggested having one rubbish bin at every berth.
On Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road Facebook Page, a video taken by Lim Lian Chin William was shared showing an accident between an Uber car (SLG317H) and an SMRT taxi along Bras Basah Road. The Uber car, which was on the second lane, suddenly turned right at the last minute, causing the SMRT taxi which was in the first lane to almost hit the group of pedestrians standing on the sidewalk. Several netizens stated that the Uber driver was at fault because he was turning right at the wrong lane. A few noted that if the taxi driver did not speed up, there would be no accident.CMC has highlighted this to the Taxis team for their attention and further follow up with the taxi partner.
?Kelvin Choo? reported on the ongoing issue of bus bunching and inconsistencies in the frequency of bus service 912 during the morning peak period. The netizen mentioned that buses usually arrive in groups of two to three and at times four. The next bus would only turn up after 15 minutes. The netizen urged SMRT to review the bus route and understand the pain points that everyone is facing. In a later post, the netizen said he understood that the bus service plies a long route, however, the issue has been going on for years. He added that SMRTs buses do not communicate with each other when they are on the road, which is the root cause of the problem. He also urged SMRT to look at the possibility of frequency and tracking applications or review bus frequency statistics during peak hours.
London-based transport firm Go-Ahead announced its employment terms for drivers in Singapore at an event with the National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU).The terms include:- A minimum basic starting salary of S$1,865 for bus captains;- A S$2,000 sign-on bonus for experienced captains;- A one-time S$1,000 retention bonus;- A S$430 annual allowance for health, learning, and leisure programmes;- Up to 26 weeks of paid maternity leave for female employees;- Two days of elder care leave per year for all employees;- And free bus and train rides.Go-Aheads basic pay was five to 15% higher than that offered by existing bus operators SBS Transit and SMRT, though their drivers also receive other allowances and incentives.Nigel Wood, Go-Ahead Singapores Managing Director, said he started off as a bus driver in London 21 years ago and could relate to the aspirations of frontline staff.Melvin Yong, Member of Parliament for Tanjong Pagar GRC and NTWU Executive Secretary, said that the NTWU looks forward to building strong labour-management relations with Go-Ahead and that the NTWU Bus Contracting Transition Committee would continue to work closely with Go-Ahead to engage the affected employees, and address any queries or concerns pertaining to the employment package from Go-Ahead. Several netizens stated that Go-Aheads employment package was good and hoped that they would also offer good services. Others speculated that the fares would increase since the company offered higher salary than SBS Transit and SMRT. Peter Tan believed that higher salaries do not always invite overwhelming applications and that there were other important factors such as benefits to be taken into consideration. Alex Chew said that Singaporean bus drivers in SBS Transit and SMRT should seriously consider moving over to Go-Ahead. Ahmad Zainal noted that Go-Ahead did not mention the working hours and shift schedules of bus captains. t0t0t0t0t0t0 wondered if Singapore has similar stories of people rising up the ranks of seemingly dead-end jobs, similar to that of Go-Aheads Managing Director Nigel Wood. raymmm said that employees might start to focus on wages instead of other non-monetary benefits the company offers.
Netizens continued to discuss the taxi drivers seen touting their services outside Orchard Towers in the CBD, which had sparked an outrage amongst honest taxi-drivers. Some netizens stated that taxi drivers caught touting for passengers should have their licences revoked and be banned from driving. William Lim believed that the 12 demerit points and S$500 fine for those caught touting for passengers was too light. The netizen said that the fine should be S$2,000. Edwardo Lee stated that the LTA go undercover to apprehend the touting drivers. Murugasan Kalimuthu claimed that fixed charging on taxis had been happening at Orchard Tower since 1989. Mike Lo asked the LTA, taxi association and Senior Minister of State for Transport Ng Chee Meng to comment on the issue. Jc Seth Ong said that the touting issue was another reason for him to take Uber.
Train services on the North-South, East-West, Circle MRT Lines and the Bukit Panjang LRT were disrupted on the evening of Apr 25. SMRT released a statement which said that the power trip was traced to a power dip at the Buona Vista power intake station. There are five such power intake stations along the North-South and East-West Lines, as well as the Circle Line.SMRT also mentioned that affected commuters could seek fare refunds within the next 14 days from passenger service centres at any SMRT train stations. Several netizens stated that they were stuck inside trains for half an hour without ventilation and light, yet no SMRT staff were sent to assist them. Some questioned the possibility of a car-lite city when the public transport network was unreliable. Some asked why there were no statements from the SMRT CEO and Transport Minister. Shiying Ng mentioned that the directions provided at the Choa Chu Kang LRT station were unclear. The netizen said that the marshal stood at Level 1 and asked commuters to move out without any clear instructions. Raymond Leong thanked all the staff who quickly acted to keep the disruption to a minimum. Isak Osman pointed out that Singapore still has a reliable MRT system despite the breakdowns. The netizen said that most are still ungrateful towards train services, even though it runs well and rarely breaks down. Andrew Leung said that SMRT should install solar panels on all their trains and stations as an alternative power source during blackouts and power trips.
The 20-year-old Polytechnic student who boarded an MRT train drunk, punched a 13-year-old boy and pushed an SMRT station manager, was sentenced to 16 months' probation after he pleaded guilty to the charges. Most netizens stated that the student should also get caned as punishment for his unruly behaviour aside from being under probation. Peter Tan believed that the student should be sentenced to a longer probation period of up to five years. Decrypting Hard Iyanto said that the student should have been tried as an adult since he wanted to act as a grown up person by drinking, creating nuisance and punching people. Low Hung Siang suggested banning alcohol in Singapore.
An online fundraising campaign to help the families of the two SMRT staff who died in an accident near Pasir Ris station has raised close to S$13,000 in just 12 hours after it began. The funds from the campaign would benefit the families of Nasrulhudin Najumudin and Muhammad Asyraf Ahmad Buhari who died in the accident. The decision to start the fundraising came about after the campaigns organisers received many requests by members of the public to help the families and how co-organiser Shariff Rafi felt when he found out about the tragedy. The organisers have contacted SMRT to help transfer the funds to the families after the campaign ends. Many netizens asked why raise money via online media when SMRT had admitted that there were safety lapses. Several stated that SMRT should provide financial compensation to the family of the victims. Optimus Red Mango said that no money would be enough to cover the grief of the families but SMRT should compensate the family.
The Goody Feed team listed eight things they missed about their MRT rides from the 1990s: The trains were crowded but not as crazy as the trains today when commuters could not even get onboard the first train. Commuters could do anything they wanted without the fear of being Stomped. The number of breakdowns were lower. Commuters chatted with friends, or with strangers while onboard the train. Passengers were not always angry. Nowadays, everyone seemed to be in a rush, even during off-peak hours. Kids playing on the pole were scolded by their parents, while parents nowadays allow them to disturb other commuters. Many passengers used to read a book on the train. Nowadays, people watch shows via their mobile devices. The reserved seat was not that scary as it was just another seat in the 1990s, and everyone gave up their seats the moment they saw an elderly or a pregnant woman, without having to post it on social media to tell the world the good deed they have done.
ImFromPipiForum stated that the train interval on the North-South Line during peak hours was worse than the East-West Line. S/he said that it took him/her about 10-15 minutes before s/he could board the train heading to Jurong East at Yishun station, where his/her earlier train had terminated at. wanabfit wondered why SMRT sends trains back to the depot during peak hours.
Dumas T stated that most cabbies complain about Uber and Grab for taking away their business but had not thought of why passengers preferred taking Uber and Grab. The netizen mentioned that most cabbies choose their passengers and locations, did not accept NETS or credit cards as payments, went on longer routes and overcharge passengers by enforcing location charges even when there were none. Some netizens wondered whether the writer was really a taxi driver or was just part of another Uber marketing scheme. Fuzzie Goh said that there were both rogue cabbies and rogue passengers so the blame should be on the taxi companies or LTA for failing to provide a common platform (taxi booking apps) to make taxi booking easy and simple. Vincent Ng Eh assumed that the writer was a new cabby or someone from Comfort. The netizen mentioned that Premier taxis were currently unable to take NETS as the company suspended all NETS function in the terminals. Trans-Cab drivers were only allowed to hit a certain amount of cashless transactions. Travis Suthish Nair said that it was frustrating that commuters could not get a taxi on the road when they need it the most.
On Facebook, SMRT posted a short film showing an SMRT maintenance crew working hard through the night to ensure that trains were running smoothly the next day. The video was SMRTs way of showing appreciation for the hard work and selfless support of their workers. Several netizens stated that the video was very touching and made them appreciate the hard work being put in by the workers. A few asserted that the video was another publicity scheme by SMRT. ybbolb mentioned that after watching the video, s/he would not be frustrated when MRT trains break down. unprofessionalvids said that SMRT should increase the pay of the maintenance workers. yellayeah appreciated the hard work by SMRT workers but stated that the frequent MRT breakdowns were still unacceptable. Wu Tong replied to yellayeah who compared the rail system to that of other countries, that Singapores train service was totally acceptable. The netizen mentioned that everyone was doing their best in their jobs, and a little encouragement or gratitude would go a long way for them. GTGameOn believed that the problem was with the management and not the workers. The netizen said that the workers deserved a higher pay because it was not easy to work in the wee hours just to ensure that commuters would have a smooth ride to work or school the next day. Dante Yuxuan thanked SMRT and its staff for their hard work.
?WeiTeckk Kyuhyunrox? reported that the air-conditioning in train cabins 509/510 was not cold. The netizen suggested the use of the emergency communication button to allow passengers to alert train captains of such situations immediately without disrupting train services.
Netizens posted on social media channels about the delay along the North-South Line during the morning peak period on June 1. It was reported on Shin Min Daily News Facebook page that readers had given feedback that announcements at Newton station mentioned that there was a track fault at Marina Bay station, and there was no train service between Raffles Place and Marina Bay stations. Most netizens stated that there were no announcements from SMRT on either Twitter or Facebook regarding the disruption. Some pointed out that delays that were less than 30 minutes were not being counted as disruptions. Others did not notice any delays along the North-South Line. flowerpot_cat said there was no train service from Raffles Place to Marina Bay Station. Nickzz said that he was stuck at Toa Payoh. kiatkiat mentioned hearing an announcement notifying commuters to expect a delay of 25 minutes.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) stated that the number of applications for taxi-driver vocational licences fell from 9,094 in 2013 to 7,968 last year as the private-hire alternatives such as Uber and Grab grow more popular. The development comes as no surprise to taxi industry players who have been facing increasing competition from the private-hire sector.Neo Nam Heng, Chairman of diversified motor group Prime, which has both taxi and private-hire businesses, said that this was just the beginning. He mentioned that the taxi industry would eventually not have enough drivers to replace those who were retiring. Meanwhile, Lim Chong Boo, Premier Taxi Managing Director appealed to level the playing field by removing all the quality of service standards measuring safety, taxi drivers conduct and response to call booking as well as taxi availability standards, which are not required of private-hire car drivers. Several netizens believed that fewer drivers apply for the taxi-driver vocational licences because of the high taxi rental rates. Spencer Yeong mentioned it was not easy taking the vocational licence test and that the cabbies had to shoulder fuel, repair and other miscellaneous costs, which eat into their take-home income. Jimmy Tan said that LTA should remove unnecessary pressure on taxi drivers. He mentioned that there were too many rules implemented for taxi drivers. Hoo Yewgee mentioned that there were a number of unhappy Uber and Grab drivers complaining on social media. Jimmy Beany wondered whether Uber and Grab really offer better services or they seemed to be better because they offer flexibility without the rules that govern taxi companies.
London-based Tower Transit announced that it would be increasing the pay of its bus drivers and staff members by 3.5% starting May.With the news, SBS Transit was expected to follow suit and raise salaries. Tammy Tan, SBS Transits Senior Vice President of Corporate Communications said the company would make an announcement soon after talks with the union.Tower Transits pay rise would benefit more than 700 of its employees, including bus drivers on the 26 services to be taken over by the company from May 29. This would be Tower Transits first annual increment to its staff members after coming to an agreement with the National Transport Workers Union.Andrew Bujtor, Tower Transits Singapore Managing Director believed that the increment would fit nicely with the SkillsFuture Sectoral Manpower Plan for the public bus industry to attract and retain bus captains. Gerard Koh, SMRT Vice President of Human Resources, said that SMRT would keep the total remuneration for its bus captains (which includes overtime pay and allowances) market-competitive. Several netizens applauded Tower Transit for offering a pay rise to its bus captains. Ng KiatKuan said that the pay rise by Tower Transit will pressure SMRT and SBS Transit to remunerate their employees better. Tan Kwong Moh hoped that with better pay, bus captains would also provide better services.
Commuters were surprised to see a pigeon inside a train on the North East Line.Several commuters were seen capturing the unusual sight on their smartphones. The video of the incident was also shared online. Several stated in jest that the pigeon might have been tired of flying and decided to take the MRT instead. Others wondered how the pigeon got inside the train. Lewis Poon said that SMRT could use the incident as another excuse for MRT breakdowns. Paul Yeow stated in jest that SMRT management might be wondering whether the pigeon paid for the ride. Derrick Chan said that the pigeon shared the same popularity as Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan, saying that when the Minister took the MRT once, many netizens posted about it online.
An SMRT taxi crashed into a concrete barrier of a bus stop at Hougang Street 21 on September 16. Two netizens sent photos of the accident to Stomp.Based on the photos, the front of the taxi sustained severe damage after mounting the kerb and hitting the barrier. A Police spokesperson stated that they were alerted to an accident and that the male driver was conveyed conscious to Tan Tock Seng Hospital. TLOWE observed that majority of taxi drivers in Singapore could be classified asF1 style drivers and or as super slow drivers. Sally Ng claimed that the taxi driver almost hit an SBS Transit bus before the accident. Horngchuan Lim asked whether the taxi driver tried to avoid the bus that was trying to cut the lane to the bus stop.CMC has alerted Taxis on the incident.
Li Coco thanked the cabby of taxi with plate number SHB1023Y for finding her mobile phone and returning it to her.
An alleged SMRT taxi driver, Peter Quek, was said to have made bookings with GrabCar at odd hours of the night or give bogus destinations and pick-up locations for over nine months since November 2015.Besides giving fake destinations or pick-up points, Quek would make excuses for not boarding the ride after the driver had arrived, claiming he already had another taxi. He would then force drivers to cancel the booking, a move which would affect the driver's cancellation rate and reduce the incentive payment they receive from Grab.Grab, the firm behind GrabCar, said it has "permanently banned" Quek from the ride-hailing platform after investigating a complaint against him from a driver. SMRT Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan said SMRT was conducting its own investigations into the matter. Several netizens stated that SMRT should take action against the taxi driver. Others mentioned that the taxi driver should be banned from driving taxis and private car-hire vehicles. Yuan Kiew claimed hearing from a few Comfort taxi drivers that SMRT taxi drivers were infamous for their bad demeanour.
Kelvin Tan? shared an article getting people to stand on both sides of the escalator making travelling more efficient and safe as a result. The netizen mentioned that it was something interesting to consider for the stations with longer escalators such as those at Raffles Place and City Hall.
?Vincent Leong? asked SMRT to lower the volume of onboard announcements as they were too loud. The SMRT Facebook administrator has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can follow up.
Tower Transit had just started its first nine bus services in Singapore but has already planned on expanding its presence in the island. The Anglo-Australian firm said it would compete in an upcoming tender - likely to be held next month - to run more bus routes.Adam Leishman, Tower Transits Chief Executive, stated that they are very committed to growing their business in Singapore and that they would absolutely be bidding for the third bus package. Some netizens suggested that LTA should also consider applying the contracting system to the MRT system. Peter Tan considered it a refreshing sight to see green-coloured buses instead the red ones. He stated the city would become more lively and vibrant with the additional colours for buses. Roy Tan Kong Wei wondered whether Tower Transit would provide free shuttle services during train breakdowns.
nauhchop shared screenshots of the Facebook post of Calvin Cheng, a former Nominated Member of Parliament, about concerns on security, because a foreign news agency was able to fly drones over the SMRT train depot and take surveillance videos and photos. He also stated that the reporters who flew the drones over a restricted area should be arrested and jailed.The netizen stated that instead of discussing the reasons why MRT trains were sent back to its manufacturer, Calvin Cheng discussed on the issue of drones. cute_togepi claimed that the drones were not flown over any SMRT depots but were flown above water around the ports, then zoomed in. sunsetbay showed how weak SMRTs security was because it did not detect the drones. Poomer was more concerned that SMRT kept silent about the defects since 2013 until a foreign news agency discovered about them. cybercom8 said that the defects and security concerns were two issues that had to be addressed separately.
Taxi authorities and passengers have reacted to the announcement that the Government plans to regulate the private hire sector through the licensing of drivers and registration of vehicles because it did not mention insurance needs. They called for more clarity about how private hire cars used by GrabCar and Uber are insured. The National Taxi Association has called for standardisation of coverage for the private hire sector. Straits Times readers have also written in asking whether they are covered by insurance when they take Uber and GrabCar rides. Peh Chee Keong, NTUC Income Vice President for Motor Insurance, said it insures Uber and GrabCar vehicles under its private car policy. A comprehensive policy at S$2,100 annually, which offers personal accident benefits of up to $$10,000 per passenger, and medical benefits of up to S$300 per passenger. Lim Kell Jay, head of Grab Singapore, said that it was common for drivers to choose third-party coverage only. Warren Tseng, Uber Singapore General Manager, said that in the event of an accident, passengers could claim against the driver's compulsory insurance. Lee Kokhoong stated that Uber and Grab services was good for Singaporeans because there was shortage of available taxis in the CBD especially during peak hours. Peter Wong claimed that the intention of taxi operators in questioning the insurance coverage of third-party hirers was to kill Uber by finding faults. CT Chew mentioned that rather than making the fares more affordable and competitive, taxi groups decided to tackle unimportant issues.
In response to the free magnets in the information packs Paving the way for better journeys distributed by SMRT to homes located along the East-West Line, yonglimm stated that SMRT assumed that commuters outrage towards the frequent breakdowns would be pacified with the freebie. Several netizens felt that giving out free magnets was a waste of money, and that the money should have been used to maintain the rail system. yonglimm said that the money spent on the magnets was a PR stunt to fix PR problems but not technical problems. Others were interested in collecting the magnets and asked where to get them.
Netizens continued to discuss the number of Station Managers and Assistant Managers at Joo Koon MRT station, posted by gatecrasher in AsiaOne Forum on June 7. Several netizens believed that Joo Koon MRT station was not overstaffed. kooldog59 stated that the thread starter should first find out how SMRT defines the role of its Station Managers and Assistant Station Managers before complaining. Mmichael assumed that the thread starter happened to be at Joo Koon Station during the changing of shifts where he saw twice the staff strength. Thread starter GateCrasher stated that there were more than the necessary number of Managers and Assistant Managers at the station. The netizen added that the station also has a Service Operation Manager and supervisors. PowerPeople mentioned that having four Station Managers was just about the right number for the station since each shift would have a Station Manager and an Assistant Manager in addition to the more senior managers.
On Facebook, Wake Up, Singapore stated that the LTA seemed to have already made up its mind about the CRL going through the nature reserve and asked what was the point of having a "dialogue". Several netizens believed that the dialogue was just a form of wayang. Tommy Ng stated with sarcasm that the dialogue was to convince people that the Government was right and the public was wrong. Saifudin Mohamed Ibrahim said that the Government should focus on improving the present system to reduce breakdowns.
Nur A claimed that an SMRT taxi had stolen a months worth of groceries from his/her Aunt who took the taxi at the Jurong West Street 41 taxi stand near block 492 on Feb 4.The netizen said that as soon as his/her Aunt alighted with her child, the taxi suddenly left even after being informed that there were many items in the car boot. When the netizen called SMRTs hotline to look for their belongings, s/he was informed by the customer service officer that "no such thing" happened and the groceries could not be found. While several netizens disapproved of the taxi drivers behaviour, some believed that the driver had no intention of stealing the grocery items and might just be rushing to another booking. Others questioned the authenticity of the story saying that the S$150-worth of groceries would not be sufficient for a month. Some said that the netizen should not blame the taxi driver for driving off because his/her Aunt was the one who forgot to take the groceries when she alighted from the taxi. Johnson Chong said that it was a disgrace for the taxi industry to have such a driver. Tan Seng Hoo suggested requesting for a receipt whenever s/he took a taxi as it would have the taxi number and time and date the taxi was taken. Clarence Ho said that if it was a Comfort cab, the taxi could be traced.
?Samantha Bek? complimented an SMRT staff at Bishan Station for his friendliness to commuters. The netizen said that she hopes to brighten up someones day with her post on SMRTs facebook page, as she noticed that most of the posts on the page were complaints.The netizen mentioned that her son always looks forward to seeing MRT Uncle Zainodin at Bishan Station every morning. Despite his age, the netizen said that Zainodin would always squat and give her son a big hug. They would chat with each other while waiting for the train despite the short two-minute wait. ?Samantha Bek? added that her son calls Zainodin Star Wars uncle because of the 'light saber' he carries around. She said that the gesture might be small but it had brightened up her sons mornings, and would like to express her gratitude to him. Many netizens also praised Zainodin for his friendly demeanour. Grace Chai thanked the netizen for the post, and stated that these are exactly the kind of posts the Internet needs instead of the usual complaints. The netizen urged others to be gracious to praise. Several netizens shared similar experiences at Bishan station, saying that Zainodin was always smiling and polite despite the crowd at Bishan. Clement Phua mentioned having observed a staff at Yew Tee who was very friendly and have done well in keeping the foot traffic flowing. Yvonne Yeo said that there was a cheerful staff at Raffles Place MRT station who greeted passengers with a warm smile and a "Good morning" even though nobody bothered to reply or smile in return. Ctea Rosli also said that there is an Indian lady staff at Jurong East MRT who will always be standing at the passenger service centre greeting passengers Good morning, which brightens up the passengers day every morning. Calvin Li said that after seeing many positive feedback about frontline staff of SMRT working hard to provide the best service, he hopes that the company can reward them for their efforts and boost their morale.
GateCrasher reposted the Mar 23 post from The Independent Singapore about Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans promise to the Singapore Democratic Party that he would leave no stones unturned on the death of two SMRT staff. Black_Horse stated that the issue was not about leaving any stones unturned but what would be done after they found out the real cause of the accident. garone said that Minister Khaw would just re-classify the meaning of "stone" so all the "problem stone" and no problems would be found in the final outcome. bats4ever mentioned that the signalling box should open on the side of the walkway and not the track, which would be a safer approach for technicians to work on.
Heng Cho Choon wrote about taxi drivers playing the cat-and-mouse game with commuters. The netizen mentioned that many taxis could be seen with the green light on, signalling availability, but would not stop for commuters hailing them on the road or at taxi stands which have long queues of waiting passengers. The netizen, however, was able to get a taxi several times within a few minutes by booking via the taxi company booking system, but incurred a booking surcharge. Once, a taxi which refused to stop when hailed was the same one that arrived after s/he used the booking service. Heng Cho Choon urged for the issue to be resolved as soon as possible, saying that the shortage of taxis was unique to Singapore. The netizen mentioned that s/he had no difficulty hailing a taxi in Malaysia, Jakarta and Bangkok.
In a news release, the LTA announced the awarding of three civil contracts worth S$948M to build the Tanjong Rhu, Katong Park and Marine Terrace MRT stations on the East Coast stretch of the upcoming Thomson-East Coast Line (TEL).One contract, worth approximately S$294M, was awarded to Bachy Soletanche Singapore - Wai Fong Construction Joint Venture for the construction of the Tanjong Rhu station and tunnels, while the S$293M contract for the Katong Park station and tunnels was awarded to Shanghai Tunnel Engineering.For the Marine Terrace station and tunnels, the joint venture of Ssangyong Engineering and Construction and Hyundai Engineering & Construction won the award of the contract worth S$361M. Construction work for the stations are expected to start by the first quarter of 2016 and targeted to complete in 2023.LTA said that the Marine Parade station, Tanjong Rhu and Marine Terrace stations would also serve as Civil Defence shelters along the East Coast stretch of TEL. JF Gary Tom hoped that the Government would learn from other first world countries, copy the best features and designs of their rail systems, and ensure that the new tracks and stations would be able to handle emergency situations such as removing carriages and faulty trains without disrupting normal train services.
?Cheng Yuan Kang? informed SMRT that the air-conditioner at train set 3352 was not blowing enough cold air and that the driver kept switching the air-conditioner off.
?Glenc Soh? reported that one of the bendy buses on service 960 departed Tampines Interchange without picking up passengers. The netizen mentioned that the queue for service 969 was usually long and that the bus captain should not depart without picking up any passengers.The netizen asked SMRT to take action against the bus captain. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Non-Constituency Member of Parliament Dennis Tan, asked Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan in Parliament whether any of the MRTs components or systems were operating past the manufacturers recommended end-of-life date, and what is the planned approach to replacing these components or systems. MP Tan also asked what measures do the Ministry plan to take to ensure systematic timely replacement of MRT parts and systems.The Transport Minister replied that trains are a very complicated system, much more complicated than, say, cars, and so one cannot just simply go law by law. He added that the manufacturers recommendations were just a guide, and that rail reliability is an engineering problem and should be left with the engineers to solve and emphasised that the rail system was not quite what the public, commentators and critics wanted but improvements were being made. Several netizens stated that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should give direct answers and simply ask the assistance of MRT engineers in explaining about technical matters. Some believed that Minister Khaw did not have any knowledge on how to improve the rail system or how to prevent it from breaking down. Others stated that poor preventive maintenance budget planning caused the deterioration of the rail system. Aaron Loy said that rail problems did not happen overnight and were chronic issues that had built up over the years. The netizen wondered whether the issues could still be resolved. 1SMRTPAIB pointed out that questions were submitted to the relevant Ministries-in-charge prior to Parliament sitting, so Minister Khaw had more than enough time to get all the relevant information. gamerx believed that MP Dennis Tans intention was to raise questions on whether the continued SMRT breakdowns were due to any systemic issues that the authorities have overlooked, and to solicit an explanation from the Transport Minister. Mystyque said rail tracks did not exactly have a fixed lifespan but it depends on the load placed on them and the usage.
The MTR Corporation (MTRC) has admitted to awarding a contract to train manufacturer CSR Qingdao Sifang Locomotive and Rolling Stock Co. Ltd despite knowing of train defects. The issue came to light after a Hong Kong news agency reported that Singapore had sent trains found to have cracks, back to the manufacturer for repairs.MTRC said that it knew of the cracks in the Singapore trains in 2014 but was assured by SMRT that they do not compromise safety.On Wednesday (July 6), when asked about Singapore's experience, Hong Kong Transport Secretary Anthony Cheung said he was not aware of the matter. Later, however, he acknowledged that his bureau had indeed received the e-mail messages about the defective trains but that he himself had not read them. University of Hong Kong Transport Researcher also said that deciding on manufacturers depended on both quality and cost. Despite problems with quality control, the defects were not absolutely critical and buyers would be willing to accept that if it came at a third of the price. Some netizens stated that safety should never be compromised because of costs. Kiam Wee Ng wondered why SMRT informed the Hong Kong Government of the train defects and said nothing to its commuters. Livia Lim believed that SMRT or LTA did not cover up the fact about the defective trains since it had sent back the trains.
?Car Tzy reported waiting for bus service 913 for about 15 minutes. The netizen hoped that the bus frequency could be improved.
Muhd Naz Farihin? wrote to clarify why there was no bus service 912M on September 2. The netizen mentioned asking the staff at the Passenger Service Centre about the said bus but was informed that the service was under the previous operator, Commute Solutions, despite the poster stating that service 912M was now being operated by SMRT.
Litmuss posted about a track fault at Joo Koon MRT station on the East-West Line in the morning of August 1. Poomer mentioned that only two gantries were open at Pioneer Station and people had to queue for about five minutes before they could enter. treeskull posted at 8:53 a.m. citing that the crowd had cleared after an empty train came.
SMRT submitted a bid for the construction of a public rail network in Bandung, Indonesia, in partnership with Indonesian engineering firm T-Files Indonesia. In a Singapore Exchange (SGX) filing, SMRT said the bid for the "Framework of Investment Construction of Corridor 1 Rail-Based Public Transportation and its Supporting Facilities in Bandung City" was submitted on September 9, the same date the tender closed. SMRT said the award of the tender would be subject to agreement on the terms of the project, and that it had not received any notification on the outcome of the tender. SMRT also stated that the development was not expected to have an impact on its net tangible assets per share or earnings per share for the current financial year, should it be awarded to the consortium. In a Facebook post on September 19, Bandung Mayor Ridwan Kamil wrote that SMRT had been awarded the tender for Corridor 1 and that construction would begin by 2017 if all went well. SMRT declined to comment beyond the SGX filing it issued. Most netizens stated that SMRT could not even cope in maintaining the rail system in Singapore and was still looking for rail projects overseas. Others wondered why Indonesia would award the project to SMRT given the number of issues faced by transport operator. Erich Dang said that there was no such thing as a perfect train system that even the Swiss and German rail systems experienced breakdowns once in a while. The netizen added that Singapore has been doing a good job of keeping the network in shape and minimizing all aspects of failure.
LTA and SMRT stated on Monday (September 5) that the signal interference affecting the Circle Line trains have ceased and trains have been operating normally since 4 p.m. last Friday (September 2).In a joint statement on Saturday (September 3), LTA and SMRT said that they were continuing with the investigations and that they have worked with IDA and mobile operators to suspend telecommunication signals along the Circle Line for short periods of time should the incident recur. Several netizens asked whether the cause of the intermittent signals has been determined. HS Ng was concerned that the signal interference might be an attempt to sabotage the MRT.
Grampa asked if he could complain for harassment because his bag had been checked by MRT staff members in several occasions especially during off-peak period. Most netizens stated that the staff was simply doing his/her job. Some said that the netizen might have looked like a terrorist. Others suggested using a different coloured bag and see if the staff would still check his bag. kiatkiat asked if the netizen carried a large bag because MRT staff usually check commuters with large bags regardless of their nationality.
?Vivian Lee? thanked the Station Manager and Service Ambassador at Clementi MRT station for assisting her when she felt unwell and took her to the nearest taxi stand and got a cab for her.
Three lanes of Upper Changi Road East towards Bedok were closed following a "road surface depression" that appeared on Jun 15 where advance works for the Thomson-East Coast MRT line were being carried out. The police also sent out a tweet at 1:59 p.m. alerting motorists to use alternative routes. Some netizens stated that Singapore would soon sink due to all the underground digging being done. FT PRIDE hoped that a thorough check will be done before the reopening of roads to traffic. wakui00 said it was better that the roads caved in now while construction was still ongoing than have it cave in when digging was already completed.
Amk Festivals? reported that a staff at Ang Mo Kio Station was seen smoking inside a covered area on Dec 29, 2015 at around 1:35 p.m.
On Facebook, 938LIVE asked netizens what types of improvements they would like to see to be able to accept a possible fare hike. Most netizens hoped to see better frequency and shorter waiting times for buses. Several stated that bus timings stated at bus stops and on bus apps should be accurate. Others mentioned that bus captains, especially Chinese drivers, should be trained well in bus routes, safety, attitude towards passengers, and should learn to speak and understand basic English before being allowed to drive on Singapore roads. Some said that bus routes should have wider coverage.
Students from the Singapore Chinese Girls School named the four Tunnel Boring Machines (?#?TBMs) at the TBM launching ceremony at the Thomson East-Coast Lines (TEL) Stevens Station on Apr 2.The TBMs were named after Greek Goddesses Hestia, Bia, Gaia and Harmonia. Measuring 6.6metres in diameter and weighing over 660 tons each, the TBMs would dig through 413 thousand tons of soil to lay a total of 5.9km of tunnels. Targeted for completion by 2021, Stevens Station will connect the TEL to the Downtown Line. Commuters boarding from Stevens Station would just be three MRT stations away from Orchard Station. Wing Shun Kong asked out of curiosity whether the Tunnel Boring Machines were reused from previous projects.
?Jasper Lee? suggested for SMRT to deploy most of its MAN A22 buses with VOITH DIWA gearbox (four gears) on basic and feeder services that do not frequently utilise the expressway to save on fuel costs.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) and the Singapore Economic Development Board (EDB) would have the opportunity to study whether new electric vehicle business models would be viable for Singapore's land transport network after local firm HDT Singapore Taxi runs its fleet of fully-electric taxis on Singapore roads starting the first week of September as part of a trial. In a media release on July 25, HDT said its e-taxi service would operate for eight years with vehicles provided by BYD, a Chinese-based auto and battery manufacturer. The electric taxis would take about 90 minutes to charge fully, and HDT said it would implement the necessary charging infrastructure.It is also looking to introduce a new business model, where taxi drivers become full-time employees and would receive benefits under the Singapore Employment Act. Several netizens believed that hiring taxi drivers as full time employees would not be profitable to the operator since they would need to provide benefits such as medical and annual leaves, bonuses and Central Provident Fund aside from the basic and overtime pay. Some stated in jest that taxi drivers would now be able to use low battery as a new excuse for not being on the roads. Others wondered about the charging downtime and locations of charging bays. A few agreed that taxi drivers should now be full-time employees of the taxi company. Sean Pang stated that LTA should look into consolidating taxi fare rates and payment methods amongst the different companies in Singapore so as to avoid confusing commuters and tourists.
?Thomas Daniel? hoped that Tower Transit could take over SMRT bus service 806 in the future so that passengers would have new wheelchair accessible buses instead of the old Hispano buses.
???? mentioned that the air-conditioning of train cabin number 1322 at Sembawang Station was switched off and that commuters were perspiring throughout the journey to Jurong East.
On July 18, SMRT announced a continuation of the trading halt of its shares of stocks "pending a possible announcement". Trading of the Singapore rail operator's shares was also halted on July 15 when the company announced that it would transfer its rail assets to the Government for S$991M. According to a Bloomberg report which cited an unnamed source with knowledge of the matter, Temasek Holdings was weighing an offer to buy all the SMRT shares it does not already own.When contacted, Temasek said it "does not comment on market speculation and rumours", while SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan also said he "does not comment on market speculation and rumours".Economist Song Seng Wun of CIMB Private Banking in Singapore stated that the buyout would make the transport system simpler and would reduce the pressure of having to answer to shareholders while the Government addresses pressure from the public. Many netizens stated that the buyout would amount to de-facto Government ownership as Temasek Holdings was essentially Government-owned. Several wondered whether it would be a buyout or bailout for SMRT after the issue on defective trains and the announcement of LTAs takeover of SMRTs rail assets. Some asked whether the buyout would result to the nationalisation of the rail system. Some asked about how taxpayers money will be utilised as commuters are at the losing end. QJPtheSE asked whether SBS Transit would be nationalized as well. Yue Kaey Tang claimed that the recent events had already been pre-planned since the previous year.
SMB388S stated that at 7 a.m., the eastbound train was arriving at an interval of six minutes. purpleflock assumed that the long interval was due to the weather. Standing Birdy mentioned that the northbound evening train at the North-South Line also had a six-minute frequency.
?Shahanan Izan? reported that the train (V114) at the Bukit Panjang LRT line had a very terrible leak affecting the dual priority seats.The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
A fire broke out during the evening rush hour on Mar 3 at the construction site of Tanjong Pagar Centre, spreading black smoke to affected parts of Tanjong Pagar MRT station. Several entrances to Tanjong Pagar MRT station, which is under the construction site, were temporarily closed while the fire was ongoing. No injuries were reported in the blaze and the cause of the fire was still under investigation. Darren Tay observed that Tanjong Pagar Station seemed to have many problems. The netizen speculated that the stations Feng Shui was not good. He added that he usually avoids using the station. Edeson Low mentioned that people were not allowed to take the MRT which caused confusion among commuters. Edwaard Tan found it strange that the worksite had no firefighting equipment.
Lucas Sia was disappointed for being charged S$0.78 after exiting one gantry opposite Choa Chu Kang MRT station.
A letter signed by more than 10,000 people addressed to Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was sent to the authorities on Jun 6 to rethink possible plans to build a MRT tunnel under Singapore's largest nature reserve.The Love Our MacRitchie volunteer group collected the signatures between Jun 17, 2013 and May 5, 2016.Chloe Tan, a Love Our MacRitchie Forest volunteer said in the letter that ensuring urban development does not harm the nature reserve will ensure that future generations will continue to reap the benefits of having healthy and intact rainforests in the heart of our city.The Land Transport Authority had acknowledged receipt of the petition letter from the volunteer group. Several netizens agreed that the nature reserve should be preserved. Others stated that the nature reserve would not be affected as the rail line would be underground. Some pointed out that the underground rail would save travel time by 20 minutes.
Bin Hao? commended SMRT senior bus captain Nga Yook Lian of service 964 (SMB5893S) for providing a pleasant ride by driving and braking smoothly. One of the photos shared by the netizen was grabbed from SMRTs Facebook page.
In connection with the Freon gas leak on a train at Tanjong Pagar MRT station on August 15, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated in Parliament on August 16 that the affected train was an old one and cited a lesson to be learnt - that old assets are not the same as new ones, and particular attention must be paid to maintenance. Its like the human body, he said. If you look after your body well from Day One, when you are 40 or 50 years old, you can maintain pretty good form. But a 40-year-old is not the same as a 14-year-old, and likewise for trains. Celine Michel mentioned that old trains should not have been used for revenue service.
It was reported that Malaysia and Singapore would be signing a memorandum of understanding (MOU) on Jul 19 to build a high-speed rail (HSR) linking Kuala Lumpur and Singapore. The fast-speed train link would cut travelling time between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur to 90 minutes, compared with more than four hours by car.The proposed 350km-long HSR line would have one terminus in a new township called Bandar Malaysia at the edge of Kuala Lumpur, with the other in Jurong East.The MOU would pave the way for detailed negotiations on the main bilateral agreement, which was expected to be signed by the end of this year.A spokesman for Singapore's Ministry of Transport told The Straits Times: "We are working towards signing the MOU on July 19. We are still in the process of confirming the details." Several netizens were uncertain that the project would push through or be successful with Malaysia being the business partner. Some mentioned that travelling time would be longer than 90 minutes if immigration and custom checks would be included in calculating total travel time. Others hoped that the construction of the HSR would not be awarded to a Chinese company. Ng KiatKuan suggested that the immigration staff check the necessary documents onboard the train. Vincent Sharon believed it would be most cost effective to build another causeway to ease the traffic jam.
Wang Kang Rong? wondered why only service 857 would be affected by the road closures for Thaipusam. The netizen noted that SBS Transit bus services would skip the Dhoby Ghaut bus stop, hence SMRT services 106, 190, 700A and 972 that also use Dhoby Ghaut bus stop should also be affected.
Saras Vathy boarded bus service 965 with licence plate number SMB239P from Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange and observed that aside from greeting passengers boarding the bus, bus captain Vasantan Subramaniam also sounds the horn when approaching some bus stops. When asked by the netizen about the reason for sounding the horn, the bus captain replied that he was just alerting the passengers that the bus has arrived because some passengers were busy playing with their mobile phones. The netizen was pleased that the bus captain was taking the extra mile to serve commuters.
As Go-Ahead Singapore started its bus operations on September 4 with the launch of 13 bus services in Punggol, it was observed that some buses were delayed by up to five minutes in leaving the interchange. Mr Nigel Wood, Go-Ahead Singapore Managing Director, said that the issue might be caused by a technical problem with a software. He added that spare buses would be deployed when buses were late to make sure the passengers' journeys were not affected.Overall, commuters were pleased with the new operator. (buses[IN]gapore!) noted that some of Go-Ahead services have long frequencies. Will Keith Chan was disappointed for waiting up to 45 minutes for bus service 119 at the bus stop at Sengkang Station in the direction of Punggol. Cheo Kien Sing observed that three double-decker buses arrived within four minutes. The netizen wondered what the time keeper was doing or whether Go-Ahead has a control centre. Ryan Chng hoped that the bus schedules would be sorted out before the students take their major exams on September 19.
Jordan Chua Chiam Siang agreed that bus operators should not be rewarded for improving services in response to what DAVID YAP PENG KHOON had written on TODAY Online Voices on May 16. He said that Land Transport Authority (LTA) should justify the reward given to the operators. The writer stated that as a layman and commuter, he could not understand why transport operators were fined for train breakdowns but rewarded for improved bus services. The writer said that transport companies were listed companies being helped by the Government using taxpayers money.
tree trunk reported that train stops were not announced on the train at the Circle Line. The netizen added that it was difficult to see what station the train was in because the lights were dim and the signs were so small. Some netizens stated that there were display screens inside the trains showing the approaching station. tree trunk replied that the display screen inside was faulty because it only showed Dakota Station during the journey.
uberian shared a video which compared the transport systems of Singapore, Hong Kong and Taipei through the experiences of their respective locals. Tanyushing observed in the beginning of the video that the average salary of a Singaporean was higher than that of Hong Kong and Taipei, hence those from Hong Kong and Taipei felt that their public transport was more expensive. z827 said that the metro in Taiwan was not too different from Singapores. The netizen also mentioned that the air-conditioning in Taiwan trains were not turned down during non-peak hours as compared to SMRT and that the trains smell clean.
The world's first self-driving taxis operated by nuTonomy, an autonomous vehicle software startup, started picking up selected passengers in Singapore, beating Uber which plans to offer rides in autonomous cars in Pittsburgh by a few weeks.The service started with six cars that would progressively grow to a dozen by the end of the year. According to nuTonomy officials, their ultimate goal was to have a fully self-driving taxi fleet in Singapore by 2018 and help reduce the number of cars on Singapore's congested roads. The taxis would only be running in a 2.5-square area of one-north, with specified pick-up and drop-off locations. Riders, however, must have an invitation from nuTonomy to use the service. Mr Doug Parker, nuTonomy's Chief Operating Officer, said that autonomous taxis could ultimately reduce the number of cars on Singapore's roads from 900,000 to 300,000. Many netizens were apprehensive of the self-driving taxis, expressing concerns regarding safety. Several asked who would be responsible if the vehicle suddenly met with an accident or malfunctioned in the middle of the road. Others pointed out that Google had been testing self-driving cars for years already but has been finding unanticipated problems with the cars. Some asked how the self-driving taxis could reduce the number of cars on the road from 900,000 to 300,000. Several surmised that taxi drivers would soon be out of their jobs if the new technology proves to be successful. Kwityurbeliakin believed that some things should not be automated. Fadly Azad was optimistic about driverless cars but believed that drivers are still needed for now as even current aircraft auto-pilot technology still needed human intervention. AngCherLing asked if the Government has any back up plans for those taxi drivers who would be unemployed. NorHelmi Maryuti said that self-driving taxis should have dedicated lanes on public roads to eliminate external factors beyond the cars automated control and detection.
?Vivien Ngo? mentioned noticing a man in a bright yellow shirt and tattered jeans boarding the train at Chinatown MRT station towards Bukit Panjang. The netizen said the man started fiddling with some lock and panel at the front of the train. Subsequently, he moved on to other parts of the train to work on some other components. The netizen said she felt very disturbed, not knowing whether the man was a train staff. Upon alighting the train, she noticed the man walking alongside a staff in uniform in the train. The netizen stated that regardless of whether the man was a contractor or a staff on duty, he should have an identification lanyard or be properly dressed in uniform.
For the Parliamentary sitting on August 15, Members of Parliament (MPs) have submitted 144 questions wherein five MPs would be asking Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan about the recall of MRT trains.MP Sitoh Yih Pin (Potong Pasir) submitted questions on why SMRT or LTA did not make public the discovery of the hairline cracks on the trains and whether the manufacturers would compensate SMRT for any loss in profits for not being able to use the trains while the trains were sent back for repair.MP Liang Eng Hwa would be asking whether the "lapses and inadequate financial controls" in the report uncover any systemic flaws.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) xmentioned his/her disappointment with the bus routes under the new Government Contracting Model because some of the services were quite slow. The netizen stated that although slower travelling speed will ensure safety, it increases travel time for commuters who might be rushing for an appointment or catching a connecting bus. Pang Soon Tan stated that all buses were two minutes behind schedule on dispatch. Ryan Han mentioned that Tower Transit buses were travelling too slow. Alex Goh mentioned that there were a number of unnecessary stops, slow closing and opening of doors, and slow moving off from the bus bays.
?Eleanor Chan? observed that the display screen at Paya Lebar Circle Line station did not show where the train was heading to. The netizen stated that commuters should be informed so that they will not miss their trains, as the platform at Paya Lebar Circle Line station shared the same platform as trains heading to Dhoby Ghaut and Marina Bay stations. Syed M Daniel mentioned that the display screen inside the train showed where the train would terminate. He added that announcements played at the platform will state where the train would end its service.
In a blog post, questions were raised as to why Factwire, a HK-based media outlet, was reporting on SMRT trains. The writer deemed that the possible link was that the PRC firm CSR Sifang, the manufacturer of the SMRT trains, was also the same PRC manufacturer that is responsible for manufacturing 9 trains for the Guangzhou-Shenzhen-Hong Kong Express Rail Link (XLR), and 93 trains for Hong Kongs Mass Transit Railway (MTR) four urban lines, as quoted from Factwire.It was no secret about the tensions escalating between Hong Kongers and the mainland Chinese in recent years. The writer deemed that Factwire might be using the news about SMRT to push a political agenda to paint PRC trains in a negative light, and to exert pressure on the Hong Kong Government.The writer also said it is thus likely that Singapores SMRT was a mere chess piece that was used as a pawn in Hong Kongs spat with China.
Minister of Communications and Information Dr Yaacob Ibrahim stated that National Reading Movement would be launched later this year and that Jul 30 would be National Reading Day. The movement aims to create a vibrant reading culture in Singapore. The National Library Board (NLB) would focus on three priorities for the Reading Movement: reach out to new audience segments, put more focus on reading in Mother Tongue Languages and expand the network of partners to work together on the initiative.Dr Yaacob said NLB would now focus on services for adults. NLB would bring books and services to working adults in the office and when they are on the move. One such initiative would be a library-themed MRT train that would also function as a library. The train would allow anyone with a mobile device to scan a QR code to download recommended e-books via the NLB mobile app, or access other content such as short essays. There would also be a Spot-A-Reader campaign on social media to recognise and encourage readers on board the train. Some netizens believed that the initiative was aimed at getting more people to read instead of complaining on social media about breakdowns and slower trains. Others said that the idea was great to improve reading in Singapore. Others wondered how commuters could read on the MRT or scan QR codes when trains were overcrowded. Aivern Tan considered the idea good and suggested having flash newspaper articles in cabin. Ji Ji Hoho suggested having special cabins on trains for passengers who want to read.
Netizens continued to comment on SMRTs short film as appreciation for the hard work and selfless support of their workers. Several netizens praised SMRT and Butterworks for their great job with the short film. Some thanked all ground staff and engineers for their time and effort so that commuters could enjoy a smooth travel. Dave Choo said that If SMRT had been replacing sleepers regularly in the past, the maintenance crew need not work during holidays and could have dinner with their families. The netizen mentioned that instead of spending more money on advertisements, the money should be given to the workers who sacrifice their precious family time. Yap Thian Beng said that it was easy for the public to condemn the MRT when it breaks down but hardly appreciate it when they reach their destinations on time.
?Shahfii Ali? stated that he was affected by drilling and noise caused by the maintenance work at Pasir Ris MRT tracks in the middle of the night. Syed M Daniel mentioned that he stays at Block 528A but he was not affected by the noise.
?Sun Hanchen? asked SMRT why the service 180 bendy buses were replaced with MAN A22 buses. The netizen said that MAN A22 buses could not handle the high demand. At least 25 people were unable to board the bus, not including the other passengers throughout the route. Ng Zheng Qin was also unable to board the bus. Ze Yu Jia informed ?Sun Hanchen? that the MAN A22 buses were actually additional buses.
sgbuffett stated that an SMRT staff holding a light stick had prevented him/her from boarding an overcrowded train. The netizen also suggested improving the air circulation on overcrowded trains because it was quite suffocating. The netizen added that germs and virus could spread in the cabin unless there was proper air circulation. wiley explained that the SMRT staff has the right to stop commuters from entering an overly packed train. The netizen also suggested in jest that the thread starter wear a gas mask to prevent him/her from getting any germs or virus while inside the train. hotrock said that the thread starter should stay home if s/he was afraid of germs and bacteria.
??Larry See? shared an article about a pilot called Pink Light, where pregnant women would carry a beacon around which will illuminate signs installed on trains when the she is near to a seat. The light would alert passengers to give up priority seats to pregnant passengers. The pilot focuses on pregnant women, and is a collaboration between Busan City and Daehong, a Korean PR company.The sensors that look like badges use Bluetooth and have six months of battery life. It must be worn on their clothing or carried on their bags. Only a single train line was covered by the pilot, but Busan now wants to expand Pink Light to cover all of its metro and bus systems.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian mentioned that he almost missed boarding bus service 162 when it tried to bypass the two buses at the bus stop. He was lucky that the bus stopped after he signalled the bus captain. Tan stated that buses should not bypass any bus stop just because there were buses at the same stop.He believed that the root of the problem was that Singapore had too many bus services. He said that it was better to restructure the system to have fewer long distance services (with limited stops) and feeder buses to serve the nearby areas.
Douglas Chan posted a photo of a display monitor at a Downtown Line station, possibly from Bayfront MRT station, which showed that Last Train to China will arrive shortly. The post quickly went viral. Several netizens stated that the staff might have meant to type Chinatown which was a station along the Downtown Line. Some said that they did not know that Singapores MRT could now reach China directly. Chow Yen mentioned in jest that at 60km/h and with occasional breakdowns, it would probably take a few months to reach China.
SMRT Chairman Koh Yong Guan said in its annual report that the company would defer a plan to refresh its board while it tackles a move to a new model focusing on services rather than its infrastructure assets. He mentioned that board continuity is important at this stage, so they have decided to defer the planned board renewal." He noted that the firm's transition to the new model would need the board's "closest attention".
?Ferry Kurniawan? wondered if it could be considered as fraud on SMRTs end to have commuters ride a non-air-conditioned train when they had paid to ride an air-conditioned one.
Alester Tan shared her sons bus experience which they filmed for a school project. The netizen thanked SMRT buses for the pleasant rides and learning experiences for her son Trevor.
Tan Jian Long? thanked SMRT staff Rahim Samad for returning his lost wallet left in the MRT. The netizen mentioned that Rahim took the effort to contact him through Facebook and even asked if anything was missing in his wallet. He said that he truly appreciated Rahims effort and honesty, and that SMRT should be proud to have such an employee.
?Lionel Oo? claimed that there was a printing error on bus service 178 brochure. The netizen mentioned that it stated Ang Mo Kio Interchange instead of Boon Lay Interchange. The netizen asked SMRT to rectify it.
?Yokiey Ong? mentioned that a bus captain of service 969 (TIB1230D) refused to open the bus door because it was the third bus in the queue and signalled him/her to take the bus in front. The netizen claimed that the bus captain was busy looking at his mobile phone.The netizen mentioned that the frequencies of service 969 were inconsistent and passengers end up waiting for at least 20 minutes for the bus and then having to squeeze in with the crowd. Peter Low explained that the first and second bus were allowed to open their doors to passengers while the third bus had to wait and proceed to the bus stop before allowing commuters to board - a safety measure implemented by LTA and bus operators.
1 Sharon Tan noticed that passengers on the East-West Line train were fanning themselves because the air-conditioner was barely blowing any cold air. The netizen asked if someone could inform the train driver so adjustments could be made.
Lawrence Ang? was disappointed to hear only train announcements reminding commuters to report on suspicious persons or things on trains and stations and to keep the trains clean, on his commute from Jurong East to Tampines.The netizen said that no announcements were made to encourage passengers to give up their seats to passengers with disabilities, and posted a picture of a lady seated on the Reserved Seat.
SBS7557R started a thread to find out whether it would be beneficial for the public to be more involved in the planning of bus routes. The netizen believed that regular bus commuters have the potential of coming up with suggestions on how to improve bus services and provide better and faster connectivity between particular areas. The LTA could review the publics suggestions and decide whether to implement feasible suggestions based on a set of established criteria. The netizen had encourage others to comment on the overall feasibility of the publics involvement in bus route planning.
Netizens continued to discuss the SMRT bus that had beaten the red light at Upper Boon Keng Road traffic junction on 11 July while a man and his child were crossing which was shared on Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road Facebook. ?Several netizens observed that many bus captains tend to overlook the red traffic light. Others asked whether carrying a child on a scooter was allowed. Ray Toh asked others not to be quick to judge the bus captain since the traffic light on the bus side was not visible on the video. The netizen added that only the blinking traffic amber light was visible which could mean that the traffic signal was faulty. David Tan Nah wondered why SMRT had yet to issue a statement regarding the matter. Tom Tay asked how SMRT trains its bus captains.
A traction power fault caused a short delay at Bukit Panjang LRT early morning of Feb 26. SMRT tweeted at 5:25 a.m. that there was no service on the line and free bus bridging was provided for commuters. Several netizens were disappointed with the late announcements of the power fault and that bus bridging service started only half an hour after the first train was supposed to leave the stations. Lee Yong Choy David? mentioned that the gate at Fajar Station was only half open. In a later post, the netizen added that there were no announcements, no staff on the ground and SMRTs Facebook page was only updated after 7 a.m. Ljc Lim suggested having announcements in four official languages similar to announcements at the North-East, Downtown and LRT Lines. Norman Abdullah said that the LTA spent billions for other companies to build a new satellite ERP system but could not even resolve half of MRT and LRT breakdowns. ?David Quek? mentioned waking up earlier than usual to catch the train but got stuck in the train as it kept stalling at every station. Ang Ziwei and Jean Chua said that there was also a train fault at the North-South Line. Henry Low said that there was a train fault at Orchard Station and wondered why SMRT did not post it on its social media accounts. Eric Zhuo stated that he got detrained at Orchard MRT.
Senior transport correspondent Christopher Tan wrote that the challenges being faced by the introduction of autonomous vehicles (AVs) lie in the publics willingness to accept and try this new concept and not with the readiness of technology.He noted that AVs trialled in Europe and the US proved to be quite capable of getting along fairly well without a driver in many situations. The writer, however, stated that it would take more effort from the authorities to convince the public that the AVs were safe to use. He noted that no one has conducted a driver-off AV journey on public roads yet.The recent accident involving a Telsa being driven on auto-pilot could be a sign that there were still flaws in the system that had to be resolved.The writer stated that having a driver on board still prove to be useful in emergency situations, citing the incident that occurred on the Bukit Panjang LRT when a train failed to stop at three stations. Aside from public acceptance and concerns on safety, cost was also a factor particularly in Singapore where cost of cars would be magnified by the taxation scheme. Jim Chua suggested a one-to-one exchange of petrol cars to full electric cars to reduce carbon emission. Sangha Vandana mentioned that the public could still choose to drive conventional cars if they did not like the idea of using self-driving vehicles. Troy Chung claimed that taxi and private car-hire drivers would soon be out of jobs.
?Calvin Tan? asked SMRT whether the arrival schedule of bus service 857 had been adjusted during the school holiday because he had to wait up to 20 minutes for the bus during the peak period.The netizen mentioned waiting for the bus since 5:40 p.m. but the bus only arrived at around 6 p.m. and was full of passengers. The netizen stated that this should not be the case as SMRT claimed that bus frequency had improved.
A Facebook post by Singapore Taxi Drivers regarding the increase in taxi companies licence fees to be imposed by LTA was reposted on TR Emeritus. Singapore Taxi Drivers stated that the LTA should first come out with a solution for current taxi woes before demanding an increase in licensing fee.The group cited the following shortcomings of LTA which they claim had resulted in a wastage of taxpayers money:1. Spent tens of thousands of dollars to develop the Taxi-Taxi app which no one used.2. Imposed a 2% cap on the growth of taxi fleets which resulted in the distortion of the taxi economy, as the supply of taxis failed to meet demand for taxi services.3. Introduced heat sensors to monitor the movement of the queue at taxi stands which triggers a notification to the various taxi companies to inform taxi drivers when taxis were needed at a certain area. The notifications were often ignored by taxi drivers as there were already many taxis queuing up at taxi stands. lamolo wondered whether Uber and Grab would be required to pay licencing fees as well. If not, the LTA would be killing the taxi operators with the imposition of higher licence fees.
?Yi JF? was happy to see bendy buses and downroute trips for services 167 and 980 during the past few days. The netizen thanked SMRT for its efforts and hoped that double-decker buses would also be added to the said services.
?Didi Dil Sutrisnoh? shared a photo of an SMRT bus captain clearing a large tree branch that had fallen on the road so that other motorists could travel smoothly. Mr Tan, the bus captain in the photo, was driving a Bus Plus shuttle service. The netizen thanked the bus captain for his consideration and kindness.
8898108 was disappointed having to wait for Tower Transits bus service for 30 minutes at the Jurong East interchange which usually arrives in 10-minute interval. The netizen also mentioned that Tower Transit had not changed the SBS Transit and SMRT livery on its buses, making it very confusing for commuters. dc7176 mentioned waiting for bus service 97 for 20 minutes at Jurong East interchange. WarCloud7 assumed that the bus was delayed because it was a Monday. S/he also stated overhearing that commuters also waited for bus service 61 for 30 minutes. cearmouse thought that the LTA would fine bus operators for failling to meet the scheduled time. diamond_guy wondered why commuters were complaining about the delay in Tower Transit buses on its first day of operations. The netizen stated that commuters should complain about SMRT as after more than 20 years of operations, trains still break down all the time. beano said that Tower Transit have many overpromises. xtemujin mentioned that the LTA should be blamed for service lapses.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) asked whether the Transit Elevated Bus would be able to solve the current issues being faced by public buses should it be introduced in Singapore. The passenger compartment of the bus is raised above other vehicles on the road, allowing cars to pass through underneath.A model of a Transit Elevated Bus, also known as land airbus, was introduced at the 19th China Beijing International High-Tech Expo in May, and had recently been tested on China roads. Some netizens stated that the elevated bus might not work in Singapore since there was no more space to provide dedicated roads for bigger vehicles such as lorries and mobile cranes. Clement Ng said that the elevated bus could be a good alternative for the LRT. Peter Wee mentioned that the elevated bus could be used as an express bus service.
Asyraf Sns wondered why shorter buses were deployed for service 172 during peak hours. The netizen reported that many long off-service buses were seen towards Choa Chu Kang when many NS men needed to take the bus.
LIM LIXUAN wrote that Nigel Wood, Go-Ahead Singapore Managing Director, is a boss who understands the hardships of his employees since he used to be a bus driver back in London 21 years ago.In 1995, Wood worked as a driver trainee at London General Transport Services Ltd and two years later he was a Night Controller at London Central. In 2003, he started working at Go-Ahead as Assistant Operating Manager and climbed up the corporate ladder to become the Managing Director of Go-Ahead Singapore.That was deemed the probable reason why he offers a generous compensation package to his employees. Beyond higher wages Wood also took into consideration the drivers welfare.
Lurvlyn Bmy ?praised the bus captain of service 913 for being friendly to passengers. The netizen said that the bus captain should be recognised for his awesome service.
?Tham Siong Tuck? reported that one of the gates at Lakeside Station towards Boon Lay was blocked off from the outside so passengers were forced to use another door to alight from the train. At the other door, his wife was the last to alight and was almost caught between the doors because they were obstructed by a family with playful children. The netizen stated that there should be an SMRT staff controlling the crowd as well as signalling to the train captain to delay closing of doors in such cases. SMRT has responded asking for more details.
Tong Chong Hin mentioned seeing a Facebook post regarding a family of foreign train passengers occupying most of the seats inside the train as most of them were reclining on the seats. The netizen asked why SMRT had not been conducting regular inspections inside trains, and what SMRT would do for such misbehaviours onboard trains.
Under new regulations expected to be announced next month, private-car hire drivers operating under Uber and GrabCar may soon be required to have a vocational licence. A proposed taxi driver vocational licence (TDVL) course which would run for at least 10 hours, was being considered by authorities for the private chauffeurs. The tens of thousands of private-car hire drivers in Singapore would be given a "phase-in" time to go for the vocational course. Course credits attained during the proposed vocational training could also be used for the TDVL, should the drivers want to become cabbies. Lim Kell Jay, Head of Grab Singapore, said that vocational licensing could serve as an "added assurance" to commuters that drivers and trips are of standard. He added that the company does its own screening, such as background checks and in-person registration. Warren Tseng, Uber's General Manager in Singapore, said he was "hopeful of a positive outcome" to the review, to ensure drivers could continue to have flexible work opportunities and commuters, reliable transportation options. Several netizens believed that the requirement for private-car hire drivers to take a vocational licence course was for the Government to collect more money. Some asked why only 10 hours of lessons were required for private-car hire drivers compared to 60 hours for taxi drivers. red amoeba wondered if the new regulations was aimed to level the playing field or to put up barricades for the National Trades Union Congress to enter the issue with private-car hire drivers. peterpan212 stated that the new regulations were just for show only. shiokalingam mentioned that Uber and GrabCar provided the platforms for families to "rent or lease" a car at around S$60 without paying for road tax and COE. shinkuaku approved of the new regulations and hoped that there would also be psychiatric tests to ascertain that no rapists, molesters and murderers would be driving in Singapore.
OCBC Investment Research stated that ComfortDelGro (CDG) would be the biggest beneficiary of the new bus contracting model as it could get around S$5.3M worth of contract fees.CDG has around 2,900 buses representing 70-75% market share of Singapore's public bus operations.OCBC believed that CDG would be able to receive more benefits such as higher dividends and more acquisitions with the transition to the new contracting model.
?Sukkie Choo? shared that she was onboard an East-West Line train travelling towards Tanjong Pagar MRT Station at 10:10 a.m. on July 4. She was surprised that the train did not stop at Tanjong Pagar Station where she was supposed to alight. The netizen stated that there was no prior announcement that the train would skip the station. The train captain only made a super distorted announcement after the train skipped the station. The netizen mentioned that the incident caused inconvenience to her as there were no trains at Outram Station on standby to serve passengers who were affected. Kumar Hi mentioned that he was also on the same train that skipped the station at full speed.
??? hoped that SMRT would increase the number of buses for service 975. The netizen stated that there were many commuters during the morning peak hours and the usual waiting time for the bus was 20 minutes.The netizen noted that service 307E which have fewer passengers but have higher frequency than service 975.
Commuters taking the Circle Line experienced delays during the morning peak period on September 20 due to a track fault.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communication said the fault occurred at a track point near Paya Lebar station, in the direction of MacPherson. He said engineers were deployed to check on the fault immediately, and that it would be rectified after the morning peak as track access was required. Mr Nathan said that for the safety of passengers, trains are travelling slower over the affected stretch. To ease congestion, some trains were turned around at Bartley Station in the direction of HarbourFront, and free bus services have been activated between Bishan and Paya Lebar stations. "We apologise for the inconvenience, he added.It was also reported that at the height of the delays, SMRT staff at Bishan station were overheard recommending to commuters to take other MRT lines, such as the North-South Line, to get to Dhoby Ghaut. Anna Lee, a Nanyang Junior College student who was on the way to school with her friend, stated that the crowd had been well managed and that people were quietly queueing.Mr Lim T.Y., who works in the construction industry, stated that he was half an hour late for a site meeting in Sengkang as the trains were crowded and many could not board. He also expressed disappointment with the frequent breakdowns that usually happen during peak hours. Many netizens stated that SMRT should also factor the amount of time they need to clear the backlog of passengers when announcing the expected delay time, pointing out that announcing a shorter delay time without considering backlogs would only infuriate the already exasperated commuters. Several wondered why a relatively new MRT line like the Circle Line was already experiencing a number of issues. Others mentioned that the frequent disruptions and delays have affected productivity and have added stress to workers who were late for work or meetings. Some said that SMRT should offer fare refunds to affected passengers. Edward Tan praised SMRT for handling the situation well and continuing its service despite the inconvenience. Barnabas Lee assumed that the overcrowding was caused by SMRTs poorly calculated decision to turn trains around at Bartley MRT station in the direction of HarbourFront in the supposedly unaffected direction towards Dhoby Ghaut and Marina Bay. Francis Lim expressed concern for commuters with mobility impairment that would have difficulty in getting alternative mode of transport to reach their destination.
?Connie Tan LiPin? reported that two SMRT bus services (900 and 911) have faulty bells. The netizen said that some passengers were unable to alight at their intended bus stop because the bus captain did not hear the bell. The netizen asked SMRT to inform its bus captains to look out for such issues and for SMRT to ensure the bells were working properly or put a sign on the bell to indicate that it was faulty.
SMRTs net profit for Q3 of FY16 surged 63.5% to S$36.9M due to the growth in most of its business segments..Bus operations also enjoyed an 845% increase in operating profit of S$3.4M this quarter from a $500,000 operating loss in 3QFY15 because of increased training grants, reliability incentives, and reduced diesel expenses.Meanwhile, LRT operations posted a higher operating loss of S$1.5M due to costs relating to the addition of new trains to the fleet.Non-fare business revenue also increased by 2.6% to S$92.3M and operating profit soared 20.3% to S$33.7M, boosted mainly by growth in taxi and rental segments.Several netizens believed that the breakdowns were SMRTs way of cutting costs while the revenue kept coming in. Some stated that with the reduction in oil prices, fares should also be lowered.Others hoped that more funds would be allocated for maintenance. Others wondered whether SMRT would share their profit with the commuters.Benjamin Alexander Cai hoped that SMRT would spend some money to upgrade the Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange and have a different kind of warning system rather than the vehicle horn being used which disturbs the residents.Aaron Loy stated that in order to find the cause of the problems, the Ministers, CEO and engineers from 10 years prior to the breakdowns should be investigated as such problems resulted from chronic negligence.
Chan Chun Sing, Minister in Prime Minister's Office and the Secretary-General of the National Trade Union Congress said he was extremely saddened by the tragic accident at Pasir Ris MRT station on Mar 22 and conveyed his deepest condolences to the families of the workers who were killed. He stated that the National Transport Workers' Union would do what was necessary to support affected workers and their families during this difficult time. He urged everyone to do their part to keep each other safe at the workplace. Several netizens also conveyed their condolences to the families of the two workers killed in the accident. Others expressed concerns for maintenance and safety protocols. Some wondered why the staff were allowed on the tracks during active rail operations. Angie Kan said that a thorough investigation should be conducted.
s-ghost stated that the train at Botanic Gardens at the Circle Line was not moving. In a later post, the netizen mentioned that the announcement stated that there was a train fault and the train ahead was moving slower so service would be delayed. BoyFromFuture observed that Singaporeans were very impatient that even a few minutes of delay would be posted on a forum. thehairy wondered what excuse would be given by SMRT regarding the delay.
The Circle Line experienced service delays during the evening peak on Jun 2. Many commuters posted their complaints online as there were no updates on SMRT Twitter regarding the delay. Some netizens, however, stated that SMRT announced about the delay at Caldecott MRT station. needsomecash mentioned that the train was crawling like a snail due to congestion ahead. In a later post, s/he said that SMRT technicians had boarded the train at Caldecott. p00p00 mentioned being stuck for 10 minutes at One North towards Buona Vista. PointofCommonCoupling said that s/he waited for 15 minutes at Bishan for one train. xiaobao54 mentioned that SMRT staff asked passengers to alight after a burning smell was noticed. Duff11 asked commuters to wait patiently as it was not a breakdown since the delay had not exceeded 30 minutes.
Tower Transit would be operating a total of 26 wheelchair accessible bus (WAB) west-serving services, starting May 29. Tower Transit would take over nine routes of WAB services from SMRT on May 29 followed by another 17 routes from SBS Transit, in two batches in June 2016.
Train services between Tanah Merah and Pasir Ris stations and between Joo Koon and Jurong East stations, would end up to half an hour earlier from Sundays to Thursdays, except on the eve of public holidays, to facilitate sleeper replacement works until the end of August.Commuters who board the trains after 11.15 pm on the East-West Line were advised to plan their journey and consider alternative transport arrangements such as bus services.
On her self-titled blog, Budget Babe stated the before people rush to buy SMRT shares of stock because of its huge gains in profits in one quarter, they should also check if such a performance could be sustained.The blogger believed that SMRTs recent quarter profits growth were only temporary. Upon studying the business in detail and looking at other factors, the blogger realized a key point that may potentially drive SMRTs profits (and thus share price) down further in the future: SMRT's expenses are expected to increase.Budget Babe listed the following reasons why SMRTs expenses would increase:1. Operating losses in rail operations.2. Increase in costs for maintenance and renewal programmes.3. Higher manpower cost that would continue to undermine profits.4. Increased net gearing from 0.77 in 2014 to 0.80 in Q3FY15 (S$810M debt).5. Decreasing cash and equivalents from S$207M in Q1 to S$126M in Q3. 6. 7.1% increase in total expenses like manpower and depreciation exceeding the savings from lower energy and fuel costs, despite higher fares.7. Competition SWEET RETIREMENT thought that the blogger had a well-written analysis of SMRT. BLUE mentioned buying SMRT shares at S$1.42.
?Haizad Jalal? asked the SMRT bus team to remove the door closing alert from its buses because the alert was too loud and very annoying and was of no benefit to the passengers.
On Facebook, All Singapore Stuff advised others not to be like Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan, who had asked opposition member to commit Hara-Kiri when they have lapses but would just keep quiet when his friends commit mistakes. Several netizens agreed with that Minister Khaw was unfair in applying rules to different people. Soh Guan Hoe said that the Transport Minister practices favouritism. Nicholas Shogun Armani supported the opposition but pointed out that MRT breakdowns were due to the ageing rail system that needs to be overhauled. The netizen added that things could not be expected to improve overnight.
Kristeena Fino Yap? shared a video showing an SMRT taxi beating the red light. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details for further investigation.
?Mei Rui Hang? shared a photo of an MRT track at Woodlands Station. The netizen claimed that the track was not properly maintained. Some netizens asked the contributor how s/he knew the tracks were not being maintained. Jeriel Lim also asked the contributor why a screw was needed on a surface that was supposed to be smooth. Aaron Tan pointed out that there was a missing screw.
Shan shared a video showing SMRT bus captain Krishna Rao entertaining his fellow bus captains in Woodlands bus interchange. The netizen said that Krishna was not only a friendly driver but also a great entertainer. Several netizens praised Krishna for being a nice and friendly bus captain. Others were happy to see the bus captains having fun during their break.
?Terry Chua Bt reported being stuck in a Bukit Panjang LRT train for almost 15 minutes.? SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more information so that the team can look into it.
Amirul Azam hoped that SMRT wins the tender for the Seletar bus package.The netizen mentioned that he fell in love with bendy buses since he was in Primary 3 when SMRTs predecessor, TIBS, purchased and introduced the first batch of bendy buses in Singapore. Zul Saibot hopes that Tower Transit would be awarded the third package.
A contractor suffered a burn injury on his left hand while carrying out maintenance works at Sembawang MRT station early on Thursday morning (May 26). SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications Patrick Nathan said that the incident occurred at 1.50 a.m. while the contractor was carrying out work on the third rail at the MRT station. He said that the necessary approval was given to access the track for the maintenance works.Singapore Civil Defence Force (SCDF) said it received a call for assistance at Sembawang MRT and despatched a fire engine and an ambulance. SCDF added that a man in his 20s was conveyed conscious to Khoo Teck Puat Hospital. Investigations are ongoing. Several netizens stated that workplace safety should not be taken for granted. Some netizens asked who between the contractor and SMRT breached the safety code. Others asked if safety measures were implemented by SMRT. Melvin Chen believed that the contractor should take safety precautions and not put the blame on SMRT.
Straits Times reported last Friday (July 8) that not only were the MRT trains found to be defective but that the entire first batch of 19 US-made Bombardier trains on the Bukit Panjang LRT had also developed cracks during their service in Singapore. The defects, however, were fixed in Singapore, unlike the 26 Chinese trains being shipped back to China to have their aluminium bodies recast.Lee Ling Wee, SMRT Trains Managing Director, said the cracks were discovered during a routine assessment by Bombardier in 2015. The cracks were also examined by the LTA and the trains were deemed safe for passenger service. Most netizens noted that the US-made trains developed cracks after 17 years in service unlike the China-made trains which developed cracks in three years. Several stated that the Government was trying to divert the publics attention away from the fact that they had tried to conceal the issue of the defective trains. Others mentioned that something was wrong with the Governments tender process. A few wondered whether the Government was trying to set the cracks as the new norm in MRT and LRT trains.
Netizens posted online about the delay in train services along the North-South Line on August 19, resulting in overcrowding at some stations. ?Kelz Tan? said that train announcements were unclear, causing confusion to commuters. Indra Atmadja Lim asked SMRT to stop people from entering the platform because it was already overcrowded and could be dangerous. Lee Ray ?also asked SMRT to stop people from going up the escalators and stairs on the southbound platform. Some netizens had expected a delay in train services due to the rainy weather. etbenben mentioned that the queue at Ang Mo Kio MRT station was already up the foot of the stairs. Usha Thiyaga stated that the breakdowns were frustrating.
testart said that Ministers should take the MRT at City Hall at 6 p.m. to know how crowded the MRT was. Some netizens stated that the Ministers were aware of the crowd issue but chose not to care. Others said that the Ministers need not take the MRT to see the crowd because photos of packed trains and platforms had been posted online.
Andrew Seow Chwee Guan mentioned that the platform display panels on the East-West Line were located at one end of the platform and not visible to commuters standing farther away. The netizen said that the display panels should be located at both ends and in the middle of every platform. The displays could also attract more advertising revenue, which may eventually lead to cost recovery. Andrew Seow Chwee Guan also hoped that the Public Transport Council, now assigned to reassess the public transport system, could also look into the daily woes of train commuters.
According to latest statistics from Euromonitor, Singapore has the largest taxi penetration rate among its global peer cities, with 5.3 taxis per 1000 people in the city. The high taxi penetration rate makes it less difficult for commuters to get a taxi in Singapore than in other cities, as reflected in the high satisfaction rate of 96.2% in LTAs Taxi Customer Satisfaction Survey conducted. Several netizens disapproved of the survey results saying that it was more difficult to get a cab in Singapore than in other countries. Toh, who claimed to be a taxi driver, mentioned that his income consistently went down since 2008 and had to drive longer hours since the taxi rental increased. The netizen mentioned his intention to return his taxi soon. Tung Chen Kum mentioned that there was a shortage of taxis in the northeast area in the morning, and that s/he could not get a taxi even with repeated booking attempts. Loh Wai Poon said that there were too many surcharges and that some smarter drivers had learned to take advantage of the surcharges to make more money while driving less hours.
Writer Raymond Koh Bock Swi stated that there were other important issues to be discussed aside from the calibre of Chinese supplier CSR Qingdao Sifang Locomotive, making reference to an earlier report Train cracks cast doubts on Chinas rail ambitions (July 8). The writer said that the decision by LTA to buy the trains involve millions of dollars and the interests of the public, and must guarantee long-term quality and reliability for the smooth operation of the MRT system. The writer questioned whether LTA chose the right supplier. He also asked if pre- and post- delivery quality control can be done to ensure the trains are in good shape. The writer also said that Singapore should learn from this experience and ensure that they pay for the best because quality cannot be compromised by cost whenever public interests were at stake. The writer added that SMRT needs the trains to enhance its operational capabilities.The writer suggested forming a high-level Government committee to investigate the facts, set the record straight and stop the widespread speculations on this matter, as well as reinstate public confidence in LTA and other bodies involved. Several netizens stated that instead of a high-level Government committee, an independent panel should be formed to investigate on the matter to reduce the effect of partisan decisions. Others mentioned that there was still no disclosure from the concerned agencies on why the defective trains issue had been kept from the public. rtfm38 said that SMRTs best interest was its shareholders and not the publics interest. Lavey Goh believed that there was nothing unusual with manufacturing defects be it from China, Europe or any part of the world.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) shared a video showing a staff at Bugis Station greeting commuters Good evening, welcome to Downtown Line!". Lim Ming Quan had seen the staff and thought that he was awesome.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament Lee Bee Wah shared photos while she was at the bus stop near Acacia Breeze to observe bus timings. She noted that between 8:02 to 8:13 a.m., four service 860 buses passed by the bus stop and some skipped the stop because they were already packed. MP Lee hoped that LTA and SMRT could deploy the empty buses she had requested for between the said period as soon as possible. Several netizens praised MP Lee for doing a good job. Phyllis Yee thanked MP Lee and mentioned that bus service 812 that ply along Yishun Ring Road were very slow. Liying Zhang stated that service 804 was also slow and that there were more service 806 and 860 buses than service 804.
After hairline cracks were found on SMRT trains, SBS Transit reported that 11 first-generation LRT trains from the Sengkang-Punggol Line were found with hairline cracks, after a fleet-wide inspection in July.According to a joint press release from the LTA and SBS Transit on September 9, the affected vehicles have been in operation since the LRT line started in 2003. The hairline cracks, which were found on the bogie frames, do not compromise its weight bearing property. An independent assessor, TUV Rheinland, found the defects were not safety-critical, which was an analysis shared by the manufacturer Mitsubishi Heavy Industries.SBS Transit has also been inspecting all vehicles on a weekly basis for any new defects, according to the press release. Several netizens were glad that the defects had been detected early and was reported to the public. Others expressed concern on safety despite assurance from the manufacturer and LTA that the cracks were not safety-critical. Foo Yong Wee wondered what excuse the LTA and transport operator would give the public regarding the cracks. Chloe Khaw believed that commuters were more concerned about efficiency and reliability rather than hairline cracks.
Gurmit Singh Kullar stated that it was unfair for the National Taxi Association (NTA) to criticise Grab and Uber's creative business strategies when some of its members' bad behaviour was the source of the problem to begin with.The netizen mentioned that commuters had been complaining about the unavailability of taxis without any clear response from the NTA to address the issue. The Land Transport Authority (LTA) had to step in to introduce surcharges to entice taxi drivers to stay on the streets and had imposed a 250km daily mileage requirement. LTAs measure, however, did not improve the availability of taxis. Taxi drivers bad behaviour persist - choosing customers by destination, avoiding taxi queues or hiding in carparks to wait for bookings to come in, not accepting electronic payment and disappearing before the surcharges kick in.As a result, commuters were forced to find alternative service providers, such as third-party booking apps, that would meet their needs, regardless of price. Several netizens agreed that it was really a challenge to get a taxi especially before peak hours and during shift changes of taxi drivers. scroobal stated that the taxi industry failed to keep up with the times and taxi companies failed to protect the taxi drivers who generated revenue for them. Jtt Tan wondered why regular taxis could not offer cheaper fares similar to Uber and Grab. Aizac Saad mentioned that taxi drivers could not offer cheaper fares because of high rental.
?Asyraaf Imaginative? shared about their groups unpleasant experience at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. The netizen mentioned that the driver of the buggy service gave priority to a female passenger with a child instead of the elderly couple who had difficulty walking. The elderly woman was able to ride the buggy with the female commuter and child. The buggy driver promised to return for the elderly man but the buggy did not come back.The old man decided to walk to the berth instead of waiting for the buggy since he had already waited 15 minutes. The netizen and his friends assisted the old man to the berth and were surprised to see the buggy parked instead of turning back to fetch the old man. Also, the buggy had sent the old mans wife to the wrong berth.The netizen also stated that the service should prioritise the elderly and be made more efficient.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about the two awards received by the transport company at the recent HRM Awards 2016. The judging panel of Human Resources (HR) leaders and industry watchers gave SMRT top marks for the company with the Best Engagement and Retention Strategies and recognised Gerard Koh, SMRT's Vice President for Human Resources, as the Best HR Leader.SMRT HR teams initiatives had been assessed by HR experts and business leaders to be moving in the right direction. Many engagement activities between SMRT staff and management, and the National Transport Workers' Union, which takes place away from the public eye, have contributed to the tripartite relationship that was essential for industrial harmony.Jun Niz praised the SMRT staff members for going the extra mile to make sure that the trains were running smoothly. The netizen added that the public should first investigate the cause of the train breakdown instead of blaming the companys CEO for every breakdown. ??? said that it was best to dissolve SMRT and let the real professionals take over everything.
?Yiwen Nam? asked SMRT for assistance in locating a taxi driver who scammed her friend of $400. The cabby claimed that he was interested in buying her friends phone and would be paying in December but have since disappeared. A link to a similar post was also shared.
On Facebook, REACH Singapore asked others whether the Circle Line delay on September 20 had been managed well, referring to a statement by Anna Lee, a Nanyang Junior college student, who stated in an interview that the crowd was well-managed and people queued quietly during the delay. Loo EH asked whether SMRT and the Government already have a crisis management plan should there be a terrorist attack in Singapore. Peter Loh stated that train services have not been improving.
?Kurniawan Raymond? mentioned going to SMRT Depot in Woodlands to have his taxi repaired and observed that there were many taxis parked at the depot. He assumed many taxi drivers might have returned their vehicles to SMRT and claimed that a few more of his friends driving SMRT taxis would be returning their vehicles this month. Some netizens said that if many had returned their taxis, taxi drivers would have lesser competition on the road. Joseph Tan assumed that some taxi drivers were switching to ComfortDelGro.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) shared a blog post on Goody Feed published on October 2015 about the top six bus services with the worst frequencies in Singapore, which include services 64, 82, 123, 197 and 197A, and 300. Netizens mentioned several other bus services that have over 20 minutes waiting time while the next buses would come in bunches. Charles Lau stated that his personal record was over 20 minutes for service 45, and 40 minutes for service 966. Tinnitus Tq said that he waited for service 960 for over 30 minutes during peak hours, especially in the evening, and an average of 15 minutes for service 904.
Josephine Teo, Senior Minister of State for Transport, stated that an area in which Singapore and Russia can develop economic cooperation is in transport management.Minister Teo was in Russia as part of the delegation led by Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong who was on a work visit. They visited the Sochi International Airport, which was managed by an international joint venture involving Singapore's Changi Airports International (CAI) and played a role in the airport's revamp.Another airport that CAI is set to run is Vladivostok Airport in Russia. CAI had participated in an open tender for the project and is now in advanced discussion to see how it could be brought to fruition. Several netizens stated that Minister Teo should manage Singapores transport system first before helping other countries improve theirs. Kenny Lee observed that Minister Teo had been silent about the frequent MRT breakdowns and had yet to offer any solutions to improve the rail system. Mackie Tan stated that Minister Teo should consider solving the transport issues in Singapore first before talking about deepening ties with foreign partners. Jeffrey Lim believed that Singapore was the one who needs Russias train experts to advise and manage its train systems. The netizen noted that Russias train system was already over a century-old but did not have many reliability issues.
?Lyzda Nizar? reported that the bus captain of the bus with licence plate number SMB1421Y was inconsiderate. The netizen did not provide details regarding the matter.
Netizens continued to discuss the Rapid Transit Systems Regulations prohibition against selling goods across the MRT fare gate. The growing popularity of online marketplaces where transactions were usually carried out in person had become an issue for the public transport operators. The increasing number of buyers and sellers loitering around MRT stations had caused concerns for the operators about commuter safety and security especially at busy stations.Under the Singapore Statutes, offenders may be removed from the stations or fined a maximum of S$2,000. The long-standing rule seeks to discourage people from using public transportation for the delivery of commercial goods.Online marketplace users, however, were unaware of the rule. One of them said: It would definitely be more inconvenient for me if I have to tap out, and it would cost me too. I understand the security risk, but if it just takes a few minutes, I think it should be okay. Many netizens stated that it would be inconvenient for the seller or the buyer to tap out and that it would cost them to tap in again. Others mentioned that rail operators should also prohibit insurance agents and other sellers inside MRT premises. Some said that operators should not rent out space to food vendors and retailers if doing business was prohibited inside the station. Several wondered whether it was also prohibited to pass lunch or other food items at the fare gates. Peter Low mentioned that if security risk was the issue, LTA should insist on baggage scanning at MRT stations. Adrian Tan said that train operators could turn the regulation into a business opportunity by providing a section at MRT stations for online sellers and setup transaction lockers where sellers could drop off the item and leave.
Facebook user Tham Yew Loong posted a video online showing a man standing outside the front of the bus and blocked it from moving for 15 minutes. The police were called in and later allowed the man to board the bus. Several netizens stated that the police should have arrested the man for being a public nuisance instead of just allowing him to board the bus. Some stated in jest that a new law had been passed allowing commuters to stop the bus in the middle of the road. A few praised the police for its quick response at the scene.
yonglimm posted a photo of an SMRT staff using live video streaming social network, BIGO, while on duty. diver-hloc said that the SMRT staff could be using BIGO during her break time. The thread starter mentioned that it was only 8:20 a.m. when the staff was seen using BIGO.
?Kenny Goh Wei Xiang? wondered why people in wheelchairs and those with baby strollers and foldable bikes were not allowed on trains during peak hours. The netizen claimed that SMRT should focus on rectifying the issues that had caused trains to breakdown instead of implementing senseless rules.He also reported that the station manager of Circle Lines Bishan Station acted offensively when the netizen requested for his name.
ChickenLitter stated that SMRT toilets were the worst. The netizen said that even the toilets at stations like Orchard and Raffles Place were unclean. Some netizens suggested that SMRT start charging for toilet usage to keep it clean. A few stated that Clementi Station had the best toilets. xtemujin mentioned that the toilet at Dover MRT was dirty and smelly.
George Wong? shared a photo of female students eating and drinking while onboard the train.
Transport group ComfortDelGro has made it into the Singapore Book of Records for a mass workout exercise. More than 1,200 ComfortDelGro staff joined in Singapore's largest ever mass workout with resistance bands on August 8. The eight-minute feat broke the 2015 mass workout record, where 625 members participated.Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan joined the record-breaking exercise at an open-air carpark of ComforDelGro's Headquarters.The mass workout is the latest in a series of health initiatives rolled out by ComfortDelGro for its staff. Earlier in August, more than 2,000 ComfortDelGro staff took part in mass exercise sessions at various locations across Singapore. Most netizens wished others a Happy National Day. A few stated that the exercise event was just a waste of time. Robert Tan stated that ComfortDelGro should offer one week free rental to taxi drivers on National Day.
?Chris Lee? reported the missing emergency hammer onboard service 961 (SMB1351R).
Writer Ee Teck Siew said that it was disturbing that defective MRT trains ordered in 2009 and delivered in 2011 must be returned to the manufacturer for repairs.The writer stated that since there had been talks of the Government taking over SMRTs rail assets, the Transport Ministry should first conduct a review of the entire public transport system, especially the MRT system, and defer the intention to take over the train operators hardware.The writer added that any negotiations and valuation should take into account the potential impairment of these assets. Taxpayers should not end up footing the cost of future repairs. The writer also proposed hiring operators from other cities to run the MRT network. Tan Kwong Moh agreed with the writer. The netizen also questioned why the announcement was made three years after the defective trains had been discovered. Keok Ngee Sim lauded the Japanese for having reliable trains and having solid engineering background.
?Sally Poh? stated that the bus timings shown on the display boards at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange was inaccurate.The netizen mentioned that bus service 965 was often late in the morning. She added that even a three-minute delay makes a lot of difference for the commuters.
Gardens by the Bay (GBTB) would have eight new wheelchair-enabled shuttles starting Jul 20 to connect visitors arriving at Bayfront MRT Station to its key attractions. The shuttles, which were sponsored by SMRT could seat up to 22 persons and a wheelchair passenger. Dr Kiat W Tan, CEO of GBTB, said that it had been their vision since their opening in 2012 to be a garden that everyone could enjoy and that they were thankful to SMRT for the new gift of mobility that would enable more people to visit the Gardens with ease and enjoy the wonders of nature. Desmond Kuek, SMRT President and Group Chief Executive Officer, said that enhancing mobility was something that SMRT aspires to achieve beyond the network, and the partnership with Gardens by the Bay allows SMRT to give back to the community in a meaningful way.
Train services on SBS Transits North-East Line were disrupted in both directions for about an hour on August 17 due to a train fault.LTA first informed commuters of the fault via Twitter at about 9:26 p.m. but commuters posted online that the disruption began as early as 8:50 p.m.Crowds were seen waiting for free buses outside Serangoon and Woodleigh stations as SBS Transit announced that free bus services were available at designated bus stops near affected stations. Commuters expressed their frustration about the delay on social media. Many netizens noted that SBS Transit has no contingency measures and that there was lack of communication between the staff and technical people. Several mentioned that there were conflicting information being announced over the public address system and by the staff members. Some stated that no announcements were made that Buangkok would be the last station and there were no train services between Buangkok and Punggol. Others said that the staff could not even assist affected commuters on where to exit to take the free bus services. Some mentioned that they could not find the free bus services and had to pay for their bus fare.
On TR Emeritus Blog, the letter of Paul Chan Poh Hoi published on The Straits Times Forum was discussed. Paul Chan Poh Hoi wrote that he was perplexed by the Land Transport Authority's (LTA) decision to reward the two public bus operators with a substantial sum for what should have been obligatory service improvements.The writer said that as a matter of principle, running bus services on time is a basic expectation that commuters have of public transport operators, and meeting the minimum requirement should not merit a monetary bonus at all. He said that the public should question the necessity of a reward scheme. The stiff penalties imposed if transport operators fail to meet stipulated requirements should be sufficient incentive for the operators to step up their efforts.The writer also stated that both SBS Transit and SMRT were very profitable firms and were more than capable of covering the associated operation costs, therefore, fines would not deplete the transport companies' funds and their ability to improve their operations.Paul Chan Poh Hoi added that improvements in bus waiting times have been far too marginal and minuscule to justify over a million-dollar incentive. He said that more substantial, systemic change in the way the public transport operators do business should be considered. Bus Stop - The Hollies stated that bus services were still not up to the mark. The netizen mentioned that some buses at interchanges depart earlier than the scheduled time leaving passengers to wait for the next bus for up to 15 minutes. MarBowling said that the management of bus companies should be reminded that their priority as a service provider was to provide prompt and reliable service to the public.
Bella Swensen wondered why SMRT did not post any tribute to its female workforce during International Womens Day. The netizen said that the company should support such special days.
?Kermit Grey? thanked the station staff at Bedok and Tanah Merah MRT stations for assisting him/her when s/he fainted inside the train.
?Cheng Yuan Kang? complained about the slow trains from Commonwealth to Buona Vista and from Clementi to Jurong East at the East-West Line, which the netizen said should be fast at all times. Siew Pheng mentioned having experienced the same and stated that trains were travelling slower temporarily because of the sleeper replacement works along the East-West Line.
It was reported that an SMRT bus service 950 crashed into a Premier taxi in Woodlands when it was on its way to Johor Bahru on 19 June.Witnesses said that the taxi was trying to stop at the side of the road, which was also a bus lane. The taxi driver and three bus passengers were injured and were sent to the hospital. (buses[IN]gapore!) asked others to leave the investigation to the police. Sharif Hamid claimed that it was the taxi drivers fault and that he should be charged for causing the accident and unnecessary delay to passengers.
Commuters have expressed sadness about the deaths of two SMRT staff near Pasir Ris station on Mar 22 and were concerned about the train operators work safety standards. The commuters interviewed by Yahoo! Singapore at Pasir Ris station on Mar 24 said that the tragedy has raised more questions than answers. Gamar Khatib, described the accident as totally avoidable and stated that the accident showed how relevant authorities have slackened, not only for train operations but public buses too. Asyikin Amri questioned whether safety standards were compromised. S/he mentioned that the tragedy has caused members of the public to be worried about the work safety issues that SMRTs maintenance staff face daily. Narayan Gurung said that inexperienced maintenance staff should not be allowed to work on the tracks so soon and must receive proper guidance from senior colleagues before being entrusted with such an important task. Victims cousins demand transparency saying that the safety standard procedures should be reviewed and asked whether there were backup procedures to avert an accident should there be a communication breakdown between staff. Full transparency from the SMRT management was being called in order to ease the concerns of its staff and members of the public. Ronnir said that it would be best for the Government to form a board of inquiry to get to the bottom of the issue. The netizen believed that there might be more than just safety violations. Mai Pen Rai pointed out that the two trainees died on the track and not on the walkway. Therefore, focus should not be on the width of the walkway. Sporean believed that even SMRTs CEO and Managing Director did not fully know the content of the safety standard operating procedure. Bujang Teruna, who claimed to be a former SMRT staff, said that the management did not think about the safety of their staff because they asked their staff to do the job very fast like a robot, based on his experience during the air show.
An article was observed regarding Drew & Napier being the advisor for Temasek Holdings on its S$1.18B offer to buy the remaining 46% stake in SMRT Corp that it does not already own. SMRT, on the other hand is being represented by WongPartnership.Once the deal is complete, SMRT would become a wholly owned subsidiary of Temasek and would be delisted. The article also pointed out that the Drew & Napier team working on the transaction includes directors Sandy Foo, Farhana Siddiqui and Maryam Menon.
Redwire Singapore shared the story of an Indian lady who complained about the racist treatment she was subjected to by an older Chinese man at Dhoby Ghaut MRT station on Mar 17. Tabitha Charmaine claimed that nobody stopped to help her despite the verbal abuse she received, even SMRT staff who witnessed the incident. Yong Ber said in jest that the SMRT staff was there only to wayang. Jang Jae Suk stated that Tabitha Charmaine should have taken a photograph or video of the Chinese man. Frank Young mentioned that the SMRT staff would not intervene unless there was a physical altercation or if the situation escalated. Sukhdev Singh Gill wondered whether the MRT staff and security personnel were trained to handle such incidents.
On September 14, Mr Lee Ling Wee, Managing Director of SMRT Trains, sent an employee communications letter to staff members stating that two employees were dismissed and several others were disciplined including some "senior management", for their role in the track accident on March 22. Many netizens are questioning about the dismissal of the two SMRT employees and are wondering if the senior management will also take responsibility since there are various departments involved. Some have asked what senior management referred to. Netizens are asking SMRT to balance the rights of the workers and to be accountable to the public.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the response of Japanese manufacturer Kawasaki Heavy Industries to the hairline cracks that appeared on 26 SMRT trains has been impressive. He mentioned that Kawasaki had taken ownership of the problem and had made the decision to replace and repair the defects and extend its warranty to protect their reputation. Some netizens agreed that authorities should learn to be accountable.
SMRT reviewed the air-conditioning systems on trains plying the North-South and East-West Lines and implemented measures to make cabin temperatures more bearable. The initiative followed a 50% increase in number of complaints about warm train cabins from 2014 to last year.SMRT said that one measure was to clean the motors in air-conditioners more frequently and efficiently, with a trial use of a new grade of carbon brush that may help reduce dust formation in the motors of first-generation trains. Other efforts included using machines to charge the supply of air-conditioning gas and seal up leaky tubes in second-generation trains.A study done between December 2015 and February 2016 found that trains from the first three generations were most problematic, as far as the air-conditioning systems go.In March, a taskforce was set up to look into faults present in the first three generations of trains. The taskforce found that first-generation trains had dust building up in their air-conditioner motors which worsens their cooling functions. Second-generation trains were found to have air-conditioners with leaking tubes, while third-generation trains had defects that caused a lack of proper control of the air-conditioners. Several netizens stated that the air-conditioning systems on trains should be regularly checked, cleaned and maintained so that they would function properly. Ayis Farreze Ezyun said that there are a few reasons why trains can be warm and stuffy. Firstly, most of the train stations are viaduct stations, and trains will stop at every station within 2-3 minutes where all 24 doors will open and hot air will enter. Next, the train already has body temperatures of more than 500 passengers, which aggravates the situation. Thiru SC pointed out that the hot weather lasts for about 2-3 months, and increasing ridership and overcrowding are the main reasons why trains are warm. Benjamin Alexander Cai suggested during rush hours when trains are overcrowded, the air-conditioning should be on full blast.
SMRT lodged a police report last week about the alleged theft of S$20,000 from Tanah Merah station by a former SMRT Station Manager. The man was said to be on the run and is no longer in the country. The missing money, which came largely from commuters wanting to top up their travel cards at the station office, had been siphoned over a period of several months.Patrick Nathan, Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications at SMRT, said that the company has referred the case to the police and that he could not comment further.A source familiar with the work of a station manager said that the handling of money was "based on trust". Many netizens found the news disturbing, saying that the incident was another loophole in SMRTs management system. Several were surprised that such a big organisation did not have a check system involving the handling of cash. Others wondered why it took two months before SMRT discovered the theft. Jessie So stated that the cash from the stations should have been deposited into a bank at the end of each shift. A netizen said that there were many security cameras in the stations and wondered why there were none at the top up counter. Jon Tan stated that the handling of cash based merely on trust meant that there was no system in place.
An SMRT bendy bus was involved in an accident involving a lorry and a van which took place at the junction of Yishun Ave 1 on Jan 17.According to the Singapore Civil Defence Force, a driver and a passenger from the van were hurt in the accident and conveyed in a conscious state to Khoo Teck Puat Hospital.An eyewitness stated that the bus was blocking three lanes, two of which were turning lanes to Sembawang. Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that the bus involved in the accident was off-service. Several netizens noted that there have been many reports of SMRT buses getting involved in accidents. The netizen mentioned that SMRT should address the issue. Agnes Meurzec said that no changes or improvements were observed despite complaints that too many bus drivers were driving recklessly and compromising safety of their passengers. ??? mentioned that such accidents were the consequence of refusing to give way and wanting to rush to claim the rights to the road.
A case study published on Human Resources Online showed that SMRT employee engagement scores were at best-in-class levels, with nine in 10 staff being proud to serve at SMRT, and 86% of staff being sustainably engaged, which places the company way above the Singapore norm of 80%. SMRT successfully attracted and grew its engineering headcount by more than 100% to about 400, despite Singapores acute shortage of engineers. Recently, the company reviewed its rewards structures to meet the different requirements of its fare and non-fare businesses, with greater emphasis placed on operational performance for its fare businesses in trains and buses. Koh Teck Chee, Deputy Director of Careers and Rewards at SMRT, said that they leverage on compensation and benefits schemes to power SMRTs transformation and drive cultural change. Elijah Lim asked if SMRT staff and commuters were interviewed to support the figures.
Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong would be in Putrajaya, Malaysia on July 19 for the signing of the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) on the High-Speed Rail (HSR) that would connect Kuala Lumpur and Singapore. He would be accompanied by his wife, Ho Ching, Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure and Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan and Minister for Foreign Affairs Vivian Balakrishnan.Minister Khaw Boon Wan and Malaysian Minister in the Prime Minister's Department Abdul Rahman Dahlan would sign the MOU. The MOU would pave the way for detailed negotiations on the main bilateral agreement which was expected to be signed by the end of this year.The tender for the HSR project linking Kuala Lumpur to Singapore was expected to be called within a year from the signing of an initial agreement. Several netizens asked the details of the HSR project and Singapores commitment since it would cost a huge amount of money. Others asked about the fares and time needed to clear the customs. Some were concerned about terrorism and hoped that both Governments would ensure the safety of commuters. Ah Soh wondered who would fund the project and how the sharing of profits and losses would be between the two Governments since 90% of the track and stations would be in Malaysia. Ong Ah Boon said that it was important for the HSR to be completed on time so that travelling time to and from Singapore would be reduced.
SMRT awarded Otis Elevator the S$47.3M contract to upgrade the escalators along the North-South and East-West Lines.233 escalators at 42 train stations would be refurbished and upgraded by 2021. The escalators would be upgraded with higher efficiency machines to better cater to passenger traffic during different periods of the day. Several netizens believed that train fares would again increase because of the additional costs to SMRT for refurbishing and upgrading the escalators. Margaret Pringle suggested building a staircase in between the escalators for higher efficiency and better health of commuters. Tan Seng Hoo welcomed the upgrading of escalators but mentioned that SMRT should ensure the quality of the escalators to avoid breakdowns and inconvenience to commuters. Kian Wee Max said that safety should be made a priority rather than having faster escalators. Brenda Loy hoped that the older trains at the East-West Line would also be replaced.
needsomecash stated in a post yesterday (16 June) that there was a slight service delay on the Circle Line which resulted in overcrowding at the platform of Bishan Station. Several netizens stated that train service on the Circle Line was normal, and told the netizen not to complain. needsomecash mentioned that there were queues for every train door at Bishan Station in the direction of Paya Lebar and the wait was up to four minutes. LamborghiniGallardo mentioned that the crowd at Bishan Station was worse than Boon Lay MRT station. Crescy confirmed that Bishan Station was crowded and that s/he had to wait for two to three trains before s/he was able to board. EdenHazard asked the thread starter not to spread inaccurate claims as there were still many empty seats on the train that s/he boarded from Bishan Station. Jason910 posted a picture of a relatively empty cabin of his train at Bishan and refuted the claims made by the thread starter.
SBS Transit revealed its official Facebook page on September 1. In its first post, SBST asked netizens to like the page and to inform them what they wished to see on the page. Some netizens asked SBS Transit to post insights of bus operations, bus captains experiences and to bring back Friends of SBS Transit. (buses[IN]gapore!) suggested that SBS Transit open up its page wall for netizens to share feedback and ideas, adding that companies such as SMRT, Tower Transit and Go-Ahead have been doing a great job engaging with netizens for a while now with their friendlier engagements.
On Facebook, Beh Chia Lor - Singapore Road responded to doubts about the story posted about the taxi driver who returned the bag of cash to a passenger.It was stated that SMRT could have easily verified the story by tracking the taxis time log from the SMRT server, checked the audio recordings of the conversations between the driver and the passenger, and checked the CCTV inside and outside hotel where the passenger was picked up.The Thai businessman was also asked to shed light on the incident to clear the taxi drivers name. Some netizens said that the taxi driver did a great job and should be commended and not be condemned. Others still found it strange that someone would carry such a big amount of money and take public transport. Lawrence Teo suggested that the driver print his cash card summary to indicate his location and the time of the incident.
?Patrick Wu? reported an usher at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange who guided commuters to board the wrong bus even though they were queuing at the correct berth for bus service 913 heading to Woodlands. However, the bus that they were asked to board was heading towards Marsiling. The netizen also mentioned that when the commuters later alighted from the bus and boarded the correct one, the bus captain gave an unpleasant attitude when he tried to confirm that the bus was the right one.
In Parliament on Feb 29, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that choosing the skirting alignment for the construction of the Cross Island Line (CRL) tunnel at the Central Catchment Nature Reserve (CCNR) would cost commuters six minutes of additional travel time. The statement was in response to questions posed by Member of Parliament Louis Ng on the environmental impact for the construction of the 50-km CRL, and whether the transport ministry would opt for the skirting alignment at the CCNR to cater to more residents.Minister Khaw mentioned that no decision has been made on which alignment would be chosen but noted the CRL's importance, saying that the line would "significantly enhance" the rail network's resilience, and with 600,000 trips a day, its capacity and usage would far exceed that of the North-East Line.The Minister added that in a minute of delay, a commuter could post 100 times on Twitter to "flame" the Land Transport Authority and the rail operator, so the six minutes of extra travel time, he said, could not be simply "brushed aside".Dispelling the notion that the skirt-around would serve more residents, Minister Khaw said residents were already served by the Circle Line and the upcoming Thomson-East Coast Line.The Transport Minister also stated that only after more environmental and technical studies have been carried out would an informed decision be made. The potential impact on the nature reserve, the travelling distance and time for commuters, the cost to taxpayers, and the potential acquisition of homes and businesses would all be taken into account. Many netizens stated that Minister Khaw might have misunderstood that the commuters complaints were about the disruptions and not about the long journey. Several were glad that the Minister was aware of commuters expectations but also asked what his plans were to resolve the existing issues of the older MRT lines. Others said that six minutes more of travel time was nothing compared to losing the green heritage forever. Some stated that the money should just be used for maintenance. Others believed that the Government had already made its decision to build the line through the nature reserve even before the experts and peoples views were taken into consideration. Hadi Iskandar mentioned that the Government has overlooked the destruction of nature and were making excuses to save cost. The netizen, however, questioned the S$500M fund to be used to upgrade the ERP system. Cedric Seow suggested that instead of using so much tax money for a satellite ERP system, the Government should use the money to keep the greenery of Singapore. Peter Loh said that the frequencies of the current lines should be increased. Mohd Kasim Aj mentioned that the CRL plans should just be shelved if it would cause a lot of problems to so many people and destroy whatever greenery that Singapore still has. Timothy Lim, on the other hand, stated that the Government should go ahead with the plan to build tunnels underneath the nature reserve and not spend the extra S$2B billion unnecessarily in order to divert the rail line. J. said that in contrast, the Government seemed to agree with having a few more stops in Malaysia for the High-Speed Rail (HSR) to Kuala Lumpur which would add more minutes before reaching the end station. Bang Wenfu remarked that Minister Khaws argument completely missed the point of public discontent - that a piece of land gazetted as "Nature Reserve" was being allowed to be encroached upon by a major public infrastructure.
Zephyr Khambatta thanked SMRT for the swift rides to and from work, making travelling in Singapore easier.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about how some students from Singapore Polytechnic gave a surprise to their station staff some weeks ago. The students approached staff members at 13 stations along the East-West Line and handed them small gifts as a token of appreciation, and personally thanked the staff for their hard work.
Two SMRT bus captains offered their assistance to the traffic police after a motorcycle and a car collided at the junction of Yishun Ring Road and Yishun Street 21. ??? observed that a number of accidents had already occurred in Yishun.
?Sonia Alex? boarded a train from Jurong East towards Bishan. The netizen said the train stopped at Ang Mo Kio Station for about five minutes and she had to disembark. She said that SMRT should provide clear announcements on which stop train services terminate at and where to wait for the next train. This is so commuters may plan their journeys well.
Catherine Tai Siew Leng stated that another automated teller machine (ATM) should be installed at Jurong East MRT station. The netizen mentioned that the queue of customers waiting to use the ATM was exceedingly long, especially during peak hours. To exacerbate the situation, the particular ATM also breaks down quite often and customers had to walk to nearby malls resulting in a lot of inconvenience. The netizen suggested that it would be a good idea if another POSB or DBS Bank ATM be installed next to the current one at the MRT station to reduce waiting time for customers.
Mancunian2 asked if it would be possible to scrap the current MRT and build a new one since the current MRT always fails and is beyond economic repair. Several netizens stated that building a new MRT system would be a waste of taxpayers money. Desmond_ said that the rail system should be upgraded and maintained properly. turbin95 disagreed with the suggestion of demolishing and rebuilding the MRT but suggested a change of operator or management. shinkuaku mentioned that it would not be possible to demolish the existing rail system but there should be engineers and technicians that could make it more efficient. savoirex suggested shutting down one major line for six months to repair and replace tracks, electrical and signalling systems, and provide bus services for affected commuters.
Bernard K wondered why Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan and LTA were the ones trying to solve the issues faced by SMRT. The contributor stated that if the Transport Minister would continue doing so, the Government should just place the train operations under its portfolio instead of being run by a private company. TheGreateagle stated that the SMRTs problems escalated when former SMRT CEO Saw Phaik Hwa handled SMRT operations and focused on rental business instead of maintenance. Robert Teh mentioned that something must be fundamentally wrong with the system as the train system and all public services were full of problems and not progressing well.
?Nigel Wan? asked SMRT about the unidentified item found on a train and reported to the staff of the Aljunied and Raffles Place stations on Apr 22.The netizen boarded the train on Apr 22 and saw an unattended large package. He reported the incident to SMRTs customer service hotline and to the Aljunied Station staff. The train, however, was not stopped and inspected. He again reported the issue to the control station staff at Raffles Place Station. The netizen felt that the reported item might not have been a real threat but may have been a disaster if it was something else.
The Ministry of Manpower (MOM), in consultation with the LTA, has directed SMRT to put in place several interim safety measures for carrying out work on railway tracks following an accident which killed two trainees on Mar 22. Among the measures which SMRT has to abide by from Mar 31 were: o No trains should be on automatic mode for sections of the track where staff are required on the adjacent track walkway; the trains must be manually operated and at low speeds. o No trains are allowed to approach sections of the track where works such as repairs are taking place before any personnel are allowed to proceed to those areas. o There should be robust authentication procedures between the personnel deployed on the tracks and the Operations Control Centre (OCC) to verify the track isolation.o Measures for isolation must be continuously in place until staff have left the work area and trackside.o Watchmen must be deployed to alert personnel on the tracks of oncoming trains from both directions of the track.In response, SMRT said it has strengthened procedures and implemented the measures spelled out by the authorities immediately after the accident. SMRT also stated that its internal investigations into the cause of the accident would be completed by next week, and the report would be handed to the police and MOM for their investigations. On Facebook, Melvin Yong, National Transport Workers Union Executive Secretary welcomed the interim measures. Most netizens stated that the implementation of safety measures seemed to be late as two lives had already been lost due to safety lapses. Several observed that the safety measures required by MOM and LTA were already common safety measures which should have been implemented by every train operator. Some suggested installing a camera in the front and back of the train. Others mentioned that SMRT should be held accountable for the accident. Min Zheng wondered why MOM and LTA have to be the ones to issue the safety guidelines, instead of SMRT CEO and senior management ensuring the safety of its staff and commuters.
A video shared on The Straits Times Facebook page showed the number of commuters at Stadium MRT station making their way home after the National Day Parade at the Singapore Sports Hub. Most netizens praised SMRT staff for being well coordinated in handling the crowd. Ahmad L Ishak was among those in the queue at Stadium MRT station but mentioned that commuter flow was orderly and moved steadily. He added that trains arrived every other minute. The netizen praised the ushers and personnel on duty. Carol Ng mentioned that commuters readily gave up their seats to her parents. Wee-Ling Chew said that the queue looked bad from the outside but it moved quickly when she was at the station platform.
Member of Parliament Leon Perera asked the Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan the following question in Parliament:1. What is the criteria used to determine the location, nature and length of MRT noise barriers; and,2. Whether the Ministry will consider extending the noise barriers in areas that are close to residential units where current sound barriers do not extend to the whole residential area.In a written reply, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that the Land Transport Authority (LTA) have prioritised the installation of noise barriers along elevated MRT tracks where the noise level in adjacent residential developments due to the MRT exceeds NEA's recommended threshold criterion of 67 decibels.
Paul posted about the replacement works being carried out within parts of Beauty World MRT Station on the Downtown Line. The netizen mentioned that the granite floor tiles were 'popping out' of the ground and had to be changed. Paul expressed concerns over the incident, which he says has been going on in various sections of the MRT station ever since April. Several netizens believed that the contractor should be blamed for the condition of the tiles.
?Kendrick Teo? observed that the southbound trains and station platforms were less crowded before 7 a.m. and that waiting time was consistent at two to three minutes.The netizen, however, observed that at 7 a.m., the waiting time for the southbound trains on the North-South line increased to six minutes, causing congestion at Ang Mo Kio MRT station platform.The netizen hoped that SMRT could maintain the less than three-minute frequency for their trains so commuters would not have to wait long at the station.
On Facebook, Singapore Democratic Party Secretary-General Chee Soon Juan, stated that he was reminded by an article on The Online Citizen recounting the 2010 accident that killed Chia Teck Heng when he was hit by a train while working on the LRT track. He said that back then, SMRT stated that worker safety was governed by a set of "strict regulations". Six years later, however, another two workers were killed in a similar manner. He also wondered why there was a repeat of the tragedy in such a short span of time if the Ministries of Transport and Manpower had truly learnt their lessons in 2010. Several netizens stated that the company should not be liable if an employee chose not to adhere with safety standards even when safety regulations were in place. Eddie Tan stated that the families or siblings of the victims must be compensated until their age of 65 since it was the fault of the company they worked for.
A train fault at Buangkok station caused a delay on the North East Line on the morning of Jul 29.SBS Transit, which operates the line, said in a tweet at 7:31 a.m. that commuters should expect an additional 15 minutes of travelling time. Free bus rides were also deployed between Potong Pasir and Punggol stations.SBS Transit announced that normal service resumed at 8:18 a.m. but added that commuters should expect delays as the stations were still crowded. Many netizens posted their frustration about the delay on social media. Several netizens mentioned that people would not be encouraged to give up their cars if public transport continued to experience frequent breakdowns. Others were disappointed that they were asked to pay for the fare on some bus services. Siah Jin Kim said that it was good that there were bus services that ply along the new MRT lines. The netizen also suggested that LTA introduce more bus services from Sengkang and Punggol.
On Facebook, Land Transportation Authority (LTA) mentioned that it was only six days away from the transition to the Bus Contracting Model. The LTA said that fares, routes and bus stops would not change but Tower Transit bus captains would be wearing new green and white uniforms. Simon Lam stated that the Government needs to review the current bus fares now that all buses are assets owned by the Government. ??? asked whether there would still be transport vouchers for low income households in 2016. Joseph Lim also asked if Monthly Adult Travel Cards will be accepted by the new bus companies.
Netizens continued to discuss the increased average daily ridership at the Downtown Line (DTL), following the opening of its second stage (DTL2) late last year.The Land Transport Authority (LTA) has said that although more commuters are now taking public transport, there is a need for a bigger push to encourage those who live in the Bukit Timah estate to go car-lite.Mr Lee Der-Horng, National University of Singapore transport researcher, believed that those living in private residences in Bukit Timah have not given up their cars as they face issues of "first-and last-mile connectivity" or travelling from their homes to the nearest MRT station. Several netizens said that there was an increase in ridership on the DTL because the residential areas were only served by buses previously and were now covered by the new DTL stations. DigDub said that it was convenient to use the Downtown Line. deezistan wondered why there was still congestion on the roads if more commuters had shifted from driving to taking the DTL, as LTA has claimed in its press release.
A pedestrian was killed after an SBS Transit bus service 238 ran over him along Toa Payoh Lorong 6 just outside the bus interchange on July 7.The victim, a man in his 60s, was pronounced dead at the scene by paramedics, according to a Singapore Civil Defence Force spokesman.Tammy Tan, SBS Transit's Senior Vice President for Corporate Communications, said that the company was assisting police with their investigations. Several netizens stated that many SBS Transit and SMRT bus captains were reckless on the road. Some argued that there was no pedestrian crossing at the said junction while others countered that there was a traffic light, a pedestrian crossing and also an overhead crossing in the area. Several stated to let the police do the investigation instead of speculating on what really happened. Others reminded both drivers and pedestrians to always be aware of each other especially at junctions. Brian Cheng claimed that public transport operators were rushing against time these days to meet the criteria set by the LTA to receive incentives it offered. Isaac Thang deemed that SBS Transit does not impose stringent requirements when hiring bus captains.
Mohammad Shake Ashiff Saripan? posted a photo showing the number of people waiting for bus service 856. It was so crowded that the 5th bus that arrived could not even open its doors for passengers to board. He claimed that the situation had been the same for the past 10 days. Vikram Raman mentioned experiencing the same situation at the same bus stop.
?Pang Huey Lee? reported that the LRT train travelling towards Choa Chu Kang did not stop at Bukit Panjang Station. The train moved towards Phoenix Station where it finally stopped.
Writer Gan Kok Tiong read with interest the response by LTA Corporate Communications Group Director Helen Lim to a forum letter about bus reliability.The writer mentioned that while waiting for the bus at the interchange, on several occasions, he/she noticed that the departure time on the screen changes to a later one if the bus does not show up on time. The writer stated that for a commuter waiting for the bus prior to the time change, that bus he/she was waiting for would be considered unreliable. On the other hand, if the bus arrives at the revised time, the bus would be deemed reliable.The writer asked what LTAs take on bus reliability in such cases was.
?Kishure Kumar? praised the bus captain of service 969 (SMB1535C). As no one had offered a seat to a pregnant passenger, the bus captain asked her how far she was travelling, and requested others to give up their seats for her.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about his visit to the North-East Line depot. Minister Khaw mentioned that the North-East Line could have passed the 100-day disruption-free milestone if not for the 30-minute delay in service on Feb 3, caused by a passengers leg getting stuck in the gap between the train and the platform, and a train fault right after.The Minister also commended the North-East Line staff members for placing passenger safety and comfort first and mentioned that he believed that the North-East Line would be able to join the 100-day Club in due course, similar to the Circle and Downtown Lines. Darren Tay asked if the staff response time to the crisis was as quick as Hong Kongs, which was about two minutes. Kue Chan Chong wondered if the East-West Line could also pass the 100-day milestone.
?Pamela Chua? thanked two SMRT staff members who assisted her niece to clean up after she had vomited at Jurong East Station platform. The netizen mentioned that the two staff were kind and considerate, and offered the passengers niece to use the staff toilet so that they could clean up, and also comforted her distressed niece.
?Lee Wang Zheng? shared a video showing Chief Bus Captain Krishna Rao assisting commuters at the Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange in the afternoon of Mar 14. The netizen praised the bus captain for his good service.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament Muhammad Faishal Ibrahim posted about the Bicycle Education and Enforcement exercise held at Yishun MRT station on September 7.He stated that there were still some who park their bicycles indiscriminately. This poses an inconvenience and safety issues to pedestrians, especially the elderly. Chua Alvin stated that although cycling was good for the health and is environmentally friendly, it poses some issues of road safety because many dispose their old or faulty bicycles at MRT stations and shopping centres.
Joseph Wong Yong Lye was disappointed that no announcements were made to inform passengers that the train at Woodleigh Station on the North-East Line would be going towards the opposite direction. The netizen reported the incident to SBS Transit but has yet to receive a response.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) awarded two contracts for the construction of Amber and Bedok South MRT stations on the Thomson-East Coast Line. The construction of Amber station in Tanjong Katong has been awarded to Woh Hup at S$146M. While the construction of Bedok South station and its associated tunnels has been awarded to China Jingye Engineering at S$188M.The Bedok South station would be the sixth Civil Defence shelter along the East Coast stretch of the Thomson-East Coast Line. Some netizens are concerned about the evaluation criteria when awarding contracts to foreign contractors. James Png suggested checking the background of the two companies that had been awarded the contracts. Wei Min Liu stated that Woh Hup is a well-established Singaporean main contractor with an excellent construction record.
Patrick Liew Siow Gian believed that the lower fares introduced by Uber and the impending changes by similar companies could contribute to overall benefits and growth of the economy and society. The writer stated that there was adequate evidence to show that competition could help to improve value creation and productivity of industries and enterprises. He mentioned that the reduction of prices might increase the number of taxi commuters, thus contributing towards building a car-lite culture. Commuters, on the other hand, benefit from having more choices, lower prices, and better services.The writer said that taxi companies should use the opportunity to improve their business models, rationalise their operations and enhance their productivity and innovation, including using Big Data analytics to improve their results and service.The Government should also revisit some of its policies, such as requiring taxi drivers to be on the road during peak hours and clocking a minimum daily mileage of 250km.
On All Singapore Stuff Facebook Page, Koh Choong Yong shared a video where an alarm could be heard continuingly sounding off. The netizen mentioned that the incident has happened many times over the years and had disrupted his/her sleep.The noise had been reported to the police but they could only check the source of the noise and inform SBS Transit of the complaint. The netizen mentioned writing to SBS Transit about the noise but there was no firm promise that such things would not recur. Several netizens stated that Koh Choong Yong should have observed the surrounding before buying a unit near an MRT or LRT line. Others suggested that the netizen close the windows and turn on the air-conditioning to lower the noise level coming inside his/her unit. Some netizens shared that their houses are located beside expressways and have lived with the noise for many years, and asked the netizen to bear with the noise. Haffiz Hafeez mentioned that based on the National Environment Agency (NEA) guidelines, noise level should be at 55 decibels within 150 metres of residential buildings. The netizen suggested lodging a complaint to NEA if the noise level was more than 55 decibels. Anuar Ah pointed out that the alarm sound came from the multi-storey car park and not from the LRT depot or station.
?Muji Ibrahim? reported the bus captain of service 913 (TIB1019Z) for being reckless which resulted in the netizens daughter to fracture her hand. The netizen recounted that as the bus was turning right after Woodlands Garden, the driver suddenly stepped on the brake to avoid colliding with a lorry. Her daughter fell off her seat and injured her right arm. The driver stopped the bus to check on the netizens daughter and reported the incident to the command centre. The netizen was asked to go back to Woodlands interchange where the ambulance would be called to check on her daughter. The netizen wondered why they had to go back to the interchange and not just call the ambulance from where the bus stopped. She mentioned that she was disappointed as to how SMRT handled the incident. They never received any calls from SMRT to check on her daughter. When the netizen called SMRTs customer service centre, all she received was an apology and a bouquet of flowers. (Note: SMRT is in touch with the family and will continue to follow up with them.)
Smexy Sai Dai? asked how often the train floors were swept because the dust on the floor seemed more than a week old.
The taxi driver involved in a fatal four-vehicle accident on the Pan-Island Expressway (PIE) had been arrested on suspicion of causing death by a rash act. His driving licence had also been suspended.A motorcyclist died in the incident after he was pinned underneath a car. If convicted, the driver could be fined and/or jailed up to two years. Many netizens stated that most taxi drivers drive recklessly and did not follow road rules. Some said that taxi drivers should only be allowed to drive eight hours a day. Kalai Heardrum suggested that taxi drivers should be required to go to an annual refresher course before being allowed to renew their vocational licence. Kim Yeo said that motorcycles should be banned on highways.
?Glenc Soh? reported that the bus captain of service 188R (SMB1592E) skipped the bus stop opposite Vivo City towards Sentosa despite passengers flagging at the bus stop.
Reader Ku Cheng Yong praised the bus captain of service 972 who patiently waited for him/her while trying to catch the bus outside Raffles Town Club on August 12. The reader said that the bus captain took the initiative to stop the bus and open the doors for him/her, even though there were no passengers alighting or boarding. When the reader boarded the bus, the driver even smiled cheerfully at him/her. The reader also said that no words could express his/her appreciation for what the driver did. The reader noted that bus captains were often under pressure to meet schedules, but this particular bus captain went the extra mile in catering to his passengers. The netizen applauded the bus captain for his gracious action.
On August 6, SMRT tweeted at around 8:52 a.m. that there will be an estimated15 minutes additional traveling time from Yishun to Ang Mo Kio due to a track fault. At 8:57 a.m., SMRT posted on Twitter that passengers should expect an additional 10 minutes traveling time from Yishun to Bishan towards Marina South Pier. Several netizens were frustrated with another train disruption on the North-South Line. peterpan2233 wondered what a track fault was exactly. The netizen asked SMRT whether the track was broken or damage and how a track could have a fault. stinv believed that the rail system was already old and the breakdowns were caused by wear and tear. Daniel Ong stated that breakdowns were an ongoing problem that would not be resolved.
SMRT shared on its Facebook page and blog regarding SMRT buses helping Go-Ahead Singapore cope with a shortage of drivers needed to run bus services in Loyang. Mr Tan Kian Heong, Managing Director SMRT Buses and Road Services, explained why SMRT is stepping in to help another public transport operator. He also shed light on what interlining entails. Mr Tan also shared that for its interlining services, SMRT Buses will ensure that all bus captains receive route familiarisation training and cater for sufficient rest so that they can carry out their duties well.
Netizens continued to discuss the debate surrounding the construction of the Cross Island MRT Line and its potential environmental impactOn TODAY Online - Voices, Manoraj Rajathurai asked what price Singapore was prepared to pay to balance progress and conservation, while Tan Kok Tim urged the LTA to provide more information on the proposed line. Several netizens believed that the Government did not care about the conservation of the nature reserve as long as it would bring them profits. Jordan Tan asked the Government to stop cutting down trees just to make way for more useless HDBs and MRT lines or there would be no natural sights to explore in a decade's time. Tan Kok Tim said that when the MRT lines went under the Singapore River, the river had not been disturbed. The netizen wondered if the reservoir would be disturbed or destroyed when the MRT lines were drilled through at a depth of 500m or deeper. Winston Sheng suggested that the LTA should review the entire MRT masterplan to avoid costly repairs and experienced experts should be hired to assess the system.
On Facebook, SMRT posted about the NightRider (NR) service which provides bus connections between the city and major housing estates after-hours, and offers a safe and affordable way for commuters to get home. A video was also shared showing NR Bus Captain Toh Thian Siew, one of many night shift workers at SMRT. Norman Abdullah stated that SMRT should have an option of a five-day week job for Singaporeans in bus operations. Sthsze Sth observed that Bus Captain Toh Thian Siew had been driving for 15 years but had yet to be promoted to an executive post.
John Leong Yew Cheong believed that private-hire car operators have a much lower entry barrier into the industry as they do not carry the heavy compliance cost of meeting the minimum daily mileage of 250km and plying the roads during morning and evening peak periods. Taxi companies, on the other hand, have to comply with the minimum daily mileage and the taxis have to be sent for monthly servicing and maintenance and six-monthly vehicle inspection. As a result, the rental cost of a taxi was 70% to 80% higher than that of a private-hire car. Many taxi drivers welcome competition, but it must be fair and on a level playing field. The writer said that all cars used for private hire on a prolonged and frequent basis should be subject to the same requirements that taxis face. He added that all should collectively work together for the benefit of commuters and drivers alike, so that passengers could enjoy their ride and drivers could earn a decent income.
The Transport Ministry announced on Friday (July 15) that LTA will take over all operating assets of the North-South, East-West and Circle lines as well as the Bukit Panjang LRT Line from SMRT for S$1.06 billion. Pending approval from SMRT shareholders, the Government would take over all operating assets from SMRT from Oct 1.Prior to the announcement, SMRT called for a trading halt at 11:59 a.m. on July 15. Its stock was up 0.5 cents at S$1.545 before trading was halted.Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure and Minister for Transport Khaw Boon Wan said that the move to the new rail financing framework would benefit commuters. The Minister said, "It will allow LTA to add trains to respond more quickly to demand, and to replace and upgrade existing rail assets in a more timely manner. This should achieve the twin objectives of raising rail reliability and reducing crowdedness."In a media statement, SMRT's President and Group CEO Desmond Kuek said that the move would "allow SMRT Trains to better focus on fulfilling its role as a public transport operator to deliver high levels of operational reliability, safety and service".LTA stated that under the new framework, SMRTs operating licence would be shortened from between 30 and 40 years to 15 years, to make the industry more contestable. Under the license charge structure, the amount of fees paid to LTA by SMRT will depend on the amount of revenue collected. This license charge will go into the Railway Sinking Fund for future expenditure on operating assets. The transport authority added that the transition would not affect day-to-day operations and would not impact employees of SMRT Trains and SMRT Light Rail. Both SMRT and LTA however, will increase workforce to enhance maintenance strength and step up checks and audits. Commuter fares, which are regulated by the Public Transport Council, would also not be affected. Many netizens disapproved that LTA had to buy back the assets which it provided to SMRT using taxpayers money. Several were concerned that the Government would now shoulder the losses of SMRT. Others approved of the new rail model saying that the Government could now ensure the quality of assets while SMRT could now focus on providing efficient and reliable service. Some were happy that the Government finally stepped in on the rail business. Others hoped that fares would eventually decrease. Some suggested that the Government should put out the tender for the operations of the MRT and LRT Lines to foreign operators, similar to the new bus contracting model. Chun Chew Lam believed that commuters were more interested to see the improvement in services without raising fares. Melvin Lai asked how LTAs taking over the assets would change the rail system. Kelvin Hwj praised LTA with sarcasm for a job well done in acquiring SMRTs rails assets including the problems that had surfaced after years of neglect.
Alex Goh stated that the scheduling of trunk service 857 on weekday mornings needs to be improved. The buses were unable to cope with the high demand with its 15-20 minutes intervals and deployment of only single-decked buses.The netizen claimed that on Jan 12, many commuters were left stranded without alternative bus services when the bus driver of SMB1491U decided not to allow waiting passenger to board the bus at bus stop 60089 at around 7:20 a.m. He also suggested deploying double-decker buses during such periods. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut said that service 857 has quite a handful of double-decker buses during weekdays. The netizen suggested having some routes from the city to Yishun. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut added that services 851 and 855 should be improved because 851 has very little high capacity buses while 855 has very erratic frequency and all low capacity buses during peak hour.
"????? stated that there was a need to increase capacity on bus service 858 during the morning peak period. The netizen mentioned that the buses arriving at the bus stop along Tampines Expressway near Punggol Road exit were almost always packed, and commuters had to wait for up to three buses before they could board. The frequency of service 858 was also irregular.????? said that s/he had previously raised the issue but was always informed that the operator was constantly reviewing the demand and adjusting its capacity accordingly. S/he stated that it was irresponsible to classify the delay as an unforeseen factor and that SMRT should re-evaluate their assessment of the bus demand and load.The netizen pointed out that that service 858 is the only link to the airport for people residing in the North. Zenov Yap noted that SMRT had been giving the same excuse since the days of Trans-Island Bus Services. If people were always not able to get onto buses, it meant that there were insufficient number of buses and the delay was not caused by the weather or traffic conditions. Yi JF wondered why SBS Transit buses were much more reliable."mrclubbie reported that the bus captain of service 858 was driving recklessly as it was leaving the airport. IWantFriends observed that SMRT bus drivers tend to drive faster. Singkaporlang stated in jest that the thread starter should be happy that s/he could reach his/her destination faster.
Ellen Chan Lover observed that the MRT trains were moving very slowly when travelling between Chinese Garden and Lakeside MRT stations for several months already. cute_togepi mentioned that the sleeper replacement on the East-West Line required trains to travel at a slower speed. The netizen also stated that the speed of trains at the North-South line was even worse during the sleeper replacement works as buses moved faster than the trains particularly in the Lentor area.
Park Chorong stated that the trains would not breakdown even if it rains because SMRT staff were working on it, referring to SMRTs Were Working On It campaign.Jackygogogo said that it was frightening that SMRT had been working on it interminably without rectifying the root cause of the issues.
SMRT and SBS Transit would be extending their train and some bus services on the eve of Vesak Day on May 20. In a press release, SMRT said that the North-South, East-West and Circle Lines, as well as Bukit Panjang LRT would have extended operating hours, with the last trains departing from between 11:30 p.m. and 1:29 a.m. Selected bus services will also have their operating hours extended to as late as 1.40am. SBS Transit would also be extending the operating hours of the North-East and Downtown Lines, as well as the Sengkang and Punggol LRT systems by about 30 minutes on May 20. To complement the extension of train operating hours, SBS Transit said that the last bus timings of 26 selected bus services would also be extended at their respective bus interchanges.
Desmond Lee reported the bus captain of service 860 for being reckless and for not turning on the air-conditioner. Bujang Teruna suggested sending an e-mail to the LTA. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details for further investigation.
As part of efforts to refresh its offerings to stay relevant in a competitive retail scene, Kallang Wave Mall has signed on new tenants. Among the latest stores at the shopping centre beside the Singapore Sports Hub were self-balancing electric unicycle provider Rendezvous! CWAL, 24-hour gym Anytime Fitness and music, dance and fitness school Kulture Studios.Other additions include sports certification and education school International Sports Academy and the Newport Dental clinic.It was not surprising for Kallang Wave Mall to be relatively empty because it lacks a dedicated catchment market as it was not located within any big housing estate.With the signing of new tenants and National Day Parade set to be held at the Sports Hub in August, however, things could be looking up for the mall. A spokesman for SMRT Alpha, which manages the mall, told My Paper that it is "bringing in new tenants to enhance the shopping, dining and entertainment experience". In recent months, the mall has held activities for children such as foosball, automated animal rides and mini-train rides. The Sports Hub has also beefed up its range of offerings, from hosting rugby matches to holding the Madonna concert.
Glenc Soh asked SMRT to extend bus timings of service 920 to at least match the last Downtown Line train service. Tommy Ong said that when there was no bus service, the netizen could take the MRT to Bukit Panjang station and then take the LRT to the station nearest his place. Glenc Soh stated that the walk from the LRT station was about 10-15 minutes and was very inconvenient for the elderly. The netizen mentioned that despite the LRT operating way past midnight in Punggol and Sengkang, feeder and shortworking trip services still operated until between 12:30 and 1 a.m. The netizen wondered why SBS Transit could offer such service while SMRT could not.
As LTA and SMRT moves to the new rail financing model, the plan to refurbish old trains have been put on hold. The authorities were studying whether to replace old MRT trains, instead of refurbishing them, as it had originally planned.In 2014, SMRT's engineering services division, Singapore Rail Engineering, signed a deal with Japan's Toshiba to replace motors on 66 of its oldest trains. Although the cost of the new motors were high, SMRT believed that the purchase would be sufficiently good from a life cycle perspective because they would be up to 30% more energy-efficient and 12% quieter. Several netizens stated that SMRT should be allowed to continue with refurbishing the old MRT trains while LTA search for a reliable train manufacturer. So Chak Ho Fergus mentioned that Hong Kong MTR also replaced the motors of trains in its urban and light rail lines. Peter Wee said that LTA should allow SMRT to refurbish the old trains with Japan-made motors. The netizen also asked LTA not to purchase China-made trains. Loh Wai Poon stated that LTA should push through with the refurbishment to not waste effort and costs spent on evaluation. The netizen also mentioned that by replacing the motors, the trains performance can be improved.
?Marvin Tam Peng Siang? asked SMRT to deploy more double-decker buses for service 965 during morning peak hours.
?Sonia Alex? reported that an unattended tourist luggage fell on the back of her legs while waiting for the train at the Jurong East platform towards City Hall on August 14 at 9.09 a.m. The netizen mentioned that the luggage was rather bulky and that the impact was painful. The netizen expressed concern that the luggage could have fallen on an elderly commuter or a child.The netizen suggested having a separate boarding section for commuters with luggage to avoid it from falling onto other passengers.
WJ had been tolerating drilling noises in the middle of the night from the ongoing construction works outside her house in Boon Lay. The netizen mentioned that the track works were going on between Boon Lay and Pioneer MRT since last week, making it difficult to sleep. She had also called the attention of the National Environment Agency (NEA) regarding the issue. A NEA officer replied that the noise level (about 64 decibels) exceeded regulated level and that the relevant agency had already been informed.WJ, however, said that the drilling was still going on. bullshit79 suggested reporting the issue to the areas GRC Member of Parliament. Alfi Aryan wondered why people complain when trains break down and still complain with ongoing maintenance works. Michael Sheridan said that 63 decibels was fairly quiet.
Parliamentary Secretary for the Ministry of Home Affairs Amrin Amin stated that there was an average of 71 outrage of modesty cases on MRT and LRT trains over the last three years. But when asked if the Ministry would consider taking measures such as putting up warning signs, or having women-only carriages - Amrin said that there was no need at present to include warning signs in trains, and that there were no plans to introduce women-only carriages, as the number of molest cases on trains were very small at 5% of total outrage of modesty cases each year.He mentioned that the current level of crime prevention messages were already sufficient. Amrin added that the courts have been meting out stiff sentences for those convicted of molestation on trains. Clement Goh stated that those who had filmed the incident never stood up to assist the victims but just posted the video on social media. BACP Singapore hoped that there could be an outreach programme to teach young girls and boys how to react in such cases. The netizen added that the perpetrators who take advantage of minors should be severely punished as deterrence.
Christopher Tan claimed that the Passenger Service Centre officers at Eunos MRT station refused to provide a train service delay slip. The netizen mentioned that he was already late for work because of a service delay along the East-West Line.
In response to Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans recommendation that rail operators should emulate the Taipei metro system for its reliability on May 30, both SBS Transit and SMRT said they were working to implement the best practices from the Taipei metro system, and have been stepping up efforts to beef up reliability.Gan Juay Kiat, Chief Executive of SBS Transit, said that the company invests extensively in systems and equipment to help in monitoring and maintenance works, regularly reviews their maintenance regime, as well as continually upgrades the skills and professional competency of their engineering staff. Meanwhile, Lee Ling Wee, Managing Director of SMRT Trains, said that it has deployed sensors since two years ago to monitor the condition of its rail assets to see when to replace them.Mr Khaw commented on the current state of Singapores rail reliability. He pointed out how the Taipei Rapid Transit Corporation (TRTC) had studied Singapores rail network in its early years when Singapore was then an exemplary MRT player and a subject of study by other countries.National University of Singapore transport researcher Lee Der Horng pointed out that the key difference of the TRTC from SBS Transit and SMRT was that TRTC was owned by the Taipei government and has no shareholders. TRTC answers directly to the Taipei city council if it does not take care of the commuters' benefit and welfare. Many netizens believed that aside from the rail operators, LTA was also accountable for the current state of Singapores rail system as it regulates and oversees all three main modes of public transport and ensures that they meet safety and service standards. Several believed that the low budget for maintenance and not replacing parts before the end of estimated useful life were some reasons why rail services were unreliable and inefficient. Others would like to see real action and solutions to the rail issues. Some stated that the root cause of the MRT issues was the tremendous increase in population.
With the introduction of new SBS Transit bus services 134 and 150, the inter-town route of service 76 plying Yio Chu Kang Terminal to Marine Parade would be amended to terminate at Eunos Bus Interchange starting Mar 20. A petition was started for the cancellation of the amendment for bus service 76. The petitioner stated that service 76 had served residents along Katong, Marine Parade, Paya Lebar, Serangoon, Sengkang, Ang Mo Kio and Yio Chu Kang, and the amendment could not happen. Several netizens stated that the amendment was illogical and inconvenient because commuters would lose direct connectivity to Marine Parade and had to change buses, lifeisinforashock speculated that the amendment was implemented to force commuters to take the MRT. le_bc_tay mentioned that Eunos bus interchange has just enough parking space during peak hours, and that by adding another service it would be more congested at the interchange. Raj Kumaresan believed that the route amendment was good as it would increase the overall reliability of service 76. The amendment would only add 15 minutes to the total travelling time due to transfers at Paya Lebar MRT station. The bus captain could now have sufficient rest time with this amendment despite a slight inconvenience to commuters. erwinrommel said that a short loop or feeder service was always better to serve the residents at Marine Terrace. He added that the change would save him time as there was no need to cross the overhead bridge outside Parkway Parade.
cheapcheep claimed that on July 1 that the train at Sembawang did not move for five minutes and there were announcements which said that it was due to urgent repair works. randyap mentioned that a similar incident also happened on June 29 at around 10 p.m. from Woodlands to Yio Chu Kang due to a track fault.
Tan Kin Lian stated that an engineer once explained to him that Singapore engaged the expertise from France and Japan to build the MRT system in the 1980s, because they were the best in the world. These experts advised that some of the major parts had to be replaced after 18 years, due to wear and tear. He wondered whether the replacements could be delayed because transport operators in Singapore said that the train parts were still working in Singapore after 18 years. In France, they replaced these parts on schedule after 18 years, and the Japanese, being more cautious, replaced these parts before 18 years. Tan Kin Lian mentioned that he was uncertain whether the engineers claim was true or exaggerated. Luke Wong believed that the engineers statement was true, given how Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan refused to answer such a question in Parliament. Richardo Link said that replacement of mechanical items should be done periodically because wear and tear is the norm in engineering. Simon Lam said that the transport operators could not foresee the wear and tear because their mind-set was just to siphon more money from consumers. Jeffrey Lim wondered how SMRT could get away with such a lax maintenance regime.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) called a tender on Apr 15 inviting private bus firms to bid to run the City Direct Service (CDS) buses for peak hour services. Residents in Buangkok, Sengkang and Hougang could look forward to an express journey to the Central Business District as two new City Direct bus services would be introduced from the third quarter of this year. Separately, the LTA also said that the City Direct contract serving Jurong West would be expiring in August, and it would be calling a tender to continue the service. Some netizens asked why there were no CDS in Punggol, Buangkok and Jurong East where it was much more needed. carbikebus believed that there was no need for too many CDS buses and to transfer the remaining Premium bus services of SMRT and SBS Transit to private operators.
Philip Ang posted about the issue regarding the defective trains which was first reported by FactWire and has taken a new twist with FactWire not only rebutting Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan, but possibly saying he is a liar in an open letter it posted on its Facebook Page.The blogger reckoned that FactWire has rightly taken issue with Minister Khaw Boon Wan speculating on its hidden agenda and its founders. The blogger stated that when engaging the foreign media, the Government should not assume they could be controlled like politicians. He also said that LTA should not have kept the issue of defective China-made trains being sent back to the manufacturer under wraps. The blogger mentioned that the issue has been one of transparency and accountability which he assumes that the Transport Minister has attempted to avoid, and his mishandling of the issue reflects incompetence at the highest level. Ultravinz Lee stated that most of the time, the best public relations was to admit to any shortcomings and propose solutions. That way, the people would think that Government officials were responsible and trying to solve problems.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) is reviewing rules that require taxis to ply the roads at peak periods and clock a minimum daily mileage to level the playing field between taxis and ride-booking services. Private car-hire services such as Uber and Grab were not subject to such rules.According to LTA, the rules enable commuters to get a cab more easily but resulted in taxis cruising the streets empty aside from adding compliance costs for operators in enforcing the regulations.In his National Day Rally speech, Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong stated that the playing field for taxis and services such as Uber and Grab was "not quite level and that the Government would "progressively sort all these things out".Meanwhile, National Taxi Association executive adviser Ang Hin Kee, said taxi availability standards are "obsolete". He added that the taxi apps technology was more effective in helping to match drivers to commuters.Under the taxi availability framework, taxi operators are allowed to expand their fleet size, if their fleets consistently meet the requirements. If they consistently fall short, they can be fined. The latest results, published on the LTA website, showed that in June, Comfort, CityCab, SMRT, Premier and Prime failed to meet the minimum daily mileage requirement. Only Trans-Cab was able to meet the said requirement. Most netizens believed that it was the taxi drivers attitude in picking up passengers that had affected their business. Several mentioned that the taxi service quality had dropped. Sp Fairley said that LTAs minimum daily mileage requirement was the "wrong solution" to the main problem of matching waiting passengers with taxis. The netizen suggested removing booking fees and introducing a mobile app to match waiting passengers with available taxis. Terence Tan said that taxi companies had failed to adapt new technologies similar to that used by Uber and Grab. Anthony Khong said that Grab and Uber were cheaper and more responsive during peak hours, and taxi operators were not able to match the competition. Jemma Ong mentioned that no amount of review could help the taxi drivers who continued to choose destinations. Samuel Lee C M stated that LTA should simplify the fare system and impose fewer surcharges.
Netizens continued to discuss the cat that was seen lying by its side on top of a gantry at Bukit Gombak MRT station. The feline was resting on the fare gate and did not seem to be affected by commuters tapping in and out of the station. Several netizens hoped that SMRT and other people would leave the cat alone. Some stated in jest that the cat was the new security officer at Bukit Gombak MRT station. Francis Chong hoped the cat would remain the premier mascot for the MRT station.
?Lee Yong Wan? asked where the security guard at the former Woodlands Regional Interchange was as a bus enthusiast was able to take photos of a new bus parked there.
Netizens continued to discuss the introduction of USB charging ports on some SMRT buses. While several considered it a commendable initiative, some commuters say the implementation of the scheme leaves much to be desired because of the position in which the USB charging ports were placed.Some commuters complained that the ports were placed too close to the inner seats, resulting in it being blocked by their thighs.Other commuters raised concerns that due to the closeness of the port to the inner passengers thigh, passengers sitting on the outer seat would have little chance to use the ports. They also fear they might be accused of molestation when they accidentally brushed on the thighs of the passenger sitting next to the charging port. Most netizens stated that the position of the charging ports were wrong as they were too close to the seat and would be blocked once the seat was occupied. Many pointed out that such features were unnecessary and the funds should have been used to improve bus frequencies. Several suggested that the charging ports should be placed at the back of seats for easy access. Some believed that the new feature would be used to justify a fare increase. A few suggested implementing an announcement for the next stop, similar to what was done in other countries.
DBS analyst Andy Sim said that while the New Rail Financing Framework (NRFF) was expected to relieve SMRT of its future $2.8billion capital expenditure (CAPEX) problems by transferring the ownership of the rail operating assets to Land Transportation Authority (LTA), it would also cap the company's future earnings. The analyst stated that "with the risk-sharing mechanism, SMRT Trains is required to share profits through a tiered structure (of up to 95%) should earnings before interest and tax (EBIT) margins exceed 5%. Meanwhile, LTA will share 50% of the shortfall if EBIT margins fall below 3.5%. This provides less volatility to SMRTs future earnings, but it will also limit the upside potential".SMRT recently reported a decrease in net profit due to a $9.4M operations loss in rail business. It also reported an increase in operating expenses of S$311.5M due to higher staff and maintenance cost.The analyst projected that SMRTs profits would be more subdued with the transition to the NRFF.
Syllabus asked others if they had noticed that the Circle Line trains had been travelling very very slow and takes a lot of traveling time. Several netizens stated that the travel on the Circle Line seemed longer because the distance between stations were longer. derrickgoh said that s/he was not sure about the speed but sympathised with those taking the Circle Line from end to end. doorsen did not feel any difference in the speed of trains on the Circle Line.
?Jil Khoo? thanked SMRT for offering the Enhanced Training Program to educate its taxi drivers on operational excellence, so they could drive better with the objective of improving their incomes. She was glad to be a driver with SMRT Taxis.
?Paul Chong? hoped that SMRT would reconsider allowing passengers to drink water onboard trains. The netizen stated that it would be senseless reporting passengers caught drinking inside trains as they might have already consumed their drinks after the matter had been reported. Several netizens pointed out that eating and drinking were not allowed inside trains to keep the trains clean and for the comfort and safety of commuters. ??? said that the rule against drinking and eating should be enforced by all SMRT staff members.The SMRT Facebook administrator thanked the netizen for his suggestion and has reached to the netizen should he have any further feedback or suggestions.
?Joselyn Chan? stated that bus service 985 arrived 18 minutes late at bus stop 60089.The netizen hoped that SMRT could increase the trips and frequencies during peak hours.
A post on STOMP was observed regarding a cement mixer truck that crashed into an SBS Transit bus on August 4.Edwin Loh wrote that the bus had the right of way and wondered how the cement mixer truck driver failed to see the oncoming bus. Several netizens asked STOMP to update its post since the vehicle involved was an SBS Transit bus and not SMRTs. Haridevi Devi said that the truck driver should not be blamed as many bus captains were worse drivers. Prabhakaran Pillai pointed out that the cement truck failed to check for oncoming traffic before turning.
Amidst complaints regarding the disruption on the North-South line, Leonard Tan? expressed his appreciation to SMRT staff and engineers. The netizen was onboard Circle Line train number 45 travelling towards HarbourFront when he observed the staff who was monitoring the trains condition.The netizen noticed that the tunnel lights were switched on throughout the journey and that the train was running normally at 70km/h automatically without much hiccups. He observed that the staff had been watching the train status screen on the driving panel and looked out for updates from the operations control throughout the journey.The netizen appreciated the staff for ensuring safety and the efforts of the engineers and ground staff to keep the trains running.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted photos of his visit to the Downtown Line (DTL) as they celebrate the 300-day disruption-free milestone.Minister Khaw had previously promised DTL staff a durian treat if DTL crossed the 300-day disruption-free milestone. He mentioned that the milestone was both significant and very inspiring for the other MRT lines and added that DTL will now aim for the 400-day milestone. Several netizens praised the DTL staff for their good job. Some said that the Transport Minister has an unusual way of motivating his people. Dennis Yin hoped that other MRT Lines would achieve the same milestone.
In the latest General Household Survey released on Mar 9, the travelling pattern of commuters showed that almost six out of 10 Singapore residents take public transport to work as new train lines expand the countrys rail network.The survey showed that 58.7% of residents aged 15 and older took either the MRT or bus, or a combination of both, to work last year, compared to 50.7% a decade ago.The biggest improvements were in the area of bus waiting times, with the satisfaction level having increased by 10.6 percentage points, and by 5.4 percentage points for bus reliability. For bus services, the overall satisfaction level rose slightly to 90.7% from 90.2% the year before. Satisfaction with MRT services also registered improvements, with levels rising by 3.9 percentage points for waiting times and by 3.7 percentage points in the area of service information. Several netizens disapproved of the survey results, claiming that they have not seen any improvement in waiting times for trains and buses. Some wondered who participated in the survey, whether there were any at all. Others said that the survey form might have been distributed to the LTA staff or members of the Peoples Action Party themselves. Jeffrey Yeo said that public service surveys should be conducted by independent not-for-profit monitors to hold any amount of impartiality. The netizen added that having public agencies survey and measure their own successes could be an exercise in self-fulfilment. Timothy Ang wondered how waiting time and service information could be translated to satisfaction levels when the survey was not about reliability and performance. Tan Kwong Moh wondered if the survey was accurate because there were still so many delays and breakdowns. Colin Chee observed that the overall bus services had improved slightly over the past year, but not the train services. urbanathlon mentioned that bus services in Singapore were alright, except that SMRT buses have very low frequency and longer waiting times. The netizen said that it might be better for SBS Transit to take over SMRT as SMRT was a bad handler. Audi Khalid stated that his commute from the north to central west had been consistently on time for the last couple of years and assumed that the delays were more apparent for those working closer towards the centre of the city. Francis Chong wondered who still needs cars when there is MRT. The netizen said that Singapore now has less exhaust fumes and cleaner air to breathe.
Go-Aheads official bus captain uniform was revealed at the bus carnival at the Loyang Bus Depot on Jun 19. Several netizens stated that the bus company should have given their bus captains a better uniform design. Others noticed that the colour of the uniform resembled that of Shell petrol, courier DHL, McDonalds and the Houston Rockets. Stanley Chan hoped that Go-Aheads service would be as colourful as their bus captains uniform. Idge Imbrulia said that the uniforms had the most ridiculous colours.
The survey by the LTA found that 96.4% of the 1,200 survey respondents on taxi service quality felt waiting time to be important, while 86.2% said they were satisfied with the time they actually had to wait. Overall, commuters were generally satisfied with the quality of taxi services. The LTA said that the gap between the expectation and satisfaction of about 10.2 percentage points was the widest of all attributes surveyed. The transport authority, however, stated that the survey results has "shown an encouraging trend of continued improvement".Private-hire car services such as Uber and GrabCar have also provided commuters with an alternative option, resulting in improved waiting times for cabs. SmallFly said that there had been so much talk about taxi waiting times and asked about the waiting time for public buses. kooldog59 thought that the problem on taxi waiting time had been solved by allowing Grab and Uber.
?Desmond Koh? reported that the sign board at the Circle Line showed Dhoby Ghaut but the train went to Bayfront instead.
Carrie Chen was disappointed with an SBS bus captain and a bus inspector for locking her up inside the bus and slapping her arm twice because her travel card had expired. The bus inspector also demanded her to pay S$50 in fines. Several netizen stated that it was each commuters responsibility to ensure that their travel cards were still valid before riding the bus or train. Some mentioned that commuters would not be able to use expired bus passes since the transaction would be denied. Others suggested making a police report of the bus inspectors threat to the passenger and writing to the bus company to demand for an apology and compensation.
On Facebook, SMRT posted quick facts about Wheelchair Accessible Buses (WAB), such as how to spot a WAB, how to differentiate a WAB from non-WAB service, and if the bus interchanges were wheelchair friendly.SMRT mentioned that Bukit Batok, Choa Chu Kang, Woodlands and Yishun interchanges have special WAB boarding berths with ramps, guard rails, directional and indicative signs, and staff assistance call buttons for commuters in wheelchairs. ??? said that there was no need for the decal if all buses are officially WAB services and disabled people did not have to wait over 30 minutes for a WAB service at certain places. Aram Melikian mentioned that in Toronto, accessible vehicles have Blue Clearance Lights. Patrick Ang T K passengers in wheelchairs usually miss the bus because no one makes way for them.
Kitty Lim posted a video on SMRTs Facebook page showing an SMRT taxi driver exchanging vulgarities with another driver believed to be the boss of the contributor. In a later post, Kitty Lim claimed that the SMRT cabby abruptly filtered into their lane without signalling. The netizen mentioned that her boss gave way to the cabby but the cabby braked abruptly multiple times which almost resulted in them bumping into the back of the taxi. The netizen added that the entire situation was very dangerous.A few netizens commented that SMRT should provide better training for their drivers. The general sentiments on the ground is one of bemusement and indifference as the incident is currently perceived to be a personal disagreement between the two drivers. Comments from netizens generally fall into the following categories: Ridicule towards the driver for having such a bad temper at his age. Lamenting that this was typical Singaporean behavior during arguments. Jokes around the driver getting into trouble if the video reached SMRT or LTA.
?Jael Tiara? asked SMRT to check the train air-conditioner because when trains were overcrowded and had faulty air-conditioner, commuters might feel unwell causing them to vomit.
?Jimmy Chen? asked if passengers were allowed to eat while onboard the bus. The netizen was onboard bus service 854 when she saw two female passengers eating openly on the bus.
Satirical Facebook page SMRT Feedback / The Vigilanteh, posted that 98.5% of commuters for SMRT trains were extremely happy with the level of service provided, but that most of the good reviews were just made up. Some netizens were still unaware that they were commenting on a satire SMRT page. Others stated that SMRT Feedback / The Vigilantehs analysis was 100% accurate. Ben ?? mentioned that he and all his friends felt so special to be part of the 1.5% who were unhappy with SMRT train service.
?Heather Ong? thanked SMRT station staff Mdm Kuldip and Mr Kamal for their exemplary customer service. The netizen mentioned that she had accidentally dropped her mobile phone into the platform gap at Somerset MRT station on September 18. She reported the incident to the Passenger Service Centre where Kuldip obtained her contact details and assured her that the phone would be retrieved after revenue service. The netizen called Somerset MRT station the following morning and was informed by Mr Kamal that the phone had been recovered undamaged. The netizen also thanked the staff who recovered the phone from the tracks.
Jerms Lin was disappointed for being late for an appointment because the train (1559) from Yishun towards the City was late for nine minutes and has stopped between Ang Mo Kio and Yio Chu Kang. The netizen claimed that an announcement was heard that there was a track fault.
?Jem Tay reported that bus service 67 took 20 minutes to arrive at bus stop 81069. The netizen said that such frequency during peak hour was unacceptable.
Vincent Lai Wai Yin mentioned writing to SBS Transit about one of its buses beating the red light. SBS Transit replied that it was unable to investigate the incident as the bus was not equipped with external cameras.The netizen was quite surprised to learn that public buses are not equipped with external cameras. He stated that such cameras were essential in capturing incidents to facilitate investigations.The netizen suggested that authorities make it compulsory for all public buses to have external cameras installed in light of the many accidents involving public buses.
The story about an SMRT taxi driver who purportedly returned a laptop bag containing $235,500 in cash to his drunk passenger was continued to be shared and discussed in several social media channels. On Facebook, Hoongji Soong claimed that the story was a fake as the taxi driver and businessman were friends. In a Facebook post on Sunday night, SMRT said it was verifying the accuracy of the story and would provide an update after conducting its investigations. In response to media queries yesterday, SMRT advised for media to check the story with the source. SMRT added that it was unable to verify the accuracy of the report and its circumstances. Majority of the netizens praised the taxi driver and had asked authorities to recognise his honesty. Others wondered why the businessman carried so much cash. Some stated that the businessman should be investigated as he might be involved in money laundering.
Paul Chan Poh Hoi shares Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tans sentiments that the deteriorating performance of the MRT network becomes all the more stark when a comparison was made with Hong Kong's Mass Transit Railway (MTR). The writer, an engineer, stated that he had always been impressed with the MTR's rigorous maintenance regime which is key to a successful metro system.He mentioned that in 2014, the MTR Corp spent 37% of its revenue on maintenance, renewals and service improvements on the rail network, while SMRT spent 19% of its rail revenue on maintenance and repairs in the 2015 financial year.The writer pointed out Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans earlier blogpost where he acknowledged that Singapore has underinvested in rail maintenance. He stated that while Singapore's rail operators have attempted to overhaul and improve their own maintenance procedures, there was still a need to reinforce the culture of professionalism and dedication to excellence that underpin the MTR's supreme reliability.Paul Chan Poh Hoi stated that it would be better to measure network reliability by the overall number of incidents resulting in service disruption, as well as the total number of passengers affected by these delays. He said that such figures are easier to visualise and understand.
?Cynric Wee? praised an Indian SMRT staff at Yishun MRT station for being amazing. The netizen was seeking information on refund but there seemed to be a miscommunication and the staff misunderstood him/her. The netizen already left the counter when the staff came after him/her to clarify the enquiry. The netizen was glad with the service provided by the staff and hoped that SMRT would recognise her for her good service.
BlurKillerEX observed that passengers were allowed to board using the middle and rear bus doors at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange despite the long queue of passengers waiting to board at the front door. Some netizens noticed that it had been a practice since a year ago where staff members had been ushering passengers to the middle and rear doors. Others stated that boarding through the middle and rear doors were only allowed at the start of the bus journey at bus interchanges. madcampus believed that it was more efficient to allow passengers to board from other doors during peak periods.
?Kokki Kumar? was impressed by the work ethics of two SMRT staff members from Kranji MRT station who closed the latch of a faulty train door and placed stickers on the door prompting passengers to use other doors. The netizen said that the staff put up with commuters anger when trains break down so it was only right to commend them when they do something right.
ComfortDelGro Taxis had clocked its 10 millionth booking job this week and had set the highest number of successful bookings (130,000) in a single day and in a single hour (5,500). Yang Ban Seng, ComfortDelGro Taxis Chief Executive, attributed the achievements to its improved ComfortDelGro app, better despatch algorithm and marketing, as well as continuous support from commuters and cabbies. To mark the milestones, the company gave a discount of S$5 off the metered fare for the first 2,000 customers who booked a ComfortDelGro taxi using the promotional code "10MIL" via the ComfortDelGro app on Apr 15 and 16. Some netizens asked why not give all customers who booked the cab a discount. Kuan Tek Seang said that the S$5 discount would be collected back in booking fees. Leslie Poon said that the chances of getting a successful booking using the ComfortDelGro app was very slim. Tai Lo Chun mentioned that the ComfortDelGro app response time was so slow.
Train services from City Hall to Newton MRT stations on the North-South Line were delayed due to a train fault near Dhoby Ghaut Station. Several netizens said that having train delays were already the norm. Nanaa Philophobia? was upset that the delay was not announced at Choa Chu Kang station. walaneh assumed that the delay was caused by the track renewal works at some parts of the North-South Line.
Too Siu Yen asked SMRT to provide an explanation as to why trains were still running along Ang Mo Kio Avenue MRT tracks past midnight. The netizen said that she could not sleep because of the noise. She also asked SMRT to install noise barriers. [Note: CMC has contacted OCC who informed that live train testing was being carried out at those hours along the NSL to test the new signalling system.]
Transport experts and Members of Parliament (MPs) have questioned whether there are safer ways of carrying out maintenance work on MRT tracks when trains were running in the wake of the deaths of two SMRT employees on Mar 22, even though they acknowledged that such work during operating hours was unavoidable. Dr Walter Theseira, SIM University senior lecturer noted that it would be unrealistic to expect absolutely no maintenance work to be done during operation hours because unchecked faults could cause a problem for train operations.Mountbatten MP Lim Biow Chuan asked whether the walkway to access the train tracks was safe enough. Meanwhile, SIM University (UniSIM) adjunct associate professor Dr Park Byung-joon asked about the kind of safety training provided for staff before they are allowed to access the train tracks. He added that there should be an additional pair of eyes to check for oncoming trains as surveillance cameras may not have full coverage of the track.SMRT President and Group CEO Desmond Kuek said the two trainees that died were part of a team of 15 investigating the signalling condition monitoring device which earlier registered a warning alarm. He said that new staff could be allowed to access the tracks after they have been properly trained and briefed on safety. Several netizens stated that SMRT and LTA should review their risk assessment and to automate their system. George Wong asked what improvements were implemented by SMRT after the first death in 2010. Mike Lo suggested the widening of the track walkway. The netizen wondered why only two of the 15 staff at the tracks were hit by the train. Kyle Guevarra asked whether no one among the other staff members warned the two victims of the oncoming train or pulled them into safety. Isaac Thang suspected a cover up because SMRT maintained that the two men were behind their supervisor, but TODAY understood that the victims were on the other side of the track when they were hit by the train.
SMRT Bus Captain Nor Adhwa Othman, who has gained much recognition online for persuading a commuter who was carrying a toddler on his bus to have a seat, as it might be uncomfortable and dangerous for her to stand, was featured on The Straits Times. His action prompted other passengers to stand up and offer their seats to the female passenger. This simple act of courtesy and civic-consciousness inspired lawyer Thiagesh Menon, who was on the bus, to write the incident in a Facebook post which has since gone viral. Many netizens praised the bus captain for his kind act.
Janu Siva? thanked the entire SMRT team at Boon Lay Bus Interchange for assisting her mother in finding the handbag which was lost inside service 178.
Raymond Lee? mentioned that he feels safe taking the trains whenever he saw SMRT staff at Clementi Station guiding passengers at the platform. The netizen, however, was disappointed to see two SMRT staff having a private conversation at the station platform instead of doing their jobs while he was waiting for the train on July 1 at around 7.45am. As the train was already arriving, the netizen approached the two staff and advised them to focus on their job and not talk about non-work related matters during their duties, as their role is to take care of passengers. The netizen mentioned that the female staff immediately adhered to his advice but the male staff stared at him angrily as he boarded the train.
In a media release on June 1, SMRT announced the installation of feedback terminals called Travel Experience Terminals (TExT) at eight MRT stations along the North-South, East-West and Circle Lines, as well as four SMRT bus interchanges. These terminals can collect feedback on a range of topics that affect the commuter travel experience such as awareness of on-going rail renewal programmes, accessibility to commuter-friendly amenities within transportation networks, and satisfaction with staff service. Each terminal comes with four buttons indicating different levels of satisfaction. Dave Ong, Head of Passenger Services at SMRT, said that the feedback would be used to improve SMRTs safety, reliability, comfort and service standards. He added that similar system installations have proven to be highly effective in improving overall service quality at airports and train stations in other countries. Some netizens questioned the need to put up feedback terminals when commuters had been sending feedback to SMRT yet nothing had been done to improve the system. Others wondered why SMRT was still unaware of the problems with its trains and buses. Patrick Koh mentioned that the commuters were more interested in knowing when the trains would stop breaking down
SG Indian mummy, who was pregnant, wrote about her disappointment with a male train passenger for not offering her a seat despite her obvious condition. The netizen mentioned that she was standing right in front of the male passenger who was seated at a reserved seat.SG Indian mummy did not expect anyone to offer her a seat but was surprised when the man offered his seat to a pregnant PRC passenger who just boarded the train. Several netizens stated that the contributor should have just asked for a seat instead of expressing her disappointment online. Some mentioned that the male passenger did not offer the contributor a seat because she might not have appeared to be pregnant to him. William Lim said that all seats should be reserved so everyone would have a chance to offer their seats.
YH Ong? reported the bus driver of service 856 for being rude and reckless. The netizen mentioned that the bus driver did not check if his passengers were already seated before moving off. The netizen and his/her parents were still on the stairs towards the upper deck when the bus moved off.
A writer provided suggestions on how to improve the public transport system that has nothing to do with frequency, overcrowding or breakdowns.1. Bring back the MRT seats. Removing the seats reduces the number of commuters who are able to sit down during off-peak hours, which would have better the comfort of their commute. 2. Allow non-foldable bicycles, along with non-folded prams and strollers, on trains and buses. People who ride bicycles and other mobility devices also rely on the MRT to complete their journeys.3. Bus routes should be made clearer on buses and at bus stops. Digital displays in all buses informing passengers of the next stop would be a huge help. A map providing a visual representation of the bus routes should be made available online and at bus stops.
Berline Lim? reported the bus captain of service 75 (SMB232H) for not stopping after the stopping bell was pressed causing great inconvenience and additional time travelling to work. It took the netizen up to 10 minutes additional time to walk from the railway mall bus stop to Hillview MRT station.
?Glenc Soh? reported that the bus captain of service 171 (SMB1321C) had skipped bus stop 48049 along Mandai Road despite passengers flagging the bus. The netizen said that he was late for his appointment, and had to wait for the next bus which was arriving in 16 minutes.The netizen also mentioned that this was not the first time he had encountered such an incident. He asked SMRT to advise its bus captains to be more attentive.
Shaun Kong? reported that trainset 203/204 was still allowed to continue revenue service from Jurong East to Marina Bay when it had a power fault warning. The netizen also posted a photo of the power fault warning light.
GOH CHUI LING disagreed with DAVID YAP PENG KHOONs view on his letter published on TODAY Online Voices on May 16 that bus operators should not be rewarded for improving services. DAVID YAP PENG KHOON used the analogy of rewarding a teacher every time students perform very well in their examinations.GOH CHUI LING suggested looking at the Bus Service Reliability Framework as a whole wherein SBS Transit and SMRT not only received incentives for improvements in waiting times, but also were penalised for underperformance.The writer believed that there were many misconceptions about giving operators the incentives. S/he explained that the framework keeps operators focused in meeting commuter expectations for waiting times. He mentioned that the disapproval of the incentives given to SBS Transit and SMRT probably stemmed from unhappiness with public transport services being expensive or inefficient.The writer stated that bus operators should be rewarded for improvements assessed within the service reliability framework. Isaac Thang stated that commuters and taxpayers were the ones who suffer when bus operators receive incentives for improvements or get penalised for underperformance because bus operators would still raise fares.
During the Committee of Supply debate in Parliament, Senior Minister of State for Transport Ng Chee Meng announced that there would be a new Private Hire Car Driver Vocational Licencing (PDVL) framework in place by the first half of 2017, requiring drivers providing chauffeured services to undergo sufficient training on safety and regulations, as well as medical and background checks.Meanwhile, life would get easier for taxi drivers. Their Taxi Driver Vocational Licence course would be shortened from 60 hours to 25 hours, and parts of this would comprise e-learning. They could also convert their licences to a PDVL by simply attending a two-hour briefing to better-understand the new regulations that apply to private-hire car drivers.In separate statements, Grab and Uber said they supported the new regulations, while the National Taxi Association (NTA) said more could be done to level the playing field between taxi drivers and private hire services. Several netizens stated that they still prefer using Grab and Uber services because private-hire cars were easier to book than taxis. Some believed that even with the new regulations, the taxi business would still weaken unless taxi companies would reduce the car rental rates. Denern Neo Steve said that it was better to switch driving for GrabCar because of lower car rental. Su Hai Mi found private-hire cars more appealing especially during peak hours when taxi drivers start to hide for bookings. Tony Yap believed that the NTA had not represented all taxis drivers well and stated that banning Grab and Uber like in other countries was still the best option.
Yvonne Jerelyn Koh? was dissatisfied with SMRTs response on her complaint about the SMRT bus captain of service 811 (SMB8010D) that had suddenly cut in her lane along Yishun Central. The netizen demanded an immediate explanation from SMRT but was surprised that SMRT only informed the supervisor of the bus captain involved in the incident.
The LTA announced that it would be issuing a tender to appoint an acquiring bank to provide the banking facilities for the account-based ticketing system which would allow commuters to use contactless debit or credit cards to pay for their transport fares.Additionally, LTA also issued a tender looking for a consultancy to study the feasibility of implementing such a system on a scale beyond that of the pilot. Weijie Aw said that the system was not something new to dedit cardholders. John Lee said that the LTA made it very convenient to access bank accounts. Hazette AK asked that the administrative charges for each top up be removed. Miles Cunanan hoped that the system was already functional.
Tan Kin Lian posted on his blog and Facebook page about the inaccurate bus arrival timings shown by LTAs transport app, MyTransport.sg. Tan said that the bus arrival timing for Service 162 was inaccurate, as it showed that the next bus was arriving in 19 minutes, while the following bus would arrive in 35 minutes. Tan said that the bus probably had a faulty tracking device, as the next bus arrived in 6 minutes, instead of the 19 minutes which was shown. He suspects that the people in SBS Transit or LTA failed to monitor the accuracy of the device, and expressed his disappointment that the device could have been faulty for a long time without anyone paying attention to it. Tan added that the authorities should pay attention to defects and rectify them immediately. Yongcheng Bay agreed with Tan Kin Lian, saying that some buses never even showed up. Robert Luo Bo said that the arrival timing was only 50% accurate, based on his experience. ??? said that the timings of all bus arrival applications worked well before LTA took over.
Phua Yong Qi? shared a video on SMRTs Facebook page showing an SMRT taxi driver trying to avoid paying the parking fee at the EPS. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue. Several netizens disapproved of the taxi drivers attitude. Some mentioned that not only taxi drivers avoid paying the parking fees, but even those driving private vehicles. Greg Roberts said that the taxi driver probably did not have enough money for the parking fee because he did not get any passengers but still had to pay the taxi rental and buy fuel. Azfar Ahmad noticed that the driver seemed to be waiting for another vehicle to exit the carpark so he could evade the parking charges.
On Facebook, Workers Party member Cheryl Denise Loh, posted about the SMRT announcement that the basic starting salary for its bus captains would be increased. Ms Loh believed that competition by new players in the bus industry was the reason for the increased salary. Ryan Soh claimed overhearing a conversation by bus captains that despite the pay raise, their overtime pay was reduced so their overall income did not change. Jonathan Jia assumed that the new bus contracting model had eased some of SMRTs financial burden which was why they were able to raise the basic salary of bus captains.
165 ComfortDelGro cabbies took part in CabbyCare Charity Group's Hair for Hope event by shaving their heads to show support for young children with cancer.This was the third time ComfortDelGro took part in Hair for Hope. Hair For Hope aims to have 6,500 shavees, and to raise a total of S$36M. CabbyCare has raised a total of S$20,000 with its Hair for Hope event. ComfortDelGro would match the cabbies' contributions dollar for dollar, to make it S$40,000 for the Childrens Cancer Foundation.
Enoch Chin asked SMRT to look into the peak hour frequency of bus service 979. The netizen mentioned waiting to board the bus for half an hour because all the other buses were packed. In a later post, the netizen said s/he was able to board the bus after an hour of waiting. Yanhan Chen suggested that the netizen should wake up an hour earlier to be able to board the bus sooner.
Transport experts believed that while there would always be people who want to own a car, it was about giving people enough options to make a choice. They stated that on top of a mind-set shift, providing attractive alternative transport options will be key as Singapore continues its drive to becoming a car-lite nation. Gopinath Menon, a senior research fellow at Nanyang Technological University, stated that if the Government could provide good alternatives like efficient public transport, good cycling tracks or good pedestrian footpaths, people might think twice about owning a car. The question, however, was whether the Government could provide something that could match public expectations.Transport expert Dr Park Byung Joon broke down the cost using his own daily commute from his home in the east to his office in Clementi as an example. He stated that driving a car would cost a person between S$1,110 and S$1,500 per month including the vehicle cost, fuel, insurance, road tax, ERP charges and parking. While commuting by bus and MRT would only cost a person an average of S$87 monthly. Travelling by taxi with a booking fee came up to about S$1,408 per month. Dr Park, however, noted that commuters look at factors other than cost, such as convenience and efficiency. For example, people who need to travel with young children and elderly, would much prefer to own a car instead due to the added convenience.Dr Park believed that the car sharing club could be another travel option. Citing previous studies, the Car Sharing Association stated that one shared car could take 14 private cars off the road. Several netizens stated that factors such as convenience, time, reliability and affordability should be taken into consideration for Singapore to be a car-lite society. Wayne Lee mentioned that one of the problems with public transport was the driving skills of taxi drivers and bus captains who were mostly reckless. David Marsalie stated that Singapore should offer monthly passes for unlimited rides on trains and buses. Raymond Cheung believed that Singapore already has convenient and affordable public transport.
Arthur Lee stated that there were three things that SMRT could have considered before taking action on the staff:1. Conducting a proper process such as a Committee of Inquiry for a hearing or for the affected employees to plead their case.2. Complying to the unions request to withhold action until completion of official investigations.3. Conducting a fair, thorough and comprehensive disciplinary process.
Train services between Boon Lay and Joo Koon MRT stations on the East-West Line were disrupted for 20 minutes on the evening of August 11 due to a track fault. SMRT said in a tweet that an additional 20 minutes of travelling time was required between the three stations. Service resumed at 10:46 p.m. but commuters were advised to expect an additional travelling time of 15 minutes. Free bus services were activated for affected commuters until about 11:20 p.m. Some netizens stated that they had been accustomed to the frequent disruptions. Ruthless Jake observed that service disruption had become a weekly affair and that commuters patience were already wearing thin. Vijayakumar Palani said that gone were the days where the MRT was reliable and was one of the best transport modes. He added that commuters confidence level has dropped. Some netizens mentioned that there were no announcements about the free bus services to those who were on board the affected trains.
In connection with the new start time of train services during Sundays at the North-South and East-West Lines to give engineers more time to carry out maintenance works, several netizens asked SMRT if they had considered the amount of people that need to go to work on Sundays. Several netizens stated that starting train services an hour later on Sundays would affect the least amount of commuters but six months of late start-time was too much. Some claimed that in London and Australia, transport operators provide enough buses to ferry commuters whenever train stations would be closed for a week or a month for maintenance works. jury_pack mentioned that it was hard to be a train operator as people complain when the trains break down, and even when the trains need more time for maintenance. The netizen added that SMRT will have buses running along the affected lines at 10 minute intervals. ???????? mentioned that if SMRT did not cut corners on maintaining the rail system, the commuters would not have been inconvenienced by breakdowns. chengsun believed that the late-start time was a way for SMRT to drive the market to its new private car hire business. alchemist_acid said that SMRT could have rotated between ending train services earlier and starting train services later.
Darren Chung praised the SMRT staff at one of the stations along the East-West line during his commute to work. The netizen said that when the train doors opened, the staff called out for passengers to give up their seat to a boarding elderly passenger. The netizen felt that it was a kind gesture of the SMRT staff. The netizen, however, pointed out that the train cabin did not come with any seats, and the passenger had no choice but to stand. The train was also packed and it was hard for the passenger to squeeze his way to the other cabin while maintaining balance at the same time. The netizen wondered if it was necessary to remove all the seats in the entire train cabin. Kai Xin said that having foldable chairs would be a good idea.
?Seah Jeremy? boarded train number 1048 at Bishan MRT station heading towards Marina Bay. The netizen reported that while passengers were still boarding the train, the doors closing warning buzz rang. The doors closed and a child was separated from his family and had to take the next train. The netizen mentioned that something had to be done to prevent such an incident from happening again.
Rina Ong commended the staff members at Jurong East MRT station for their excellent service. The netizen shared her Facebook post on SMRTs Facebook page, which had a detailed write-up of the incident. The netizen mentioned that the staff attended to her after they were informed by another passenger that she was not feeling well. The staff assisted to wheel the netizen to a room to rest, and made sure that she was comfortable. The staff also asked her if they should call for the ambulance or her immediate family members regarding the issue. The staff also assured her to take all the time she needed to rest and gave her some warm water. The netizen mentioned Service Ambassador Ms Habibah, who stayed with her in the room and genuinely cared for her. The netizen added that Ms Habibah was thoughtful and encouraging. The netizen thanked SMRT for grooming staff to be selfless and ever ready to provide assistance in any form to their passengers. She hoped that SMRT would continue to maintain the high quality standards and excellent spirit in giving the best service to its passengers.
Kelvin Leow shared the video posted previously by Kitty Lim on her Facebook page regarding an alleged rude and reckless SMRT taxi driver.
Muhd Naz Farihin? praised senior bus captain Kumar from Kranji depot (KJDEP 106) for his excellent customer service by greeting passengers boarding the bus. The bus captain also showed care and concern by making sure that every passenger was seated before continuing with the journey.
While the Workers Party (WP) considered SMRTs new rail financing framework as a step in the right direction and corrects a major policy mistake, the opposition party voiced its concerns over the buyout of SMRT by Temasek Holdings. WP said that it may not result in any nationalisation benefits such as Government control over the MRT networks management and that SMRTs operations and financials would become less transparent. Financial analysts, on the other hand, generally welcomed Temasek Holdings' offer to take SMRT private. Several netizens believed that SMRT should never be privatised as it was into public transport service. Others stated that the fares would definitely increase once the buyout is completed. Raymond Wee said that the only way to improve train efficiency was to serve the commuters rather than the shareholders. Suze Shon Ng wonderd how many commuters own SMRT shares of stocks. Kan Yew Wah pointed out that Hong Kongs MTR is a public-listed company, answers to the shareholders but has fewer breakdowns. On Today Online Voices, Chen Tian Qi wrote his disapproval with most of the analysts arguments that privatisation would allow SMRT to sharpen focus on rail service, saying that most of SMRTs minority shareholders were passive dividend seekers.
On the Straits Times Forum, Sum Siew Kee wrote that neither the number of major train disruptions, nor the average distance between breakdowns was a good indicator of rail reliability, despite the Land Transport Authoritys (LTA) survey that showed the rail system to be more reliable even with the increase in major breakdowns. The netizen stated that the use of statistics shows an undue focus on the health of trains over the welfare of commuters. S/he suggested that the LTA should look at the overall cost of breakdowns to the economy, such as the man-hours of delays incurred, the number of people delayed by more than five minutes, number of people forced to take alternative modes of transport, and the additional fares spent. The LTA ought to be sensitive to how rail reliability was perceived and felt on the ground to improve customer experience. WhatDoYouThink stated that despite the numerous feedback, problems in the rail system has yet to be solved. cow138 hoped that the Government would be able to reverse the rail culture. The netizen surmised that there was too much inbreeding from the army. Xian Lian Zeng said that the people in the train business need to learn three simple terms: probability (how likely), frequency (how often) and severity (how bad).Isa Kamari believed that the MRT announcements in Malay "Berhati-hati di ruang platform" reminding commuters to mind the gap between the platform and the train was inappropriate and inaccurate because it did not convey the intended message. The netizen said that the Malay announcement when translated was asking commuters to be careful on the platform space while moving in and out of the train cabin to and from the platform and does not remind them to be careful of the gap. The netizen offered three translations of the announcement:1. Berhati-hati ketika melangkah ke platform2. Waspada terhadap jurang di sisi platform3. Mata kau buta ke apa? Wompie Wompie mentioned that the contributors suggestions seemed like tongue twisters and too long to announce. The netizen stated in jest that by time the announcement was made, people had already fallen into the gap.
?Thiagesh Menon praised the bus captain of ? SMRT bus service 859B (SMB3149X) for not continuing with the journey while a female passenger holding a toddler was finding a seat inside the bus. The driver walked towards the female passenger and informed her that it would be uncomfortable and dangerous to stand on the bus while holding a child. This prompted another passenger to persuade others to give up their seats. Lydia Wong-Foo asked why passengers were not giving up their seat to the lady with the toddler until the captain requested. Most netizens also praised the bus captain for his good deed and for ensuring the safety of his passengers. Several said that the driver should be recognised by SMRT. Others mentioned that they knew the bus captain to be polite and friendly.
SMRT has introduced the use of fixed gantry cranes to replace rail sleepers on the East-West Line. The Road Rail Vehicles (RRVs), which help replace timber sleepers with concrete ones, could now be hoisted up to the train tracks from sites near Chinese Gardens and Pasir Ris MRT stations. The hoisting - done by gantry cranes - would help workers save up to one hour.The cranes, however, were not mobile - so the hoisting was confined only to the Chinese Gardens and Pasir Ris sites. Several netizens were glad that SMRT had finally spent money on maintenance works. Some appreciated SMRTs efforts but mentioned that it was better to be proactive than be reactive. Others asked how much taxpayers money was used to pay for the crane. Allen Tan CF suggested that SMRT watch YouTube videos for better sleeper replacement machines. The netizen said that it was a waste of resources to use such a big machine which was not accessible to the other parts of the railway. Roland C. Fernandez mentioned that engineers and technicians were doing their best for trains to run smoothly. The netizen added that the public should appreciate that something was being done by SMRT.
An hour-long blackout hit Toa Payoh bus interchange on Apr 19. The electricity went out at 3 p.m. affecting the bus interchange and shops in its vicinity. A witness said that while bus services were still running, the air-conditioning, lights and the boards displaying bus times had gone out. The SBS Transit office was affected as well. Tammy Tan, SBS Transit's Senior Vice President for Corporate Communications, responded to queries from Channel NewsAsia. She said that engineers were activated immediately following the power outage. The bus services were unaffected and continued to operate as scheduled. Lighting was restored about 4 p.m. tkdguru asked if there had been no backup power for the control centre. danny8x8 stated that even SBS Transit was affected by recession as they had no money to pay their power bills.
Rui Hang Mei stated having a pleasant ride onboard the bus that bus captain Rickee Ng was driving. Rickee Ng thanked the netizen for the compliment.
Netizens commented on the case hearing which involved a father of a 12 year-old boy who is suing SMRT for an accident where his son was knocked by an SMRT bus in 2013. The boy was riding his bicycle across a zebra crossing in Choa Chu Kang where he was knocked down by the bus and dragged for about 10m.SMRT was sued for S$638,000 over the incident that left the boy with permanent disability. The claims include compensation for pain and suffering, medical expenses and loss of future earnings, and diminished earning capacity.A hearing in the High Court started on Feb 24 to determine the issues of liability and damages. Several netizens pointed out that the boy was also at fault as cyclists were required to dismount at zebra crossings. Others said that motorists must heed to pedestrians crossing the road. Some noted that many motorists drive past zebra crossings at high speed. A few stated that the boys family should sue SMRT for up to S$3.5M to cover for future medical expenses and the obstacles of being handicapped, provide they could prove that the boy was not at fault. ? ? said that it was time for SMRT drivers to go through training again because there were a number of drivers that would suddenly step on the brakes and cause bus passengers of the bus to fall or lose their balance. Kenny Zeng PropNex urged the LTA to put up signs requiring cyclists to dismount at zebra crossings.
On Yahoo! Singapore, veteran Singaporean journalist P N Balji expressed his views regarding the recent SMRT accident and SMRTs reaction to the crisis. The writer observed that SMRT had exposed a leadership stuck in permanent panic mode and a company culture that needs fixing.He stated that SMRTs series of troubles started with the under-investment in maintenance by its former CEO, Saw Phaik Hwa. The companys reaction to a series of breakdowns and disruptions, however, showed that lessons have yet to be learnt.The reversal of an earlier statement that all safety procedures were met also showed a serious flaw in the manner SMRT handled the situation. The writer stated that SMRT looked like an organisation under siege - one forced upon it by a public that seems to have had enough of its flops and its reaction to these missteps.Many questions remained unanswered such as what were the other 13 doing when the two trainees were on the tracks, how the driver did not see people on the track, and why was the train not being driven on manual mode, which would force it to go at a much slower pace.The writer said that it was time for SMRT to review its company culture, if a culture of fear and failure pervades its management and operations teams. He suggested that SMRT think seriously about what Samsung is doing: fight the declining profits by changing its structure and operations to those of a start-up. Glen Yang pointed out that it takes only one fatality for hawkers and taxi drivers to lose their license to operate, and for for construction sites to be issued a 'stop work' order pending investigation. With SMRT, however, it continues to operate despite ongoing investigation. Little said that as long as the management and all the governing bodies are profit-driven, there would be little or no hope for any urgent action to overhaul the aging MRT system and the managements mind-set. m1user suggested that SMRT go back to the drawing board, back to how things were done in 1987. luckyguitar stated that in order to overhaul the whole structure and work culture, SMRT has to acknowledge that the whole system was in disrepair.
Netizens continued to discuss SMRT for being shortlisted as a finalist for Employer of the Year at the Human Resources Excellence Awards 2016 despite the frequent breakdowns, the track accident that killed two trainees and the dismissal of two employees allegedly involved in the accident even before the Coroners Inquiry. Several netizens assumed that the judges for the award were somehow connected to the Government and SMRT. Most netizens spoke up sarcastically that despite the two SMRT staff who died in March this year and the recent dismissal of the two staff associated with the incident, the award did not seem representative with the nominated awards. Some felt that the staff should not be dismissed before the investigations are completed and that there were a few safety lapses that must have failed before such an incident could happen.
?Jessica Taeganger? reported that the first bus of service 970 did not stop at the Bukit Panjang MRT station bus stop. The netizen said that the incident caused her mother and other regular commuters on that bus to be late for work.
On Facebook, 938LIVE asked netizens about the difficulties they face on public transport when travelling with their family. Netizens were also encouraged to share ideas for a family-friendly public transport system on the radio show, Talkback. These were in relation to reports that the Government was studying ways to ease public transport woes of families with young kids. Several netizens suggested allowing open strollers on board buses, similar to other countries. Others mentioned that the Government encourages people to take public transport but has yet to make them child and family friendly. Cheng Ying Ling mentioned not taking public transport with his/her children when they were younger because the MRT was horrible during peak hours. Teo Gui Xiong suggested having breastfeeding rooms at bus interchanges and MRT stations, removing the middle pole at the entrance of buses, allow unfolded strollers inside buses, and redesign buses to have wider corridors.
?Ming Hui? was on board bus service 860 with licence plate number SMB172Y when she noticed that the bus captain had been pressing and looking at the left side panel throughout the journey and was driving at extremely slow speed. The netizen was also not able to tap out when she alighted due to an E1 error. The netizen asked SMRT to remind its bus captains to drive with full attention on the road and stop for a while if there was an issue with the bus.
AlmondShell started a thread to ask others If they would agree to pay an additional S$1 should SMRT sell premium train seats. Several netizens stated that they were willing to pay even more than S$1 for a guaranteed seat at the MRT. Some said they would pay more depending on the length of their journey. WestGuy would pay S$5 for a seat and priority queue. starmerck asked if SMRT could also introduce food and beverage service on trains similar to that in Taiwan and Japan.
Netizens continued to discuss the durian treat given by Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan to the Downtown Line (DTL) staff for its 300-day disruption-free milestone. Blogger Phillip Ang claimed that the Transport Minister has continued to engage in propaganda without addressing the real issue of train disruptions.The blogger mentioned that Minister Khaw must have his own definition of disruption free. Phillip Ang stated that according to a FAILRAIL.sg article in April posted on The Online Citizen blog, there were three DTL disruptions on Dec 29 and 31, 2015 and on Jan 6, 2016.The blogger said that the Transport Minister should clarify his definition of disruption free. Several netizens stated that Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan should stop talking about the milestones because every time he talked, a train delay would occur the next day. Others said that MRT staff should not be pampered with such rewards because it was their job to keep the trains running efficiently. A few mentioned that it was too early to celebrate the milestone since the DTL was a new line. KH Ngai suggested upgrading the technical skills of staff rather than give a durian treat. Jason Kwan said that the public should stop complaining because the staff were working hard to prevent breakdowns.
Mohammad Hafeezrul? stated that the noise from overnight maintenance works along Boon Lay MRT to Pioneer was getting louder by the night. The netizen wondered about the sound barrier which was supposed to be installed in the area.
?Wendy Lee stated that SMRT bus services were getting worse. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain of service 307 drove off despite her being almost at the door of the bus. The netizen also reported that the frequency of bus service 979 was always at 20 minutes and was already packed with passengers between 6:30 to 7:30 a.m. The SMRT Facebook administrator has acknowledged the passengers feedback and has reached out to her for contact details so that the team can follow up.
?Thomas Daniel? asked SMRT when the service 806 Hispano buses, which have noisy engines that were irritating to hear early in the morning, would be phased out. The netizen said that SMRT should either fine tune the engines or bring in the quieter A24 buses.
Hokkien Mee Hunter noticed that the train doors tend to close quickly even before passengers could board, and end up closing on some of them. The netizen wondered whether it was the passengers fault for rushing in or the train captains fault for allowing the doors to open for only a few seconds before closing them. Dunny believed it was the passengers fault as the train was already full. cannotliao noticed that people would always rush to board the trains when they hear the closing door chime, even if they were still on the escalator. OMeGa666 stated that this was only applicable to driverless trains on the Downtown Line, Circle Line and the North-East Line. The netizen said that automation avoids delays, whereas manually-controlled train doors on the North-South and East-West Lines tend to stay open longer during peak hours, causing trains to stop in the middle of stations as the train would still be ahead at the next station.
On his self-titled blog, Tan Kin Lian wrote about Grab Taxis newest offer of no booking fee during off peak period on weekdays from August 29 to September 9.Commuters do not have to queue and enjoy on-demand taxi rides at no extra charge between 10 a.m. to 5 p.m.
Adam Ang? commended the female Malay staff who was ushering passengers to the available carriages at Choa Chu Kang Station. Despite the crowd, the staff guided commuters in a friendly yet professional way.
?Ansari Abdul Kader? noticed that there were buggy rides for the elderly and those who require assistance to get around the interchange, and ramps for those with strollers and passengers in wheelchairs. The netizen, however, observed that there were no lifts or escalators for commuters who could not climb the stairs due to weak legs and knees, and those with chest or lung problems.The netizen suggested having wheelchair porter services similar to wheelchair porter service at the airport.
?Elysha Chua? asked SMRT to deploy more service 855 buses from Yishun on weekdays to accommodate the high volume of commuters.
?Kristeena Fino Yap? reported seeing a bus captain trying to execute a lane change, forcing a motorcyclist out of the lane when doing so. The netizen added that the SMRT bus had already occupied half the lane, and the motorcyclist was trying to filter out of the lane but was unable to do so because of other oncoming cars. The netizen, however, was not able to provide the bus plate number. The netizen hoped that SMRT would be able to educate its bus captains on road safety and responsible driving.
Senior Minister of State for Transport Mrs Josephine Teo announced the launch of a new Sectoral Manpower Plan (SMP) to attract and retain bus captains amidst the long-running difficulties in attracting locals to the bus industry. The SMP aims to grow the pool of bus captains to around 12,000 from the current 9,200 over the next five years. The plan, which comes under the national SkillsFuture programme, would be implemented over the next few years, and comprises five strategies, which encompass a new Singapore Bus Academy for training and career resources, and better support for those seeking to join the industry. It comes as changes are being rolled out in the bus industry, with new entrants Tower Transit and Go-Ahead entering as operators under the Governments bus contracting model. A Memorandum of Understanding to establish the Singapore Bus Academy was signed on Friday (6 May) between the Land Transport Authority (LTA), Employment and Employability Institute, the Singapore Workforce Development Agency, the National Transport Workers Union, SBS Transit, SMRT Corporation, Tower Transit Singapore, and Go-Ahead Singapore. The LTA also signed an agreement with Republic Polytechnic to introduce more bus-related content within the final-year curriculum of the Diploma in Engineering Systems and Management programme, in a bid to build a pipeline of future bus professionals. Avery Yandaokia believed that there was nothing to upskill. The netizen said that the basic pay and recognition were the ones that need to be upgraded.
?Dee N Dil? commended SMRT taxi driver Richard Lee of SMRT taxi number plate 4634 for his honesty and great service. The netizen mentioned losing her phone in a taxi and reported the incident to SMRT. The netizen tried calling her phone several times and was surprised that someone finally answered. The female voice on the other line stated that the phone was found by her husband who did not know how to use the phone to answer the call. The lady asked the netizen to call back later. When she finally spoke to Mr Lee, he offered to return the phone to her home at Choa Chu Kang. The netizen however said that she would gladly come over to his house at Toa Payoh instead to pick up her phone. The netizen said that she was touched by Mr Lees kind gesture and was surprised that he was honest and willing to go the extra mile to return the lost phone. She praised Mr Lee and his wife for their trustworthiness and gave Mr Lee a token as a sign of her gratitude, which he did not want to accept initially but did so after the netizen insisted.
?Ryan Tan Yee Yong ? mentioned waiting for bus service 187 opposite Bukit Batok fire station for more than 25 minutes. The bus eventually arrived but the netizen was unable to board because it was almost packed with passengers. The netizen hoped to hear from SMRT for any updates.
Don shared a video of bus captain Surenther Singh of service 854 warmly greeting every passenger boarding and alighting the bus.The netizen mentioned that he already met the bus captain two years ago and praised the bus captain for still greeting his passengers. He stated that it was rare to see bus captains go the extra mile to give their passengers a pleasant ride. Many netizens mentioned seeing the bus captain and that they were always impressed with his friendly attitude. Melissa Bek said that there were quite a few bus captains for service 854 that greet their passengers. Shane Tan offered to buy bus captain Surenther Singh a nice dinner. She asked the bus captain to contact her. Mikha Maric observed that despite the warm greeting, there was no reaction from most of the passengers.
Jeshua Tan ?reported that the bus with licence plate number TIB1243S had a broken stop button near the rear exit door.
Thng Coeway Boulder commended SMRT staff Muhd Shaban for making the extra effort to return his NRIC which he had unknowingly dropped.The netizen learnt that Muhd Shaban had tried to leave messages for him on Facebook and even went to his home to return the NRIC, but the netizen was not around at the time of visit. The staff continued to try to get the netizens attention by commenting on his Facebook. The netizen praised the staff for his integrity and perseverance, and pointed out that such character and spirit makes him proud to be a Singaporean. Many netizens also praised the staff for doing a good job.
On Facebook, SMRT commended Amran Bin Abdul, Assistant Station Manager of Jurong East Station who went the extra mile to assist an old, wheelchair-bound passenger after seeing that the passenger was weak and unable to handle his wheelchair properly. Some netizens also praise also praised Amran for his good job.
wwenze stated that the size of the Sengkang-Punggol LRT station should be increased to accommodate the doubled length of the trains and increase in population. The netizen said that the queue already reached the entire width of the station. Some netizens stated that the frequency should be increased to be able to clear the crowd faster. Cloud_Evolution mentioned that Punggol LRT station was able to accommodate large crowds while Sengkang LRT station was only half the size of Punggol Station. ahkrong suggested extending one section of the station.
Train services were disrupted between Marina Bay and Marina South Pier MRT stations due to a train fault. The Alternative View asked whether SMRT was deliberately omitting information related to train disruptions to "manage" public perception of their impact. It was cited that Twitter posts of commuters at stations along the North-South Line also experienced queues and delays. It demanded that SMRT provide clearer and more accurate information so that people can better plan their journeys. Several netizens were disappointed with the frequent breakdowns. Some assumed that SMRT did not want to cause any unnecessary panic to commuters. Chi Hian Foo said that under Temasek, there would be complete news blackout during breakdowns. Jason Toh asked whether the high-speed rail to Kuala Lumpur would also experience frequent disruptions.
On Mothership.sg, He Ruiming wrote that contrary to what Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said that commuters would flame the LTA or SMRT even with just a minute delay in train service, Singaporeans are extremely patient people.The writer mentioned some instances when Singaporeans showed their amazing queuing and waiting skills for more than six minutes, including waiting for hours to get a Hello Kitty toy at McDonalds, waiting to pay respects during Lee Kuan Yews passing, waiting for train services to resume, queuing three days before an opening of an international brand retail outlet, queuing to get the latest mobile phone, waiting to see a doctor at a polyclinic and queuing for a taxi to name a few.He Ruiming believed that it would be fine with Singaporeans to spare six minutes of travel time to protect the nature reserves by not letting the Cross Island Line cut through MacRitchie. Several netizens said that commuters complain about the waiting time for trains and not about the length of time of a journey. Some stated that it was nonsensical to compare daily commute with waiting times at polyclinics because people commute every day for work but do not go to polyclinics every day. A few pointed out that the extra six minutes being talked about was just on a one-way trip, so it would be a total of 12 minutes round trip. Sas Karma mentioned that six minutes on a moving train was better than six minutes of stalled trains or of wasted time waiting at the platform for the train. Luke Wong stated with sarcasm that people should not forget to thank Minister Khaw that Singaporeans now have to wait for hours to get a hospital bed since Minister Khaw was the former Minister of Health.
addict951 stated that the train at the North-South Line stopped for about 15 minutes "due to congestion ahead". In another forum thread, lvlrsSTI posted that services at the North-South Line was delayed because someone pressed the emergency button causing the train to stop. rathalos claimed that LTA would be announcing a new ERP system specially designed for trains to improve the congestion frequently felt by commuters. The system was currently under testing at the North-South Line and would be fully implemented sometime in 2017. Commuters may expect a 5% increase in train fares when the new ERP system kicks in, as transport operators would seek reimbursement of operation cost from the Public Transport Council. Billionaire pointed out that the train would stop at the next station if the emergency button was pressed, and not immediately after the button was pressed.
?Derrick Goh? reported the bus captain of service 960 who did not stop despite his mother pressing the bell.When the bus skipped the bus stop, the netizens mother approached the bus captain to ask why he did not stop. The netizen claimed that instead of replying in a proper manner, the bus captain told the passenger that she could alight at the next stop. The bus captain also refused to provide his name to the passenger. Upon reaching Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange, the netizens mother complained to the Passenger Service Centre but said that the staff was not very helpful either. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue and provide him with an explanation. Benang Biru asked Derrick Goh to view the transaction history on the EZ-Link card so he could provide SMRT with details such as boarding and alighting time and the bus plate number. SMRT reached out to the netizen to request for details so that the team can look into it.
An SBS Transit bus crashed into seven parked motorcycles along Changi Village Road on Mar 16 at around 7 a.m. as it was leaving a bus bay.The collision also pushed two motorcycles underneath a Toyota Vios parked in front of the motorcycle lot.According to the Singapore Police Force, a 23-year-old male motorcyclist was conveyed conscious to Changi General hospital.Tammy Tan, SBS Transit Senior Vice President of Corporate Communications, said that the bus captain suddenly felt unwell and was unable to avoid a collision. Tan also apologised to the injured motorcyclists and that they have been in touch with him and were rendering him assistance.The accident also held up traffic for about half an hour. Several netizens speculated that the bus captain had fallen asleep or was using his mobile phone while driving. Others said that there had been many accidents involving SBS Transit buses and asked SBS Transit to take action. Joel Yen said that the driver must be tired and have schedules to meet.
Liviasasjunius stated that it was an amazing experience having used the EZ-Link NFC SIM card for the first time. In a later post, however, the netizen felt disappointed that there was a S$0.35 convenience fee charge when she topped up. Most netizens stated that it was troublesome and costly to use the new EZ-Link NFC SIM card.
Belmont Lay wrote about three misconceptions that the public might have about SBS Transit and SMRT being rewarded for improving bus waiting times.1. It did not mean that all SBS Transit and SMRT bus services have improved. If a commuter personally felt that waiting times for buses s/he took did not improve, they were not part of the 34 bus services being assessed.2. Reduced EWT did not mean shorter wait time. If a bus service arrived on time regularly, the EWT would be zero minutes. If there was bus bunching resulting in prolonged waits for the subsequent bus, the EWT would increase. The EWT would only improve if bus arrivals become more regular and more evenly spaced.3. SBS Transit and SMRT could be rewarded but also get penalised, a classic carrot-and-stick approach.The writer stated that bus waiting times should not be getting worse because 800 Government-funded buses have been added as of Mar 31.
"On The Straits Times Forum, Patrick Nathan, Vice-President for Corporate Information and Communications, stated that Seah Yam Meng might have misunderstood the structure of the Team-Based Reliability Incentive scheme that would be rolled out by SMRT. Nathan assured the netizen that the scheme does not include a penalty component but would incentivise staff at all levels to excel in their work as a team, by paying bonuses when targets are met or exceeded.He added that the senior management's bonuses have been, and continue to be, tied to a range of key performance indicators (KPIs) which were important to the stakeholders The KPIs include operational performance and reliability of our public transport service, customer experience, and the quality and strength of our workforce."Faizal posted about a piece of metal that came off from an escalator at Jurong East MRT station on the night of Mar 5, causing commuters to flee in panic. A man was also injured during the chaos.mutually claimed that the side metal of the escalator came off because of a stroller that was stuck in the escalator. Notahuman suggested reviewing the CCTV footage to see what really happened during the incident.
Senior Transport Correspondent Christopher Tan wrote on The Straits Times that it was puzzling that SMRT and Temasek Holdings were not upbeat about the transition to the new rail framework.He said that it was equally puzzling that Temasek has not made a general offer for the buyout and instead has effected a scheme of arrangement, which was often associated with mergers or the restructuring of a troubled entity.Tan explained that in the scheme of arrangement, Temasek would require a 75% acceptance rate, versus 90% for a general offer. By virtue of that, it was likely it would have had to offer a better price for a general offer. Temasek said it picked a scheme of arrangement because it was not looking to raise its shareholding of 54%, but instead wanted to delist SMRT. The writer noted that Temasek's S$1.68 per share offer would amount to a total consideration of S$1.1B, which was almost identical to the sum that the Government has agreed to pay for SMRT's operating assets.Tan asked whether the Government would eventually be financing Temasek's buyout. Victor Wee said that the privatisation of Singapore's public transportation system has been a pointless exercise and an outright failure. The netizen deemed that the move to make SMRT private was a politically compromised re-nationalization. Michael Chan said that it was a wise decision for the Government to buy SMRT over and run it like a Government department as that would increase the accountability of the firm. Davy Devaraj said that all the financial transactions involve taxpayers and public funds. Sim Tony believed that the buyout was a calculated move with LTA buying SMRTs assets then Temasek buying SMRT and going private.
A car crashed into the fence at SMRT's Bishan Depot in the afternoon of September 9. An eyewitness saw an SMRT staff member taking a statement from the female driver of the grey Mazda 3. Another vehicle, a TransCab taxi was also involved in the accident and had its front bumper damaged.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, stated that a private car and a taxi met an accident along Bishan Road. The impact caused the car to crash into the perimeter fencing for SMRT Bishan Depot close to the main guardhouse. SMRT has immediately activated its infrastructure personnel to inspect and reinforce the part of the fencing that has been damaged. The site will also be manned by personnel as added security until the damage is repaired. Others noted that TransCab was again involved in an accident. A few mentioned that it was not safe to walk on pedestrian pavement because of such accidents.
A former SMRT Bus Captain Lau Pik Choong, who drove off while an 88-year-old passenger still had one foot in the bus, was sentenced to one week in jail and disqualified from driving for 18 months for his negligence.On Apr 3, 2015, passenger Ting Lang Kins crushed left foot had to be amputated following the accident. According to a medical report, the injuries to her leg were deemed to be non-reconstructable. Assistant Public Prosecutor Dillion Kok pressed for a jail term of between one and two weeks, and for Lau to be disqualified from driving for two years, citing a couple of aggravating factors in the case, such as how Lau had a reasonable expectation to ensure that the doors were closed before driving off.When The Straits Times visited Madam Ting, she said that she was already trying to move on from the incident, despite still feeling the occasional pain. When told about the bus captain's sentence, she said in dialect: "It doesn't matter to me, I want to let the matter rest. I'm already so old but he still has a family to feed." Most netizens believed that the one week jail term was not enough compared to the permanent loss of a body part. Several stated that the LTA should revoke Laus licence. Some mentioned that most SMRT and SBS Transit bus captains were reckless and would not wait for the elderly to find a seat or alight from the bus before moving off. Faizan Ali mentioned seeing an SBS Transit bus captain of service 170 who did not bring the bus to a complete stop when a female passenger with a child were alighting from the bus.
SMRT expects the new Downtown Line 2, which is operated by its rival SBS Transit, to adversely affect the companys revenue this quarter.Manfred Seah, SMRT Chief Financial Officer, said that the new line which opened a month ago, would erode its revenue by "S$5 to S$6M in the fourth quarter" ending Mar 31. Riders would be drawn off from the North-South Line, the western part of the East-West line, as well as bus services serving the Bukit Timah corridor.Seah added that SMRT's taxi business was also feeling the impact of ride-hailing apps such as Uber and GrabTaxi, as the hired out rate of its taxi fleet decreased to 95% from more than 97% in the first two quarters.Several netizens stated that SMRT should not be afraid of competition since they received billions of dollars in subsidies from the Government.Some believed that the issue would be used by SMRT as a good justification for requesting another fare hike despite its huge revenues in the last financial year.Benjamin Ng mentioned that SMRT should try to improve its services first before talking about profit and revenue.Joei Huang stated that SMRT CEO was already reporting to shareholders the potential cause of loss of earnings in the future but no solutions to current issues were mentioned.Gabriel Ng mentioned that the Downtown Line was indeed more convenient than SMRTs North-South and East-West Lines.Ryosuke Takahashi asked whether SBS Transit complained when some of their bus routes were awarded to SMRT decades ago. SRSR333 said that more competition would give more pressure on SMRT, which would be better for consumers.
Additional comments were observed on a thread initiated by matamafia at Sammyboy Forum on Jul 25, 2011 regarding the train collision at Clementi MRT station in 1993 which injured 156 commuters. The thread starter claimed that there was a cover up about a human finger found inside the train after the accident. blissquek mentioned searching for news stories on Google about the accident but found no mention of the human finger
An article published by TODAYonline shared about bus enthusiasts and what they do. It was mentioned that many of them were members of the Singapore Bus Spotters Association (SBSA), a group passionate about spotting models of buses on the roads. As part of SBSAs activities, members would hop on a bus to document the buses of the past and the future and also discover different routes. They also collect and preserve the unused bus parts like number plates from retired buses for memorys sake, and also collect detailed die-cast scaled bus models.The transport enthusiasts would also regularly send feedback to LTA, as well as bus and train operators, when they see areas that can be improved. Commenting on the article, another bus enthusiast group, (buses[IN]gapore!), however, warned about the rogue side of the said "Association". They claimed that members of the SBSA were not authorised to sell SMRT Enviro500 models to the public during bus carnivals, but insisted on continuing to sell, despite warnings from organisers and LTA. (buses[IN]gapore!) also claimed that SBSA members were involved in stealing bus parts.
The famous Sungei Road flea market would be shut down in 2017 to make room for the Jalan Besar MRT station for the Downtown Line 3.The flea market popularly known as the Thieves Market has been in operation since the 1930s, and has blossomed into a favourite spot for patrons searching for second-hand goods like clothes and even rare antiques and collectables Samantha Tan stated that while some of the stuff sold at the market were questionable in quality and value, the netizen wondered why the tourism board as well as heritage board could not do something about it. Calvin Koh said that the market should be allowed beside or near Sungei Road MRT station. PikuChoo assumed that the National Environment Agency either wants to get rid of the "eyesore" or would like the vendors to pay a licence fee.
Kah Yong Ngai? noticed that many commuters could now freely eat and drink while onboard buses. The netizen also mentioned that no signages stating that drinking and eating were prohibited on public transport could be seen inside the bus.
The lift at Kallang MRT station jammed while descending from platform level towards the station concourse, trapping 11 commuters for about 25 minutes on Mar 13. Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that station staff were alerted to the incident at around 2:50 p.m. and that the lift maintenance crew were immediately activated. SMRT station staff kept in touch with passengers in the lift through the lift intercom while rescue efforts were underway. One of the trapped passengers mentioned that an elderly lady found it difficult to breathe and was given a bottle of water to help her rehydrate. SMRT apologised for the inconvenience caused. Some netizens observed that there had been several lift accidents recently. Others said that most people taking the lift at MRT stations were able-bodied.
?Shahrul Kamal? asked SMRT why the train (cabin 3011) from Buona Vista MRT was stuffy and hot as if there was no air-conditioner.
Richmond Kwan asked SMRT to look into the bus arrival timing of service 167. The netizen stated that two service 882, two service 859B and two service 859 went past but no 167 had yet to arrive. In another post, the netizen asked SMRT to explain why commuters had to wait 40 minutes for service 167 on a Sunday night.
?Angeline Teoh? mentioned that she was onboard bus service 800 with a friend on 6 June 2016. When she was about to alight, the bus captain motioned her to come forward. When the netizen questioned why, she was surprised that the bus captain started shouting at her for attempting to alight from the front door.The netizen demanded an explanation from SMRT regarding the incident. Shawn Lee wondered why the contributor did not get the bus captains details. In a later post, he mentioned that when boarding the bus, it would be more efficient if passengers can do so from both the front and back doors, and passengers should be patient enough to wait for passengers to alight before boarding.
rambo22 observed that most SBS Transit bus drivers were always in a hurry, expecting motorists to give way to them. 70niner stated with sarcasm that public buses are the kings of the road and all private vehicles should give priority to buses hLsY said that it was even more irritating when buses do not use the lane designated to them. S/he added that buses also try to cut their own queue at the bus stops jamming up two lanes. Sulo Garbage explained that if one bus was delayed other buses would also be delayed. The netizen also mentioned that drivers tend to rush to keep up with the timings.
In his latest blog post, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated that as many developed cities had been aiming for a car-lite society, Singapore was also moving towards the same direction. The Government was working hard to deliver a reliable, convenient and affordable public transport system, make places and streets much friendlier for pedestrians and cyclists, and reduce travel distances by bringing jobs closer to homes, with the development of regional centres outside the CBD, such as in Woodlands and Punggol. The Government would be investing a projected S$36B in public transport expenditure over the next 5 years. In the Ministry of Transports addendum to President Tony Tan Keng Yams opening address to Parliament on Jan 15, Minister Khaw said that rail reliability would remain the top priority, while the Government would be improving walking and cycling connections, particularly to train stations and bus stops. The transport operators and the LTA were set to recruit many additional engineers and technicians to support maintenance capabilities, as well as implementing more stringent maintenance requirements. While several netizens support the Governments vision for a car-lite city, others were uncertain if Singapore was prepared for the abrupt transition. Others stated that Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong, President Tony Tan, and the Cabinet Ministers should take the lead and set an example by taking public transport. Some said that public transport should be efficient and reliable in order to encourage the public not to drive their cars. Others mentioned that it would be difficult to convince people to walk or cycle to work because of the weather. Several stated that hiring more local engineers and offering better pay. Jok Kwang Han said that the people should support the Ministry of Transport on every step towards its aim. Francis Chu thanked Minister Khaw for his world class commitment towards a green and clean future. Joseph Kerk mentioned that it would be difficult for young families to take public transport. Richard Lim HL said that having more shaded footpaths or roads leading to bus stops and MRT stations would encourage more to use public transport. Swee Kong also suggested having bicycles for hire at MRT stations so commuters could just cycle from the train station towards their destination. Gillian Teng said that traffic situations would be better if both standard journeys and express buses shared the same lane.
For the third day in a row, commuters on the Circle Line continued to face delays as the signalling issues were still ongoing. On August 31, SMRT sent out a tweet at 6:47 a.m. to inform commuters to expect an additional three to five minutes of travelling time. At 8:40 a.m., SMRT revised the additional travelling time to 10 minutes.Commuters were advised to hold onto the handrails as there may be "intermittent braking" of the trains.In response to media queries, SMRT said initial investigations show "possible signal interference in tunnels, causing loss of signal between the trains and stations". Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that its engineers were trying to confirm it and that the company and the Land Transport Authority were working with the contractor, Alstom, to rectify the fault as quickly as possible.Commuters continued to express their frustrations about the delay on social media. Most netizens were frustrated that SMRT was still unable to resolve the signalling issues. Several stated that SMRT should provide realistic announcements on the situation so that commuters could find alternative transport to continue their journey. Some asked why SMRT engineers have yet to rectify the signalling issue. Others suggested that SMRT close certain stations to rectify the issue. Several believed that the issues being faced by the MRT were caused by a high volume of commuters which the trains could not handle. Some said that the daily delays had affected the economy and productivity.
Melissa Wong? asked SMRT to deploy more bendy buses and increase the frequency for service 811 because of the increased population in the area. She also said that the buses tend to bunch and come in two or three at the same time.As rigid buses were deployed, the netizen said that many passengers had to wait another 20 minutes for the next bus. She suggested for SMRT to deploy more bendy buses or alternate the frequency of bendy buses if there were not enough bendy buses to go around. Lim Guan Heng Bahamut mentioned writing to the Land Transport Authority (LTA) regarding the issue and was informed that no additional bus services would be introduced in the near future along Yishun Avenue 6 and 7. The netizen also suggested writing to LTA on the seriousness of the situation. Matthias Ngan also posted on SMRTs Facebook page regarding the same issue. The netizen said that during evening peak hours, bendy buses deployed for service 811A would be empty, while the buses heading from the industrial area towards Khatib would be struggling to cope with passenger demand. The netizen added that there seem to be almost no bendy buses during some weekends, resulting in poorly optimised resources where some buses are running empty and others packed with passengers such as foreign workers. He noted that service 811 has seen improvements and it is great to see some effort by SMRT. However, the netizen still feels that deployment of buses can be improved to other feeder services in Yishun and also for service 812.
On TODAY Online News, it was posted that some SMRT employees were upset by what they see as an apparent disregard for workers safety over the need to subdue commuters complaints about train breakdowns in the aftermath of the two SMRT employees deaths. Other employees claimed they were kept in the dark about the tragedy on Mar 22 even as they had to continue performing their duties.Speaking to TODAY on the condition of anonymity, an SMRT engineer said: We are very angry and sad that such a thing has happened. It was an accident that could have been avoided. Safety should always come first and not be compromised, even when the management wants problems to be fixed fast to avoid delays to the train service.While technicians on the ground are essential for the reliability of operations, the engineer said he was devastated when he heard the news that they were killed on the tracks.Another SMRT employee, who also declined to be named, said that ground crew personnel were not given much information after the accident. He himself was not told about what was happening at the accident scene, or about when the station may be re-opened: (At that time), people were asking how long the delay would last, and I said, Im not sure. Tan Kwong Moh stated that SMRT must be accountable for the accident. wixxxx said that many people were also upset that two young lives were lost just like that. fish&chips mentioned that the employees union should not only ensure the staff were fairly remunerated, but also act on staff grievances.
?Nicole Lee? reported that passengers were stranded for about 10 minutes while onboard the bus with plate number SMB 297X because of an argument between the bus captain and a passenger. The netizen said that the bus captain refused to continue with the journey unless the passenger apologised. SMRT has reached out to the netizen, asking for more details.
?Gerald Tan? asked SMRT why bendy and MAN A22 buses were deployed for service 190 which was supposed to have double-decker buses.
?Kircheis Csm? asked SMRT to deploy more service 903 buses from the bus interchange or introduce more buses to the said route. The netizen mentioned that there is always a long queue for service 903.
?Luke Lim? stated that there was a train disruption between Jurong East and Clementi station on Mar 11. The netizen observed that announcements onboard train number 3074 was only in English and Mandarin. The netizen said that there should also be announcements in Malay and Tamil.
?On Facebook, SMRT featured one of its Assistant Engineers, Norhidayat Bin Salim, who recently graduated from his Bachelor of Technology Program at the National University of Singapore. Norhidayat presented his final year project to Guest of Honour, Acting Minister for Education and Senior Minister of State for the Ministry of Defence, Ong Ye Kung. The project was a redesign of SMRTs track cleaning vehicles, which would make track cleaning much more effective and water efficient, which SMRT had adopted and funded.
On Mothership.sg, Jeanette Tan reposted about SMRT excuse chits for commuters affected by train delays and disruptions, which SMRT had posted on its Facebook page on September 21.In its Facebook post, SMRT had shared that excuse chits are available at SMRTs Passenger Service Centres after The Straits Times ran a report on a service delay on the Circle Line and quoted a commuter, Ashley Wu, who said SMRT should issue excuse chits that employees could show to their employers as proof that, it was not their fault they were late for work. George Wong suggested that the excuse chits should be available online for printing or alerts on delays can be sent through SMS notifications to all phones so that all concerned parties are aware of the disruption.
An oil spill from a tanker carrying palm oil on the Bukit Timah Expressway caused a massive traffic jam on Jan 29, which affected several SMRT bus services at Woodlands Bus Interchange.SMRT said the bus services affected were: 178, 187, 858, 911, 913, 925, 950, 960, 961, 963 and 966. Bus passengers were advised to seek alternative forms of travel. Commuters could also approach SMRTs service ambassadors for guidance. Several netizens wondered why SMRT was mentioned on news stories when SMRT had nothing to do with the oil spill. Some mentioned that the oil spill also affected several bus services coming from SMRTs Woodlands Bus Interchange. Kelvin Stark noted that the accident happened at around 2 a.m., the police arrived at 3 a.m., Singapore Civil Defence Force came at 6 a.m. and the clean-up started after 11 a.m. Poomer mentioned that there was a train breakdown on Jan 28 and a massive traffic jam on Jan 29 but Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan was nowhere in sight. Yutian Chua asked SMRT to deploy more double-decker buses for service 966 on Sundays because commuters had to wait up to 30 minutes. Jason Han said that SMRT should keep up the good work in informing passengers about the traffic jam. Ryosuke Takahashi asked why SMRT did not have alternative plans to divert the buses.
On his Facebook page, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan wrote about the lost-and-found treasure chest at the Woodlands Bus Interchange. He also shared photos of his visit at the bus interchange to wish the staff Happy New Year personally. Meanwhile, SMRT also posted photos of the Transport Ministers visit and stated that the staff were delighted when Minister Khaw paid them a visit. The Minister also visited Ten Mile Junction Depot's workshop to understand the works that were being carried out. He mingled with some maintenance staff in the conference room and dropped by the Bukit Panjang LRT Operations Control Centre.At the Jurong East MRT Station, Minister Khaw greeted the station ambassadors and had a chat with the train captains and operations crew. Mediacorp HD was concerned that while there were train breakdowns and delays, Minister Khaw missed the extremely critical problems at hand because he was busy visiting public transport depots and its staff.
?Johnny Yap? reported the bus captain of service 901 (SMB1603P) for inappropriate driving on September 1. The netizen mentioned that he boarded bus service 901 from Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange towards Blk 541. He said that his journey usually takes 7 -8 minutes, but there was an 80% increase in travelling time incurred during his trip as the bus was travelling at unusually slow speed and took unreasonably long stops at every single bus stop. The netizen asked the bus captain why he was driving slowly and the bus captain stated that he had too much time based on SMRT's schedule for service 901.The netizen stated that in order for SMRT to have statistically-sound data, the bus captain should drive at a normal speed so that SMRT could gather accurate data of the bus journey at different timings. The bus captain could also feedback to the company about the extra timing in the schedule.SMRT has reached out to the netizen so that the team can look into the incident.
Govindaraju Kannan? suggested having badges for commuters who were willing to offer their seats to those who need them. The netizen mentioned that he was willing to wear such a badge particularly during peak hours. He added that wearing the badge would help unwell passengers because most of them hesitate to ask for a seat.
Sum Siew Kee was very disappointed with SMRT that there was a disruption across four lines on Apr 25, saying that it was unacceptable for a developed country.The netizen said that SMRT needs to improve its communication process during major disruptions. Although Twitter has become SMRTs preferred medium of communication for the public during rail disruptions, the netizen said that news of the breakdowns on the Circle Line and Bukit Panjang LRT on Apr 25 was not forthcoming. The netizen said that SMRT ought to ensure that timely information should be given during a disruption. Any lack of updates would destroy any remaining shred of confidence left in SMRT.
Netizens continued to discuss the possibility of an increase in bus fares as implied in Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans statement that service standards of public bus services could not be improved without increasing the fares. Some mentioned that authorities should first resolve the current issues before planning on raising fares.KH Ngai noted that the bus and train fares had just been reduced last November and wondered whether the transport companies have been making losses since then. John FC mentioned that commuters in Japan get free rides whenever the train breaks down, and claimed that in Singapore, there would be a fare hike after a breakdown.
Patrick Tan Siong Kuan stated that the NTA and taxi companies have themselves to blame for the situation they are in because they have ignored the commuters call for improvement in taxi services.The netizen said that Singapore was probably the only country with an extremely complex taxi system with so many layers of surcharge that it was virtually impossible to remember what the charges were. He added that it was easier to flag a taxi in New York than in Singapore where taxis were always on call. Patrick Tan Siong Kuan mentioned that taxi companies and the NTA should stop complaining about unfair competition because they had monopolised the industry for a long time. David Kwok said that the Government should remove all surcharges and introduce one standard fare. instinct remarked that competition would wake taxi companies up from their slumber.
The Workers' Party (WP) hailed the new rail financing framework for public transport operator SMRT as a "step in the right direction", but expressed concern that Temasek Holdings' proposed buyout of SMRT might render the company's financials and operations "less transparent to the public". The party wanted to know how Temasek, given its status as a private exempt company", would manage the tension between its role of maximising shareholder value and delivering better public transport value.The WP suggested that the contract of operating the rail system should be shortened further from 15 to 10 years. The WP also asked whether the North-East Line and Sengkang-Punggol LRT under SBS Transit would transition to the new framework, and if so, by when. Several netizens stated that the money was just going from the right pocket to the left pocket as Temasek was Government-owned. Gary Tan believed that Temasek sees the deal as a business opportunity as LTA just offered S$991M to buy over the train assets. Being still a privatised company, Temasek could always re-list or sell away SMRT as they wished in the future. Kelvin Lam Does asked whether The WP has any solutions for the rail woes apart from worrying about them. JJ Wong noted that the Hong Kong MTR was doing its duty to the public well despite being listed.
The Online Citizen reposted the news story about the agreement between LTA and MasterCard for the new system called the Account-Based Ticketing System which would allow commuters to tap their registered credit and debit cards for the payment of their bus and train journeys. Some netizens stated that using credit cards for transport fares is nothing new as POSB Everyday cardholders had been using it for some time already. Sam Tan warned credit card users of an additional fees charged when using MasterCard. Other netizens were worried about the security of using credit cards. "Chin Lee" said he preferred the separation of the function that Flashpay provides, which allows him to view his transactions easily on NFC.
Analysts stated that it was not yet time for SMRT to celebrate after its latest increase in profits because the rail headwinds continue to threaten SMRT.According to analysts from Maybank Kim Eng, benefits from its lower energy bills would be nullified by the 1.9% fare reduction that took place last month, while the recent opening of SBS Transits Downtown Line 2 would continue to affect SMRTs revenue. Analysts added that discussions on bus and rail transitions remain unclear.Meanwhile, RHB Research stated that SMRT had been making progress in its discussions with LTA on the transition to a new rail financing framework.
On SMRTs Facebook page, several netizens posted about the train air-conditioning system that was not functioning well. Jerryson Easudas? mentioned that the train travelling from Toa Payoh to Jurong East had a faulty air-conditioner. ?Benjamin Alexander Cai? asked SMRT to ensure that the air-conditioning system was functioning well during peak hours. The netizen also suggested having air-conditioning vents at the door to prevent cold air from escaping. ?Valiant Lee? wondered why the train cabins lacked air-conditioning during hot weather.
Imogen B stated that the Singapore MRT system was super easy to navigate, and the ticket machines were even easier to use. A commuter would just have to press the station names and choose whether it would be a single or return journey. The netizen also recommended getting a three-day transport pass for S$20. S/he added that most trains have a lighted display which shows current and subsequent stations, as well as which side the doors would open. The netizen also said that trains were very clean as drinking, eating and chewing gum were prohibited.The netizen felt that the MRT was the cheapest, quickest and most stress-free way to get around Singapore.
?Wf Ran? asked whether there was a rule prohibiting people from sitting on the floor at MRT stations. The netizen mentioned sitting against a wall at Paya Lebar MRT and was not obstructing any traffic flow but was told off by a security officer.The netizen pointed out that SMRT had failed to police heavier offences such as eating and drinking at MRT stations and trains but was quick to reprimand someone who was just resting his/her tired legs.
Celine Foo shared her experience when half of her leg was stuck inside the cabin while she was standing outside the train. The netizen mentioned that the train doors closed while she was trying to board the train. She wondered why the train door did not open even when her leg was caught in between them. The netizen managed to free her leg in time before the train moved off. She suffered a cut on her toe and had left her sandals and earphones inside the train.While thankful for the assistance of an SBS Transit female service officer for applying antiseptic on her wound and lending her a pair of slippers, the netizen was pretty much appalled with what happened. The netizen questioned SBS Transits safety features especially during peak hours. She also wondered why no one inside the train pushed the emergency button to alert the train driver that someone was caught between the doors. Some netizens posted similar experiences on being caught in between train doors.
In an article on AsiaOne, it was stated that the planned high-speed rail (HSR) connecting Singapore and Kuala Lumpur was a feather in the cap for regional economic integration but profitability and political manoeuvring may overshadow the ambitious project.A recent report from Nanyang Technological University (NTU) has warned that the HSR could struggle to provide the hoped-for boost to ASEAN cohesion to unite Southeast Asia into a single market and production base. Research fellow Wu Shang-su and Associate Professor Alan Chong noted that HSR projects typically struggle for years before turning a profit. Citing that the example of the Eurotunnel linking Britain and France, the NTU report explained that it took more than two decades for the rail to turn a profit.The report also stated that the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur HSR may not be an exception with operating deficits common among most HSR operators around the world. Moreover, with commercial aviation as the railway's primary competitor, redirecting large numbers of aerial passengers to the HSR may not be feasible.Ticket pricing would also be a key issue, particularly if the HSR was meant to compete with cars, buses and conventional trains. Navigating through government bureaucracy could also derail progress.
SBS Transit plans to install an intelligent camera sensor, called Mobileye, at the front of the bus which can alert drivers through a dashboard display unit when they are too close to the vehicle in front, and if a pedestrian or cyclist comes into their path. The Israeli-designed advanced driver assistance system (ADAS) would serve as an extra set of special eyes to help bus captains look out for vehicles, pedestrians and cyclists on the roads. SBS Transit is believed to be the first operator in Singapore to have an ADAS installed across its entire fleet. The Mobileye system was also able to detect lane markings, and would alert drivers when they stray out of their lanes without using their turn signals. SBS has finished testing Mobileye on 30 buses being used for passenger service in a trial that began in November 2014. Some netizens stated that bus captains should not be too reliant on technology to keep themselves, passengers, and other road users safe. May Ong stated that SMRT and SBS Transit should spend more money to retrain all bus captains to be more caring and careful in their driving skills. Darren Chow suggested installing sensors on the sides of buses as well. Peter Tan stated that the latest gadgets could not guarantee zero accidents because everything still depends on the alertness of the bus captain. Peter Lim said that there should be a device that would slow down or stop a bus to avoid a collision.
Dr. Chee Soon Juan, Secretary-General of the Singapore Democratic Party (SDP), asked why the rush to sign the memorandum of understanding (MOU) for the Kuala Lumpur-Singapore high-speed rail (HSR) project given the widening scandal enveloping 1 Malaysia Development Berhad (1MDB). Dr. Chee Soon Juan cited the recent announcement of the US Department of Justice's investigation into 1MDB and the alleged corrupt practices in the company. He stated that it was premature for Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan to say that it was time to pause and celebrate the green light for the project.The SDP had raised the following questions:1. Why the rush to put pen to paper given the controversy embroiling 1MDB and the political uncertainty building up in Malaysia2. Has the Singapore government exercised due diligence in proceeding with the HSR project?3. How comfortable is the Government with the fact that China Railway Engineering Corp (CREC) which owns majority control of Bandar Malaysia is also bidding for the HSR operations? Will the government be able to guarantee that the bidding had been done and will be done in a transparent way in the future?4. Does Singapore have a say which company would be awarded the contract for the HSR project? 5. If 1MDB was crippled by the impending actions taken by multiple jurisdictions, how would the project proceed and what, if any, would be the contingencies? Several netizens agreed with the SDPs concern regarding the recent signing of the MOU with Malaysia in light of the controversies surrounding 1MDB. Others assumed that the project would be cancelled once Malaysia appoints a new Prime Minister. Max Chew observed that there were many MOUs that had been signed by the Government with many different countries that became meaningless.
Tar Sutthisiriwattana? praised the security and station control staff members at Bishan and Dhoby Ghaut MRT stations for alerting the next station and keeping the lost laptop. The netizen mentioned leaving the laptop accidentally after topping his travel card. She stated that SMRT had won her heart for the good job.
SMRT launched a new feeder bus service 805 to better serve Nee Soon residents on Feb 14, Sunday. The service would ply between Yishun Bus Interchange and Yishun Avenue 1 enhancing connection to key amenities such as Khoo Teck Puat Hospital and Yishun Community Hospital. Associate Prof Dr Muhammad Faishal Ibrahim and Er Dr Lee Bee Wah, both advisers from Nee Soon GRC, boarded the bus during the launch. Thomas Daniel stated that during the launch of new services, new buses were used by SMRT for promotion but the old buses would be deployed after the launch.
Last year, Facebook user Pamela Tham posted a series of funny MRT puns which went viral in Singapore.With the addition of the Downtown Line 2, more puns had been posted online. Some have already been posted by Facebook user Joelynn Wong, who started her own collection of MRT puns last year.Puns added to the collection include "I gotta run, Cashew (catch you) later!", and "So excited, I can't Stevens (even)". Most netizens tagged their friends to the post, with some saying that they could come up with much better puns. Several shared their own puns.
Steyr69 noticed that there was now an option for commuters to top up their EZ-Link cards using credit cards at MRT stations. The netizen wondered whether there would be an extra charge when using credit cards for top-up. Some netizens said that credit cards could not be used to top up EZ-Link cards. lonelyarinei also noticed the new payment option but did not have time to try using it. marc2002 mentioned that credit cards could be used for online top-ups via an app.
?Claudia Ng? reported that only two fare gantries were opened for passengers entering the platform at Ang Mo Kio MRT station during the morning peak period yesterday (September 20). The netizen mentioned that the gantries on the side of the station leading to the platform for trains heading towards Jurong East were closed and only two gantries were opened on the side of the station towards Marina Bay.
On SMRT Facebook Page, complaints regarding warm train cabins were posted. ?Mohd Rizal? asked if SMRT sets the air-conditioning to the same temperature throughout the day. Yesmin Isabelle Soh? shared a video showing passengers fanning themselves while inside the train and wondered whether the air-conditioner or ventilation on the trains were switched on. ?Andrew Ng? stated that there was no air-conditioning in train cabin 8052 on the Circle Line travelling towards Bishan.
Teo Kian Keong thanked the LTA with sarcasm for removing the direct link to Marine Parade.
?Tay Jing Wen? praised the young Malay bus captain of SMB1319K for being polite, kind and friendly. The netizen mentioned that the bus captain addressed him as "sir" when he was talking to him. The bus captain also thanked the passengers and wished them to have a nice day before he left the bus interchange at the of his shift.
ImFromPipiForum stated that there were long intervals at the East- West Line and the trains kept stopping. qingyong mentioned that the third train was still at the station. MrSinkie95 said that the train was stuck at Redhill Station.
In a joint press release on August 31, LTA and SMRT announced that 10 new double-decker buses with USB charging ports would be on the roads starting September 1. Operated by SMRT, five of these bus services would be deployed on services 61, 67, 985, 963 and 969, and may be redeployed to other services from time to time. A bus on service 964 has been testing the USB ports since August 29.Each bus would have 41 USB charging points located near the inner seats. The ports were also available at the wheelchair bay on wheelchair accessible buses.From October onwards, an additional 137 buses with the feature would be rolled out on other routes. Many netizens felt that the special feature was unnecessary and that the money should have been used to improve train and bus services. Several did not welcome the introduction of USB ports on buses stating that there would be commotion among commuters over the usage of the USB ports. Some commuters welcomed the new feature introduced in some new buses. Others mentioned that more mobile devices would be left behind on the bus and there would be delays in alighting because of the need to take the phones from the USB port. Philemon Foo noted that the feature is a good way to shape human behaviour and encourage more people to move to the back of the bus. Several believed that LTA and SMRT were simply trying to distract commuters from other bus service issues relating to frequencies and passenger loads. Others assumed that the new feature would be used to justify the possible fare increase.
June Ng MY asked SMRT to improve the frequency of bus service 962.The netizen hoped SMRT could look into the issue to avoid inconvenience for commuters.
?Zulraihan Kazuki? reported that there was a long queue at Tampines Interchange because no bus service 969 arrived for almost an hour on Aug 4.The netizen went to the SMRT office at the interchange to report the issue but no personnel was manning the office.The netizen was disappointed that no contingency measures were implemented or backup buses deployed if there was a massive jam at the expressway. The netizen hoped that SMRT could look into the issue.The netizen was also worried that affected commuters might vent their frustrations to the bus captain.
?Sapphire Jasper Lee? praised Bus Captain Uncle Rickee of SMRT service 858 (SMB1386 or 1306).The netizen stated that Bus Captain Rickee was very friendly and sweet. He also greeted his passengers a Happy National Day. The netizen hoped that the bus captain could be recognised by SMRT.
?Celiana Tan Inn Shen posted on SMRTs Facebook page about the staff at Chinatown MRT who refused to let her exit by the gantry at exit F for free. The netizen was not aware that Chinatown MRT was under SBS Transit.The netizen mentioned that she had recently sprained her ankle making it difficult to move around without experiencing pain. Instead of exiting at Chinatown Point and cross multiple roads to get to exit F, the netizen decided to cross the gantry at Chinatown Point and asked the staff to let her exit from the gantry at exit F for free. The staff refused and asked her to exit where she came from before they would refund her fare. The netizen later decided to pay to exit from the gantry so that she did not have to cross multiple roads. The SMRT Facebook Administrator directed the netizen to reach out to SBS Transit, to which the netizen thanked SMRT for its prompt reply.
Itha P mentioned that Singapores MRT system was one of the most efficient in world.The netizen stated that the fares were not expensive and people could travel all day spending just a few dollars on public transport. S/he also mentioned that the travel card could be used for both MRT and bus rides and can be topped-up at the machines available at the stations.
The Ministry of Transport mentioned during parliamentary debates that rail reliability could address the problem of trains breaking down too often. Writer Tan Chu Chze said that reliability is not a very straightforward idea because it could not be easily achieved. To commuters, reliability means trains arriving at the station on time. The Land Transport Authority (LTA), on the other hand, defined reliability as the average distance travelled by trains during the time between rail delays excluding delays less than five minutes long and delays caused by external factors.Basically rail reliability was a measure of how far trains travel before having a significant delay. According to the current statistics, commuters can expect about one delay every 133,000km travelled by all the trains in the system. Another way of looking at it is that commuters could travel on all the MRT lines end-to-end about 870 times before experiencing one delay longer than five minutes.Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan announced a new target average of 200,000km before a delay, along with plans for new technologies to be implemented, and even a Rail Academy to train engineers. The ministry was doing its part to improve rail reliability. The writer asked whether all the effort would calm the beast of a disgruntled patronage and whether commuters would be able to rely on these measures to put together the bits and pieces of rail reliability. Johnson deemed that all those involved in the management and operations of the MRT train systems have very little knowledge of their tasks and responsibilities, including maintenance, planned and regular detailed maintenance, procurement, and repairs. J Y believed that the people were frustrated, especially when there was much better service and reliability in the past to compare with. Tea K stated that train breakdowns were purely due to complacency of the management and engineering department of SMRT.
?Matthias Ngan? reported that the air-conditioning on bus service 851 with plate number SMB1411B was very weak, with the interior cooling to a comfortable temperature only towards the end of the journey. The netizen also observed that service 811 was operating with only one bendy bus and hopes that more bendy buses can be deployed.
dker333 stated that UberX had reduced its base fare from S$3.50 to S$3. S/he said that it was around S$5-8 cheaper than GrabCar for several destinations. Several netizens were happy with the reduced base fares. Some said that it was much cheaper to use Uber and Grab services than taxi services.
?Parokya Ng Makabayan? reported that the bus captain of service 106 (SMB3041Y) headed to Orchard was either sleepy or drunk as he would make sudden brakes or accelerate too fast. The bus captain would also open the bus door even when the bus was still far from the bus stop. SMRT pointed out to the netizen that service 106 is currently operated by Tower Transit.
Dutch! stated that his/her daily journey from Jurong East to Clementi and back was the worst train ride because the journey seemed to take forever. Ah-Pin-Kor wondered if the train ride was slower than people walking on the streets. kaixax555 saidthat the trains from Botanic Gardens to Caldecott also travelled at a slow speed.
In a press release on August 29, SMRT stated that it would raise the basic starting salary for all its Singaporean and Permanent Resident (PR) bus captains by 20% to S$1,950 from September 1. In the revised salary package, SMRT bus captains would earn a monthly gross salary of up to S$3,540. Existing bus captains would also have their basic pay increased by at least S$300 "in recognition of their service to the company", according to SMRT.Between September 1 to January 1, 2017, SMRT would also enhance other staff benefits such as increasing the number of days of annual leave for SMRT Buses employees, free travel on all public bus and train networks, and an enhanced flexible benefits scheme for all of its Singaporean and PR bus captains.Mr Gerard Koh, SMRTs Vice President of Human Resources said that the company's package "goes beyond a competitive basic pay. Several netizens believed that with the increase in basic pay of bus captains, bus fares might also increase soon. Others favoured the increase in basic pay of bus captains. Sp Fairley mentioned that the Government should adopt a progressive wage model, which was the norm for several industries. Ryan Xie noted that the increase in the basic pay of bus captains coincided with Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wans indication of increasing bus fares.
Ang Ah Lay stated that the leaks on the roof on the Circle and Downtown Lines were an eye sore as pails were all over the place to catch the drippings. The affected stations include Stevens, Botanic Gardens and Haw Par Villa.The netizen stated that such leaks caused inconvenience to commuters, especially during peak periods.S/he urged authorities to investigate the causes of the construction deficiencies and to take action to avoid their recurrence. walaneh feared that the whole building might collapse.
Lauren Nmr? praised the SMRT Staff at Newton MRT station for being friendly to commuters. The staff calls the lift for her and her child and even went the extra mile to return a toy that her child had dropped.
?Sharon Yan, a pregnant passenger, praised the SMRT staff at City Hall MRT station for giving her priority to the front of the queue and for making sure she had a seat when the train arrived.
A video was shared online showing a man dangerously cutting into the lane of an SMRT bus while riding on an electric scooter in Mandai. Many netizens stated that LTA should ban the use of electric bikes and scooters along major roads. Others stated that there should be strict enforcement of the current law to prevent accidents. Some mentioned that the bus driver would be taking the blame if an accident happened.
?Yi JF? was unsatisfied with bus service 167 for having to wait 28 minutes for the bus for two consecutive days already.The netizen added that only single-decker buses were usually deployed.The netizen hoped that SMRT could purchase more high capacity buses and pointed out that 43% of SBS Transit buses were double-deckers. Wang Xurui said that Sembawang seemed to be the most neglected SMRT service, particularly service 167.
The LTA had issued a certificate to run a third-party cab-booking service to British start-up Karhoo, joining two other apps, GrabTaxi and Hailo.Karhoo would be relaying its customers booking requests to the taxi operators dispatch systems, unlike most other taxi-booking apps, which work through peer-to-peer matching of cabbies and passengers. Commuters would be given a selection of taxis near them, which they could sort through and select based on "price, local knowledge, quality, punctuality, vehicle type or brand".Karhoo had already signed agreements to work with ComfortDelGro, as well as Prime. Some netizens welcomed the new third-party cab-booking service saying that more apps would benefit more consumers. Kelvin Li was uncertain if the new app would be able to beat the incumbents or gain a good market share to sustain the business. Toi Jon said that there should be an app that eliminates the crazy charge drivers pay the operators. Andrew Singh said that taxi booking apps should think out of the box to be able to sustain their business.
The LTA announced on 23 June that they would double the current taxi operating licensing fees this year and triple it the next year. For a mid-size operator such as SMRT, the fee hike translates to more than $1M in additional costs per year. Member of Parliament and National Taxi Association Executive Adviser Ang Hin Kee said that operators might pass the cost to the drivers by raising rental fees. With the increased rental fees, Singapore commuters would have to pay more for taxi services.The move runs in contradiction with a car-lite society being promoted by Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong. Private car owners were unlikely to see public transport as an option if costs and inconvenience become deterrents.It has also been described by Leong Sze Hian as a triple whammy for taxi drivers after considering the economic downturn and the competition from car-sharing apps. Several netizens reckoned that the increase in taxi licence fee would result in another increase in taxi rental and taxi fares. Others suggested that taxi drivers shift to driving Uber and Grab which they say was cheaper and did not have to adhere to Government regulations. bowah commented that it was a contradiction for the taxi association adviser to be a Member of Parliament who supported the ruling Governments policies. Manjit Singh asked why the Government was making it difficult for taxi drivers to make a living.
?Nadia Oneonethreefive ? asked how she could collect her Friends of SMRT membership card which she signed up for in November 2015 but was not able to collect it on time.
Yeo Szemin mentioned that a young male bus passenger pressed the bell too late for the bus captain to stop at his desired bus stop. The netizen praised the bus captain of service 169 (SMB153X) who did not lose his temper and even advised the young passenger to take a bus in the opposite direction back to his original destination. The netizen was very impressed and thankful to have such bus captains in Singapore. She asks him to keep up the good work.
?Tay Kai Boon noticed several problems with the doors of trains on the East-West Line. The train or platform doors either took a long time to open or failed to open at all.
?Tan Guan Ming? disapproved of having to wait 20 minutes for a bus after three buses had arrived consecutively within a five-minute interval. The netizen asked if bus bunching was part of the Bus Service Reliability Framework. Koo Hansen stated that service 858 had very long wait times.
Sun Hanchen stated that the bus captains assigned to drive the free shuttle buses during the disruption at Bukit Panjang LRT line, as well as the staff guiding the bus captains, were unfamiliar with the route. The netizen mentioned that the contingency exercises previously conducted were a total waste of resources.
An SBS Transit bus captain and a ComfortDelGro taxi driver have earned praise for what their companies have labelled a "selfless act", after they were filmed stopping their vehicles to help put out a car fire.Bus captain Jiang Hong, who was operating bus service 153 along Farrer Road had spotted dense smoke coming out from the front of a car. He was later filmed running towards the car with a red fire extinguisher in his hand. He was later joined by ComfortDelGro taxi driver Ong Kong Poh, in fighting the blaze.Tammy Tan, ComfortDelGro's Group Corporate Communications Officer, stated that they were proud of the bus captain and cabby whose selfless act helped avert what could potentially have been a very serious incident indeed." Most netizens praised the bus captain and cabby for their selfless act. Several netizens stated that both drivers deserved recognition. Others hoped that all Singaporeans would also demonstrate such great examples, not just being bystanders and taking videos or pictures. Shehnaz Shiraz said that the country needed more proactive people like the two men. Others wondered what caused the fire.
In a joint news release, SMRT and LTA announced that a new SMRT bus service would ply Choa Chu Kang Avenue 7, Choa Chu Kang Grove and Keat Hong Link starting May 15 from the Choa Chu Kang Bus Interchange.The new service would operate daily, including public holidays with the first bus departing at 5:30 a.m. on weekdays and 5:45 a.m. on weekends and public holidays. Yvonne Yeh wondered why there was a direct bus service from Woodlands that plies along Bukit Panjang, but none from Choa Chu Kang. Peggy Foo asked if there would be any new bus services going to Thomson Plaza as she was tired of the long waiting time for bus service 855.
SMRT announced that it would raise the retirement age of its bus captains from 67 to 69 years to allow them to provide more meaningful contribution to the growing transport industry.
?Glenc Soh? reported that there was vomit at the last row of seats on bus service 853 (SMB165T). The netizen was surprised that the bus captain continued with the service despite the stench in the bus.
On Facebook, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan posted about his visit at SMRTs Circle Line (CCL) Depot at Kim Chuan and SBSTs Downtown Line (DTL) Depot at Gali Batu, for the second and third time respectively, in two months. The Minister mentioned that both the CCL and DTL had reached an important rail reliability milestone. The two lines had no major service disruption for a continuous period of 100 days. Minister Khaw said that the milestone should be an inspiration for the other MRT lines. The Minister also visited and thanked some of the CCL and DTL maintenance crew and encouraged them to go for the next milestone: 150-day disruption-free. Netizens praised Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan for boosting the morale of the workers and also commended the maintenance crew for their good job.
?Tiffany Nai? stated that the bus captain of bus number SMB232H was very friendly.
On The Alternative View Facebook Page, it was posted that the Circle Line experienced a system fault on September 15 at around 8:10 a.m. The netizen mentioned that the incident was not reported on SMRTs official Twitter account.
?Eye Light? reported three staff members manning berth numbers eight and nine at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange for failing to manage the queue, causing many passengers to miss boarding the second bus.The netizen mentioned that service 966 was late in the morning of Apr 6. The queue had spilled over the marked queue lines. When two consecutive 966 buses arrived, the first bus became full but the staff, an Indian gentleman at the front of the berth, did not instruct the passengers in queue to board the second bus. After about three minutes, the second bus closed its door and drove away without picking up a single passenger. The remaining passengers left at the queue could only watch as the bus drove away. As the empty 966 bus was driving off, two other staff who were standing nearby just pointed, signalling that the bus was supposed to wait and take the overflow. All three staff were just standing around, and passengers were unsure where to go and what to do. The staff did not manage the queue at all, or communicate instructions to the second bus. The netizen added that other staff were also busy chit-chatting instead of assisting commuters.
Malaysian expatriates working in Singapore are excited about the upcoming Kuala Lumpur-Singapore High-Speed Rail link (HSR) project despite reservations over its cost and punctuality.Others, on the other hand, stated that they would choose to travel by plane instead of the HSR if it would take a long time to clear the customs and immigration, and if the cost of the train fare would be more than the budget fares offered by many airlines. Station locations were also a factor considered by potential passengers. If the travelling time to the station would take more than an hour, it would be pointless to travel by train.
A Straits Times article reported on the slow business at the food courts in Kallang Wave Mall and Leisure Park Kallang at the Sports Hub. Many of the stalls in the food courts were now unoccupied.NTUC Foodfare, which operates the food court at Kallang Wave Mall, said it would "resize" to have fewer stalls by the third quarter of this year and the food court would have 10 stalls down from the 17.One former stall owner said he noticed that even when there were events at the Sports Hub, customers bypassed the food court. One employee at a Korean stall still in business said that customers comprise mostly of workers on weekdays.A spokesman for SMRT Alpha, which manages Kallang Wave Mall, Singapore Indoor Stadium and Water Sports Centre, said the space would be reorganised to bring in a new tenant. At the nearby Leisure Park Kallang, about five stalls at the Koufu food court were also closed. A spokesman for Jack Investment, landlord of Leisure Park Kallang, said that it was understood that Koufu was in the midst of changing the food stall mix. Many netizens stated that the food at Kallang Wave Mall and Leisure Park food courts were substandard and the prices were exorbitant. Several said that NTUC Foodfare should review the quality of food being sold. Others mentioned that they were not aware that there was a food court at the mall. Michelle Tan mentioned that the quality of food and prices should be improved since the place has many visitors on event nights. Nam Koh believed that the landlord should be blamed for their high rentals. Jess Thia asserted that there were still a handful of eateries selling good value-for-money and appetising food at Kallang Wave Mall and Leisure Park, while neighbouring food and beverage stalls that sold over-priced food were faring poorly. Roy Kwang believed that the retail shops at the mall were also facing problems such as the lack of crowd.
A train delay occurred along the East-West Line from Joo Koon to Redhill on Mar 8. On Twitter, SMRT alerted commuters to expect 10 to 15 minutes additional travelling time. Some netizens stated that it was not surprising to have train delays and breakdowns nowadays. ?? stated that a train also broke down at Tanah Merah Station towards Pasir Ris, but luckily, the middle track could be used. Kim Taeyeon said that track faults still occur despite the sleeper replacement works. Suria Moorthy mentioned that there was no point in saving six minutes of travel time for the Cross Island Line as train delays were longer than six minutes.
?Allan Magdeline Ang stated that the design of the new Woodlands bus interchange was really very bad because there were only stairs which was difficult for the elderly to use. Buses were also queuing outside waiting to enter the interchange which caused delays to commuters. The alighting bays were also a long walk to the MRT station. The netizen said that he could not imagine having these problems for three years while waiting for the upgrade of the regional bus interchange.
After the much-publicised claim that the alternative route for the Cross Island Line (CRL) would cost S$2B as stated by LTA Chief Executive Chew Men Leong in a letter to The Straits Times on Feb 22, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan stated in Parliament that the LTA does not know the exact cost of the alternative option to run a 9km route skirting the nature reserve for the CRL.Regarding the result of the Environmental Impact Assessment (EIA), Non-Constituency Member of Parliament Leon Perera asked if the EIA could be made readily available online by default in the future and whether the Ministry of National Development (MND) would publish all documents that it uses to determine the options for CRL.Desmond Lee, Senior Minister of State for National Development replied that the MND would consider his recommendation and would consider at what level the information would be useful for the public.Minister Lee also mentioned that the EIA has assessed the impact to the Central Catchment Nature Reserve (CCNR) to be minimum after stringent mitigating measures are factored into the assessment. Several netizens stated that Minister Khaw should not be comparing delay of existing train services to the actual travel time of a proposed service. George Lam said that all information from the EIA should be disclosed to the public The netizen added that restricted access to the EIA would cause the public to doubt the Government. Ong Alan wondered whether it was necessary to build an MRT line through the MacRitchie Reservoir.
On Facebook, (buses[IN]gapore!) wondered whether all SBS Transit and SMRT livery colours would be changed to green once the takeover of all bus assets are complete. Zuphian Vittorio Alfieri stated that eventually all buses would have the standardised green colour and only the company logo on the side would identify the operator. Royce Liow asked whether the wheelchair accessible buses such as CDGE B9TL and Scania buses would also be painted lush green. Aaron Tan said that there should be multiple variations of the common livery. Razi Tumadi preferred to retain the existing individual livery of each operator.
Netizens continued to discuss the recommendations by the Public Transport Council (PTC) on ways to improve the public transport system in Singapore. On The Straits Times, Danson Cheong wrote that more than 2,500 commuters were surveyed by the PTC for its first report. Those interviewed included parents, wheelchair users, working adults, seniors and students, ranging between 17 and 81 years of age. Views of taxi drivers, staff from transport operators and international transport experts were also sought by the Council. Several netizens also shared their views on how to improve public transport experience such as resolving the causes of frequent breakdowns and lowering of train and bus fares. Lee Suping suggested that bus operators should conduct a refresher course for bus captains to teach them not to jam brake. Thiru SC stated that bus captains should be required to have a good command of basic English.
?Sherrz Lim? asked SMRT to regularly maintain its train air-conditioning system so that it could continue to provide cool air to commuters.
Shivaram Singam wondered why both routes were duplicating each other. The netizens believed there was something wrong with LTAs bus planning department.
Following investigations, SMRT released a statement on August 1 that it was a fault on an LRT train's antenna that caused the train to skip stations along the Bukit Panjang LRT (BPLRT) line on July 28, in response to the feedback by netizen Ms Jacqueline Bong.Ms Bong wrote on SMRT's Facebook page on Jul 28 that she boarded an LRT train at Segar Station with the intention of alighting at Jelapang station. The train, however, did not stop at Jelapang station. Ms Bong also mentioned that a commuter tried contacting staff via the emergency phone, but there was no response.She added that the train was moving "really fast and passed three stations without stopping", and that she tried pressing the emergency button in the train to no avail. The train came to a stop after a passenger made a call to the BPLRT Operations Control Centre.SMRT stated that at 11.50am on July 28, the BPLRT train skipped Jelapang station because the train's antenna, which ensures trains stop accurately at each station, was not able to pick up the signal to stop at the next three stations due to a fault. Upon receiving the alert from commuters on the train, the Operations Control Centre issued a speed code restriction to halt the train before getting staff to drive it back to Phoenix Station.SMRT said that Ms Bong was probably referring to the Emergency Halt Request button which was pressed several times. SMRT clarified that the button could only be activated when a train comes to a complete stop at a station, to prevent it from moving off again. SMRT added that the train's speed did not exceed 55km per hour, and that BPLRT trains operate at a speed range of 30 55 km per hour depending on the gradient and turn of each section of the BPLRT network. Trains also came with independent Automatic Train Protection Systems that ensured safe distances between trains.SMRT stated that all equipment in the train, including the emergency phone, were checked before putting the train into service each day. SMRT also apologised to Ms Bong and other commuters who were on board the affected train, and reassured commuters that safety is top priority. Many netizens were concerned about the safety of using the BPLRT after the incident. Several wondered how many emergency calls the control station received on the day of the incident that they had to put on queue the call made through the trains emergency phone. Jacqueline Bong, the commuter who shared her account on the LRT train, posted a photo of the Emergency Button that the commuters onboard the affected train had pressed. She asked SMRT to clarify the purpose of the "Emergency Next Station Stop button and where the Emergency Halt Request button was located. On HardwareZone Forum, Ideasmiths stated with sarcasm that SMRT should fine Ms Bong and other passengers for pressing the emergency button which could only be activated when a train comes to a complete stop. scroobal claimed that no one was monitoring the control station and no alerts were triggered when trains had missed stations. S/he said that the only alerts generated were the calls to the station or the train intercom.
A photo of a cat at Khatib MRT station was shared online. Netizens stated that it was the colleague of the cat seen at Bukit Gombak MRT station. (buses[IN]gapore!) stated in jest that SMRT might have assigned some cats to become service ambassadors.
Netizens continued to discuss the priority queues for the elderly, disabled, pregnant passengers and parents with strollers, to be implemented at all MRT stations. Several netizens stated that there was no point having priority queues when trains were overcrowded. Some mentioned that even with the queue, commuters shove aside those in front of the queue and rush inside the train to grab priority seats. Sze Wee believed that the main issue was that the rail system was already handling volumes past its intended capabilities. Lucy Quek thought that while priority queues was a gracious idea, it would not work during peak hours. The netizen suggested having foldable priority seats so that those who do not need them would not be sitting on them and pretending to be asleep. She added that in Kobe, trains have folded seats and priority cabins for women. Sp Fairley said that it was a good idea by the LTA but strict enforcement would be needed for successful implementation.
Member of Parliament Melvin Yong shared photos of his visit at the SMRT Ulu Pandan Depot with National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) leaders. He met and had an engaging dialogue with the Rolling Stock team members. Some of the team members were excited about the upcoming opening of the new Tuas Depot, and potential staff issues that may arise with a new facility were also discussed.
derrickgoh stated that the East-West Line train going towards Pasir Ris had been stuck at Lavender Station for quite some time. The netizen also mentioned that the train driver did not know how to open the train door to let commuters exit the train. sanzhu claimed that Transport minister Khaw Boon Wan wanted to have more breakdowns.
In continuation of the Land Transport Authoritys (LTA) announcement of the extension of the free pre-peak travel scheme, Writer Goh Kian Huat said in a forum letter that the scheme was intended to encourage commuters to change their travel hours from peak to off-peak hours to help ease congestion. It also benefits the commuters who were not required to make any change, as they were already travelling early because of the nature of their work and not for the incentive.By giving the latter free rides and discounts, the LTA inadvertently discriminates against commuters who exit other MRT stations before 8 a.m. without the benefits, which the writer insists should be offered to all early birds to be fair to all commuters. Several netizens stated that if the scheme was to be extended to all stations, the LTA would have to spend more, and this could lead to a fare hike to raise the funds to support this scheme. Jun Ying Chuah believed that implementing the scheme in CBD areas was reasonable, as most of the morning crowd on trains were headed to the CBD.
Tan Chuan-Jin, Minister for Social and Family Development, graced the launch of POSB Talking ATMs at SMRT's Esplanade Xchange on Jan 14.Audio and Braille instructions were now included in the enhanced Talking ATMS to allow the visually impaired to conduct basic banking transactions independently.
Transport Minister and Coordinating Minister for Infrastructure Khaw Boon Wan stated at the Committee of Supply (COS) that public transport must make a quantum leap forward in the areas of rail and bus services, along with regulatory and policy frameworks. He said that his focus was on improving accessibility, point-to-point options as well as public transport excellence.He noted that there were four major drivers behind transports evolution in Singapore: the emergence of new technology like driverless vehicles; the introduction of new business models like mobile apps Uber and Grab; the continued ageing population and the growing need to be environment-friendly.Minister Khaw said that the Government wants Singaporeans to eventually cherish public transport as an indispensable part of their daily lives. Several netizens stated that to be able to give proper recommendations, the Ministers should take public transport every day to know the real issues with the rail system. Others would like to see actions and results rather than just promises of improvements. Linda Nguyen said that what Minister Khaw was trying to achieve may be good. The netizen, however, disagreed with Minister Khaws statement that cars would eventually "go the way of horse carriages". Edward Tong Min Chu asked how the Government would penalise the public transport operators for their numerous breakdowns.
On Facebook, Tan Kin Lian wondered whether Singapore needed so many bus services. He observed that many roads in the city area have several bus stops near each other. These stops are required because more than 20 services have to stop there, hence the services are separated to serve the different bus stops. He also mentioned that having too many bus services and bus stops results in a complicated and confusing system. Tan Kin Lian suggested that the bus system be simplified and streamlined. Fewer long distance services with limited stops should be introduced and supported by feeder services to serve the nearby areas. This approach could reduce the number of services by half and still provide a faster and better service to the public. Tan believed that it would also improve operational efficiency.
?Kate Ong? asked SMRT why there was no shuttle bus service from Queenstown to Jurong East when stations open an hour later on Sundays for MRT maintenance works. SMRT responded to inform the netizen that the parallel bus service between Joo Koon and Bukit Gombak is a paid service which goes according to the train distance fare, and advised the netizen about the regular bus service that she can take to travel from Queenstown to Jurong East.
On Facebook, Parliamentary Secretary of the Ministry of Home Affairs Amrin Amin mentioned visiting the new Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange on the evening of Mar 15 after receiving feedback on congestion at the bus entrance and exit of the interchange.He met with LTA and SMRT staff who assured him that they were working hard at improving the interchange. Armin observed that while some improvements were definitely required, everything went generally well. He thanked the LTA, SMRT and Aetos team for their hard work. Several netizens hoped that escalators would be installed at the temporary bus interchange because elderly people found it difficult to climb the stairs. Cikgu Besar hoped that some fans could be installed to help with the circulation of air in the interchange. Salmiah Sapari said that the issues at the interchange might just be teething problems and could still be improved. The netizen mentioned that the main issue was the bus entrance and exit and the alighting bay which becomes very congested during peak hours. Fitra Hamzah suggested having a "Buggy Request Button" along the alighting bay for the elderly. Zydan Nadyz observed that the berth for bus service 904 had no railings and was far from the rest of the berths.
Jacelyn Chia Yee Fang, a third-year polytechnic student, suggested to have more art displays at MRT stations. She mentioned that it was encouraging to see various forms of art by Singaporean artists displayed at MRT stations, such as at Newton and Botanic Gardens.She said that sculptures, performance art and mixed media art could also be displayed in older MRT stations, especially those located in the neighbourhoods of Singapore, to showcase iconic landmarks.SMRT could also partner with the National Arts Council to bring engaging art experiences to various communities in Singapore. The writer added that with the older MRT lines undergoing track renewal works, it would also be apt to have the artwork showcase MRT staff who are working tirelessly behind the scenes to provide commuters seamless travel.
?Maria Tan? was grateful to the SMRT staff at Nicoll Highway MRT Station for keeping her debit card safe. The netizen mentioned topping up her EZ-Link card using her debit card but forgot to take the debit card after the transaction. Fortunately the staff held on to the debit card until the netizen came back for it.
?Adrian Quek? reported that the EZ-Link card reader on bus service 912 (TIB1143Y) was faulty.
Malaysias Prime Minister Najib Razak announced that Singapore and Malaysia would sign the Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) for the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur high-speed rail (HSR) project in mid-2016.Meanwhile, a spokesman from Singapore's Ministry of Transport shared that both countries plan to hold the signing ceremony at the next Leaders Retreat, which would be held in Malaysia.Once complete, the HSR project was expected to shorten the travel time between Singapore and Kuala Lumpur to just 90 minutes. It currently takes nearly four hours to travel between the two cities by car, around five hours by express coach, and up to eight hours by train. Several netizens doubted that the Malaysian Prime Minister would honour the MOU. Mac Taghoier wondered why the terminus would be in Jurong East, saying that it was shorter to travel from Singapore to Kuala Lumpur than to travel from Jurong East to the CBD. Wong Heng Kwong hoped that there would be a structure to guarantee that the money for the project would not be misused and go only to someones bank account. Lemon Squeezy wondered why Singapore was agreeing to the MOU when the MOU means nothing to Malaysia.
On SMRT Facebook Page, ?HT Helena? mentioned that s/he had yet to receive an update regarding the lost EZ-Link card which was reported to the Bugis Downtown Line station on Jan 7. SMRT replied that Bugis Downtown Line was managed by SBS Transit.
Nurulasyikin Sa'ad praised the bus captain of service 911 for remaining calm despite being verbally abused by a passenger.
SMRT had re-categorised its operating expenses tohighlight aggregate maintenance-related expenses (MRE) in a bid to better illustrate its total maintenance cost. As a result, repair & maintenance (R&M) cost in Q3 ended Dec 31, 2015, almost tripled from 11.3% of S$303M in operating expenses, to 30.9%.Manfred Seah, SMRT Chief Financial Officer explained that this was done to "give better resolution of what the total maintenance looks like for the group'', so that the public would understand that the company was focusing on maintenance.Equipment depreciation related to maintenance and repair is also moved into this category.SMRT was expecting the MRE for rail to hit 50% in Q4 and the next financial year, as rising maintenance costs outpace revenue. Norman Ng mentioned that the operational state of the system spoke for itself, that the public would not complain if the trains were able to run trouble free even if nothing was spent on maintenance. Similarly, the public would be complaining if billions of dollars were spent on maintenance while the system continues to breakdown.Teo Yew Chuan Teo said that SMRT should stop purchasing China-made rail materials.
?Wilson Tan? reported that the bus captain of service 176 (SMB335U) did not stop at Haw Par Villa bus stop despite commuters at the bus stop flagging it down. Glenc Soh mentioned that several commuters had already reported similar incidents but SMRT had yet to take action.The SMRT Facebook Administrator has responded to the netizen to provide more details of his experience so that it can be looked into.
?Alexander Dennis Fong? hoped that SMRT wins the Seletar bus package. The netizen mentioned being exasperated with foreign operators who do not understand the needs of locals.
On Facebook, On The Road shared a video showing SMRT taxi driver dumping his cigarette butt on the road along Bukit Panjang Road. Chay Him suggested making an official report if the netizen was willing to take the stand if the National Environment Agency would press charges against the taxi driver.
?Ernest Wong? posted about the Epica taxi that he rented from SMRT which had been in and out of the repair shop for 10 out of the 35 days he had been driving it. Several netizens suggested changing the vehicle to a Prius or Sonata which could have higher fuel costs but less problems. Others said that hiring a good mechanic would solve his problem. Johnny Ang said that the driver should ask SMRT for a refund of rental.
?Caleb Lee? asked SMRT to look into the deployment of WABs for service 854. The netizen mentioned that at around 2 p.m. onwards, more non-WABs arrived at Bedok interchange.
huihong started a thread regarding an announcement s/he heard at Orchard MRT station stating that "Due to wet and slippery tracks, MRT trains will be travelling at a slower speed for your safety". lalalalalala wondered how traveling slower on tracks was for the safety of commuters. progene asked if trains in other countries also slow down and experience faults when it rains. ahdotx said that it was better for trains to travel at a slower speed than to break down.
The proposed regulatory framework for private-hire cars yesterday drew mixed responses: While private-hire car operators welcomed it, the National Taxi Association (NTA) urged the authorities to take bolder steps to ensure a level playing field for cabbies whose livelihoods have been affected by these services.Transport analysts stated that the regulations signalled a light-touch approach by the Government, and set minimum standards that should be expected of drivers providing a public service. Disparities in regulations were also raised by analysts and taxi drivers interviewed such as the lack of requirements for private-hire car drivers to provide mileage driven and lack of a stipulated minimum age for Private Hire Car Driver Vocational Licencing (PDVL) applicants. In a press statement, NTA executive adviser Ang Hin Kee said the association was glad that commuters safety and security concerns were taken into account. He noted, however, that there should be a clear and transparent accountability system provided by private-hire services to facilitate proper recourse for commuters embroiled in accidents or disputes.Ang also urged the removal of unnecessary rules for the taxi industry, such as requiring taxis to run a minimum of 250km daily.Thor MG disapproved that the NTA was asking for easier rules for taxis when they were the ones who messed up the industry.
On Facebook, a video was posted showing a rail grinding vehicle being operated at Jurong East MRT station early on Jun 5, as train services at 13 North-South and East-West Lines MRT stations began about 90 minutes later than usual to allow more time for maintenance works to be carried out. A new paid parallel bus service plying between Joo Koon and Bukit Gombak MRT stations also began operating on Jun 5 for commuters who needed to travel before 7 a.m. Existing bus services were also available for commuters between Jurong East and Queenstown stations. In the meantime, marshals from SMRT were deployed at the stations to inform commuters of the services available to them. Some commuters, however, said that their trips were slightly delayed because they were not familiar with the new arrangements. Several netizens asked why the rail maintenance had to be covered by the media and made it look like a big issue. Raymond Lee considered the media coverage of the maintenance works a publicity stunt to show and justify the late opening of the 13 MRT stations. Boon Huat Tan stated that no amount of publicity could reverse the deterioration of rail services if the root problems were not resolved. Alexander Dennis Fong said that maintenance was actually an important job but there was no need for any media presence. Abdul Qayyum appreciated SMRT for trying hard to resolve the issues.
Zaihan Kariyani waited for half an hour for service 171 at Yishun Temporary Bus Interchange.
?Janice Ang? reported a staff at HarbourFront MRT station for being rude after she unknowingly queued at the gate entry for passengers in wheelchair. The netizen mentioned that the Caucasians who were ahead of her in the line were not asked to transfer to a regular queue.
Nanaa Hernandez? asked why the trains travelling towards Jurong East on the North-South Line were delayed. In her post on 11 Jan at 6.32am, the netizen mentioned waiting for the train for 15 to 20 minutes although the display board showed that the train would arrive in six minutes.
?Sharon Laychen? reported that late arrival of Bus Parallel Service 1 (BPS1) at Segar Roads first bus stop towards Choa Chu Kang. The netizen mentioned that the usual 5 to 10-minute wait was now between 20-30 minutes. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the bus timings and to educate its bus captains on the importance of accurate arrivals to commuters. The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen so that the team can follow up.
Gary Khun? boarded a southbound train from Bishan MRT station Mar 8 and noticed that there was no air-conditioning nor proper ventilation near door B4 on train car 3352. The netizen hoped that SMRT would look into the issue.
Swee Heng Tan? asked why there were no notices to inform commuters that there was ongoing lift maintenance at Bedok and Tanjong Pagar MRT stations.
Harun posted photos of the SMRT bus which showed a Happy Deepavali greeting on its electronic display system at the bus stop at HarbourFront Centre. Several netizens stated that it was just a simple mistake and should not be made into a big issue. AISTST assumed that the particular bus was last used on Deepavali period and that the program was not changed. CaseyakaHZG said that the incorrect greeting reflected how SMRT handles the system. The netizen mentioned that if the staff could not even differentiate between Chinese New Year and Deepavali, the public could not expect SMRT to manage the MRT without malfunctions. Pravin Raj Sukumaran said that the electronic display system might have malfunctioned.
?Ling Tun? commended the bus captain of service 176 (TIB1051D) for being very polite. SMRT thanked the netizen for the compliment.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) started a contest on its Facebook page for the most creative 6-word story challenge, about interesting things that commuters do during their daily commute.The five most creative entries would win prizes worth more than S$50. On HardwareZone Forum, PoloBoiBoi believed that there would be interesting contest submissions. Many netizens participated, with several saying that they take advantage of their commute to sleep or rest for a while. Several, on the other hand, mentioned that when taking public transport, they worried about breakdowns. Sara Jamz suggested that LTA should change its tagline We Keep Your World Moving' because of the frequent breakdowns.
Netizens continued to discuss the 2016 Fare Review Exercise. The Public Transport Council (PTC) stated that in consideration of the applications by transport operators for fare adjustments, it would ensure that the fares would reach a balance between ensuring that the public transport system would be financially sustainable and that fares were maintained affordable for the customers.Fares might also be lowered by as much as 5.7% because of the drop in energy prices.Ms Tammy Tan, SBS Transit's Senior Vice President for Corporate Communications said it would make an announcement if they would submit an application for fare adjustments. SMRT did not confirm if it would be submitting an application for fare adjustments. Some netizens wondered how the fares for buses under the new contracting model would be determined. Daniel Yong mocked that the fare exercise should be renamed as 2016 Fare increase exercise.
?Calicia Jasmine Lim? reported that the noise from machines and shouting from workers at the tracks near her residential estate in Limbang area had never bothered her until it woke her up at about 2.30am.She added that she was on medication as was unwell, and closing the windows also did not help to reduce the noise.Assuming that it was due to sleeper replacement works, the netizen said that she understood the works were essential for the safety of commuters.The netizen also asked about the noise barriers that were planned to be installed as stated on SMRTs website. Syed M Daniel shared that he lives near the tracks at Pasir Ris and have to bear with the noise regardless of whether he was unwell. Calicia Jasmine Lim hoped that the noise barriers will be installed to minimise inconvenience to residents.The SMRT Facebook Administrator has reached out to the netizen.
?Colin Tan? boarded an SMRT taxi with licence plate number SHB5142G from VivoCity to Pasir Ris. The netizen noticed that the driver was speaking with someone on his mobile using the hands free settings throughout the journey.
Beyond a speedier commute, Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong had a bigger vision for the Singapore-Kuala Lumpur High-Speed Rail (HSR) project: One that would change the way we think about Singapore and Malaysia and draw our peoples and economies together, akin to the London-Paris, Taipei-Kaohsiung and Tokyo-Osaka rail links.With the ripple effect of the project, development in Malaysia looks set to surge, as developers fight for the newly-accessible prime estate along the tracks, awakening now-sleepy towns hosting transit stations.Analysts suggested that multinational companies could position their headquarters in Singapore, and shift their production lines to the smaller towns in Malaysia. These smaller towns could potentially be used for back office functions and less vital office functions, where land is cheaper.Back across the Causeway, Singaporeans could benefit from more affordable housing options, to opportunities for business expansion. Meanwhile, some experts stated that the upcoming HSR between Singapore and Malaysia could pose a serious threat to budget carriers especially since its fares are expected to be equal or lower than what low-cost airlines currently charge.The option has been made even more attractive with Singapore and Malaysias agreement to co-locate their Customs and Immigration facilities at three places: Singapore, Iskandar Puteri and Kuala Lumpur. This means that commuters would be cleared by the authorities on both sides at the point of departure. Several netizens stated that it was still too early to predict the HSRs impact on the economy and whether travellers would prefer it over budget airlines. Some wondered how much budget from the project would be siphoned by Malaysia. Christina The stated that if the HSR terminates in the city, it would compete with the budget airlines. Chun Chew Lam believed that the competition between the HSR and budget airline operators could only be good for travellers.
Netizens continued to discuss the accident between a GrabCar, SMRT bus service 169 and a delivery van along Yishun Avenue 3 on August 1. Grab driver Francis Michael said he was ferrying three passengers when his car suddenly shook violently. When he turned around, he saw his passengers covered in glass as his rear windshield had shattered.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRT's Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, confirmed that an SMRT bus was involved in an accident and that SMRT has contacted the injured parties and was already providing all necessary assistance. Several netizens wondered whether Grab passengers were covered by insurance during accidents. Others blamed the Grab driver for the accident. A few pointed out that it was the SMRT bus that hit the back of the GrabCar. reiko was uncertain the Grab drivers have commercial insurance coverage.
On Facebook, Emily, a new SMRT intern, shared a video of her interview with Bus Captain (BC) Uncle Tan whom she thought was rather heroic. Bus Captain Tans photo was recently shared online where he was photographed as he stopped and alighted from his vehicle to remove a large tree branch off the road. BC Tan said that he did it for the safety of his passengers and other motorists. In the video, he also shared that this was something he had to do. Danish Mohamed mentioned that BC Tan deserved a pat on his back for his heroic action. Rafiq Exclusinga said that SMRT was truly the best.
Netizens continued to discuss the incentives given by LTA to SBS Transit and SMRT for improved bus service reliability under the BSRF scheme. Many netizens stated that bus services should be punctual and that bus operators should not be rewarded for services they were paid to do. Arthur Gow disapproved of using taxpayers money to buy more buses to improve the timings and afterwards reward the operators for improving the timings. Salihin Hin would not mind rewarding the bus operators as long as the reward goes directly to the bus captains and other staff that run the service. useme explained that the reward was an incentive for the operators to perform better. Before the implementation of the reward scheme, the netizen said that bus operators profit from providing service at current service levels and had no motivation to try to do better. Locnil Yup wondered whether operators would also face penalties if their bus waiting times increase. lobo_arisen pointed out that the sample size of the scheme was only 34, and 7 out of these bus routes did not meet the targets, yet the operators still received rewards. R?nin47 mentioned that being on time should be the goal, even if those target schedules were in themselves subjective, if not arbitrary. Joseph Loh stated that the reward scheme resulted in more accidents because the bus captains were forced to meet the bus timings.
?Eileen Koh? reported waiting for Night Rider 1 (NR1) bus service for 55 minutes. The netizen pointed out that frequency of NR1 was supposed to be every 29 minutes.
Netizens continued to discuss the three train delays on August 2, with two track faults occurring on the North-South Line and another on the East-West Line.Mr Patrick Nathan, SMRTs Vice President for Corporate Information and Communications, said that the trackside signalling equipment lost power for the East-West Line disruption. Some netizens stated that SMRT should resolve current MRT issues before building more MRT tracks.
On his latest blog post, Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan mentioned that the North-South Line (NSL) achieved 100 days without any major incident. The Downtown Line also passed 178 days without any major incident.He stated that among the five MRT lines, two have already crossed the 100-day mark. Minister Khaw mentioned that the entry of NSL was especially inspiring as it is the oldest MRT line. Its success gave them confidence that with hard work and strong determination, rail reliability could be improved. The Minister explained that as they seek to stabilise the existing system and make them more reliable, authorities were also expanding rail capacity, upgrading the power system and replacing ageing assets. Many of these engineering tasks have to be carried out during the three to four engineering hours per day.He added that they would monitor the effectiveness of the late opening of the North-South and East-West Lines on Sunday mornings, to provide the engineers with more valuable time to work, and if needed, they might extend it further. They would also try to minimise the inconvenience caused, and hoped that commuters would be understanding. Several netizens congratulated SMRT for the 100 disruption-free days on the North-South Line. Some stated that credit should be given to the maintenance people for working hard day and night to keep the trains moving without disruption. Others countered that there were disruptions on the NSL in the past month. Shane Toh said that there should never be any disruption in the first place. Lydia Lin hoped that all the workers would be rewarded for their hard work.
Zalia Lily Po'eman? reported that one of the USB slots at the mobile charging points at Orchard Station was loose, while the other three were not working. The netizen hoped that SMRT could rectify the issue.
Sarah Rahim mentioned accidentally dropping her EZ-Link card inside the track when she was about to alight at Bugis station. The netizen was surprised to receive a call from SMRT the same day informing the netizen that the travel card had been recovered. The netizen thanked Michael, SMRT staff at Bugis, for his kind assistance and great service.
Netizens continued to discuss LTAs agreement with SBS Transit and SMRT to move their bus services under the new Government bus contracting model starting September 1. Various news channels also continued to post about the agreement.Mr Sitoh Yih Pin, Chairman of the Government Parliamentary Committee for Transport stated that "It is too early to tell if service will effectively improve. We will have to allow the new model to be in play for a sustained period before any judgment can be made." He added that LTA would be more responsive to changes in ridership with the new model. Meanwhile, industry players and investors welcome the switch to the new bus contracting model.Mr Gan Juay Kiat, SBS Transit Chief Executive, stated that they were glad that the terms of the contract had been successfully concluded. He mentioned that commuters could expect higher level of service.SMRT Buses managing director Tan Kian Heong said that SMRT has always been committed to delivering high levels of operational reliability, safety and service. The transition to the bus contracting model will allow SMRT to have a stronger focus on these areas and better fulfil its role as a public transport operator for the benefit of all commuters.Mr Derrick Heng, Maybank Kim Eng analyst, believed that the new model would be positive for the two companies as it would free the operators from revenue risks.Mr Andy Sim, DBS Equity Research Senior Vice President, said the move should indicate well for the two companies, whose bus operations "are running at low profitability".RHB Research, however, believed that the new model would greatly affect the transport operators operating margins. Sp Fairley mentioned that the Government could buy all the listed shares of SBS Transit and SMRT that were not already Government-owned with the S$7.2B.
gallyban stated that pregnant commuters should not take the MRT because it can be dangerous when other commuters shove or push them. Many commuters do not give up their seats to them. Several netizens agreed with the thread starter saying that pregnant passengers should be banned from taking the MRT. spiramirabilis stated that there were others that should be banned from taking the MRT such as those carrying big bags, noisy school children and the elderly. OddEye said that aside from elderly, those with disabilities should also be banned from taking the MRT.
?Sp Zo? mentioned that bus service 912 was getting from bad to worse, with frequent bus bunching. S/he also wondered about the roles of staff in SMRT t-shirts who held clipboards at Woodlands Temporary Bus Interchange. S/he claimed that they were not doing their job to report about the issues with bus bunching. Toh Ken Ian said that the issue was caused by the traffic jam at the checkpoint.
?Aloysius Liow? asked SMRT to look into the air-conditioning issue in train cabin numbers 213/214 travelling along the East-West Line.
walaneh shared the Twitter post by SBS Transit regarding the delay in train service at the Downtown Line (DTL) due to a train fault. FaTa said that too much money was spent on DTL just for commuters to experience 10-20 minutes of slower trains.
Haziq Nazid? posted on (buses[IN]gapore!) Facebook page regarding the new SG series licence plates used by public buses. (buses[IN]gapore!) explained that the SG prefix series were being used because the Government now owned the public buses and the old licence plates would be converted to the SG series.
Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan told Parliament on Feb 29 that the 50km Cross Island Line (CRL) would be an important part of Singapore's rail network, with about 30 stations - nearly all of them interchanges to other MRT lines - that would offer commuters many travel options.Minister Khaw, however, stated that more environmental and engineering studies, along with public consultations, must be done to determine whether the underground CRL would be built through the CCNR route or around it., which would take more than two years.The Minister added that the public should keep an open mind, go with the facts and look at the evidence. starmerck stated with sarcasm that the LTA should just cut through the forest because the economy in Singapore was more important than saving a small part of nature. nyvrem said that the golf course and all the forest around should be removed to build a Sinkiecon Valley (paronomasia of Silicon Valley). The netizen mentioned that the reservoir area could be made into a large park with a lake similar to New Yorks Central Park.
GrabTaxi Singapore opened a new driver support centre for its drivers at Jurong East to add to its existing supporting centre at Midview City in Sin Ming. Another centre in Bedok would be opened in August.Mr Melvin Vu, GrabTaxi Singapore Deputy Head, said that the new centres demonstrated Grab's commitment to support the taxi industry despite the growing popularity of private-hire car services such as its own GrabCar. Ruzaini Juaxis Syazwan stated that Grab should learn to pay their partner drivers on time before expanding its business.
In a joint statement, Infocomm Development Authority of Singapore, Land Transport Authority (LTA), National Parks Board and Urban Redevelopment Authority announced on August 18 a new bus stop concept, named Project Bus Stop, which have features such as free Wi-Fi, charging points, interactive smart boards, bicycle parking, and a swing, to make waiting buses fun for commuters. This experimental project is located along Jurong Gateway Road at Jurong East Central which would be in operation for a year. The public were encouraged to share their experiences using the bus stop. Most netizens stated that authorities should try to shorten the waiting times for buses instead of introducing such initiatives. Steven Waliter believed that authorities were trying to distract the public from the real issues such as the long waiting times of buses.
?Melvin See? reported waiting for bus service 811 at Yishun for 40 minutes. The netizen mentioned that three service 811A had arrived and left but there was no sight of service 811. The netizen asked SMRT to look into the issue.
?Mei Rui Hang? stated that SMRT had yet to repair the torn protective folding bellows of the pivoting joint of the articulated bus with plate number TIB1039R, which had been reported a month ago. Jeriel Lim shared a photo to show that the articulator was joined by a chassis jack below the bus and not by the folding bellows.[Note: CMC has acknowledged the feedback from the netizen and our team from Buses are looking into it.]
Lew Sin Hoe suggested that the LTA and bus operators should make bus travel more elderly and wheelchair user friendly instead of applying cosmetic changes such as nice bus stops and USB charging ports on buses.The netizen pointed out that residents living along Choa Chu Kang Avenue 3 and Teck Whye Avenue did not have direct bus service to Bukit Panjang MRT station. Residents had to take a bus to Bukit Panjang Road then use the overhead bridge or signalised crossing to get to the MRT station. Alternatively, they must take a bus to Choa Chu Kang Road and get on another bus. Lew Sin Hoe stated that the journey could be difficult for elderly commuters and challenging for people in wheelchairs.The netizen hoped that the authorities could do something to address the problem.
?Dan Fang? reported that the waiting time for the train at Expo MRT station was up to 15 minutes during the peak hour at 6:30 p.m.
On behalf of her sister, Suhaidah Ghapar? thanked SMRT taxi driver Koh (SHB1891H) for his kindness and willingness to send over her sisters mobile phone that was left inside the taxi.
Commuters heading to the Sports Hub on Jul 30 to attend the NDP preview faced delays on the Circle Line because of a system fault. Several netizens hoped that trains would not breakdown during the actual NDP on Aug 9. Some suggested having alternative transport such as trams to accommodate the increase in population. Others said that car owners should not be encouraged to give up their cars if public transport was not reliable. nagyagyutunder mentioned being stuck in the train which was heading to Dakota station for at least 15 minutes.
Joanne Poh wrote about the biggest complaints about public transport and what could be done to try to get around them.1. Waiting time for taxis 2. Waiting time for buses 3. MRT breakdowns4. Missing the last trainThe netizen suggested booking a taxi a day in advance when needing a cab during rush hours, although there were would be a booking fee of about S$6 to S$8. Bus riders should download the Intelligent Route Information System (IRIS) app to check the waiting time of buses. This would help a commuter plan to use a different service or alternative transport if the bus would be arriving late.While commuters could do nothing to prevent or predict MRT breakdowns, or even to make contingency transport plans, they could always make sure they were equipped to survive being trapped in an MRT cabin, on the platform or at a bus stop. Make sure that mobile devices are always fully charged and have some reading material to keep busy when stuck in one place for a long time. The writer also suggested setting an alarm as an alert for the last train and always check the time of the last bus or train services so as not to miss the last train or bus.
?KupLai Lai? shared a video showing SMRT bus service 856 making an illegal right turn at Admiralty Road West and Senoko Avenue. SMRT has reached out to the netizen for more details so that the team can look into it. CMC has informed Buses, and the team is currently investigating the incident.
In a joint news release, the LTA and SMRT announced the new bus loop service which would ply between Bukit Panjang LRT station and Choa Chu Kang North 5 starting Apr 24. Bus service 979M would provide residents of Choa Chu Kang North 5 direct connection to the key transport node at Bukit Panjang MRT Station from 6am to 11:30 pm daily.This temporary route would be integrated into service 979 when modification and widening of the junction between Stagmont Ring and Woodlands Road is completed. MaiMoon Sidik stated that the bus service at Bukit Panjang MRT was good, fast and convenient. The unpleasant journey was with service 979 from Choa Chu Kang to Bukit Panjang MRT because of the long wait for the bus. Allan Tan wondered why the said service could not stop at Yew Tee MRT station bus stop.
Train service between Joo Koon and Boon Lay in both directions were disrupted in the evening of Mar 22 due to a traction power fault. Free bus services were activated between the affected stations. Several netizens suggested that the MRT system should be shut down for a complete audit and overhaul to rectify all the issues. Some were frustrated that train services were disrupted twice the same day. ??? stated that Singapore should stop and think what could be done to improve the safety and reliability of the MRT. Ken Ho said that both the North-South and East-West Lines were affected by the disruption. He mentioned waiting for the train for eight minutes. Hard0n mentioned being stuck in Bedok Station for 25 minutes. lalalalalala said that the whole line was down and had no power from Boon Lay to Joo Koon.
Certain stations along the East-West Line (EWL) would close half an hour earlier from Sundays to Thursdays, except on the eve of public holidays, starting 14 Feb in order to facilitate the ongoing sleeper replacement exercise. The early closure would affect stations between Tanah Merah to Pasir Ris, and between Joo Koon to Jurong East, and was expected to end in August. Some netizens stated that the slowing down of trains meant longer travelling time for commuters. Yg Tan said that there should be 100% revamp of the rail system no matter how costly it might be. Shannon Perry Ignatius thanked the workers who were working in the wee hours.
Shawn Wee claimed that an SMRT taxi driver had been booking Grab rides to far and remote places but always cancelled the said booking in an attempt to destroy Grab drivers' acceptance rates (AR) and cancellation rates (CR), which would ultimately affect the victim driver's incentives and earnings.The netizen also claimed that this had been happening for some time and on numerous occasions. The bookers profile has been shared amongst many Uber and Grab's Facebook groups. Most netizens asked for evidence that it was an SMRT taxi driver who was doing the booking and cancellation. Some stated that taxi drivers and private car-hire drivers should not spread hatred since they all face the same issues and were just making an honest living. Others asked for proof that it was indeed a SMRT taxi driver.
In the latest Customer Satisfaction Index from April 2016 to July 2016 published by Institute of Service Excellence at Singapore Management University, the MRT had a customer satisfaction score of 66.4 despite reports of MRT service disruptions from time to time.A total of 13,355 respondents were polled for the survey conducted by the Singapore Management University (SMU).According to the SMU survey, all other Singapore transport like taxi services and airport services saw vast improvements as compared to a year ago. The credibility of SMU, however, has recently been under scrutiny with many speculating that the university was now producing fictitious reports to suit the Governments agenda, similar to the Singapore Press Holdings. Most netizens wondered who participated in the survey that resulted in increased satisfaction with MRT services. Some asked who would be happy with the MRT when commuters arrive late at work because of frequent delays. Others said that the surveys should be posted online so that many could participate. A few stated that there was no need to conduct any survey since the frequent delays and disruptions could be used as gauge to measure customer satisfaction.
On WonderPeace Blog, the blogger asked whether SMRTs top priority was safety or service reliability because SMRT CEO Desmond Kuek once said that "the safety of our people has always been the utmost priority", but at the same time SMRT was quoted saying it is their "priority to deliver a high level of reliability" in its train network. The blogger believed that SMRTs priority was likely the service reliability over staff safety as the CEO himself said that to have a team of staff walking along the 0.5m wide maintenance track while the train is in operation was "standard...It is a routine activity". By treating high hazard work as 'routine', the head of SMRT has trivialized the importance of safety. The deeper problem, according to the blogger, could be that SMRTs safety culture which could affect the quality and standard of the operation safety procedures and staff compliance to them. For high risk work, the basic requirements were the use of operation checklists and maintenance of communication between the maintenance team and station control. The most uncomfortable possibility, however, was that the team took unnecessary risks to minimize train service disruption due to pressure from the top.
The Land Transport Authority (LTA) would be spending $50,000 to produce a video to promote bus driving as a career as it ramps up Singapore's public bus fleet to raise service standards, as well as to meet increasing demand.The video which would be screened at recruitment fairs that bus operators hold, would also be used to raise public awareness about the role of bus drivers.The production is part of a wider "branding and promotion" effort by LTA to "boost the image for both the rail and bus sectors" this year. The authority has contracted production house Little Red Ants to produce the video.On Mar 28, an SBS Transit bus was seen plying Upper Serangoon Road with a video camera strapped to its right, above the front wheel, with a spider mount. Another bus mounted with a similar camera plied Hougang, Sengkang and Punggol. The cameras, however, had been dismounted because of "complaints from the public". lalalalalala stated that the cost of the video filming was more than the annual salary of drivers. jeff79 mentioned that those who would be recruited as bus drivers would be later retrenched as LTA was reportedly considering to introduce driverless buses.
On Facebook, Member of Parliament Kwek Hian Chuan Henry mentioned that 16 more SBS Transit buses would become wheelchair-accessible, including its Express bus service 549.This means that 95% of SBS Transit buses were now wheelchair-accessible, along with many more SMRT buses as well.He hoped that all buses and bus stops in Singapore would be wheelchair-accessible soon.
?Huong LG? was frustrated that commuters of the train on the North-East Line towards Marina Bay were asked to alight at Ang Mo Kio Station for a track inspection. After many commuters had alighted from the train, an SMRT staff announced that there was no track inspection but the train door had already closed for the commuters to board the train again. Commuters were forced to wait for the next train, but no apologies were given for the inconvenience caused.The netizen corrected herself that the incident happened at the North-South Line and not at the North-East Line after Eric Weidenfeller pointed out the correct rail line.
?Wang Kang Rong? asked SMRT why its parking agents do not wear high visibility safety vests while at the bus park, similar to those worn by maintenance crew on the tracks.
?Alexander Dennis Fong? asked SMRT to deploy double-decker or bendy buses every afternoon for service 188 at bus stop 44151 opposite Bukit Batok fire station.
Commuters on the North-South Line experienced major delays and slower train speed in the morning of August 30 due to a track fault and train congestion. SMRT first tweeted about the track fault at about 6.08 a.m., announcing that there was no train service from Yew Tee to Bukit Gombak MRT stations. It added that free regular bus services had been activated. Mr Patrick Nathan, Vice President of Corporate Information and Communications at SMRT, said that the delays were caused by a fault that was traced back to track-side signalling equipment near Choa Chu Kang MRT station. Trains were manually driven at 18km/hr over the affected stretch for the safety of passengers. SMRT said that it is carrying out investigations into the cause of the fault, and apologised for the inconvenience caused.On social media, commuters expressed frustration over the delays and posted photos of the crowd at the platforms and long queues at some stations. Commuters on the Circle Line also experienced delays, the second day in a row after train signalling issues on the Circle Line on August 29. Several stated that the delays were longer than the announced 20-minute additional travelling time. Several observed that there were not enough staff members to do crowd control and assist commuters on where to take the free buses. A few commented that SBS Transit did a better job in making announcements to alert commuters of the disruptions as compared to SMRT. Many netizens were disappointed with the lack of announcements about the train service disruption. Some said that not everyone has Twitter and Facebook accounts. Others mentioned that the delay had caused staff to report late for work and students late for their exams. Some made sarcastic remarks referencing to the recent announcement made by Minister Khaw Boon Wan regarding the increase in fares to improve public transport service standards. Matahari Dinihari suggested that SMRT should provide shuttle buses to drop affected passengers to several main designated areas such as Bishan for the Circle Line or Toa Payoh for the city centre. Idah San also suggested deploying more buses to various destinations during train disruptions so passengers would have more options to choose from. The netizen shared that bus service 979 could take commuters to Bukit Panjang on the Downtown Line or they could alight along Woodlands Road towards Bukit Panjang to take other buses to their destinations. TimothyTan wondered why no SMRT engineers could resolve the signalling issue on the Circle Line. ?Usha Krish-Soman? said that the staff at Yew Tee MRT station should learn how to communicate effectively and learn how to disseminate correct information to the public. The netizen claimed that the staff at the Passenger Service Centre were unaware of the announcements that there were free bus services to Jurong East.
?Muhd Naz Farihin complimented the staff from the Woodlands team and Bus Captain Wadud (74483) for their professionalism in handling the crowd and a breakdown situation while ensuring passenger safety. The netizen mentioned that the SMRT bus broke down because of a radiator issue. Smoke was seen coming out of the radiator and also inside the bus. The netizen praised the bus captain for handling the situation in a calm and swift manner, and requested to send his regards to the bus captain.
?CH Lee? claimed that the taxi driver of vehicle with plate number SHB743J took a longer route to his home, adding that the driver had done it on purpose.As a result, the usual distance fare of S$15 became S$22.
Haldrian Iriawan? thanked the bus captain of service 966 for finding his/her laptop that was left onboard the bus. The netizen did not expect to get his/her laptop back so s/he was thankful that it had been found.
In a joint media release, SMRT and the National Transport Workers' Union (NTWU) announced that the transport operator would be introducing initiatives in early-2016 as it looks to increase its headcount.SMRT would be adjusting the basic salaries of bus captains upwards so that they will "at least be on par with the market". Other initiatives would include enhanced health and fitness benefits, an enhanced joining bonus and staff referral scheme, a sign-on bonus of up to S$3,000, as well as training and courses for staff. SMRT added that bus captains with more years of service would also enjoy two to three more days of annual leave.The company was also aiming to increase its headcount by 700 rail staff and about 500 new bus staff. Several netizens stated that SMRT only started to offer more to its employees after new players had stepped into the market with better compensation packages. Some speculated that with the increase in salary of its staff, SMRT would soon apply for a fare increase. Gary Wu coaxed SMRT to lead by example by offering higher pay to its employees rather than just at par with the market.
In a press release on Apr 7, British-based bus company Go-Ahead said that it hoped to fill the 700 bus captain positions before it commences operation by the third quarter of the year. They have already hired a total of 424 bus captains which constitutes 60% of the 700 bus captain positions.Nigel Wood, Go-Ahead Managing Director, said that "they look to provide their employees with an excellent work environment, as well as career progression opportunities through training and development. Peter Tan stated that Go-Ahead had a great concept and hoped that the Singaporeans and permanent residents could adopt the British way of service. Marianne Pereira asked whether Go-Ahead would be giving drivers who do not speak English basic lessons in English. carbikebus speculated that out of the 66 new recruits, at least 30% would quit before or just after the start of its operations.
The Land Transport Authority announced that it was looking into several family-friendly initiatives to make public transport facilities user-friendly and accessible for commuters with various needs.In a press release, LTA said it has been collaborating with institutes of higher learning such as the National University of Singapore High School of Mathematics and Science and Nanyang Polytechnic to study a restraint system for open prams on public buses. The safety of the pram users, the child in the pram and other passengers on the buses, as well as the needs of other bus passengers, especially wheelchair users, will be taken into consideration.Additionally, all new bus interchanges and integrated transport hubs, such as those at Bukit Panjang, Outram, Sengkang, Shenton Way and Tampines, would have a standalone nursing room with diaper-changing amenities and a wash basin.Subsequently, all rail stations along the future Thomson-East Coast Line (TEL) and Circle Line 6 would have family-friendly washrooms, comprising a diaper-changing station, child-size toilet seat and barrier-free facilities, alongside the main toilets in the unpaid area. Some of the other measures LTA is implementing to improve accessibility include escalators that can be operated at two different speeds, and travellators at new TEL interchange stations that require walking between lines. There would be priority queues for the elderly, pregnant women, persons with disabilities and parents travelling with prams indicated by stickers at platform screen doors and passenger lifts of all MRT stations by end-2017. Several netizens stated that the LTA should look into improving the efficiency and reliability of transport services instead of focusing on extra services to commuters. Others mentioned that a change in culture was needed. People had to respect what the priority queue, seats and nursing rooms are for. Some disapproved of allowing open prams inside buses and trains. Joyc Lau said that Singapore was way behind other countries such as Taiwan when it comes to nursing and diaper changing rooms where almost every train station was well-equipped with facilities including hot water dispensers and sinks. Frank Chong assumed that transport fares would increase again with the implementation of family-friendly initiatives.
Netizens continued to discuss the issue regarding defective trains that were sent back to its manufacturer for repairs. Transport Minister Khaw Boon Wan said on Tuesday (July 12) that the news of the trains could have caused undue panic and mentioned that if there was a safety issue, the Land Transport Authority (LTA) would have gone public with the information. Most netizens were disappointed with the lack of accountability and transparency by the Government. Several wondered what other issues the Government was hiding from the public. Others speculated that the Government kept the issue under wraps to prevent the publics perception of SMRT to deteriorate further. Some were concerned about safety, saying that even hairline cracks could propagate when subjected to tension caused by high speed movement or vibration. Others asked for the reason behind the need to send back the trains for repair if the cracks were not safety-critical.
